Anarchism is a political philosophy and movement that is skeptical of all justifications for authority and seeks to abolish the institutions it claims maintain unnecessary coercion and hierarchy, typically including nation-states, and capitalism.
Anarchism advocates for the replacement of the state with stateless societies and voluntary free associations.
Albedo (; ) is the fraction of sunlight that is diffusely reflected by a body.
It is measured on a scale from 0 (corresponding to a black body that absorbs all incident radiation) to 1 (corresponding to a body that reflects all incident radiation).
A, or a, is the first letter and the first vowel of the Latin alphabet, used in the modern English alphabet, the alphabets of other western European languages and others worldwide.
Its name in English is a (pronounced ), plural aes.
Alabama () is a state in the Southeastern region of the United States, bordered by Tennessee to the north; Georgia to the east; Florida and the Gulf of Mexico to the south; and Mississippi to the west.
Alabama is the 30th largest by area and the 24th-most populous of the U.S. states.
In Greek mythology, Achilles ( ) or Achilleus () was a hero of the Trojan War who was known as being the greatest of all the Greek warriors.
A central character in Homer's Iliad, he was the son of the Nereid Thetis and Peleus, king of Phthia and famous Argonaut.
Abraham Lincoln ( ; February 12, 1809 – April 15, 1865) was an American lawyer, politician, and statesman who served as the 16th president of the United States from 1861 until his assassination in 1865.
Lincoln led the Union through the American Civil War to defend the nation as a constitutional union and succeeded in defeating the insurgent Confederacy, abolishing slavery, expanding the power of the federal government, and modernizing the U.S. economy.
Aristotle (;  Aristotélēs, ; 384–322 BC) was an Ancient Greek philosopher and polymath.
His writings cover a broad range of subjects spanning the natural sciences, philosophy, linguistics, economics, politics, psychology and the arts.
An American in Paris is a jazz-influenced symphonic poem (or tone poem) for orchestra by American composer George Gershwin first performed in 1928.
It was inspired by the time that Gershwin had spent in Paris and evokes the sights and energy of the French capital during the .
The Academy Award for Best Production Design recognizes achievement for art direction in film.
The category's original name was Best Art Direction, but was changed to its current name in 2012 for the 85th Academy Awards.
The Academy Awards, mainly known as the Oscars, are awards for artistic and technical merit for the film industry.
They are presented annually by the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences located in Beverly Hills, California, United States, in recognition of excellence in cinematic achievements as assessed by the Academy's voting membership.
Actresses (Catalan: Actrius) is a 1997 Catalan language Spanish drama film produced and directed by Ventura Pons and based on the award-winning stage play E.R. by Josep Maria Benet i Jornet.
The film has no male actors, with all roles played by females.
Animalia is an illustrated children's book by Graeme Base.
It was originally published in 1986, followed by a tenth anniversary edition in 1996, and a 25th anniversary edition in 2012.
International Atomic Time (abbreviated TAI, from its French name ) is a high-precision atomic coordinate time standard based on the notional passage of proper time on Earth's geoid.
TAI is a weighted average of the time kept by over 450 atomic clocks in over 80 national laboratories worldwide.
Altruism is the principle and practice of concern for the well-being and/or happiness of other humans or animals.
While objects of altruistic concern vary, it is an important moral value in many cultures and religions.
Alice O'Connor (born Alisa Zinovyevna Rosenbaum; , 1905 – March 6, 1982), better known by her pen name Ayn Rand (), was a Russian-born American writer and public philosopher.
She is known for her fiction and for developing a philosophical system she named Objectivism.
Alain Connes (; born 1 April 1947 in Draguignan) is a French mathematician, known for his contributions to the study of operator algebras and noncommutative geometry.
He is a professor at the , , Ohio State University and Vanderbilt University.
Allan Dwan (born Joseph Aloysius Dwan; April 3, 1885 – December 28, 1981) was a pioneering Canadian-born American motion picture director, producer, and screenwriter.
Early lifeBorn Joseph Aloysius Dwan in Toronto, Ontario, Canada, Dwan was the younger son of commercial traveler of woolen clothing Joseph Michael Dwan (1857–1917) and his wife Mary Jane Dwan (née Hunt).
Algeria, officially the People's Democratic Republic of Algeria, is a country in North Africa.
Algeria is bordered to the northeast by Tunisia; to the east by Libya; to the southeast by Niger; to the southwest by Mali, Mauritania, and Western Sahara; to the west by Morocco; and to the north by the Mediterranean Sea.
This is a list of characters in Ayn Rand's 1957 novel Atlas Shrugged.
Major charactersThe following are major characters from the novel.
Anthropology is the scientific study of humanity, concerned with human behavior, human biology, cultures, societies, and linguistics, in both the present and past, including past human species.
Social anthropology studies patterns of behavior, while cultural anthropology studies cultural meaning, including norms and values.
Agricultural science (or agriscience for short) is a broad multidisciplinary field of biology that encompasses the parts of exact, natural, economic and social sciences that are used in the practice and understanding of agriculture.
Professionals of the agricultural science are called agricultural scientists or agriculturists.
Alchemy (from Arabic: al-kīmiyā; from Ancient Greek: χυμεία, khumeía) is an ancient branch of natural philosophy, a philosophical and protoscientific tradition that was historically practiced in China, India, the Muslim world, and Europe.
In its Western form, alchemy is first attested in a number of pseudepigraphical texts written in Greco-Roman Egypt during the first few centuries AD.
An astronomer is a scientist in the field of astronomy who focuses their studies on a specific question or field outside the scope of Earth.
They observe astronomical objects such as stars, planets, moons, comets and galaxies – in either observational (by analyzing the data) or theoretical astronomy.
ASCII ( ), abbreviated from American Standard Code for Information Interchange, is a character encoding standard for electronic communication.
ASCII codes represent text in computers, telecommunications equipment, and other devices.
Austin is the capital of Texas in the United States.
Austin may also refer to:Geographical locationsAustralia Austin, Western AustraliaCanada Austin, Manitoba Austin, Ontario Austin, Quebec Austin Island, NunavutFrance Saint-Austin, hamlet at la Neuville-Chant-d'Oisel, NormandyUnited States Austin, Arkansas Austin, Colorado Austin Township, Macon County, Illinois Austin, Chicago, Cook County, Illinois Austin, Indiana Austin, Kentucky Austin, Minnesota Austin, Missouri Austin, Nevada Austin, Ohio Austin, Oregon Austin, Pennsylvania Austin, Texas Austin County, Texas (the city of Austin, Texas is located in Travis County)Schools Austin College, Sherman, Texas University of Texas at Austin, flagship institution of the University of Texas System Austin Peay State University, Clarksville, TennesseeReligion Augustine of Hippo An adjective for the AugustiniansBusiness American Austin Car Company, short-lived American automobile maker Austin Automobi
Animation is the method that encompasses myriad filmmaking techniques, by which still images are manipulated to create moving images.
In traditional animation, images are drawn or painted by hand on transparent celluloid sheets (cels) to be photographed and exhibited on film.
Apollo or Apollon is one of the  Olympian deities in classical Greek and Roman religion and Greek and Roman mythology.
Apollo has been recognized as a god of archery, music and dance, truth and prophecy, healing and diseases, the Sun and light, poetry, and more.
Andre Kirk Agassi ( ; born April 29, 1970) is an American former world No. 1 tennis player.
He is an eight-time major champion and an Olympic gold medalist, as well as a runner-up in seven other majors.
The Austroasiatic languages   are a large language family spoken throughout mainland Southeast Asia, South Asia and East Asia.
These languages are natively spoken by the majority of the population in Vietnam and Cambodia, and by minority populations scattered throughout parts of Thailand, Laos, India, Myanmar, Malaysia, Bangladesh, Nepal, and southern China.
The Afroasiatic languages (or Afro-Asiatic, sometimes Afrasian), also known as Hamito-Semitic or Semito-Hamitic, are a language family (or "phylum") of about 400 languages spoken predominantly in West Asia, North Africa, the Horn of Africa, and parts of the Sahara and Sahel.
Over 500 million people are native speakers of an Afroasiatic language, constituting the fourth-largest language family after Indo-European, Sino-Tibetan, and Niger–Congo.
Andorra, officially the Principality of Andorra, is a sovereign landlocked country and microstate on the Iberian Peninsula, in the eastern Pyrenees, bordered by France to the north and Spain to the south.
Believed to have been created by Charlemagne, Andorra was ruled by the count of Urgell until 988, when it was transferred to the Roman Catholic Diocese of Urgell.
In mathematics and statistics, the arithmetic mean ( ), arithmetic average, or just the mean or average (when the context is clear) is the sum of a collection of numbers divided by the count of numbers in the collection.
The collection is often a set of results from an experiment, an observational study, or a survey.
The American Football Conference (AFC) is one of the two conferences of the National Football League (NFL), the highest professional level of American football in the United States.
The AFC and its counterpart, the National Football Conference (NFC), each contain 16 teams with 4 divisions.
Animal Farm is a beast fable, in the form of a satirical allegorical novella, by George Orwell, first published in England on 17 August 1945.
It tells the story of a group of anthropomorphic farm animals who rebel against their human farmer, hoping to create a society where the animals can be equal, free, and happy.
Amphibians are ectothermic, anamniotic, four-limbed vertebrate animals that constitute the class Amphibia.
They are a paraphyletic group encompassing all tetrapods excluding the amniotes (tetrapods with an amniotic membrane, such as modern reptiles, birds, and mammals).
Alaska ( ) is a non-contiguous U.S. state on the northwest extremity of North America.
It borders British Columbia and Yukon in Canada to the east and it shares a western maritime border in the Bering Strait with Russia's Chukotka Autonomous Okrug.
Agriculture encompasses crop and livestock production, aquaculture, fisheries and forestry for food and non-food products.
Agriculture was the key development in the rise of sedentary human civilization, whereby farming of domesticated species created food surpluses that enabled people to live in cities.
Aldous Leonard Huxley ( ; 26 July 1894 – 22 November 1963) was an English writer and philosopher.
His bibliography spans nearly 50 books, including novels and non-fiction works, as well as essays, narratives, and poems.
Ada may refer to:PlacesAfrica Ada Foah, a town in Ghana Ada (Ghana parliament constituency)
Ada, Osun, a town in NigeriaAsia Ada, Urmia, a village in West Azerbaijan Province, Iran Ada, Karaman, a village in Karaman Province, TurkeyEurope Ada, Bosnia and Herzegovina, a village Ada, Croatia, a village Ada, Serbia, a town and municipality Ada Ciganlija or Ada, a river island artificially turned into a peninsula in Belgrade, SerbiaUnited States  Ada, Alabama, an unincorporated community Ada County, Idaho Ada, Kansas, an unincorporated community Ada Township, Michigan Ada, Minnesota, a city Ada Township, Dickey County, North Dakota Ada, Ohio, a village Ada, Oklahoma, a city Ada, Oregon, an unincorporated community Ada Township, Perkins County, South Dakota Ada, West Virginia, an unincorporated community Ada, Wisconsin, an unincorporated communityOther Ada River (disambiguation), various rivers 523 Ada, an asteroidFilm and television Ada TV, a   televis
Aberdeen is a city in Scotland.
Aberdeen may also refer to:PlacesAfrica  Aberdeen, Sierra Leone Aberdeen, Eastern Cape, South AfricaAsiaHong Kong  Aberdeen, Hong Kong, an area and town on southwest Hong Kong Island Aberdeen Channel, a channel between Ap Lei Chau (Aberdeen Island) and Nam Long Shan on the Hong Kong Island in Hong Kong Aberdeen Country Park, a country park in Hong Kong Island Aberdeen floating village, at Aberdeen Harbour, containing approximately 600 junks, which house an estimated 6,000 people Aberdeen Harbour, a harbour between Aberdeen, Hong Kong and Ap Lei Chau (Aberdeen Island) Aberdeen Tunnel, a tunnel in Hong Kong Island Aberdeen Tunnel Underground Laboratory, an underground particle physics laboratory in Hong Kong Island Ap Lei Chau or Aberdeen Island, an island of Hong Kong Aberdeen (Hong Kong constituency), a constituency of Southern District CouncilIndia  Aberdeen Bazaar, a shopping centre in Port Blair, South Andaman IslandSri Lanka
Algae (, ; : alga ) is an informal term for a large and diverse group of photosynthetic, eukaryotic organisms.
It is a polyphyletic grouping that includes species from multiple distinct clades.
Analysis of variance (ANOVA) is a collection of statistical models and their associated estimation procedures (such as the "variation" among and between groups) used to analyze the differences among means.
ANOVA was developed by the statistician Ronald Fisher.
In organic chemistry, an alkane, or paraffin (a historical trivial name that also has other meanings), is an acyclic saturated hydrocarbon.
In other words, an alkane consists of hydrogen and carbon atoms arranged in a tree structure in which all the carbon–carbon bonds are single.
United States appellate procedure involves the rules and regulations for filing appeals in state courts and federal courts.
The nature of an appeal can vary greatly depending on the type of case and the rules of the court in the jurisdiction where the case was prosecuted.
In law, an answer was originally a solemn assertion in opposition to someone or something, and thus generally any counter-statement or defense, a reply to a question or response, or objection, or a correct solution of a problem.
In the common law, an answer is the first pleading by a defendant, usually filed and served upon the plaintiff within a certain strict time limit after a civil complaint or criminal information or indictment has been served upon the defendant.
An appellate court, commonly called a court of appeal(s), appeal court, court of second instance or second instance court, is any court of law that is empowered to hear an appeal of a trial court or other lower tribunal.
In much of the world, court systems are divided into at least three levels: the trial court, which initially hears cases and reviews evidence and testimony to determine the facts of the case; at least one intermediate appellate court; and a supreme court (or court of last resort) which primarily reviews the decisions of the intermediate courts, often on a discretionary basis.
Arraignment is a formal reading of a criminal charging document in the presence of the defendant, to inform them of the charges against them.
In response to arraignment, in some jurisdictions, the accused is expected to enter a plea; in other jurisdictions, no plea is required.
"America the Beautiful" is a patriotic American song.
Its lyrics were written by Katharine Lee Bates and its music was composed by church organist and choirmaster Samuel A. Ward at Grace Episcopal Church in Newark, New Jersey.
Assistive technology (AT) is a term for assistive, adaptive, and rehabilitative devices for people with disabilities and the elderly.
Disabled people often have difficulty performing activities of daily living (ADLs) independently, or even with assistance.
The abacus (: abaci or abacuses), also called a counting frame, is a hand-operated calculating tool of unknown origin used since ancient times in the ancient Near East, Europe, China, and Russia, millennia before the adoption of the Hindu-Arabic numeral system.
The abacus consists of a two-dimensional array of slidable beads (or similar objects).
An acid is a molecule or ion capable of either donating a proton (i.e. hydrogen ion, H+), known as a Brønsted–Lowry acid, or forming a covalent bond with an electron pair, known as a Lewis acid.
The first category of acids are the proton donors, or Brønsted–Lowry acids.
Bitumen (, ) is an immensely viscous constituent of petroleum.
Depending on its exact composition it can be a sticky, black liquid or an apparently solid mass that behaves as a liquid over very large time scales.
The American National Standards Institute (ANSI  ) is a private nonprofit organization that oversees the development of voluntary consensus standards for products, services, processes, systems, and personnel in the United States.
The organization also coordinates U.S. standards with international standards so that American products can be used worldwide.
In logic and philosophy, an argument is an attempt to persuade someone of something, or give evidence or reasons for accepting a particular conclusion.
Argument may also refer to:Mathematics and computer scienceArgument (complex analysis), a function which returns the polar angle of a complex numberCommand-line argument, an item of information provided to a program when it is startedParameter (computer programming), a piece of data provided as input to a subroutineArgument principle, a theorem in complex analysis An argument of a function, also known as an independent variableLanguage and rhetoricArgument (literature), a brief summary, often in prose, of a poem or section of a poem or other workArgument (linguistics), a phrase that appears in a syntactic relationship with the verb in a clauseOral argument in the United States, a spoken presentation to a judge or appellate court by a lawyer (or parties when representing themselves) of the legal reasons why they should preva
Apollo 11 (July 16–24, 1969) was the American spaceflight that first landed humans on the Moon.
Commander Neil Armstrong and Lunar Module Pilot Buzz Aldrin landed the Apollo Lunar Module Eagle on July 20, 1969, at 20:17 UTC, and Armstrong became the first person to step onto the Moon's surface six hours and 39 minutes later, on July 21 at 02:56 UTC.
Apollo 8 (December 21–27, 1968) was the first crewed spacecraft to leave low Earth orbit and the first human spaceflight to reach the Moon.
The crew orbited the Moon ten times without landing, and then departed safely back to Earth.
An astronaut (from the Ancient Greek  (), meaning 'star', and  (), meaning 'sailor') is a person trained, equipped, and deployed by a human spaceflight program to serve as a commander or crew member aboard a spacecraft.
Although generally reserved for professional space travelers, the term is sometimes applied to anyone who travels into space, including scientists, politicians, journalists, and tourists.
A Modest Proposal For preventing the Children of Poor People From being a Burthen to Their Parents or Country, and For making them Beneficial to the Publick, commonly referred to as A Modest Proposal, is a Juvenalian satirical essay written and published anonymously by Jonathan Swift in 1729.
The essay suggests that the impoverished Irish might ease their economic troubles by selling their children as food to rich gentlemen and ladies.
The alkali metals consist of the chemical elements lithium (Li), sodium (Na), potassium (K), rubidium (Rb), caesium (Cs), and francium (Fr).
Together with hydrogen they constitute group 1, which lies in the s-block of the periodic table.
An alphabet is a standardized set of basic written graphemes (called letters) representing phonemes, units of sounds that distinguish words, of certain spoken languages.
Not all writing systems represent language in this way; in a syllabary, each character represents a syllable, and logographic systems use characters to represent words, morphemes, or other semantic units.
The atomic number or nuclear charge number (symbol Z) of a chemical element is the charge number of an atomic nucleus.
For ordinary nuclei composed of protons and neutrons, this is equal to the proton number (np) or the number of protons found in the nucleus of every atom of that element.
Anatomy () is the branch of biology concerned with the study of the structure of organisms and their parts.
Anatomy is a branch of natural science that deals with the structural organization of living things.
In propositional logic, affirming the consequent, sometimes called converse error, fallacy of the converse, or confusion of necessity and sufficiency, is a formal fallacy of taking a true conditional statement (e.g., "if the lamp were broken, then the room would be dark") under certain assumptions (there are no other lights in the room, it is nighttime and the windows are closed), and invalidly inferring its converse ("the room is dark, so the lamp must be broken"), even though that statement may not be true under the same assumptions.
This arises when the consequent ("the room would be dark") has other possible antecedents (for example, "the lamp is in working order, but is switched off" or "there is no lamp in the room").
Andrei Arsenyevich Tarkovsky (; 4 April 1932 – 29 December 1986) was a Russian film director and screenwriter.
Widely considered one of the greatest and most influential directors in cinema history, Tarkovsky's films explore spiritual and metaphysical themes, and are noted for their slow pacing and long takes, dreamlike visual imagery, and preoccupation with nature and memory.
Ambiguity is the type of meaning in which a phrase, statement, or resolution is not explicitly defined, making several interpretations plausible.
A common aspect of ambiguity is uncertainty.
Abel is a Biblical figure in the Book of Genesis within Abrahamic religions.
He was the younger brother of Cain, and the younger son of Adam and Eve, the first couple in Biblical history.
An animal is a multicellular, eukaryotic organism of the kingdom Animalia or Metazoa.
Animal, Animals, or The Animal may also refer to:People The Animal (nickname), a list of people nicknamed "The Animal" or "Animal" Animal Hamaguchi, a ring name of Japanese retired professional wrestler Heigo Hamaguchi (born 1947) Road Warrior Animal or Animal, ring names of American professional wrestler Joseph Michael Laurinaitis (1960–2020)Books and publications Animal (book), full title Animal:
The aardvark ( ; Orycteropus afer) is a medium-sized, burrowing, nocturnal mammal native to Africa.
It is the only living species of the order Tubulidentata, although other prehistoric species and genera of Tubulidentata are known.
The aardwolf (Proteles cristatus) is an insectivorous species of hyena, native to East and Southern Africa.
Its name means "earth-wolf" in Afrikaans and Dutch.
Adobe ( ; ) is a building material made from earth and organic materials.
is Spanish for mudbrick.
An adventure is an exciting experience or undertaking that is typically bold, sometimes risky.
Adventures may be activities with danger such as traveling, exploring, skydiving, mountain climbing, scuba diving, river rafting, or other extreme sports.
Asia ( ,  ) is the largest continent in the world by both land area and population.
It covers an area of more than 44 million square kilometers, about 30% of Earth's total land area and 8% of Earth's total surface area.
Aruba ( ,  or , ), officially the Country of Aruba (; ), is a constituent country of the Kingdom of the Netherlands physically located in the mid-south of the Caribbean Sea, about  north of the Venezuelan peninsula of Paraguaná  and  northwest of Curaçao.
It measures  long from its northwestern to its southeastern end and  across at its widest point.
The Articles of Confederation and Perpetual Union was an agreement among the 13 states of the United States, formerly the Thirteen Colonies, that served as the nation's first frame of government.
It was debated by the Second Continental Congress at Independence Hall in Philadelphia between July 1776 and November 1777, and finalized by the Congress on November 15, 1777.
Asia Minor is an alternative name for Anatolia, the westernmost protrusion of Asia, comprising the majority of the Republic of Turkey.
Asia Minor may also refer to: Asia Minor (album), an album by Jamaican-born jazz trumpeter Dizzy Reece "Asia Minor" (instrumental), a 1961 instrumental recording by Jimmy Wisner (operating under the name Kokomo)See also Asia Major (disambiguation)
The Atlantic Ocean is the second-largest of the world's five oceans, with an area of about .
It covers approximately 17% of Earth's surface and about 24% of its water surface area.
Arthur Schopenhauer ( , ; 22 February 1788 – 21 September 1860) was a German philosopher.
He is best known for his 1818 work The World as Will and Representation (expanded in 1844), which characterizes the phenomenal world as the manifestation of a blind and irrational noumenal will.
Angola ( ; ; , ), officially the Republic of Angola (), is a country on the west-central coast of Southern Africa.
It is the second-largest Lusophone (Portuguese-speaking) country in both total area and population (behind Brazil in both cases), and is the seventh-largest country in Africa.
Demographic features of the population of Angola include population density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status, religious affiliations and other aspects.
According to 2014 census data, Angola had a population of 25,789,024 inhabitants in 2014.
The current political regime in Angola is presidentialism, in which the President of the Republic is also head of state and government; it is advised by a Council of Ministers, which together with the President form the national executive power.
Legislative power rests with the 220 parliamentarians elected to the National Assembly.
The economy of Angola remains heavily influenced by the effects of four decades of conflict in the last part of the 20th century, the war for independence from Portugal (1961–75) and the subsequent civil war (1975–2002).
Despite extensive oil and gas resources, diamonds, hydroelectric potential, and rich agricultural land, Angola remains poor, and a third of the population relies on subsistence agriculture.
Transport in Angola comprises:RoadsRailways There are three separate railway lines in Angola: Luanda Railway (CFL) (northern); Benguela Railway (CFB) (central), operated by the Lobito Atlantic Railway joint venture; Moçâmedes Railway (CFM) (southern);Reconstruction of these three lines began in 2005 and they are now all operational.
The Benguela Railway connects to the Democratic Republic of the Congo.
The Angolan Armed Forces () or FAA is the military of Angola.
The FAA consist of the Angolan Army (), the Angolan Navy () and the National Air Force of Angola ().
The foreign relations of Angola are based on Angola's strong support of U.S. foreign policy as the Angolan economy is dependent on U.S. foreign aid.
From 1975 to 1989, Angola was aligned with the Eastern bloc, in particular the Soviet Union, Libya, and Cuba.
Albert Sidney Johnston (February 2, 1803 – April 6, 1862) served as a general in three different armies: the Texian Army, the United States Army, and the Confederate States Army.
He saw extensive combat during his 34-year military career, fighting actions in the Black Hawk War, the Texas-Indian Wars, the Mexican–American War, the Utah War, and the American Civil War.
An android is a humanoid robot or other artificial being often made from a flesh-like material.
Historically, androids were completely within the domain of science fiction and frequently seen in film and television, but advances in robot technology now allow the design of functional and realistic humanoid robots.
Alberta ( ) is one of the thirteen provinces and territories of Canada.
It is a part of Western Canada and is one of the three prairie provinces.
Actinopterygii (; ), members of which are known as ray-finned fish or actinopterygians, is a class of bony fish that comprise over 50% of living vertebrate species.
They are so called because of their lightly built fins made of webs of skin supported by radially extended bony spines, as opposed to the bulkier, fleshy lobed fins of the sister class Sarcopterygii (lobe-finned fish).
Albert Einstein ( ; ; 14 March 1879 – 18 April 1955) was a German-born theoretical physicist who is widely held to be one of the greatest and most influential scientists of all time.
Best known for developing the theory of relativity, Einstein also made important contributions to quantum mechanics, and was thus a central figure in the revolutionary reshaping of the scientific understanding of nature that modern physics accomplished in the first decades of the twentieth century.
Afghanistan, officially the Islamic Emirate of Afghanistan, is a landlocked country located at the crossroads of Central Asia and South Asia.
Referred to as the Heart of Asia, it is bordered by Pakistan to the east and south, Iran to the west, Turkmenistan to the northwest, Uzbekistan to the north, Tajikistan to the northeast, and China to the northeast and east.
Albania ( ;  or ), officially the Republic of Albania (), is a country in Southeast Europe.
The country is located in the Balkans on the Adriatic and Ionian Seas within the Mediterranean Sea and shares land borders with Montenegro to the northwest, Kosovo to the northeast, North Macedonia to the east and Greece to the south.
Allah (; , , ) is the common Arabic word for God.
In the English language, the word generally refers to God in Islam.
Algorithms is a monthly peer-reviewed open-access scientific journal of mathematics, covering design, analysis, and experiments on algorithms.
The journal is published by MDPI and was established in 2008.
Azerbaijan (, ; , ), officially the Republic of Azerbaijan, is a transcontinental country located at the boundary of Eastern Europe and West Asia.
It is a part of the South Caucasus region and is bounded by the Caspian Sea to the east, Russia (Republic of Dagestan) to the north, Georgia to the northwest, Armenia and Turkey to the west, and Iran to the south.
Amateur astronomy is a hobby where participants enjoy observing or imaging celestial objects in the sky using the unaided eye, binoculars, or telescopes.
Even though scientific research may not be their primary goal, some amateur astronomers make contributions in doing citizen science, such as by monitoring variable stars, double stars, sunspots, or occultations of stars by the Moon or asteroids, or by discovering transient astronomical events, such as comets, galactic novae or supernovae in other galaxies.
Aikido ( ,  , , ) is a modern Japanese martial art that is split into many different styles, including Iwama Ryu, Iwama Shin Shin Aiki Shuren Kai, Shodokan Aikido, Yoshinkan, Renshinkai, Aikikai and Ki Aikido.
Aikido is now practiced in around 140 countries.
Art is a diverse range of human activity, and its resulting product, that involves creative or imaginative talent expressive of technical proficiency, beauty, emotional power, or conceptual ideas.
There is no generally agreed definition of what constitutes art, and its interpretation has varied greatly throughout history and across cultures.
Agnostida are an order of extinct arthropods which have classically been seen as a group of highly modified trilobites, though some recent research has doubted this placement.
Regardless, they appear to be close relatives as part of the Artiopoda.
Abortion is the termination of a pregnancy by removal or expulsion of an embryo or fetus.
An abortion that occurs without intervention is known as a miscarriage or "spontaneous abortion"; these occur in approximately 30% to 40% of all pregnancies.
In law, an abstract is a brief statement that contains the most important points of a long legal document or of several related legal papers.
Types of legislation The abstract of title, used in real estate transactions, is the more common form of abstract.
The American Revolutionary War (April 19, 1775 – September 3, 1783), also known as the Revolutionary War or American War of Independence, was the military conflict of the American Revolution in which American Patriot forces under George Washington's command defeated the British, resulting in the Treaty of Paris (1783) recognizing the independence and sovereignty of the United States.
Fighting began on April 19, 1775, at the Battles of Lexington and Concord.
The ampere ( ,  ; symbol: A), often shortened to amp, is the unit of electric current in the International System of Units (SI).
One ampere is equal to 1 coulomb moving past a point in 1 second, or  electrons' worth of charge moving past a point in 1 second.
In mathematics and computer science, an algorithm () is a finite sequence of rigorous instructions, typically used to solve a class of specific problems or to perform a computation.
Algorithms are used as specifications for performing calculations and data processing.
An annual plant is a plant that completes its life cycle, from germination to the production of seeds, within one growing season, and then dies.
The length of growing seasons and period in which they take place vary according to geographical location, and may not correspond to the four traditional seasonal divisions of the year.
The anthophytes are a paraphyletic grouping of plant taxa bearing flower-like reproductive structures.
The group, once thought to be a clade, contained the angiosperms - the extant flowering plants, such as roses and grasses - as well as the Gnetales and the extinct Bennettitales.
An atlas is a collection of maps.
Atlas may also refer to:Mythology Atlas (mythology), an Ancient Greek Titanic deity Atlas, the first legendary king of Atlantis Atlas of Mauretania, a legendary kingPlacesUnited States Atlas, California Atlas, Illinois Atlas, Texas Atlas, West Virginia Atlas, Wisconsin Atlas District, in Washington, D.C. Atlas Peak AVA, a California wine region Atlas Township, MichiganOther places Atlas Cinema, a historic movie theatre in Istanbul, Turkey Atlas Mountains, a set of mountain ranges in northwestern Africa Atlas, Nilüfer, a village in Bursa Province, TurkeyPeople with the name Atlas (given name)
Mouthwash, mouth rinse, oral rinse, or mouth bath is a liquid which is held in the mouth passively or swirled around the mouth by contraction of the perioral muscles and/or movement of the head, and may be gargled, where the head is tilted back and the liquid bubbled at the back of the mouth.
Usually mouthwashes are antiseptic solutions intended to reduce the microbial load in the mouth, although other mouthwashes might be given for other reasons such as for their analgesic, anti-inflammatory or anti-fungal action.
Alexander III of Macedon (; 20/21 July 356 BC – 10/11 June 323 BC), commonly known as Alexander the Great, was a king of the ancient Greek kingdom of Macedon.
He succeeded his father Philip II to the throne in 336 BC at the age of 20, and spent most of his ruling years conducting a lengthy military campaign throughout Western Asia and Egypt.
Alfred Habdank Skarbek Korzybski (, ; July 3, 1879 – March 1, 1950) was a Polish-American independent scholar who developed a field called general semantics, which he viewed as both distinct from, and more encompassing than, the field of semantics.
He argued that human knowledge of the world is limited both by the human nervous system and the languages humans have developed, and thus no one can have direct access to reality, given that the most we can know is that which is filtered through the brain's responses to reality.
Asteroids is a space-themed multidirectional shooter arcade video game designed by Lyle Rains and Ed Logg released in November 1979 by Atari, Inc.
The player controls a single spaceship in an asteroid field which is periodically traversed by flying saucers.
Asparagales (asparagoid lilies) is an order of plants in modern classification systems such as the Angiosperm Phylogeny Group (APG) and the Angiosperm Phylogeny Web.
The order takes its name from the type family Asparagaceae and is placed in the monocots amongst the lilioid monocots.
The Alismatales (alismatids) are an order of flowering plants including about 4,500 species.
Plants assigned to this order are mostly tropical or aquatic.
The Apiales are an order of flowering plants.
The families are those recognized in the APG III system.
Asterales () is an order of dicotyledonous flowering plants that includes the large family Asteraceae (or Compositae) known for composite flowers made of florets, and ten families related to the Asteraceae.
While asterids in general are characterized by fused petals, composite flowers consisting of many florets create the false appearance of separate petals (as found in the rosids).
An asteroid is a minor planet—an object that is neither a true planet nor a comet—that orbits within the inner Solar System.
They are rocky, metallic or icy bodies with no atmosphere.
An allocution, or allocutus, is a formal statement made to the court by the defendant who has been found guilty prior to being sentenced.
It is part of the criminal procedure in some jurisdictions using common law.
An  ( ; Medieval Latin for "he has declared under oath") is a written statement voluntarily made by an affiant or deponent under an oath or affirmation which is administered by a person who is authorized to do so by law.
Such a statement is witnessed as to the authenticity of the affiant's signature by a taker of oaths, such as a notary public or commissioner of oaths.
Aries  is one of the constellations of the zodiac.
It is located in the Northern celestial hemisphere between Pisces to the west and Taurus to the east.
Aquarius is an equatorial constellation of the zodiac, between Capricornus and Pisces.
Its name is Latin for "water-carrier" or "cup-carrier", and its old astronomical symbol is  (♒︎), a representation of water.
is hand-drawn and computer-generated animation originating from Japan.
Outside Japan and in English, anime refers specifically to animation produced in Japan.
Ankara ( ,  ; ), historically known as Ancyra and Angora, is the capital of Turkey.
Located in the central part of Anatolia, the city has a population of 5.1 million in its urban center and 5.7 million in Ankara Province, making it Turkey's second-largest city after Istanbul, but first by the urban area (2,767 km2).
Arabic (,  ; ,   or ) is a Semitic language spoken primarily across the Arab world.
Having emerged in the 1st century AD, it is named after the Arab people; the term "Arab" was initially used to describe those living in the Arabian Peninsula, as perceived by geographers from ancient Greece.
Sir Alfred Joseph Hitchcock  (13 August 1899 – 29 April 1980) was an English film director, screenwriter, producer and editor.
He is widely regarded as one of the most influential figures in the history of cinema.
Anacondas or water boas are a group of large snakes of the genus Eunectes.
They are found in tropical South America.
Altaic () is a controversial proposed language family that would include the Turkic, Mongolic and Tungusic language families and possibly also the Japonic and Koreanic languages.
The hypothetical language family has long been rejected by most comparative linguists, although it continues to be supported by a small but stable scholarly minority.
Austrian German (), Austrian Standard German (ASG), Standard Austrian German (), Austrian High German (), or simply just Austrian (), is an official and standard variety of Standard High German written and spoken in Austria and Italian South Tyrol.
It has the highest sociolinguistic prestige locally, as it is the variation used in the media and for other formal situations.
In mathematics, the axiom of choice, abbreviated AC or AoC, is an axiom of set theory equivalent to the statement that a Cartesian product of a collection of non-empty sets is non-empty.
Informally put, the axiom of choice says that given any collection of sets, each containing at least one element, it is possible to construct a new set by arbitrarily choosing one element from each set, even if the collection is infinite.
Attila (  or  ; ), frequently called Attila the Hun, was the ruler of the Huns from 434 until his death, in March 453.
He was also the leader of an empire consisting of Huns, Ostrogoths, Alans, and Bulgars, among others, in Central and Eastern Europe.
The Aegean Sea is an elongated embayment of the Mediterranean Sea between Europe and Asia.
It is located between the Balkans and Anatolia, and covers an area of some .
A Clockwork Orange is a dystopian satirical black comedy novel by English writer Anthony Burgess, published in 1962.
It is set in a near-future society that has a youth subculture of extreme violence.
Amsterdam ( ,  , ; literally, "The Dam on the River Amstel") is the capital and most populated city of the Netherlands, with The Hague being the seat of government.
It has a population of 921,402 within the city proper, 1,457,018 in the urban area and 2,480,394 in the metropolitan area.
The Museum of Work (Arbetets museum) is a museum located in Norrköping, Sweden.
The museum is located in the Strykjärn (Clothes iron), a former weaving mill in the old industrial area on the Motala ström river in the city centre of Norrköping.
Audi AG () is a German automotive manufacturer of luxury vehicles headquartered in Ingolstadt, Bavaria, Germany.
A subsidiary of the Volkswagen Group, Audi produces vehicles in nine production facilities worldwide.
An aircraft (: aircraft) is a vehicle that is able to fly by gaining support from the air.
It counters the force of gravity by using either static lift or the dynamic lift of an airfoil, or, in a few cases, direct downward thrust from its engines.
Alfred Bernhard Nobel ( , ; 21 October 1833 – 10 December 1896) was a Swedish chemist, engineer, inventor, businessman, and philanthropist.
He is known for creating dynamite as well as having bequeathed his fortune to establish the Nobel Prize.
Alexander Graham Bell (, born Alexander Bell; March 3, 1847 – August 2, 1922) was a  Scottish-born inventor, scientist and engineer who is credited with patenting the first practical telephone.
He also co-founded the American Telephone and Telegraph Company (AT&T) in 1885.
Anatolia, also known as Asia Minor, is a large peninsula in West Asia and is the western-most extension of continental Asia.
The land mass of Anatolia constitutes most of the territory of contemporary Turkey.
Apple Inc. is an American multinational technology company headquartered in Cupertino, California.
, Apple is the world's biggest company by market capitalization, and with  the largest technology company by 2022 revenue.
Aberdeenshire (; ) is one of the 32 council areas of Scotland.
It takes its name from the County of Aberdeen, which has substantially different boundaries.
Aztlan Underground is a band from Los Angeles, California that combines Hip-Hop, Punk Rock, Jazz, and electronic music with Chicano and Native American themes, and indigenous instrumentation.
They are often cited as progenitors of Chicano rap.
The American Civil War (April 12, 1861 – May 26, 1865; also known by other names) was a civil war in the United States between the Union ("the North") and the Confederacy ("the South"), formed by states that had seceded from the Union.
The cause of the war was the dispute over whether slavery would be permitted to expand into the western territories, leading to more slave states, or be prevented from doing so, which many believed would place slavery on a course of ultimate extinction.
Andy Warhol (; born Andrew Warhola Jr.; August 6, 1928 – February 22, 1987) was an American visual artist, film director, producer, and leading figure in the pop art movement.
His works explore the relationship between artistic expression, advertising, and celebrity culture that flourished by the 1960s, and span a variety of media, including painting, silkscreening, photography, film, and sculpture.
Alp Arslan, born Muhammad bin Dawud Chaghri, was the second sultan of the Seljuk Empire and great-grandson of Seljuk, the eponymous founder of the dynasty.
He greatly expanded the Seljuk territory and consolidated his power, defeating rivals to the south and northwest, and his victory over the Byzantines at the Battle of Manzikert, in 1071, ushered in the Turkmen settlement of Anatolia.
The American Film Institute (AFI) is an American nonprofit film organization that educates filmmakers and honors the heritage of the motion picture arts in the United States.
AFI is supported by private funding and public membership fees.
was a Japanese filmmaker and painter who directed 30 films in a career spanning over five decades.
He is widely regarded as one of the greatest and most influential filmmakers in the history of cinema.
Ancient Egypt was a civilization in Northeast Africa situated in the Nile Valley.
Ancient Egyptian civilization followed prehistoric Egypt and coalesced around 3100BC (according to conventional Egyptian chronology) with the political unification of Upper and Lower Egypt under Menes (often identified with Narmer).
Analog Brothers were an experimental hip hop band featuring Tracy "Ice-T" Marrow (Ice Oscillator) on keyboards, drums and vocals, Keith "Kool Keith" Thornton (Keith Korg) on bass, strings and vocals, Marc Live (Marc Moog) on drums, violins and vocals, Christopher "Black Silver" Rodgers (Silver Synth) on synthesizer, lazar bell and vocals, and Rex Colonel "Pimpin' Rex" Doby Jr. (Rex Roland JX3P) on keyboards, vocals and production.
Its album Pimp to Eat featured guest appearances by various members of Rhyme Syndicate, Odd Oberheim, Jacky Jasper (who appears as Jacky Jasper on the song "We Sleep Days" and H-Bomb on "War"), D.J. Cisco from S.M., Synth-A-Size Sisters and Teflon.
Motor neuron diseases or motor neurone diseases (MNDs) are a group of rare neurodegenerative disorders that selectively affect motor neurons, the cells which control voluntary muscles of the body.
They include amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS), progressive bulbar palsy (PBP), pseudobulbar palsy, progressive muscular atrophy (PMA), primary lateral sclerosis (PLS), spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) and monomelic amyotrophy (MMA), as well as some rarer variants resembling ALS.
An abjad (, ; also abgad) is a writing system in which only consonants are represented, leaving vowel sounds to be inferred by the reader.
This contrasts with alphabets, which provide graphemes for both consonants and vowels.
An abugida (, from Ge'ez: ), sometimes known as alphasyllabary, neosyllabary or pseudo-alphabet, is a segmental writing system in which consonant–vowel sequences are written as units; each unit is based on a consonant letter, and vowel notation is secondary, like a diacritical mark.
This contrasts with a full alphabet, in which vowels have status equal to consonants, and with an abjad, in which vowel marking is absent, partial, or optional – in less formal contexts, all three types of script may be termed "alphabets".
ABBA ( , ; formerly named Björn & Benny, Agnetha & Anni-Frid or Björn & Benny, Agnetha & Frida) are  a Swedish pop supergroup formed in Stockholm in 1972 by Agnetha Fältskog, Björn Ulvaeus, Benny Andersson, and Anni-Frid Lyngstad.
The group's name is an acronym of the first letters of their first names arranged as a palindrome.
An allegiance is a duty of fidelity said to be owed, or freely committed, by the people, subjects or citizens to their state or sovereign.
EtymologyThe word allegiance comes from Middle English  (see Medieval Latin , "a liegance").
The MessagePad is a discontinued series of personal digital assistant devices developed by Apple Computer for the Newton platform in 1993.
Some electronic engineering and the manufacture of Apple's MessagePad devices was undertaken in Japan by Sharp.
Alfred Elton van Vogt  ( ; April 26, 1912 – January 26, 2000) was a Canadian-born American science fiction author.
His fragmented, bizarre narrative style influenced later science fiction writers, notably Philip K. Dick.
Anna Sergeyevna Kournikova (; born 7 June 1981) is a Russian former professional tennis player and American television personality.
Her appearance  and celebrity status made her one of the best known tennis stars worldwide.
Alfons Maria Jakob (2 July 1884 – 17 October 1931) was a German neurologist who worked in the field of neuropathology.
He was born in Aschaffenburg, Bavaria and educated in medicine at the universities of Munich, Berlin, and Strasbourg, where he received his doctorate in 1908.
Agnosticism is the view or belief that the existence of God, of the divine or the supernatural is unknown or unknowable.
Another definition provided is the view that "human reason is incapable of providing sufficient rational grounds to justify either the belief that God exists or the belief that God does not exist.
Argon is a chemical element with the symbol Ar and atomic number 18.
It is in group 18 of the periodic table and is a noble gas.
Arsenic is a chemical element with the symbol As and atomic number 33.
Arsenic occurs in many minerals, usually in combination with sulfur and metals, but also as a pure elemental crystal.
Antimony is a chemical element with the symbol Sb () and atomic number 51.
A lustrous gray metalloid, it is found in nature mainly as the sulfide mineral stibnite (Sb2S3).
Actinium is a chemical element with the symbol Ac and atomic number 89.
It was first isolated by Friedrich Oskar Giesel in 1902, who gave it the name emanium; the element got its name by being wrongly identified with a substance André-Louis Debierne found in 1899 and called actinium.
Americium is a synthetic radioactive chemical element with the symbol Am and atomic number 95.
It is a transuranic member of the actinide series, in the periodic table located under the lanthanide element europium and was thus named after the United States by analogy.
Astatine is a chemical element with the symbol At and atomic number 85.
It is the rarest naturally occurring element in the Earth's crust, occurring only as the decay product of various heavier elements.
An atom is a particle that consists of a nucleus of protons and neutrons surrounded by an electromagnetically-bound cloud of electrons.
The atom is the basic particle of the chemical elements, and the chemical elements are distinguished from each other by the number of protons that are in their atoms.
Arable land (from the , "able to be ploughed") is any land capable of being ploughed and used to grow crops.
Alternatively, for the purposes of agricultural statistics, the term often has a more precise definition: A more concise definition appearing in the Eurostat glossary similarly refers to actual rather than potential uses: "land worked (ploughed or tilled) regularly, generally under a system of crop rotation".
Aluminium (aluminum in North American English) is a chemical element with the symbol Al and atomic number 13.
Aluminium has a density lower than those of other common metals; about one-third that of steel.
Advanced Chemistry is a German hip hop group from Heidelberg, a scenic city in Baden-Württemberg, South Germany.
Advanced Chemistry was founded in 1987 by Toni L, Linguist, Gee-One, DJ Mike MD (Mike Dippon) and MC Torch.
The Anglican Communion is the third largest Christian communion after the Roman Catholic and Eastern Orthodox churches.
Founded in 1867 in London, the communion has more than 85 million members within the Church of England and other autocephalous national and regional churches in full communion.
Arne Kaijser (born 1950) is a professor emeritus of history of technology at the KTH Royal Institute of Technology in Stockholm, and a former president of the Society for the History of Technology.
Kaijser has published two books in Swedish: Stadens ljus.
An archipelago ( ), sometimes called an island group or island chain, is a chain, cluster, or collection of islands, or sometimes a sea containing a small number of scattered islands.Examples of archipelagos include: the Indonesian Archipelago, the Andaman and Nicobar Islands, the Lakshadweep Islands, the Galápagos Islands, the Japanese archipelago, the Philippine Archipelago, the Maldives, the Balearic Islands, the Åland Islands, The Bahamas, the Aegean Islands, the Hawaiian Islands, the Canary Islands, Malta, the Azores, the Canadian Arctic Archipelago, the British Isles, the islands of the Archipelago Sea, and Shetland.
Archipelagos are sometimes defined by political boundaries.
In legal discourse, an author is the creator of an original work, whether that work is in written, graphic, or recorded medium.
Thus, a sculptor, painter, or composer, is an author of their respective sculptures, paintings, or compositions, even though in common parlance, an author is often thought of as the writer of a book, article, play, or other written work.
Andrey Andreyevich Markov (14 June 1856 – 20 July 1922) was a Russian mathematician best known for his work on stochastic processes.
A primary subject of his research later became known as the Markov chain.
Angst is fear or anxiety (anguish is its Latinate equivalent, and the words anxious and anxiety are of similar origin).
The dictionary definition for angst is a feeling of anxiety, apprehension, or insecurity.
Anxiety is an emotion which is characterized by an unpleasant state of inner turmoil and includes feelings of dread over anticipated events.
Anxiety is different from fear in that fear is defined as the emotional response to a real threat, whereas anxiety is the anticipation of a future threat.
Alan Alexander Milne (; 18 January 1882 – 31 January 1956) was an English writer best known for his books about the teddy bear Winnie-the-Pooh, as well as for children's poetry.
Milne was primarily a playwright before the huge success of Winnie-the-Pooh overshadowed all his previous work.
Asociación Alumni, usually just Alumni, is an Argentine rugby union club located in Tortuguitas, Greater Buenos Aires.
The senior squad currently competes at Top 12, the first division of the Unión de Rugby de Buenos Aires league system.
An axiom, postulate, or assumption is a statement that is taken to be true, to serve as a premise or starting point for further reasoning and arguments.
The word comes from the Ancient Greek word  (), meaning 'that which is thought worthy or fit' or 'that which commends itself as evident'.
Alpha  (uppercase , lowercase ; , , or ) is the first letter of the Greek alphabet.
In the system of Greek numerals, it has a value of one.
Alvin Eugene Toffler (October 4, 1928 – June 27, 2016) was an American writer, futurist, and businessman known for his works discussing modern technologies, including the digital revolution and the communication revolution, with emphasis on their effects on cultures worldwide.
He is regarded as one of the world's outstanding futurists.
The Amazing Spider-Man is an ongoing American superhero comic book series featuring the Marvel Comics superhero Spider-Man as its title character and main protagonist.
Being in the mainstream continuity of the franchise, it was the character's first title, launching seven months after his introduction in the final issue of Amazing Fantasy.
AM or Am may refer to:Arts and entertainmentMusic A minor, a minor scale in music A.M. (Chris Young album)
A.M. (Wilco album) AM (Abraham Mateo album)  AM (Arctic Monkeys album) AM (musician), American musician Am, the A minor chord symbol Armeemarschsammlung (Army March Collection), catalog of German military march music Andrew Moore (musician), Canadian musician known as A.M. DJ AM, American DJ and producer Skengdo & AM, British hip hop duoTelevision and radio AM (radio program), Australian current affairs radio program American Morning, American morning television news program Am, Antes del Mediodía, Argentine current affairs television program Am, a character in the anthology Star Wars: VisionsOther media  Allied Mastercomputer, the antagonist of the short story "I Have No Mouth, and I Must Scream"Education Active Minds, a mental health awareness charity Arts et Métiers ParisTech, a French engineering school Australian Museum, a museum in Australia Mas
Antigua and Barbuda (, ) is a sovereign island country in the Caribbean.
It lies at the conjuncture of the Caribbean Sea and the Atlantic Ocean in the Leeward Islands part of the Lesser Antilles.
Azincourt (), historically known in English as Agincourt ( ), is a commune in the Pas-de-Calais department in northern France.
It is situated  north-west of Saint-Pol-sur-Ternoise on the D71 road between Hesdin and Fruges.
Berthold Konrad Hermann Albert Speer (; ; 19 March 1905 – 1 September 1981) was a German architect who served as the Minister of Armaments and War Production in Nazi Germany during most of World War II.
A close ally of Adolf Hitler, he was convicted at the Nuremberg trial and sentenced to 20 years in prison.
The family Asteraceae (), with the original name Compositae, consists of over 32,000 known species of flowering plants in over 1,900 genera within the order Asterales.
Commonly referred to as the aster, daisy, composite, or sunflower family, Compositae were first described in the year 1740.
Apiaceae () or Umbelliferae is a family of mostly aromatic flowering plants named after the type genus Apium and commonly known as the celery, carrot or parsley family, or simply as umbellifers.
It is the 16th-largest family of flowering plants, with more than 3,800 species in about 446 genera, including such well-known and economically important plants as ajwain, angelica, anise, asafoetida, caraway, carrot, celery, chervil, coriander, cumin, dill, fennel, lovage, cow parsley, parsley, parsnip and sea holly, as well as silphium, a plant whose identity is unclear and which may be extinct.
An axon (from Greek ἄξων áxōn, axis), or nerve fiber (or nerve fibre: see spelling differences), is a long, slender projection of a nerve cell, or neuron, in vertebrates, that typically conducts electrical impulses known as action potentials away from the nerve cell body.
The function of the axon is to transmit information to different neurons, muscles, and glands.
The ancient Aramaic alphabet was used to write the Aramaic languages spoken by ancient Aramean pre-Christian tribes throughout the Fertile Crescent.
It was also adopted by other peoples as their own alphabet when empires and their subjects underwent linguistic Aramaization during a language shift for governing purposes—a precursor to Arabization centuries later—including among Assyrians who permanently replaced their Akkadian language and its cuneiform script with Aramaic and its script, and among Jews (but not Samaritans), who adopted the Aramaic language as their vernacular and started using the Aramaic alphabet even for writing Hebrew, displacing the former Paleo-Hebrew alphabet.
"American shot" or "cowboy shot" is a translation of a phrase from French film criticism, , and refers to a medium-long ("knee") film shot of a group of characters, who are arranged so that all are visible to the camera.
The usual arrangement is for the actors to stand in an irregular line from one side of the screen to the other, with the actors at the end coming forward a little and standing more in profile than the others.
Acute disseminated encephalomyelitis (ADEM), or acute demyelinating encephalomyelitis, is a rare autoimmune disease marked by a sudden, widespread attack of inflammation in the brain and spinal cord.
As well as causing the brain and spinal cord to become inflamed, ADEM also attacks the nerves of the central nervous system and damages their myelin insulation, which, as a result, destroys the white matter.
Ataxia (from Greek α-
[a negative prefix] + -τάξις
Augusta Ada King, Countess of Lovelace (née Byron; 10 December 1815 – 27 November 1852) was an English mathematician and writer, chiefly known for her work on Charles Babbage's proposed mechanical general-purpose computer, the Analytical Engine.
She was the first to recognise that the machine had applications beyond pure calculation.
August William Derleth (February 24, 1909 – July 4, 1971) was an American writer and anthologist.
He was the first book publisher of the writings of H. P. Lovecraft.
The Alps () are the highest and most extensive mountain range that is entirely in Europe, stretching approximately  across eight Alpine countries (from west to east): Monaco, France, Switzerland, Italy, Liechtenstein, Germany, Austria and Slovenia.
The Alpine arch extends from Nice on the western Mediterranean to Trieste on the Adriatic and Vienna at the beginning of the Pannonian Basin.
Albert Camus ( ,  ; ; 7 November 1913 – 4 January 1960) was an Algerian-French  philosopher, author, dramatist, journalist, and political activist.
He was the recipient of the 1957 Nobel Prize in Literature at the age of 44, the second-youngest recipient in history.
Dame Agatha Mary Clarissa Christie, Lady Mallowan,  (; 15 September 1890 – 12 January 1976) was an English writer known for her 66 detective novels and 14 short story collections, particularly those revolving around fictional detectives Hercule Poirot and Miss Marple.
She also wrote the world's longest-running play, the murder mystery The Mousetrap, which has been performed in the West End since 1952.
The Plague () is a 1947 absurdist novel by Albert Camus.
It tells the story from the point of view of a narrator in the midst of a plague sweeping the French Algerian city of Oran.
Applied ethics is the practical aspect of moral considerations.
It is ethics with respect to real-world actions and their moral considerations in private and public life, the professions, health, technology, law, and leadership.
In mathematics, the absolute value or modulus of a real number ,  is the non-negative value  without regard to its sign.
Namely,  if  is a positive number, and  if  is negative (in which case negating  makes  positive), and  For example, the absolute value of 3  and the absolute value of −3 is  The absolute value of a number may be thought of as its distance from zero.
An analog signal is any continuous-time signal representing some other quantity, i.e., analogous to another quantity.
For example, in an analog audio signal, the instantaneous signal voltage varies continuously with the pressure of the sound waves.
Arecales is an order of flowering plants.
The order has been widely recognised only for the past few decades; until then, the accepted name for the order including these plants was Principes.
Hercule Poirot (, ) is a fictional Belgian detective created by British writer Agatha Christie.
Poirot is one of Christie's most famous and long-running characters, appearing in 33 novels, two plays (Black Coffee and Alibi), and 51 short stories published between 1920 and 1975.
Miss Jane Marple is a fictional character in Agatha Christie's crime novels and short stories.
Miss Marple lives in the village of St. Mary Mead and acts as an amateur consulting detective.
April is the fourth month of the year in the Gregorian and Julian calendars.
It is the first of four months to have a length of 30 days, and the second of five months to have a length of less than 31 days.
August is the eighth month of the year in the Julian and Gregorian calendars, and the fifth of seven months to have a length of 31 days.
In the Southern Hemisphere, August is the seasonal equivalent of February in the Northern Hemisphere.
According to Abrahamic religions, Aaron (  or  ) was a prophet, a high priest, and the elder brother of Moses.
Information about Aaron comes exclusively from religious texts such as the Hebrew Bible, the New Testament (Luke, Acts, and Hebrews), and the Quran.
EventsPre–160046 BC – Julius Caesar defeats Caecilius Metellus Scipio and Marcus Porcius
Cato (Cato the Younger) at the Battle of Thapsus.
EventsPre-1600 240 –
Shapur I becomes co-emperor of the Sasanian Empire with his father Ardashir I. 467 – Anthemius is elevated to Emperor of the Western Roman Empire.
EventsPre-1600 769 – The Lateran Council ends by condemning the Council of Hieria and anathematizing its iconoclastic rulings.
1071 – Bari, the last Byzantine possession in southern Italy, is surrendered to Robert Guiscard.
EventsPre-1600311 – The Diocletianic Persecution of Christians in the Roman Empire ends.
1315 – Enguerrand de Marigny is hanged at the instigation of Charles, Count of Valois.
EventsPre-1600 392 – Arbogast has Eugenius elected Western Roman Emperor.
851 – Battle of Jengland: Erispoe defeats Charles the Bald near the Breton town of Jengland.
EventsPre-1600 410 – The sacking of Rome by the Visigoths ends after three days.
1172 –
In chemistry, an alcohol is a type of organic compound that carries at least one hydroxyl () functional group  bound to a saturated carbon atom.
Alcohols range from the simple, like methanol and ethanol, to complex, like sucrose and cholesterol.
Achill Island (; ) is the largest of the Irish isles and lies off the west coast of Ireland in County Mayo.
It has a population of 2,345.
Irwin Allen Ginsberg (; June 3, 1926 – April 5, 1997) was an American poet and writer.
As a student at Columbia University in the 1940s, he began friendships with Lucien Carr, William S. Burroughs and Jack Kerouac, forming the core of the Beat Generation.
In mathematics, a field  is algebraically closed if every non-constant polynomial in  (the univariate polynomial ring with coefficients in ) has a root in .
ExamplesAs an example, the field of real numbers is not algebraically closed, because the polynomial equation  has no solution in real numbers, even though all its coefficients (1 and 0) are real.
EventsPre-16001284 –
The Republic of Pisa is defeated in the Battle of Meloria by the Republic of Genoa, thus losing its naval dominance in the Mediterranean.1538 – Bogotá, Colombia, is founded by Gonzalo Jiménez de Quesada.
Anatoly Yevgenyevich Karpov (; born May 23, 1951) is a Russian and former Soviet chess grandmaster, former World Chess Champion, ⁣and politician.
He was the 12th World Chess Champion from 1975 to 1985, a three-time FIDE World Champion (1993, 1996, 1998), twice World Chess champion as a member of the USSR team (1985, 1989), and a six-time winner of Chess Olympiads as a member of the USSR team (1972, 1974, 1980, 1982, 1986, 1988).
The aspect ratio of a geometric shape is the ratio of its sizes in different dimensions.
For example, the aspect ratio of a rectangle is the ratio of its longer side to its shorter side—the ratio of width to height, when the rectangle is oriented as a "landscape".
Auto racing (also known as car racing, motor racing, or automobile racing) is a motorsport involving the racing of automobiles for competition.
Auto racing has existed since the invention of the automobile.
Anarcho-capitalism (colloquially: ancap or '"an-cap"') is an anti-statist, libertarian political philosophy and economic theory that seeks to abolish centralized states in favor of stateless societies with systems of private property enforced by private agencies, the non-aggression principle, free markets and self-ownership, which extends the concept to include control of private property as part of the self.
In the absence of statute, anarcho-capitalists hold that society tends to contractually self-regulate and civilize through participation in the free market, which they describe as a voluntary society involving the voluntary exchange of goods and services.
EventsPre-160048 BC – Caesar's Civil War: Battle of Pharsalus: Julius Caesar decisively defeats Pompey at Pharsalus and Pompey flees to Egypt. 378 – Gothic War: Battle of Adrianople: A large Roman army led by Emperor Valens is defeated by the Visigoths.
Valens is killed along with over half of his army.
Aristophanes (; , ; c. 446 – c. 386 BC), son of Philippus, of the deme Kydathenaion (), was a comic playwright or comedy-writer of ancient Athens and a poet of Old Attic Comedy.
Eleven of his forty plays survive virtually complete.
Ludwig Philipp Albert Schweitzer  (; 14 January 1875 – 4 September 1965) was an Alsatian polymath.
He was a theologian, organist, musicologist, writer, humanitarian, philosopher, and physician.
The Austrian School is a heterodox school of economic thought that advocates strict adherence to methodological individualism, the concept that social phenomena result exclusively from the motivations and actions of individuals.
Austrian school theorists hold that economic theory should be exclusively derived from basic principles of human action.
An abscess is a collection of pus that has built up within the tissue of the body.
Signs and symptoms of abscesses include redness, pain, warmth, and swelling.
Aalborg Municipality () is a municipality in North Jutland Region on the Jutland peninsula in northern Denmark.
The municipality straddles the Limfjord, the waterway which connects the North Sea and the Kattegat east-to-west, and which separates the main body of the Jutland peninsula from the island of Vendsyssel-Thy north-to-south.
Aarhus (, , ; officially spelled Århus from 1948 until 1 January 2011) is the second-largest city in Denmark and the seat of Aarhus Municipality.
It is located on the eastern shore of Jutland in the Kattegat sea and approximately  northwest of Copenhagen.
The northern cavefish or northern blindfish (Amblyopsis spelaea) is found in caves through Kentucky and southern Indiana.
It is under review for possible listing under the Endangered Species Act of 1973 in the United States as of 2023, and the IUCN lists the species as near threatened.
An amateur () is generally considered a person who pursues an avocation independent from their source of income.
Amateurs and their pursuits are also described as popular, informal, self-taught, user-generated, DIY, and hobbyist.
Alexis Carrel (; 28 June 1873 – 5 November 1944) was a French surgeon and biologist who was awarded the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine in 1912 for pioneering vascular suturing techniques.
He invented the first perfusion pump with Charles Lindbergh opening the way to organ transplantation.
All Souls' Day, also called The Commemoration of All the Faithful Departed, is a day of prayer and remembrance for the faithful departed, observed by certain Christian denominations on 2 November.
Through prayer, intercessions, alms and visits to cemeteries, people commemorate the poor souls in purgatory and gain them indulgences.
(; born , ; 16 April 1844 – 12 October 1924) was a French poet, journalist, and novelist with several best-sellers.
Ironic and skeptical, he was considered in his day the ideal French man of letters.
André Paul Guillaume Gide (; 22 November 1869 – 19 February 1951) was a French author whose writings spanned a wide variety of styles and topics.
He was awarded the 1947 Nobel Prize in Literature.
Algorithms for calculating variance play a major role in computational statistics.
A key difficulty in the design of good algorithms for this problem is that formulas for the variance may involve sums of squares, which can lead to numerical instability as well as to arithmetic overflow when dealing with large values.
The almond (Prunus amygdalus, syn.
Prunus dulcis) is a species of small tree from the genus Prunus, cultivated worldwide for its seed, a culinary nut.
This article is a demography of the population of Antigua and Barbuda including population density, ethnicity, religious affiliations and other aspects of the population.
PopulationAccording to the 2011 census the estimated resident population of Antigua and Barbuda was 86,295.
The politics of Antigua and Barbuda takes place in a framework of a unitary parliamentary representative democratic monarchy, wherein the sovereign of Antigua and Barbuda is the head of state, appointing a governor-general to act as vice-regal representative in the nation.
A prime minister is appointed by the governor-general as the head of government, and of a multi-party system; the prime minister advises the governor-general on the appointment of a Council of Ministers.
Telecommunications in Antigua and Barbuda are via media in the telecommunications industry.
TelephoneTelephones – main lines in use: 37,500 (2006)country comparison to the world: 168Telephones – mobile cellular: 110,200 (2006) (APUA PCS, Cable & Wireless, Digicel)country comparison to the world: 177Telephone system:domestic: good automatic telephone systeminternational: 3 fiber optic submarine cables (2 to Saint Kitts and 1 to Guadeloupe); satellite earth station – 1 Intelsat (Atlantic Ocean)RadioRadio broadcast stations: AM 4, FM 6, shortwave 0 (2002)Radios: 36,000 (1997)TelevisionTelevision broadcast stations: 2 (1997) (including ABS-TV)Televisions: 31,000 (1997)InternetInternet Service Providers (ISPs): Cable & Wireless, Antigua Computer Technologies (ACT), Antigua Public Utilities Authority (APUA INET)Internet hosts: 2,215 (2008)country comparison to the world: 140Internet users: 60,000 (2007)country comparison to the world: 158Country codes: AGDemo
The Antigua and Barbuda Defence Force (ABDF) is the armed forces of Antigua and Barbuda.
The ABDF has responsibility for several different roles: internal security, prevention of drug smuggling, the protection and support of fishing rights, prevention of marine pollution, search and rescue, ceremonial duties, assistance to government programs, provision of relief during natural disasters, assistance in the maintenance of essential services, and support of the police in maintaining law and order.
Antisemitism (also spelled anti-semitism or anti-Semitism) is hostility to, prejudice towards, or discrimination against Jews.
This sentiment is a form of racism, and a person who harbours it is called an antisemite.
The economy of Azerbaijan has completed its post-Soviet transition into a major oil-based economy (with the completion of the Baku-Tbilisi-Ceyhan Pipeline), from one where the state played the major role.
The transition to oil production led to remarkable growth figures as projects came online; reaching 26.4% in 2005 (second highest GDP growth in the world in 2005 only to Equatorial Guinea) and 34.6% in 2006 (world highest) before subsiding to 10.8% and 9.3% in 2008 and 2009 respectively.
Azerbaijan is a country in the Caucasus region, situated at the juncture of Eastern Europe and West Asia.
Three physical features dominate Azerbaijan: the Caspian Sea, whose shoreline forms a natural boundary to the east; the Greater Caucasus mountain range to the north; and the extensive flatlands at the country's center.
The Republic of Azerbaijan is a member of the United Nations, the Non-Aligned Movement, the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe, NATO's Partnership for Peace, the Euro-Atlantic Partnership Council, the World Health Organization, the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development; the Council of Europe, CFE Treaty, the Community of Democracies; the International Monetary Fund; and the World Bank.
The major trends in the foreign relations of the Republic of Azerbaijan toward both global and regional powers active in Caucasus area.
The Azerbaijani Armed Forces () is the military of the Republic of Azerbaijan.
It was re-established according to the country’s Law of the Armed Forces on 9 October 1991.
Armenia is a landlocked country in the South Caucasus region of the Caucasus.
The country spans Eastern Europe and West Asia, with cultural ties to both regions.
After registering steady increases during the Soviet period, the population of Armenia declined from its peak value of 3.633 million in 1992 to 2.986 million in 2017.
Whilst the country's population increased steadily during the Soviet Union as a result of periods of repatriation and low emigration rates, it has declined in recent times due to the exodus of peoples following the Soviet break-up.
The politics of Armenia take place in the framework of the parliamentary representative democratic republic of Armenia, whereby the president of Armenia is the head of state and the prime minister of Armenia the head of government, and of a multi-party system.
Executive power is exercised by the president and the Government.
The economy of Armenia grew by 12.6% in 2022, according to the country's Statistical Committee and the International Monetary Fund.
Total output amounted to 8.5 trillion Armenian drams, or $19.5 billion.
This article considers transport in Armenia.
RailwaysTotal in common carrier service; does not include industrial linesBroad gauge825 km of  gauge (825 km electrified)
The Armed Forces of Armenia (), sometimes referred to as the Armenian Army (), is the national military of Armenia.
It consists of personnel branches under the General Staff of the Armenian Armed Forces, which can be divided into two general branches: the Ground Forces, and the Air Force.
Since its independence, Armenia has maintained a policy of trying to have positive and friendly relations with Iran, Russia, and the West, including the United States and the European Union.
It has full membership status in a number of international organizations, such as the Council of Europe and the Eurasian Economic Union, and observer status, etc. in some others.
Demographics of American Samoa include population density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status, religious affiliations and other aspects.
American Samoa is an unincorporated territory of the United States located in the South Pacific Ocean.
Politics of American Samoa takes place in a framework of a presidential representative democratic dependency, whereby the governor is the head of government, and of a pluriform multi-party system.
American Samoa is an unincorporated and unorganized territory of the United States, administered by the Office of Insular Affairs, U.S. Department of the Interior.
The economy of American Samoa is a traditional Polynesian economy in which more than 90% of the land is communally owned.
Economic activity is strongly linked to the United States, with which American Samoa conducts the great bulk of its foreign trade.
EventsPre-160029 BC – Octavian holds the first of three consecutive triumphs in Rome to celebrate the victory over the Dalmatian tribes.
523 – John
Ibn Sina (; 980 – June 1037 CE), commonly known in the West as Avicenna (), was the preeminent philosopher and physician of the Muslim world, flourishing during the Islamic Golden Age, serving in the courts of various Iranian rulers.
He is often described as the father of early modern medicine.
The Men's Ashes is a Test cricket series played biennially between England and Australia.
The term originated in a satirical obituary published in a British newspaper, The Sporting Times, immediately after Australia's 1882 victory at The Oval, its first Test win on English soil.
Analysis (: analyses) is the process of breaking a complex topic or substance into smaller parts in order to gain a better understanding of it.
The technique has been applied in the study of mathematics and logic since before Aristotle (384–322 B.C.), though analysis as a formal concept is a relatively recent development.
Abner Doubleday (June 26, 1819 – January 26, 1893) was a career United States Army officer and Union major general in the American Civil War.
He fired the first shot in defense of Fort Sumter, the opening battle of the war, and had a pivotal role in the early fighting at the Battle of Gettysburg.
America's National Game is a book by Albert Spalding, published in 1911, that details the early history of the sport of baseball.
It is one of the defining books in the early formative years of modern baseball.
Amplitude modulation (AM) is a  modulation technique used in electronic communication, most commonly for transmitting messages with a radio wave.
In amplitude modulation, the amplitude (signal strength) of the wave is varied in proportion to that of the message signal, such as an audio signal.
Augustin-Jean Fresnel (10 May 1788 – 14 July 1827) was a French civil engineer and physicist whose research in optics led to the almost unanimous acceptance of the wave theory of light, excluding any remnant of Newton's corpuscular theory, from the late 1830s until the end of the 19th century.
He is perhaps better known for inventing the catadioptric (reflective/refractive)
Abbot is an ecclesiastical title given to the male head of a monastery in various Western religious traditions, including Christianity.
The office may also be given as an honorary title to a clergyman who is not the head of a monastery.
Ardipithecus is a genus of an extinct hominine that lived during the Late Miocene and Early Pliocene epochs in the Afar Depression, Ethiopia.
Originally described as one of the earliest ancestors of humans after they diverged from the chimpanzees, the relation of this genus to human ancestors and whether it is a hominin is now a matter of debate.
An assembly line is a manufacturing process (often called a progressive assembly) in which parts (usually interchangeable parts) are added as the semi-finished assembly moves from workstation to workstation where the parts are added in sequence until the final assembly is produced.
By mechanically moving the parts to the assembly work and moving the semi-finished assembly from work station to work station, a finished product can be assembled faster and with less labor than by having workers carry parts to a stationary piece for assembly.
Adelaide ( ;  ) is the capital city of South Australia, the state's largest city and the fifth-most populous city in Australia.
"Adelaide" may refer to either Greater Adelaide (including the Adelaide Hills) or the Adelaide city centre.
Alan Garner  (born 17 October 1934) is an English novelist best known for his children's fantasy novels and his retellings of traditional British folk tales.
Much of his work is rooted in the landscape, history and folklore of his native county of Cheshire, North West England, being set in the region and making use of the native Cheshire dialect.
EventsPre-1600338 BC – A Macedonian army led by Philip II defeated the combined forces of Athens and Thebes in the Battle of Chaeronea, securing Macedonian hegemony in Greece and the Aegean.216 BC – The Carthaginian army led by Hannibal defeats a numerically superior Roman army at the Battle of Cannae.49 BC – Caesar, who marched to Spain earlier in the year leaving Marcus Antonius in charge of Italy, defeats Pompey's general Afranius and Petreius in Ilerda (Lerida) north of the Ebro river. 461 – Majorian is arrested near Tortona (northern Italy) and deposed by the Suebian general Ricimer as puppet emperor.
932 – After a two-year siege, the city of Toledo, in Spain, surrenders to the forces of the Caliph of Córdoba Abd al-Rahman III, assuming an important victory in his campaign to subjugate the Central March.
The Atlantic Ocean is the second largest of the world's oceans, that separates the old world from the new world.
Atlantic may also refer to:PlacesIn Canada Atlantic, Nova Scotia Atlantic CanadaIn the United States Atlantic, Iowa Atlantic, Massachusetts Atlantic, North Carolina, an unincorporated community in eastern Carteret County Atlantic, Pennsylvania Atlantic, Seattle, a neighborhood in Washington state Atlantic, Virginia Atlantic City, New Jersey Atlantic County, New Jersey Atlantic Peak (Colorado), a mountainArt, entertainment, and mediaCompanies and labels Atlantic Books, an independent British publishing house Atlantic Monthly Press, an American publishing house Atlantic Entertainment Group, a defunct movie studio company Atlantic FM, a former radio station serving Cornwall, United Kingdom Atlantic Records, a record companyMusic The Atlantics, an Australian surf rock band formed in the early 1960sAlbums Atlantic (Dufresne album)
An algebraic number is a number that is a root of a non-zero polynomial in one variable with integer (or, equivalently, rational) coefficients.
For example, the golden ratio, , is an algebraic number, because it is a root of the polynomial .
In mathematics, an automorphism is an isomorphism from a mathematical object to itself.
It is, in some sense, a symmetry of the object, and a way of mapping the object to itself while preserving all of its structure.
Accordions (from 19th-century German , from —"musical chord, concord of sounds") are a family of box-shaped musical instruments of the bellows-driven free reed aerophone type (producing sound as air flows past a reed in a frame).
The essential characteristic of the accordion is to combine in one instrument a melody section, also called the diskant, usually on the right-hand keyboard, with an accompaniment or Basso continuo functionality on the left-hand.
Artificial intelligence (AI) is the intelligence of machines or software, as opposed to the intelligence of humans or animals.
It is also the field of study in computer science that develops and studies intelligent machines.
Afro Celt Sound System are a European and African group who fuse electronic music with traditional Gaelic and West African music.
Afro Celt Sound System were formed in 1995 by producer-guitarist Simon Emmerson, and feature a wide range of guest artists.
This page lists some links to ancient philosophy, namely philosophical thought extending as far as early post-classical history ().
OverviewGenuine philosophical thought, depending upon original individual insights, arose in many cultures roughly contemporaneously.
Anaximander ( ;  Anaximandros; ) was a pre-Socratic Greek philosopher who lived in Miletus, a city of Ionia (in modern-day Turkey).
He belonged to the Milesian school and learned the teachings of his master Thales.
APL is an abbreviation, acronym, or initialism that may refer to:Science and technology
132524 APL, an asteroidAbductor pollicis longus muscle, in the human handAcute promyelocytic leukemia, a subtype of acute myelogenous leukemiaApplied Physics Letters, a physics journalNampula Airport (IATA airport code: APL), in MozambiqueComputers .apl, the file extension of the Monkey's Audio metadata file AMD Performance Library, renamed Framewave, a computer compiler library APL (programming language), an array-based programming language APL (codepage), the character set for programming in APL Address Prefix List, a DNS record type Address programming language, an early high-level programming language developed in the Soviet Union Advanced Physical Layer, an extension of Ethernet 10BASE-T1L for field devices Alexa Presentation Language, a language for developing Amazon Alexa skillsSoftware licences Adaptive Public License, an Open Source license from the University of Victori
An architect is a person who plans, designs and oversees the construction of buildings.
To practice architecture means to provide services in connection with the design of buildings and the space within the site surrounding the buildings that have human occupancy or use as their principal purpose.
An abbreviation (from Latin , meaning short) is a shortened form of a word or phrase, by any method.
It may consist of a group of letters or words taken from the full version of the word or phrase; for example, the word abbreviation itself can be abbreviated as abbr., abbrv., or abbrev.; NPO, for nil (or nothing) per (by) os (mouth) is an abbreviated medical instruction.
Aphrodite ( ) is an ancient Greek goddess associated with love, lust, beauty, pleasure, passion, procreation, and as her syncretized Roman goddess counterpart , desire, sex, fertility, prosperity, and victory.
Aphrodite's major symbols include seashells, myrtles, roses, doves, sparrows, and swans.
EventsPre-1600 527 – Byzantine Emperor Justin I names his nephew Justinian I as co-ruler and successor to the throne.
1081 – Alexios
In mathematics, a binary relation  on a set  is antisymmetric if there is no pair of distinct elements of  each of which is related by  to the other.
More formally,  is antisymmetric precisely if for all or equivalently,The definition of antisymmetry says nothing about whether  actually holds or not for any .
Aleister Crowley (; born Edward Alexander Crowley; 12 October 1875 – 1 December 1947) was an English occultist, philosopher, ceremonial magician, poet, painter, novelist and mountaineer.
He founded the religion of Thelema, identifying himself as the prophet entrusted with guiding humanity into the Æon of Horus in the early 20th century.
The afterlife or life after death is a purported existence in which the essential part of an individual's stream of consciousness or identity continues to exist after the death of their physical body.
The surviving essential aspect varies between belief systems; it may be some partial element, or the entire soul or spirit, which carries with it one's personal identity.
Astrometry is a branch of astronomy that involves precise measurements of the positions and movements of stars and other celestial bodies.
It provides the kinematics and physical origin of the Solar System and this galaxy, the Milky Way.HistoryThe history of astrometry is linked to the history of star catalogues, which gave astronomers reference points for objects in the sky so they could track their movements.
Athena or Athene, often given the epithet Pallas, is an ancient Greek goddess associated with wisdom, warfare, and handicraft who was later syncretized with the Roman goddess Minerva.
Athena was regarded as the patron and protectress of various cities across Greece, particularly the city of Athens, from which she most likely received her name.
The Amber Diceless Roleplaying Game is a role-playing game created and written by Erick Wujcik, set in the fictional universe created by author Roger Zelazny for his Chronicles of Amber.
The game is unusual in that no dice are used in resolving conflicts or player actions; instead a simple diceless system of comparative ability, and narrative description of the action by the players and gamemaster, is used to determine how situations are resolved.
Athene or Athena is the shrewd companion of heroes and the goddess of heroic endeavour in Greek mythology.
Athene may also refer to:881 Athene, a main-belt asteroidAthene (bird), a genus of small owlsAthene (Cynuria), a town in ancient Cynuria, GreeceAthene Glacier, a glacier in AntarcticaHMS Athene, an aircraft transportUSS Athene (AKA-22), an Artemis-class attack cargo shipBachir Boumaaza or Athene (born  1980), Belgian YouTube personality and social activistAthene (research center), stylized as ATHENE, an IT security research institute in Darmstadt, GermanyAthene, an insurance company acquired by Apollo Global ManagementPeople with the given nameAthene Seyler (1889–1990), English actressAthene Donald (born 1953), British physicistSee alsoAltena (disambiguation)
An alloy is a mixture of chemical elements of which at least one is a metal.
Unlike chemical compounds with metallic bases, an alloy will retain all the properties of a metal in the resulting material, such as electrical conductivity, ductility, opacity, and luster, but may have properties that differ from those of the pure metals, such as increased strength or hardness.
Throughout history, forms of art have gone through periodic abrupt changes called artistic revolutions.
Movements have come to an end to be replaced by a new movement markedly different in striking ways.
Agrarianism is a social and political philosophy that has promoted subsistence agriculture, family farming, widespread property ownership, and political decentralization.
Adherents of agrarianism tend to value traditional bonds of local community over urban modernity.
Atomic may refer to: Of or relating to the atom, the smallest particle of a chemical element that retains its chemical properties Atomic physics, the study of the atom Atomic Age, also known as the "Atomic Era" Atomic scale, distances comparable to the dimensions of an atom Atom (order theory), in mathematics Atomic (cocktail), a champagne cocktail Atomic (magazine), an Australian computing and technology magazine Atomic Skis, an Austrian ski producerMusic  Atomic (band), a Norwegian jazz quintet Atomic (Lit album), 2001 Atomic (Mogwai album), 2016 Atomic, an album by Rockets, 1982 Atomic (EP), by , 2013 "Atomic" (song), by Blondie, 1979 "Atomic", a song by Tiger Army from Tiger Army III: Ghost Tigers RiseSee also    Atom (disambiguation)
Atomicity (database systems) Nuclear (disambiguation) Atomism, philosophy about the basic building blocks of reality Atomic City (disambiguation) Atomic formula, a formula without subformulas Atomic number, the number of
In Euclidean geometry, an angle is the figure formed by two rays, called the sides of the angle, sharing a common endpoint, called the vertex of the angle.
Angles formed by two rays are also known as plane angles as they lie in the plane that contains the rays.
Asa may refer to:People and fictional characters Asa (name), a given name, including a list of people and fictional characters so named Asa people, an ethnic group based in Tanzania Aṣa, Nigerian-French singer, songwriter, and recording artist Bukola Elemide (born 1982) Asa (rapper), Finnish rapper Matti Salo (born 1980)
Biblical and mythological figures Asa of Judah, third king of the Kingdom of Judah and the fifth king of the House of David Ása or Æsir, Norse godsPlaces Asa, Hardoi Uttar Pradesh, India, a village Asu, South Khorasan, Iran, also spelled Asa, a village Asa, Kwara State, Nigeria, a local government area Asa River (Japan), a tributary of the Tama River in Tokyo, Japan Asa (Kazakhstan), a river Asa River (Venezuela) - see List of rivers in VenezuelaOther uses Asa (album), the sixth studio album by the German Viking metal band Falkenbach Asa (raga), a peculiar musical raga in Gurmat Sangeet tradition ASA carriage control characters,
Acoustics is a branch of physics that deals with the study of mechanical waves in gases, liquids, and solids including topics such as vibration, sound, ultrasound and infrasound.
A scientist who works in the field of acoustics is an acoustician while someone working in the field of acoustics technology may be called an acoustical engineer.
Atomic physics is the field of physics that studies atoms as an isolated system of electrons and an atomic nucleus.
Atomic physics typically refers to the study of atomic structure and the interaction between atoms.
American Sign Language (ASL) is a natural language that serves as the predominant sign language of Deaf communities in the United States of America and most of Anglophone Canada.
ASL is a complete and organized visual language that is expressed by employing both manual and nonmanual features.
In computing, an applet is any small application that performs one specific task that runs within the scope of a dedicated widget engine or a larger program, often as a plug-in.
The term is frequently used to refer to a Java applet, a program written in the Java programming language that is designed to be placed on a web page.
Alternate history is a subgenre of speculative fiction in which one or more historical events have occurred but are resolved differently than in actual history.
As conjecture based upon historical fact, alternate history stories propose What if?
In atomic theory and quantum mechanics, an atomic orbital () is a function describing the location and wave-like behavior of an electron in an atom.
This function can be used to calculate the probability of finding any electron of an atom in any specific region around the atom's nucleus.
Amino acids are organic compounds that contain both amino and carboxylic acid functional groups.
Although over 500 amino acids exist in nature, by far the most important are the 22 α-amino acids incorporated into proteins.
Alan Mathison Turing  (; 23 June 1912 – 7 June 1954) was an English mathematician, computer scientist, logician, cryptanalyst, philosopher and theoretical biologist.
Turing was highly influential in the development of theoretical computer science, providing a formalisation of the concepts of algorithm and computation with the Turing machine, which can be considered a model of a general-purpose computer.
Area is the measure of a region's size on a surface.
The area of a plane region or plane area refers to the area of a shape or planar lamina, while surface area refers to the area of an open surface or the boundary of a three-dimensional object.
The astronomical unit (symbol: au, or  or AU) is a unit of length, roughly the distance from Earth to the Sun and approximately equal to  or 8.3 light-minutes.
The actual distance from Earth to the Sun varies by about 3% as Earth orbits the Sun, from a maximum (aphelion) to a minimum (perihelion) and back again once each year.
An artist is a person engaged in an activity related to creating art, practicing the arts, or demonstrating an art.
The common usage in both everyday speech and academic discourse refers to a practitioner in the visual arts only.
Actaeon (;  Aktaiōn), in Greek mythology, was the son of the priestly herdsman Aristaeus and Autonoe in Boeotia, and a famous Theban hero.
Through his mother he was a member of the ruling House of Cadmus.
Anglicanism is a Western Christian tradition that has developed from the practices, liturgy, and identity of the Church of England following the English Reformation, in the context of the Protestant Reformation in Europe.
It is one of the largest branches of Christianity, with around 110 million adherents worldwide .
Athens ( ; , ; , ) is a major coastal urban area in the Mediterranean, and it is both the capital and the largest city of Greece.
With its urban area's population numbering over three million, it is also the eighth largest urban area in the European Union.
Anguilla ( ) is a British Overseas Territory in the Caribbean.
It is one of the most northerly of the Leeward Islands in the Lesser Antilles, lying east of Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands and directly north of Saint Martin.
This article is about communications systems in Anguilla.
TelephoneTelephones – main lines in use: 6,200 (2002)country comparison to the world: 212Telephones – mobile cellular: 1,800 (2002)country comparison to the world: 211Telephone system:
The Territory of Ashmore and Cartier Islands is an uninhabited Australian external territory consisting of four low-lying tropical islands in two separate reefs (Ashmore and Cartier), as well as the  territorial sea generated by the islands.
The territory is located in the Indian Ocean situated on the edge of the continental shelf, about  off the northwest coast of Australia and  south of the Indonesian island of Rote.Ashmore Reef is called Pulau Pasir by Indonesians and Nusa Solokaek in the Rotenese language.
Acoustic theory is a scientific field that relates to the description of sound waves.
It derives from fluid dynamics.
Alexander Mackenzie  (January 28, 1822 – April 17, 1892) was a Canadian politician who served as the second prime minister of Canada, in office from 1873 to 1878.
Mackenzie was born in Logierait, Perthshire, Scotland.
Ashoka (, ; also Asoka;  – 232 BCE), popularly known as Ashoka the Great, was the third Mauryan Emperor of Magadha in the Indian subcontinent during  to 232 BCE.
His empire covered a large part of the Indian subcontinent, stretching from present-day Afghanistan in the west to present-day Bangladesh in the east, with its capital at Pataliputra.
The meaning of the word American in the English language varies according to the historical, geographical, and political context in which it is used.
American is derived from America, a term originally denoting all of the Americas (also called the Western Hemisphere).
Ada is a structured, statically typed, imperative, and object-oriented high-level programming language, inspired by Pascal and other languages.
It has built-in language support for design by contract (DbC), extremely strong typing, explicit concurrency, tasks, synchronous message passing, protected objects, and non-determinism.
Alfonso Cuarón Orozco ( , ; born 28 November 1961) is a Mexican filmmaker.
He is known for directing films in a variety of genres, including the family drama A Little Princess (1995), the romantic drama Great Expectations (1998), the coming of age road film Y tu mamá también (2001), the fantasy film Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban (2004), science fiction films such as Children of Men (2006) and Gravity (2013) and the semi-autobiographical drama Roma (2018).
Arianism (, ) is a Christological doctrine first attributed to Arius (), a Christian presbyter who preached and studied in Alexandria, Egypt.
Arian theology holds that Jesus Christ is the Son of God, who was begotten by God the Father with the difference that the Son of God did not always exist but was begotten/made before "time" by God the Father; therefore, Jesus was not coeternal with God the Father, but nonetheless Jesus began to exist outside time as time applies only to the creations of God.
EventsPre-160030 BC – Octavian (later known as Augustus) enters Alexandria, Egypt, bringing it under the control of the Roman Republic.
AD 69 – Batavian rebellion: The Batavians in Germania Inferior (Netherlands) revolt under the leadership of Gaius Julius Civilis.
Titus Aelius Hadrianus Antoninus Pius (19 September 86 – 7 March 161) was Roman emperor from 138 to 161.
He was the fourth of the Five Good Emperors from the Nerva–Antonine dynasty.
EventsPre-16008 – Roman Empire general Tiberius defeats the Dalmatae on the river Bosna.
435 – Deposed Ecumenical Patriarch of Constantinople Nestorius, considered the originator of Nestorianism, is exiled by Roman Emperor Theodosius II to a monastery in Egypt.
The Advanced Encryption Standard (AES), also known by its original name Rijndael (), is a specification for the encryption of electronic data established by the U.S. National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) in 2001.
AES is a variant of the Rijndael block cipher developed by two Belgian cryptographers, Joan Daemen and Vincent Rijmen, who submitted a proposal to NIST during the AES selection process.
EventsPre-16001336 – Francesco Petrarca (Petrarch) ascends Mont Ventoux.
1478 – The Pazzi family attack on Lorenzo de' Medici in order to displace the ruiling Medici family kills his brother Giuliano during High Mass in Florence Cathedral.
Anisotropy () is the structural property of non-uniformity in different directions, as opposed to isotropy.
An anisotropic object or pattern has properties that differ according to direction of measurement.
Alpha decay or α-decay is a type of radioactive decay in which an atomic nucleus emits an alpha particle (helium nucleus) and thereby transforms or 'decays' into a different atomic nucleus, with a mass number that is reduced by four and an atomic number that is reduced by two.
An alpha particle is identical to the nucleus of a helium-4 atom, which consists of two protons and two neutrons.
Extreme poverty is the most severe type of poverty, defined by the United Nations (UN) as "a condition characterized by severe deprivation of basic human needs, including food, safe drinking water, sanitation facilities, health, shelter, education and information.
It depends not only on income but also on access to services".
The analytical engine was a proposed mechanical general-purpose computer designed by English mathematician and computer pioneer Charles Babbage.
It was first described in 1837 as the successor to Babbage's difference engine, which was a design for a simpler mechanical calculator.
Caesar Augustus (born Gaius Octavius; 23 September 63 BC – 19 August AD 14), also known as Octavian, was the founder of the Roman Empire; he reigned as the first Roman emperor from 27 BC until his death in AD 14.
The reign of Augustus initiated an imperial cult as well as an era associated with imperial peace, the Pax Romana or Pax Augusta, in which the Roman world was largely free of armed conflict aside from expansionary wars and the Year of the Four Emperors.
The geography of Antarctica is dominated by its south polar location and, thus, by ice.
The Antarctic continent, located in the Earth's southern hemisphere, is centered asymmetrically around the South Pole and largely south of the Antarctic Circle.
Transport in Antarctica has transformed from explorers crossing the isolated remote area of Antarctica by foot to a more open era due to human technologies enabling more convenient and faster transport, predominantly by air and water, but also by land as well.
Transportation technologies on a remote area like Antarctica need to be able to deal with extremely low temperatures and continuous winds to ensure the travelers' safety.
The geography of Alabama describes a state in the Southeastern United States in North America.
It extends from high mountains to low valleys and sandy beaches.
The governor of Alabama is the head of government of the U.S. state of Alabama.
The governor is the head of the executive branch of Alabama's state government and is charged with enforcing state laws.
Apocrypha is biblical or related writings not forming part of the accepted canon of Scripture.
While some might be of doubtful authorship or authenticity, in Christianity, the word apocryphal (ἀπόκρυφος) was first applied to writings which were to be read privately rather than in the public context of church services.
The Antarctic Treaty and related agreements, collectively known as the Antarctic Treaty System (ATS), regulate international relations with respect to Antarctica, Earth's only continent without a native human population.
It was the first arms control agreement established during the Cold War, setting aside the continent as a scientific preserve, establishing freedom of scientific investigation, and banning military activity; for the purposes of the treaty system, Antarctica is defined as all the land and ice shelves south of 60°S latitude.
Alfred William Lawson (March 24, 1869 – November 29, 1954) was an English born professional baseball player, aviator and utopian philosopher.
He was a baseball player, manager, and league promoter from 1887 through 1916 and went on to play a pioneering role in the U.S. aircraft industry.
Ames () is a city in Story County, Iowa, United States, located approximately  north of Des Moines in central Iowa.
It is best known as the home of Iowa State University (ISU), with leading agriculture, design, engineering, and veterinary medicine colleges.
Abalone ( or ; via Spanish , from  Rumsen aulón) is a common name for any of a group of small to very large marine gastropod molluscs in the family Haliotidae.
Other common names are ear shells, sea ears, and, rarely, muttonfish or muttonshells in parts of Australia, ormer in the UK, perlemoen in South Africa, and paua in New Zealand.
An abbess (Latin: abbatissa), also known as a mother superior, is the female superior of a community of Catholic nuns in an abbey.
DescriptionIn the Catholic Church (both the Latin Church and Eastern Catholic), Eastern Orthodox, Coptic and Anglican abbeys, the mode of election, position, rights, and authority of an abbess correspond generally with those of an abbot.
The term abdominal surgery broadly covers surgical procedures that involve opening the abdomen (laparotomy).
Surgery of each abdominal organ is dealt with separately in connection with the description of that organ (see stomach, kidney, liver, etc.)
Abensberg () is a town in the Lower Bavarian district of Kelheim, in Bavaria, Germany, lying around  southwest of Regensburg,  east of Ingolstadt,  northwest of Landshut and  north of Munich.
It is situated on the river Abens, a tributary of the Danube.
Arminianism is a movement of Protestantism initiated in the early 17th century, based on the theological ideas of the Dutch Reformed theologian Jacobus Arminius and his historic supporters known as Remonstrants.
Dutch Arminianism was originally articulated in the Remonstrance (1610), a theological statement submitted to the States General of the Netherlands.
The Alan Parsons Project were a British rock band active between 1975 and 1990, whose core membership consisted of producer, audio engineer, musician and composer Alan Parsons and singer, songwriter and pianist Eric Woolfson.
They were accompanied by varying session musicians and some relatively consistent session players such as guitarist Ian Bairnson, arranger Andrew Powell, bassist and vocalist David Paton, drummer Stuart Elliott, and vocalists Lenny Zakatek and Chris Rainbow.
In mathematics, the term "almost all" means "all but a negligible quantity".
More precisely, if  is a set, "almost all elements of " means "all elements of  but those in a negligible subset of ".
Aromatic compounds, also known as "mono- and polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons", are organic compounds containing one or more aromatic rings.
The word "aromatic" originates from the past grouping of molecules based on odor, before their general chemical properties were understood.
An abbey is a type of monastery used by members of a religious order under the governance of an abbot or abbess.
Abbeys provide a complex of buildings and land for religious activities, work, and housing of Christian monks and nuns.
The Annales school () is a group of historians associated with a style of historiography developed by French historians in the 20th century to stress long-term social history.
It is named after its scholarly journal Annales d'histoire économique et sociale, which remains the main source of scholarship, along with many books and monographs.
In modern physics, antimatter is defined as matter composed of the antiparticles (or "partners") of the corresponding particles in "ordinary" matter, and can be thought of as matter with reversed charge, parity, and time, known as CPT reversal.
Antimatter occurs in natural processes like cosmic ray collisions and some types of radioactive decay, but only a tiny fraction of these have successfully been bound together in experiments to form antiatoms.
() is a building in the center of Barcelona, Spain.
It was designed by Antoni Gaudí, and is considered one of his masterpieces.
Park Güell ( ; ) is a privatized park system composed of gardens and architectural elements located on Carmel Hill, in Barcelona, Catalonia, Spain.
Carmel Hill belongs to the mountain range of Collserola – the Parc del Carmel is located on the northern face.
Casa Milà (, ), popularly known as La Pedrera (, ; "the stone quarry") in reference to its unconventional rough-hewn appearance, is a Modernista building in Barcelona, Catalonia, Spain.
It was the last private residence designed by architect Antoni Gaudí and was built between 1906 and 1912.
In particle physics, every type of particle is associated with an antiparticle with the same mass but with opposite physical charges (such as electric charge).
For example, the antiparticle of the electron is the positron (also known as an antielectron).
Kim Renard Nazel (born June 17, 1965), better known by his stage names Arabian Prince or Professor X, is an American rapper, record producer, and DJ.
He was a founding member of N.W.A.Early lifeNazel was born in Compton, California to the son of Joseph "Skippy" Nazel Jr., an African-American author and radio talk show host.
EventsPre-1600 461 – Roman Emperor Majorian is beheaded near the river Iria in north-west Italy following his arrest and deposition by the magister militum Ricimer.
626 – The Avar and Slav armies leave the siege of Constantinople.
EventsPre-1600685 BC – Spring and Autumn period: Battle of Qianshi: Upon the death of the previous Duke of Qi, Gongsun Wuzhi, Duke Zhuang of Lu sends an army into the Duchy of Qi to install the exiled Qi prince Gongzi Jiu as the new Duke of Qi — but is defeated at Qianshi by Jiu’s brother and rival claimant, the newly inaugurated Duke Huan of Qi. 870 – Treaty of Meerssen: King Louis the German and his half-brother Charles the Bald partition the Middle Frankish Kingdom into two larger east and west divisions.1220 – Sweden is defeated by Estonian tribes in the Battle of Lihula.1264 – Mudéjar revolt: Muslim rebel forces took the Alcázar of Jerez de la Frontera after defeating the Castilian garrison.1503 – King James IV of Scotland marries Margaret Tudor, daughter of King Henry VII of England at Holyrood Abbey in Edinburgh, Scotland.1509 – Krishnadeva Raya is crowned Emperor of Vijayanagara at Chittoor.
1576 – The cornerstone for Tycho Brahe's Uraniborg observatory is laid on the
EventsPre-16001457 BC – Battle of Megido - the first battle to have been recorded in what is accepted as relatively reliable detail.69 – Defeated by Vitellius' troops at Bedriacum, Otho commits suicide.
73 – Masada, a Jewish fortress, falls to the Romans after several months of siege, ending the First Jewish–Roman War.1346 – Stefan Dušan, "the Mighty", is crowned Emperor of the Serbs at Skopje, his empire occupying much of the Balkans.
In mathematics, the associative property is a property of some binary operations, which means that rearranging the parentheses in an expression will not change the result.
In propositional logic, associativity is a valid rule of replacement for expressions in logical proofs.
The Apache Software Foundation ( ; ASF) is an American nonprofit corporation (classified as a 501(c)(3) organization in the United States) to support a number of open-source software projects.
The ASF was formed from a group of developers of the Apache HTTP Server, and incorporated on March 25, 1999.
The Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 or ADA () is a civil rights law that prohibits discrimination based on disability.
It affords similar protections against discrimination to Americans with disabilities as the Civil Rights Act of 1964, which made discrimination based on race, religion, sex, national origin, and other characteristics illegal, and later sexual orientation and gender identity.
The Apple Computer 1 (Apple-1), later known predominantly as the Apple I, is an 8-bit motherboard-only personal computer designed by Steve Wozniak and released by the Apple Computer Company (now Apple Inc.) in 1976.
The company was initially formed to sell the Apple Iits first product and would later become the world's largest technology company.
Apatosaurus (; meaning "deceptive lizard") is a genus of herbivorous sauropod dinosaur that lived in North America during the Late Jurassic period.
Othniel Charles Marsh described and named the first-known species, A. ajax, in 1877, and a second species, A. louisae, was discovered and named by William H. Holland in 1916.
Allosaurus () is an extinct genus of large carnosaurian theropod dinosaur that lived 155 to 145 million years ago during the Late Jurassic period (Kimmeridgian to late Tithonian ages).
The name "Allosaurus" means "different lizard", alluding to its unique (at the time of its discovery) concave vertebrae.
The AK-47, officially known as the Avtomat Kalashnikova (; also known as the Kalashnikov or just AK), is a gas-operated assault rifle that is chambered for the 7.62×39mm cartridge.
Developed in the Soviet Union by Russian small-arms designer Mikhail Kalashnikov, it is the originating firearm of the Kalashnikov (or "AK") family of rifles.
The Atanasoff–Berry computer (ABC) was the first automatic electronic digital computer.
Limited by the technology of the day, and execution, the device has remained somewhat obscure.
The Andes ( ), Andes Mountains or Andean Mountain Range (; ) are the longest continental mountain range in the world, forming a continuous highland along the western edge of South America.
The range is  long,  wide (widest between 18°S – 20°S latitude), and has an average height of about .
Ancylopoda is a group of browsing, herbivorous, mammals in the Perissodactyla that show long, curved and cleft claws.
Morphological evidence indicates the Ancylopoda diverged from the tapirs, rhinoceroses and horses (Euperissodactyla) after the Brontotheria; however, earlier authorities such as Osborn sometimes considered the Ancylopoda to be outside Perissodactyla or, as was popular more recently,  to be related to Brontotheriidae.Macrotherium, which is typically from the middle Miocene of Sansan, in Gers, France, may indicate a distinct genus.
An anchor is a device, normally made of metal, used to secure a vessel to the bed of a body of water to prevent the craft from drifting due to wind or current.
The word derives from Latin , which itself comes from the Greek  ().
Anbar (, ,) also known by its original ancient name, Peroz-Shapur, was an ancient and medieval town in central Iraq.
It played a role in the Roman–Persian Wars of the 3rd–4th centuries, and briefly became the capital of the Abbasid Caliphate before the founding of Baghdad in 762.
Anazarbus, also known as Justinopolis (, medieval Ain Zarba; modern Anavarza; ), was an ancient Cilician city.
Under the late Roman Empire, it was the capital of Cilicia Secunda.
An anagram is a word or phrase formed by rearranging the letters of a different word or phrase, typically using all the original letters exactly once.
For example, the word anagram itself can be rearranged into nag a ram; which is an Easter egg in Google when searching for the word "anagram"; the word binary-into brainy and the word adobe-into abode.
The Anadyr (; Yukaghir: Онандырь; ) is a river in the far northeast of Siberia which flows into the Gulf of Anadyr of the Bering Sea and drains much of the interior of Chukotka Autonomous Okrug.
Its basin corresponds to the Anadyrsky District of Chukotka.
André-Marie Ampère (, , ; 20 January 177510 June 1836) was a French physicist and mathematician who was one of the founders of the science of classical electromagnetism, which he referred to as "electrodynamics".
He is also the inventor of numerous applications, such as the solenoid (a term coined by him) and the electrical telegraph.
Ammonia is an inorganic chemical compound of nitrogen and hydrogen with the formula .
A stable binary hydride and the simplest pnictogen hydride, ammonia is a colourless gas with a distinct pungent smell.
Amethyst is a violet variety of quartz.
The name comes from the Koine Greek αμέθυστος amethystos from α- a-, "not" and μεθύσκω (Ancient Greek)  / μεθώ  (Modern Greek), "intoxicate", a reference to the belief that the stone protected its owner from drunkenness.
Albertosaurus (; meaning "Alberta lizard") is a genus of large tyrannosaurid theropod dinosaur that lived in northwestern North America during the early to middle Maastrichtian age of the Late Cretaceous period, about 71 million years ago.
The type species, A. sarcophagus, was apparently restricted in range to the modern-day Canadian province of Alberta, after which the genus is named, although an indeterminate species ("cf.
In computer programming,  assembly language (alternatively assembler language or symbolic machine code), often referred to simply as assembly and commonly abbreviated as ASM or asm, is any low-level programming language with a very strong correspondence between the instructions in the language and the architecture's machine code instructions.
Assembly language usually has one statement per machine instruction (1:1), but  constants, comments, assembler directives, symbolic labels of, e.g., memory locations, registers, and macros are generally also supported.
In the ancient Greek myths, ambrosia (, ) is the food or drink of the Greek gods, and is often depicted as conferring longevity or immortality upon whoever consumed it.
It was brought to the gods in Olympus by doves and served either by Hebe or by Ganymede at the  heavenly feast.
Ambrose of Milan (; 4 April 397), venerated as Saint Ambrose, was a theologian and statesman who served as Bishop of Milan from 374 to 397.
He expressed himself prominently as a public figure, fiercely promoting Roman Christianity against Arianism and paganism.
Ambracia (; , occasionally , Ampracia) was a city of ancient Greece on the site of modern Arta.
It was founded by the Corinthians in 625 BC and was situated about  from the Ambracian Gulf, on a bend of the navigable river Arachthos (or Aratthus), in the midst of a fertile wooded plain.
Amber is fossilized tree resin that has been appreciated for its color and natural beauty since Neolithic times.
Much valued from antiquity to the present as a gemstone, amber is made into a variety of decorative objects.
Amalaric (; Spanish and Portuguese: Amalarico; 502–531) was king of the Visigoths from 522 until his assassination.
He was a son of king Alaric II and his first wife Theodegotha, daughter of Theodoric the Great.
The alphorn or alpenhorn or alpine horn is a labrophone, consisting of a straight several-meter-long wooden natural horn of conical bore, with a wooden cup-shaped mouthpiece.
Traditionally the Alphorn was made of one single piece, or two parts at most, of the wood of a red pine tree.
An army, ground force or land force is an armed force that fights primarily on land.
In the broadest sense, it is the land-based military branch, service branch or armed service of a nation or country.
The family Alligatoridae of crocodylians includes alligators, caimans and their extinct relatives.
Phylogeny
Alders are trees comprising the genus Alnus in the birch family Betulaceae.
The genus comprises about 35 species of monoecious trees and shrubs, a few reaching a large size, distributed throughout the north temperate zone with a few species extending into Central America, as well as the northern and southern Andes.Description With a few exceptions, alders are deciduous, and the leaves are alternate, simple, and serrated.
Amos Bronson Alcott (; November 29, 1799 – March 4, 1888) was an American teacher, writer, philosopher, and reformer.
As an educator, Alcott pioneered new ways of interacting with young students, focusing on a conversational style, and avoided traditional punishment.
Arachnophobia is a specific phobia brought about by the irrational fear of spiders and other arachnids such as scorpions and ticks.
The word Arachnophobia comes from the Greek words arachne and phobia.
Alabaster is a mineral and a soft rock used for carvings and as a source of plaster powder.
Archaeologists, geologists, and the stone industry have different definitions and usages for the word alabaster.
Ahab (;  Aḫâbbu
[a-ḫa-ab-bu];  Achaáb; ) was the seventh king of Israel, the son and successor of King Omri and the husband of Jezebel of Sidon, according to the Hebrew Bible.
In the realm of electronic technology, ASIC stands for application-specific integrated circuit, an integrated circuit customized for a specific task.
ASIC may also refer to: Accreditation Service for International Colleges, an educational accreditation agency in the UK Acid-sensing ion channels, a protein family Air and Space Interoperability Council , former name of the Air Force Interoperability Council Arfoire Syndicate of International Crime, the antagonist group in the video game Hyperdimension Neptunia mk2 ASIC programming language, a dialect of BASIC Associated Signature Containers (ASiC), specifies the use of container structures to bind together one or more signed objects with either advanced electronic signatures or time-stamp tokens into one single digital container Association Scientifique Internationale pour le Café, a scientific organization based in France Australian Securities & Investments Commission, Australia's corporate regulator Aviation Security Identifi
Dasyproctidae is a family of large South American rodents, comprising the agoutis and acouchis.
Their fur is a reddish or dark colour above, with a paler underside.
Algol , designated Beta Persei (β Persei, abbreviated Beta Per, β Per), known colloquially as the Demon Star, is a bright multiple star in the constellation of Perseus and one of the first non-nova variable stars to be discovered.
Algol is a three-star system, consisting of Beta Persei Aa1, Aa2, and Ab – in which the hot luminous primary β Persei Aa1 and the larger, but cooler and fainter, β Persei Aa2 regularly pass in front of each other, causing eclipses.
"Amazing Grace" is a Christian hymn published in 1779 with words written in 1772 by English Anglican clergyman and poet John Newton (1725–1807).
It is an immensely popular hymn, particularly in the United States, where it is used for both religious and secular purposes.
AOL (stylized as Aol., formerly a company known as AOL Inc. and originally known as America Online) is an American web portal and online service provider based in New York City.
It is a brand marketed by the current incarnation of
The terms  (AD) and before Christ (BC) are used to label or number years in the Julian and Gregorian calendars.
The term  is Medieval Latin and means "in the year of the Lord" but is often presented using "our Lord" instead of "the Lord", taken from the full original phrase "anno Domini nostri Jesu Christi", which translates to "in the year of our Lord Jesus Christ".
AV, Av or A.V. may refer to:Arts and entertainment The abbreviation of audiovisual, possessing both a sound and a visual component A.V. (film), a 2005 Hong Kong film directed by Pang Ho-Cheung Adult video, an alternative name/synonym of a pornographic film AV The Hunt, a 2020 Turkish thriller film directed by Emre AkayBusinesses and organizations America Votes, an American 501(c)4 organization that promotes progressive causes Ambulance Victoria, an ambulance service operated in the Australian state of Victoria Anonymous for the Voiceless, a grassroots animal rights organization specializing in street activism Aston Villa F.C., an English professional football club AV Akademikerverlag GmbH & Co. KG an imprint of the German group VDM Publishing (now OmniScriptum) Avaya, a technology company formerly listed on the New York Stock Exchange with symbol "AV" Avianca (IATA airline code AV)
Aviva, British insurance company, listed on the New York Stock Exchange and London Stock
Alcuin of York (; ;  735 – 19 May 804) – also called Ealhwine, Alhwin, or Alchoin – was a scholar, clergyman, poet, and teacher from York, Northumbria.
He was born around 735 and became the student of Archbishop Ecgbert at York.
Angilbert ( – 18 February 814) was a noble Frankish poet who was educated under Alcuin and served Charlemagne as a secretary, diplomat, and son-in-law.
He is venerated as a pre-Congregation saint and is still honored on the day of his death, 18 February.
In chemistry, amines (,  ) are compounds and functional groups that contain a basic nitrogen atom with a lone pair.
Amines are formally derivatives of ammonia (), wherein one or more hydrogen atoms have been replaced by a substituent such as an alkyl or aryl group (these may respectively be called alkylamines and arylamines; amines in which both types of substituent are attached to one nitrogen atom may be called alkylarylamines).
EventsPre-1600 801 – An earthquake in the Central Apennines hits Rome and Spoleto, damaging the basilica of San Paolo Fuori le Mura.1091 – Battle of Levounion:
The Pechenegs are defeated by Byzantine Emperor Alexios
EventsPre-160074 BC – A group of officials, led by the Western Han minister Huo Guang, present articles of impeachment against the new emperor, Liu He, to the imperial regent, Empress Dowager Shangguan.
29 BC – Octavian holds the second of three consecutive triumphs in Rome to celebrate the victory over the Dalmatian tribes.
Absolute zero is the lowest limit of the thermodynamic temperature scale; a state at which the enthalpy and entropy of a cooled ideal gas reach their minimum value, taken as zero kelvin.
The fundamental particles of nature have minimum vibrational motion, retaining only quantum mechanical, zero-point energy-induced particle motion.
In thermodynamics, an adiabatic process (Greek: adiábatos, "impassable") is a type of thermodynamic process that occurs without transferring heat or mass between the thermodynamic system and its environment.
Unlike an isothermal process, an adiabatic process transfers energy to the surroundings only as work.
In organic chemistry, an amide, also known as an organic amide or a carboxamide, is a compound with the general formula , where R, R', and R″ represent any group, typically organyl groups or hydrogen atoms.
The amide group is called a peptide bond when it is part of the main chain of a protein, and an isopeptide bond when it occurs in a side chain, such as in the amino acids asparagine and glutamine.
Animism (from Latin:  meaning 'breath, spirit, life') is the belief that objects, places, and creatures all possess a distinct spiritual essence.
Animism perceives all things—animals, plants, rocks, rivers, weather systems, human handiwork, and in some cases words—as animated and alive.
Antonio Lucio Vivaldi (4 March 1678 – 28 July 1741) was an Italian composer, virtuoso violinist and impresario of Baroque music.
Along with Johann Sebastian Bach and George Frideric Handel, Vivaldi ranks amongst the greatest Baroque composers and his influence during his lifetime was widespread across Europe, giving origin to many imitators and admirers.
Adrian is a form of the Latin given name Adrianus or Hadrianus.
Its ultimate origin is most likely via the former river Adria from the Venetic and Illyrian word adur, meaning "sea" or "water".
The Aare () or Aar () is a tributary of the High Rhine and the longest river that both rises and ends entirely within Switzerland.
Its total length from its source to its junction with the Rhine comprises about , during which distance it descends , draining an area of , almost entirely within Switzerland, and accounting for close to half the area of the country, including all of Central Switzerland.
Abbotsford is a historic country house in the Scottish Borders, near Galashiels, on the south bank of the River Tweed.
Now open to the public, it was built as the residence of historical novelist and poet Sir Walter Scott between 1817 and 1825.
Abraham (originally Abram) is the common Hebrew patriarch of the Abrahamic religions, including Judaism, Christianity, and Islam.
In Judaism, he is the founding father of the special relationship between the Jews and God; in Christianity, he is the spiritual progenitor of all believers, whether Jewish or non-Jewish; and in Islam, he is a link in the chain of Islamic prophets that begins with Adam and culminates in Muhammad.
Abraxas (, variant form  romanized: ) is a word of mystic meaning in the system of the Gnostic Basilides, being there applied to the "Great Archon" (), the princeps of the 365 spheres ().
The word is found in Gnostic texts such as the Holy Book of the Great Invisible Spirit, and also appears in the Greek Magical Papyri.
Absalom ( ʾAḇšālōm, "father of peace") was the third son of David, King of Israel with Maacah, daughter of Talmai, King of Geshur.
2 Samuel 14:25 describes him as the handsomest man in the kingdom.
Abydos  ( or ; Sahidic  ) is one of the oldest cities of ancient Egypt, and also of the eighth nome in Upper Egypt.
It is located about  west of the Nile at latitude 26° 10' N, near the modern Egyptian towns of El Araba El Madfuna and El Balyana.
Abydos (, ) was an ancient city and bishopric in Mysia.
It was located at the Nara Burnu promontory on the Asian coast of the Hellespont (the straits of Dardanelles), opposite the ancient city of Sestos, and near the city of Çanakkale in Turkey.
EventsPre-1600 636 – Arab–Byzantine wars: The Battle of Yarmouk between the Byzantine Empire and the Rashidun Caliphate begins.
717 – Arab–Byzantine wars: Maslama ibn Abd al-Malik begins the Second Arab Siege of Constantinople, which will last for nearly a year.
Acacia s.l. (pronounced  or ), known commonly as mimosa, acacia, thorntree or wattle,  babul [India/hindi] is a polyphyletic genus of shrubs and trees belonging to the subfamily Mimosoideae of the family Fabaceae.
It was described by the Swedish botanist Carl Linnaeus in 1773 based on the African species Acacia nilotica.
Acapulco de Juárez (), commonly called Acapulco ( ,  ; ), is a city and major seaport in the state of Guerrero on the Pacific Coast of Mexico,  south of Mexico City.
Acapulco is located on a deep, semicircular bay and has been a port since the early colonial period of Mexico's history.
EventsPre-16001 BC – Wang Mang consolidates his power in China and is declared marshal of state.
Emperor Ai of Han, who died the previous day, had no heirs.
Alan Curtis Kay (born May 17, 1940) is an American computer scientist best known for his pioneering work on object-oriented programming and windowing graphical user interface (GUI) design.
At Xerox PARC he led the design and development of the first modern windowed computer desktop interface.
APL (named after the book A Programming Language) is a programming language developed in the 1960s by Kenneth E. Iverson.
Its central datatype is the multidimensional array.
ALGOL (; short for "Algorithmic Language") is a family of imperative computer programming languages originally developed in 1958.
ALGOL heavily influenced many other languages and was the standard method for algorithm description used by the Association for Computing Machinery (ACM) in textbooks and academic sources for more than thirty years.
AWK (awk ) is a domain-specific language designed for text processing and typically used as a data extraction and reporting tool.
Like sed and grep, it is a filter, and is a standard feature of most Unix-like operating systems.
In Nordic mythology, Asgard (Old Norse: Ásgarðr ; "enclosure of the Æsir") is a location associated with the gods.
It appears in a multitude of Old Norse sagas and mythological texts.
The Apollo program, also known as Project Apollo, was the United States human spaceflight program carried out by the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), which succeeded in preparing and landing the first humans on the Moon from 1968 to 1972.
It was first conceived in 1960 during President Dwight D. Eisenhower's administration as a three-person spacecraft to follow the one-person Project Mercury, which put the first Americans in space.
An assault is the illegal act of causing physical harm or unwanted physical contact to another person, or, in some legal definitions, the threat or attempt to do so.
It is both a crime and a tort and, therefore, may result in criminal prosecution, civil liability, or both.
In Norse cosmology, Álfheimr (Old Norse: , "Land of the Elves" or "Elfland"; anglicized as Alfheim), also called "Ljósálfheimr" ( , "home of the Light Elves"), is home of the Light Elves.
AttestationsÁlfheim as an abode of the Elves is mentioned only twice in Old Norse texts.
In Norse mythology, Ask and Embla ( )—male and female respectively—were the first two humans, created by the gods.
The pair are attested in both the Poetic Edda, compiled in the 13th century from earlier traditional sources, and the Prose Edda, written in the 13th century by Snorri Sturluson.
The Alabama River, in the U.S. state of Alabama, is formed by the Tallapoosa and Coosa rivers, which unite about  north of Montgomery, near the town of Wetumpka.
The river flows west to Selma, then southwest until, about  from Mobile, it unites with the Tombigbee, forming the Mobile and Tensaw rivers, which discharge into Mobile Bay.
Alain de Lille (Alan of Lille) (Latin: Alanus ab Insulis;  11281202/03) was a French theologian and poet.
He was born in Lille, some time before 1128.
The Alemanni or Alamanni were a confederation of Germanic tribes on the Upper Rhine River during the first millennium.
First mentioned by Cassius Dio in the context of the campaign of Roman emperor Caracalla of 213, the Alemanni captured the  in 260, and later expanded into present-day Alsace and northern Switzerland, leading to the establishment of the Old High German language in those regions, which by the eighth century were collectively referred to as Alamannia.
NYSE American, formerly known as the American Stock Exchange (AMEX), and more recently as NYSE MKT, is an American stock exchange situated in New York City.
AMEX was previously a mutual organization, owned by its members.
EventsPre-1600 310 – Pope Eusebius dies, possibly from a hunger strike, shortly after being banished by the Emperor Maxentius to Sicily.
682 – Pope Leo II begins his pontificate.
EventsPre-16001099 – First Crusade: Battle of Ascalon Crusaders under the command of Godfrey of Bouillon defeat Fatimid forces led by Al-Afdal Shahanshah.
This is considered the last engagement of the First Crusade.
Alfred Russel Wallace  (8 January 1823 – 7 November 1913) was an English naturalist, explorer, geographer, anthropologist, biologist and illustrator.
He independently conceived the theory of evolution through natural selection; his 1858 paper on the subject was published that year alongside extracts from Charles Darwin's earlier writings on the topic.
The Australian Labor Party (ALP), also simply known as Labor, is the major centre-left political party in Australia and one of two major parties in Australian politics, along with the centre-right Liberal Party of Australia.
The party has been in government since being elected at the 2022 federal election, and with political branches in each state and territory, they currently form government in New South Wales, Queensland, South Australia, Victoria, Western Australia, the Australian Capital Territory, and the Northern Territory.
EventsPre-1600 684 – Battle of Marj Rahit: Umayyad partisans defeat the supporters of Ibn al-Zubayr and cement Umayyad control of Syria.
707 – Princess Abe accedes to the imperial Japanese throne as Empress Genmei.
EventsPre-1600295 BC – The first temple to Venus, the Roman goddess of love, beauty and fertility, is dedicated by Quintus Fabius Maximus Gurges during the Third Samnite War.
43 BC – Gaius Julius Caesar Octavianus, later known as Augustus, compels the Roman Senate to elect him Consul. 947 – Abu Yazid, a Kharijite rebel leader, is defeated and killed in the Hodna Mountains in modern-day Algeria by Fatimid forces.
EventsPre-1600 959 – Eraclus becomes the 25th bishop of Liège.
1140 – Song dynasty general Yue Fei defeats an army led by Jin dynasty general Wuzhu at the Battle of Yancheng during the Jin–Song Wars.1169 – Battle of the Blacks:
The Dodo is a fictional character appearing in Chapters 2 and 3 of the 1865 book Alice's Adventures in Wonderland by Lewis Carroll (Charles Lutwidge Dodgson).
The Dodo is a caricature of the author.
A Lory is a small to medium-sized arboreal parrot.
Lory may also refer to:People Al De Lory (1930–2012), an American record producer, arranger, conductor and session musician Donna De Lory (born 1964), an American singer, dancer and songwriter Milo B. Lory (1903–1974), an American sound editorOther uses Lory, a fictional parrot, a minor character in the Alice series by Lewis CarrollLory Lake, in Minnesota, U.S.Lory State Park, near Fort Collins, Colorado, U.S.See alsoLorry (disambiguation)
Albert may refer to:Companies Albert Czech Republic, a supermarket chain in the Czech Republic Albert Heijn, a supermarket chain in the Netherlands Albert Market, a street market in The Gambia Albert Productions, a record label Albert Computers, Inc., a computer manufacturer in the 1980sEntertainment Albert (1985 film), a Czechoslovak film directed by František Vláčil Albert (2015 film), a film by Karsten Kiilerich Albert (2016 film), an American TV movie Albert (album), by Ed Hall, 1988 "Albert" (short story), by Leo Tolstoy Albert (comics), a character in Marvel Comics Albert (Discworld), a character in Terry Pratchett's Discworld series Albert, a character in Dario Argento's 1977 film SuspiriaMilitary Battle of Albert (1914), a WWI battle at Albert, Somme, France Battle of Albert (1916), a WWI battle at Albert, Somme, France Battle of Albert (1918), a WWI battle at Albert, Somme, FrancePeople Albert (given name)
Albert (surname) Albert (wrestler) (born 197
Albert I may refer to:PeopleBorn before 1300Albert I, Count of Vermandois (917–987)
Albert I, Count of Namur ()
Albert III may refer to:Albert III, Count of Namur (1048–1102)Albert III, Count of Habsburg (died 1199)Albert III, Margrave of Brandenburg-Salzwedel (–1300)Albert III, Duke of Saxe-Lauenburg (1281–1308)Albert III, Prince of Anhalt-Zerbst (died 1359)Albert III, Count of Gorizia (died 1374)
Albert III, Duke of Austria (1349–1395)Albert III, Duke of Saxe-Wittenberg (1375/1380–1422)Albrecht III Achilles, Elector of Brandenburg (1414–1486)Albert III, Duke of Bavaria (1438–1460)Albert III, Duke of Saxony (1443–1500)
Albert II  (; 28 March 15228 January 1557) was the margrave of Brandenburg-Kulmbach (Brandenburg-Bayreuth) from 1527 to 1553.
He was a member of the Franconian branch of the House of Hohenzollern.
Albert the Bear (;  1100 – 18 November 1170) was the first margrave of Brandenburg from 1157 to his death and was briefly duke of Saxony between 1138 and 1142.
LifeAlbert was the only son of Otto, Count of Ballenstedt, and Eilika, daughter of Magnus Billung, Duke of Saxony.
Albert of Brandenburg (; 28 June 149024 September 1545) was a German cardinal, elector, Archbishop of Mainz from 1514 to 1545, and Archbishop of Magdeburg from 1513 to 1545.
Through his notorious sale of indulgences, he became the catalyst for Martin Luther's Reformation and its staunch opponent.
Albert of Prussia (; 17 May 149020 March 1568) was a German prince who was the 37th grand master of the Teutonic Knights and, after converting to Lutheranism, became the first ruler of the Duchy of Prussia, the secularized state that emerged from the former Monastic State of the Teutonic Knights.
Albert was the first European ruler to establish Lutheranism, and thus Protestantism, as the official state religion of his lands.
EventsPre-160019 – The Roman general Germanicus dies near Antioch.
He was convinced that the mysterious illness that ended in his death was a result of poisoning by the Syrian governor Gnaeus Calpurnius Piso, whom he had ordered to leave the province.
Aachen ( , ;  ; French and traditional English: Aix-la-Chapelle ) is the 13th-largest city in North Rhine-Westphalia and the 27th-largest city of Germany, with around 249,000 inhabitants.
It is the westernmost city in Germany, and borders Belgium and the Netherlands to the west, the triborder area.
Agate () is the banded variety of chalcedony, which comes in a wide variety of colors.
Agates are primarily formed within volcanic and metamorphic rocks.
Aspirin, also known as acetylsalicylic acid (ASA), is a nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID) used to reduce pain, fever, and/or inflammation, and as an antithrombotic.
Specific inflammatory conditions which aspirin is used to treat include Kawasaki disease, pericarditis, and rheumatic fever.
In the Hebrew Bible, Abner ( ) was the cousin of King Saul and the commander-in-chief of his army.
His name also appears as  "Abiner son of Ner", where the longer form Abiner means "my father is Ner".
Ahmed I ( ; ; 18 April 1590 – 22 November 1617) was the sultan of the Ottoman Empire from 1603 to 1617.
Ahmed's reign is noteworthy for marking the first breach in the Ottoman tradition of royal fratricide; henceforth, Ottoman rulers would no longer systematically execute their brothers upon accession to the throne.
Ahmed II ( Aḥmed-i sānī)
(25 February 1643 or 1 August 1642 – 6 February 1695) was the sultan of the Ottoman Empire from 1691 to 1695.
Ahmed III (, Aḥmed-i sālis; 30 December 16731 July 1736) was sultan of the Ottoman Empire and a son of sultan Mehmed IV (r. 1648–1687).
His mother was Gülnuş Sultan, originally named Evmania Voria, who was an ethnic Greek.
The Ainu are an ethnic group of related indigenous people native to Northern Japan, as well as the land surrounding the Sea of Okhotsk, including Hokkaido Island, Northeast Honshu Island, Sakhalin Island, the Kuril Islands, the Kamchatka Peninsula, and the Khabarovsk Krai; they have occupied these areas since before the arrival of the modern Japanese and Russians.
These regions are often referred to as  in historical Japanese texts.
An acropolis was the settlement of an upper part of an ancient Greek city, especially a citadel, and frequently a hill with precipitous sides, mainly chosen for purposes of defense.
The term is typically used to refer to the Acropolis of Athens, yet every Greek city had an acropolis of its own.
Acupuncture is a form of alternative medicine and a component of traditional Chinese medicine (TCM) in which thin needles are inserted into the body.
Acupuncture is a pseudoscience; the theories and practices of TCM are not based on scientific knowledge, and it has been characterized as quackery.
Vipera berus, the common European adder, is a snake found in Europe and northern Asia.
Adder may also refer to: AA-12 Adder, a Russian air-to-air missile Adder (electronics), an electronic circuit designed to do addition Adder Technology, a manufacturing company Armstrong Siddeley Adder, a late 1940s British turbojet engine Blackadder, a series of BBC sitcoms Golden Axe: The Revenge of Death Adder, a video game HMS Adder, any of seven ships of the Royal Navy Any of several groups of venomous snakes USS Adder, a US submarineSee also  Addition, a mathematical operation
In Greco-Roman mythology, Aeneas ( , ; from ) was a Trojan hero, the son of the Trojan prince Anchises and the Greek goddess Aphrodite (equivalent to the Roman Venus).
His father was a first cousin of King Priam of Troy (both being grandsons of Ilus, founder of Troy), making Aeneas a second cousin to Priam's children (such as Hector and Paris).
EventsPre-16001111 – Henry V is crowned Holy Roman Emperor.
1204 – Constantinople falls to the Crusaders of the Fourth Crusade, temporarily ending the Byzantine Empire.
Amaranthus is a cosmopolitan genus of annual or short-lived perennial plants collectively known as amaranths.
Some amaranth species are cultivated as leaf vegetables, pseudocereals, and ornamental plants.
Agapanthus africanus, or the African lily, is a flowering plant from the genus Agapanthus found only on rocky sandstone slopes of the winter rainfall fynbos from the Cape Peninsula to Swellendam.
It is also known as the lily-of-the-Nile in spite of only occurring in South Africa.
In Greek mythology, Agamemnon (;  Agamémnōn) was a king of Mycenae who commanded the Greeks during the Trojan War.
He was the son (or grandson) of King Atreus and Queen Aerope, the brother of Menelaus, the husband of Clytemnestra, and the father of Iphigenia, Iphianassa, Electra, Laodike, Orestes and Chrysothemis.
Aga Khan I ( or ) or Hasan Ali Shah () (1804–1881) was the governor of Kirman, the 46th Imam of the Nizari Ismaili Muslims, and a prominent Muslim leader in Iran and later in the Indian subcontinent.
He was the first Nizari Imam to hold the title Aga Khan.
Sir Sultan Mahomed Shah, Aga Khan III  (2 November 187711 July 1957) was the 48th Imam of the Nizari Ismaili sect of Islam.
He was one of the founders and the first permanent president of the All-India Muslim League (AIML).
Agasias was the name of several different people in classical history, including two different Greek sculptors.
Agasias of Arcadia, a warrior mentioned by Xenophon Agasias, son of Dositheus, Ephesian sculptor of the Borghese Gladiator Agasias, son of Menophilus (), Ephesian sculptorGreek masculine given namesMasculine given names
Alexander Emmanuel Rodolphe Agassiz (December 17, 1835March 27, 1910), son of Louis Agassiz and stepson of Elizabeth Cabot Agassiz, was an American scientist and engineer.
BiographyAgassiz was born in Neuchâtel, Switzerland, and immigrated to the United States with his parents, Louis and Cecile (Braun)
Agathon (; ; ) was an Athenian tragic poet whose works have been lost.
He is best known for his appearance in Plato's Symposium, which describes the banquet given to celebrate his obtaining a prize for his first tragedy at the Lenaia in 416.
Agesilaus II (;  ; 445/4 – 360/59 BC) was king of Sparta from c. 400 to c. 360 BC.
Generally considered the most important king in the history of Sparta, Agesilaus was the main actor during the period of Spartan hegemony that followed the Peloponnesian War (431–404 BC).
Antonio Agliardi (4 September 1832 – 19 March 1915) was an Italian Roman Catholic Cardinal, archbishop, and papal diplomat.
BiographyAgliardi was born at  Cologno al Serio, in what is now the Province of Bergamo.
Agnes of Merania (1175 – July 1201) was Queen of France by marriage to King Philip II.
She is called Marie by some of the French chroniclers.
(Vipsania) Agrippina the Elder (also, in Latin, , "Germanicus's Agrippina";  – AD 33) was a prominent member of the Julio-Claudian dynasty.
She was the daughter of Marcus Vipsanius Agrippa (a close supporter of the first Roman emperor, Augustus) and Augustus' daughter, Julia the Elder.
Julia Agrippina (6 November AD 15 – 23 March AD 59), also referred to as Agrippina the Younger, was Roman empress from 49 to 54 AD, the fourth wife and niece of Emperor Claudius, and the mother of Nero.
Agrippina was one of the most prominent women in the Julio-Claudian dynasty.
American Chinese cuisine is a cuisine derived from Chinese cuisine that was developed by Chinese Americans.
The dishes served in many North American Chinese restaurants are adapted to American tastes and often differ significantly from those found in China.
Ahmad Shāh Durrānī (; ), also known as Ahmad Shāh Abdālī (), was the founder of the Durrani Empire and is regarded as the founder of the modern Afghanistan.
In June 1747, Ahmad Shah was appointed as King of the Afghans by a loya jirga in Kandahar, where he set up his capital.
Arthur Aikin  (19 May 177315 April 1854) was an English chemist, mineralogist and scientific writer, and was a founding member of the Chemical Society (now the Royal Society of Chemistry).
He first became its treasurer in 1841, and later became the society's second president.
Ailanthus (; derived from ailanto, an Ambonese word probably meaning "tree of the gods" or "tree of heaven") is a genus of trees belonging to the family Simaroubaceae, in the order Sapindales (formerly Rutales or Geraniales).
The genus is native from east Asia south to northern Australasia.
Aimoin of Fleury (; ), French chronicler, was born at Villefranche-de-Longchat, Southwestern France about 960.
Early in his life he entered the monastery of Fleury, where he became a monk and then passed the greater part of his life.
The Akkadian Empire () was the first ancient empire of Mesopotamia, succeeding the long-lived civilization of Sumer.
Centered on the city of Akkad () and its surrounding region, the empire would unite Akkadian and Sumerian speakers under one rule and exercised significant influence across Mesopotamia, the Levant, and Anatolia, sending military expeditions as far south as Dilmun and Magan (modern Saudi Arabia, Bahrain, and Oman) in the Arabian Peninsula.
Ajax ( Aias means "of the earth".) was a Greek mythological hero, son of Oileus, the king of Locris.
He was called the "lesser" or "Locrian" Ajax, to distinguish him from Ajax the Great, son of Telamon.
Ajax () or Aias (;  ,   Aíantos; archaic  ) is a Greek mythological hero, the son of King Telamon and Periboea, and the half-brother of Teucer.
He plays an important role in the Trojan War, and is portrayed as a towering figure and a warrior of great courage in Homer's Iliad and in the Epic Cycle, a series of epic poems about the Trojan War, being second only to Achilles among Greek heroes of the war.
Alaric I (; , , "ruler of all"; c. 370 – 411 AD) was the first king of the Visigoths, from 395 to 410.
He rose to leadership of the Goths who came to occupy Moesia—territory acquired a couple of decades earlier by a combined force of Goths and Alans after the Battle of Adrianople.
Alaric II (, , "ruler of all"; ;  – August 507) was the King of the Visigoths from 484 until 507.
He succeeded his father Euric as king of the Visigoths in Toulouse on 28 December 484; he was the great-grandson of the more famous Alaric I, who sacked Rome in 410.
Albertus Magnus  ( – 15 November 1280), also known as Saint Albert the Great or Albert of Cologne, was a German Dominican friar, philosopher, scientist, and bishop.
Later canonized as a Catholic saint, he was known during his lifetime as Doctor universalis and Doctor expertus and, late in his life, the sobriquet Magnus was appended to his name.
Alboin (530s – 28 June 572) was king of the Lombards from about 560 until 572.
During his reign the Lombards ended their migrations by settling in Italy, the northern part of which Alboin conquered between 569 and 572.
Afonso de Albuquerque, 1st Duke of Goa ( – 16 December 1515), was a Portuguese general, admiral, and statesman.
He served as viceroy of Portuguese India from 1509 to 1515, during which he expanded Portuguese influence across the Indian Ocean and built a reputation as a fierce and skilled military commander.
Alcaeus of Mytilene (; , Alkaios ho Mutilēnaios;  –  BC) was a lyric poet from the Greek island of Lesbos who is credited with inventing the Alcaic stanza.
He was included in the canonical list of nine lyric poets by the scholars of Hellenistic Alexandria.
Alcamenes () was an ancient Greek sculptor of Lemnos and Athens, who flourished in the 2nd half of the 5th century BC.
He was a younger contemporary of Phidias and noted for the delicacy and finish of his works, among which a Hephaestus and an Aphrodite of the Gardens were conspicuous.
In Greek mythology, Alcmene ( ; ) or Alcmena ( ; ; ; meaning "strong in wrath") was the wife of Amphitryon, by whom she bore two children, Iphicles and Laonome.
She is best known as the mother of Heracles, whose father was the god Zeus.
Alcidamas (), of Elaea, in Aeolis, was a Greek sophist and rhetorician, who flourished in the 5th-4th century BC .
Life
The Aldine Press was the printing office started by Aldus Manutius in 1494 in Venice, from which were issued the celebrated Aldine editions of the classics (Latin and Greek masterpieces, plus a few more modern works).
The first book that was dated and printed under his name appeared in 1495.
Ealdred (or Aldred; died 11 September 1069) was Abbot of Tavistock, Bishop of Worcester, and Archbishop of York in early medieval England.
He was related to a number of other ecclesiastics of the period.
Alexander I of Epirus (; c. 370 BC – 331 BC), also known as Alexander Molossus (), was a king of Epirus (343/2–331 BC) of the Aeacid dynasty.
As the son of Neoptolemus I and brother of Olympias, Alexander
Alexander I Theopator Euergetes, surnamed Balas (), was the ruler of the Seleucid Empire from 150 BC to August 145 BC.
Picked from obscurity and supported by the neighboring Roman-allied Attalid kingdom, Alexander landed in Phoenicia in 152 BC and started a civil war against Seleucid King Demetrius I Soter.
Alexander () was Tyrant or Despot of Pherae in Thessaly, ruling from 369 to c. 356 BC.
Following the assassination of Jason, the tyrant of Pherae and Tagus of Thessaly, in 370 BC, his brother Polyphron ruled for a year, but he was then poisoned by Alexander who assumed power himself.
Alexander II (Greek: Άλέξανδρος) was a king of Epirus, and the son of Pyrrhus and Lanassa, the daughter of the Sicilian tyrant Agathocles.
ReignHe succeeded his father as king in 272 BC, and continued the war which his father had begun with Antigonus II Gonatas, whom he succeeded in driving from the kingdom of Macedon.
Alexander Jagiellon (; ; 5 August 1461 – 19 August 1506) of the House of Jagiellon was Grand Duke of Lithuania from 1492 and King of Poland from 1501 until his death in 1506.
He was the fourth son of Casimir IV Jagiellon.
Alexander III (; 10 March 18451 November 1894) was Emperor of Russia, King of Congress Poland and Grand Duke of Finland from 13 March 1881 until his death in 1894.
He was highly reactionary in domestic affairs and reversed some of the liberal reforms of his father, Alexander II.
Alexander I (medieval Gaelic:
Alaxandair mac Maíl Coluim; modern Gaelic:
Alexander II (Medieval Gaelic: ; Modern Gaelic: ; 24 August 1198 – 6 July 1249) was King of Scotland from 1214 until his death.
He concluded the Treaty of York (1237) which defined the boundary between England and Scotland, virtually unchanged today.
Alexander I (; 14 August 187611 June 1903) reigned as the king of Serbia from 1889 to 1903 when he and his wife, Draga Mašin, were assassinated by a group of Royal Serbian Army officers, led by Captain Dragutin Dimitrijević.
AccessionAlexander was born on 14 August 1876 to King Milan and Queen Natalie of Serbia.
Alexander III  (Medieval ; Modern Gaelic: ; 4 September 1241 – 19 March 1286) was King of Scots from 1249 until his death.
He concluded the Treaty of Perth, by which Scotland acquired sovereignty over the Western Isles and the Isle of Man.
Alexander of Greece (1893–1920) was king of Greece from 1917 until his death.
Alexander of Greece may also refer to: Alexander of Greece (rhetorician) ()
Alexander of Aphrodisias (;  AD) was a Peripatetic philosopher and the most celebrated of the Ancient Greek commentators on the writings of Aristotle.
He was a native of Aphrodisias in Caria and lived and taught in Athens at the beginning of the 3rd century, where he held a position as head of the Peripatetic school.
Marcus Aurelius Severus Alexander (1 October 208 – 21/22 March 235), also known as Alexander Severus, was a Roman emperor, who reigned from 222 until 235.
He was the last emperor from the Severan dynasty.
Alexander is a male given name of Greek origin.
The most prominent bearer of the name is Alexander the Great, the king of the Ancient Greek kingdom of Macedonia who created one of the largest empires in ancient history.
Alexander Aetolus (, Ἀléxandros ὁ Aἰtōlós) was a Greek poet and grammarian, the only known representative of Aetolian poetry.
LifeAlexander was the son of Satyrus (Σάτυρος) and Stratocleia (Στρατόκλεια), and was a native of Pleuron in Aetolia, although he spent the greater part of his life at Alexandria, where he was reckoned one of the seven tragic poets who constituted the Tragic Pleiad.
Alexander Jannaeus ( ;  Yannaʾy; born Jonathan ) was the second king of the Hasmonean dynasty, who ruled over an expanding kingdom of Judaea from 103 to 76 BCE.
A son of John Hyrcanus, he inherited the throne from his brother Aristobulus I, and married his brother's widow, Queen Salome Alexandra.
Alexander V may refer to: Alexander V of Macedon (died 294 BCE)
Antipope Alexander V (–1410) Alexander V of Imereti (–1752)
The Alexandrists were a school of Renaissance philosophers who, in the great controversy on the subject of personal immortality, adopted the explanation of the De Anima given by Alexander of Aphrodisias.
According to the orthodox Thomism of the Catholic Church, Aristotle rightly regarded reason as a facility of the individual soul.
Alexios I Komnenos (, 1057 – 15 August 1118; Latinized Alexius I Comnenus) was Byzantine emperor from 1081 to 1118.
Although he was not the first emperor of the Komnenian dynasty, it was during his reign that the Komnenos family came to full power and initiated a hereditary succession to the throne.
Alexis  (; c. 375 – c. 275 BC) was a Greek comic poet of the Middle Comedy period.
He was born at Thurii (in present-day Calabria, Italy) in Magna Graecia and taken early to Athens, where he became a citizen, being enrolled in the deme Oion () and the tribe Leontides.
Alexios II Komnenos (; 14 September 1169September 1183), Latinized Alexius II Comnenus, was Byzantine emperor from 1180 to 1183.
He ascended to the throne as a minor.
Alexios III Angelos (Greek: Άλέξιος Άγγελος; 1211), Latinized as Alexius III Angelus, was Byzantine Emperor from March 1195 to 17/18 July 1203.
He reigned under the name Alexios Komnenos (Greek: Άλέξιος Κομνηνός), associating himself with the Komnenos dynasty (from which he was descended matrilineally).
Alexios V Doukas (;  – December 1204), in Latinised spelling Alexius V Ducas, was Byzantine emperor from February to April 1204, just prior to the sack of Constantinople by the participants of the Fourth Crusade.
His family name was Doukas, but he was also known by the nickname Mourtzouphlos or Murtzuphlus (), referring to either bushy, overhanging eyebrows or a sullen, gloomy character.
Grand Duke Alexei Petrovich of Russia (28 February 1690 – 26 June 1718) was a Russian Tsarevich.
He was born in Moscow, the son of Tsar Peter I and his first wife, Eudoxia Lopukhina.
Andrew Jackson (March 15, 1767 – June 8, 1845) was an American lawyer, planter, general, and statesman who served as the seventh president of the United States from 1829 to 1837.
Before being elected to the presidency, he gained fame as a general in the U.S. Army and served in both houses of the U.S. Congress.
Andrew Johnson (December 29, 1808July 31, 1875) was the 17th president of the United States, serving from 1865 to 1869.
He assumed the presidency following the assassination of Abraham Lincoln, as he was vice president at that time.
Aleksandr Isayevich Solzhenitsyn (11 December 1918 – 3 August 2008) was a Russian writer.
A prominent Soviet dissident, Solzhenitsyn was an outspoken critic of communism and helped to raise global awareness of political repression in the Soviet Union, in particular the Gulag system.
Aberdeen (;  ;  ; ) is a city in North East Scotland, and is the third most populous Scottish city.
Aberdeen is one of Scotland's 32 local government council areas (as Aberdeen City), and has a  population estimate of for the city of Aberdeen, and  for the local council area making it the United Kingdom's 39th most populous built-up area.
EventsPre-160030 BC – After the successful invasion of Egypt, Octavian executes Marcus Antonius Antyllus, the eldest son of Mark Antony, and Caesarion, the last king of the Ptolemaic dynasty of Egypt and only child of Julius Caesar and Cleopatra.
79 – Mount Vesuvius begins stirring, on the feast day of Vulcan, the Roman god of fire.
EventsPre-1600 367 – Gratian, son of Roman Emperor Valentinian I, is named co-Augustus at the age of eight by his father.
394 – The Graffito of Esmet-Akhom, the latest known inscription in Egyptian hieroglyphs, is written.
An antipope () is a person who claims to be Bishop of Rome and leader of the Catholic Church in opposition to the legitimately elected pope.
Between the 3rd and mid-15th centuries, antipopes were supported by factions within the Church itself and secular rulers.
Aquaculture (less commonly spelled aquiculture), also known as aquafarming, is the controlled cultivation ("farming") of aquatic organisms such as fish, crustaceans, mollusks, algae and other organisms of value such as aquatic plants (e.g. lotus).
Aquaculture involves cultivating freshwater, brackish water and saltwater populations under controlled or semi-natural conditions, and can be contrasted with commercial fishing, which is the harvesting of wild fish.
In algorithmic information theory (a subfield of computer science and mathematics), the Kolmogorov complexity of an object, such as a piece of text, is the length of a shortest computer program (in a predetermined programming language) that produces the object as output.
It is a measure of the computational resources needed to specify the object, and is also known as algorithmic complexity, Solomonoff–Kolmogorov–Chaitin complexity, program-size complexity, descriptive complexity, or algorithmic entropy.
“Hymn to Proserpine” is a poem by Algernon Charles Swinburne, published in Poems and Ballads in 1866.
The poem is addressed to the goddess Proserpina, the Roman equivalent of Persephone, but laments the rise of Christianity for displacing the pagan goddess and her pantheon.
"The Triumph of Time" is a poem by Algernon Charles Swinburne, published in Poems and Ballads in 1866.
It is in adapted ottava rima and is full of elaborate use of literary devices, particularly alliteration.
EventsPre-1600 224 –
The Battle of Hormozdgan is fought.
Alfred the Great (also spelled Ælfred;  – 26 October 899) was King of the West Saxons from 871 to 886, and King of the Anglo-Saxons from 886 until his death in 899.
He was the youngest son of King Æthelwulf and his first wife Osburh, who both died when Alfred was young.
Alessandro Algardi (July 31, 1598 – June 10, 1654) was an Italian high-Baroque sculptor active almost exclusively in Rome.
In the latter decades of his life, he was, along with Francesco Borromini and Pietro da Cortona, one of the major rivals of Gian Lorenzo Bernini, in Rome.
Alger of Liège (1055–1131), known also as Alger of Cluny and Algerus Magister, was a learned clergyman and canonist from Liège, author of several notable works.
Alger was first deacon and scholaster of church of St Bartholomew in his native Liège and was then appointed () as a canon in St. Lambert's Cathedral.
Algiers ( ; ; , ) is the capital and largest city of Algeria.
The city's population at the 2008 census was 2,988,145 and in 2020 was estimated to be around 4,500,000.
Ḥasan Ibn al-Haytham (Latinized as Alhazen; ; full name  ; ) was a medieval mathematician, astronomer, and physicist of the Islamic Golden Age from present-day Iraq.
Referred to as "the father of modern optics", he made significant contributions to the principles of optics and visual perception in particular.
Alessandro di Cristofano di Lorenzo del Bronzino Allori (Florence, 31 May 153522 September 1607) was an Italian painter of the late Mannerist Florentine school.
BiographyIn 1540, after the death of his father, Allori was brought up and trained in art by a close friend, often referred to as his 'uncle', the mannerist painter Agnolo Bronzino, whose name he sometimes assumed in his pictures.
The Almoravid dynasty () was an imperial Berber Muslim dynasty centered in the territory of present-day Morocco.
It established an empire in the 11th century that stretched over the western Maghreb and Al-Andalus, starting in the 1050s and lasting until its fall to the Almohads in 1147.
Aloe (; also written Aloë) is a genus containing over 650 species of flowering succulent plants.
The most widely known  species is Aloe vera, or "true aloe".
Alyattes (Lydian language:  ;   ; reigned c. 635-585 BC), sometimes described as Alyattes I, was the fourth king of the Mermnad dynasty in Lydia, the son of Sadyattes, grandson of Ardys, and great-grandson of Gyges.
He died after a reign of 57 years and was succeeded by his son Croesus.
The age of consent is the age at which a person is considered to be legally competent to consent to sexual acts.
Consequently, an adult who engages in sexual activity with a person younger than the age of consent is unable to legally claim that the sexual activity was consensual, and such sexual activity may be considered child sexual abuse or statutory rape.
Alypius of Antioch was a geographer and a vicarius of Roman Britain, probably in the late 350s AD.
He replaced Flavius Martinus after that vicarius' suicide.
Amalasuintha (495 – 30 April 535) was a ruler of the Ostrogothic Kingdom from 526 to 535.
Initially serving as regent for her son Athalaric, she became queen after his premature death.
Amalric of Bena (; ; died ) was a French theologian, philosopher and sect leader, after whom the Amalricians are named.
Reformers such as Martin Luther considered him to be a proto-Protestant.
Afonso I of Portugal (; 1106/1109/11111185), also called Afonso Henriques, nicknamed the Conqueror () and the Founder () by the Portuguese, and El-Bortukali (in Arabic  "the Portuguese") and Ibn-Arrink or Ibn Arrinq (in Arabic  or  "son of Henry", "Henriques") by the Moors whom he fought, was the first king of Portugal.
He achieved the independence of the County of Portugal, establishing a new kingdom and doubling its area with the , an objective that he pursued until his death.
Afonso II (; English: Alphonzo; Archaic Portuguese: Affonso; Portuguese-Galician: Alfonso or Alphonso;
Latin: Alphonsus; 23 April 118525 March 1223), nicknamed the Fat (o Gordo) or the Leper (o Gafo), was the third king of Portugal and the second but eldest surviving son of Sancho I of Portugal and Dulce of Aragon.
Afonso III (; rare English alternatives: Alphonzo or Alphonse), or Affonso (Archaic Portuguese), Alfonso or Alphonso (Portuguese-Galician) or Alphonsus (Latin),  the Boulonnais (Port.
o Bolonhês), King of Portugal (5 May 121016 February 1279) was the first to use the title King of Portugal and the Algarve, from 1249.
Afonso IV (; 8 February 129128 May 1357), called the Brave (), was King of Portugal from 1325 until his death in 1357.
He was the only legitimate son of King Denis of Portugal and Elizabeth of Aragon.
Afonso V () (15 January 1432 – 28 August 1481), known by the sobriquet the African (), was king of Portugal from 1438 until his death in 1481, with a brief interruption in 1477.
His sobriquet refers to his military conquests in Northern Africa.
Afonso VI (; 21 August 164312 September 1683), known as "the Victorious" (), was the second king of Portugal of the House of Braganza from 1656 until his death.
He was initially under the regency of his mother, Luisa de Guzmán, until 1662, when he removed her to a convent and took power with the help of his favourite, the Luís de Vasconcelos e Sousa, 3rd Count of Castelo Melhor.
There has not been a monarch known as Alphonso or Alfonso I of Spain, the first king of that name of the unified Spain being Alfonso XII (1857–1885).
Several precursor kingdoms have had an Alfonso I, including:Alfonso I of Asturias ( – 757)
Alfonso II of Asturias (842), nicknamed the Chaste (), was the king of Asturias during two different periods: first in the year 783 and later from 791 until his death in 842.
Upon his death, Nepotian, a family member of undetermined relation, attempted to usurp the crown in place of the future Ramiro I.During his reign, which covered a span of 51 years, Alfonso discovered the supposed tomb of St. James the Great (called  in Spanish) in the town of Compostela, which later became known as the city of Santiago de Compostela.
Amarasimha (IAST: , ) was a Sanskrit grammarian and poet from ancient India, of whose personal history hardly anything is known.
He is said to have been "one of the nine gems that adorned the throne of Vikramaditya," and according to the evidence of Xuanzang, this is the Chandragupta Vikramaditya (Chandragupta II) who flourished about CE 375.
Alfonso XII (Alfonso Francisco de Asís Fernando Pío Juan María de la Concepción Gregorio Pelayo de Borbón y Borbón; 28 November 185725 November 1885), also known as El Pacificador (Spanish: the Peacemaker), was King of Spain from 29 December 1874 to his death in 1885.
After the Glorious Revolution of 1868 deposed his mother Isabella II from the throne, Alfonso studied in Austria and France.
Alfonso XIII (Spanish: Alfonso León Fernando María Jaime Isidro Pascual Antonio de Borbón y Habsburgo-Lorena; French: Alphonse Léon Ferdinand Marie Jacques Isidore Pascal Antoine de Bourbon; 17 May 1886 – 28 February 1941), also known as El Africano or the African due to his Africanist views, was King of Spain from his birth until 14 April 1931, when the Second Spanish Republic was proclaimed.
He was a monarch from birth as his father, Alfonso XII, had died the previous year.
Alfonso I (7 September 1134), called the Battler or the Warrior (), was King of Aragon and Navarre from 1104 until his death in 1134.
He was the second son of King Sancho Ramírez and successor of his brother Peter I. With his marriage to Urraca, queen regnant of Castile, León and Galicia, in 1109, he began to use, with some justification, the grandiose title Emperor of Spain, formerly employed by his father-in-law, Alfonso VI.
Amaryllis () is the only genus in the subtribe Amaryllidinae (tribe Amaryllideae).
It is a small genus of flowering bulbs, with two species.
Alfonso III (4 November 1265 – 18 June 1291), called the Liberal (el Liberal) and the Free (also "the Frank", from el Franc), was king of Aragon and Valencia, and count of Barcelona (as ) from 1285 until his death.
He conquered the Kingdom of Majorca between his succession and 1287.
Alfonso IV, called the Kind (also the Gentle or the Nice, ) (2 November 1299 – 24 January 1336) was King of Aragon and Count of Barcelona (as Alfons III) from 1327 to his death.
His reign saw the incorporation of the County of Urgell, Duchy of Athens, and Duchy of Neopatria into the Crown of Aragon.
Amasis II ( ;  ḤMS) or Ahmose II was a pharaoh (reigned 570526 BCE) of the Twenty-sixth Dynasty of Egypt, the successor of Apries at Sais.
He was the last great ruler of Egypt before the Persian conquest.
Alfonso the Magnanimous (Alfons el Magnànim in Catalan) (139627 June 1458) was King of Aragon and King of Sicily (as Alfonso V) and the ruler of the Crown of Aragon from 1416 and King of Naples (as Alfonso I) from 1442 until his death.
He was involved with struggles to the throne of the Kingdom of Naples with Louis III of Anjou, Joanna II of Naples and their supporters, but ultimately failed and lost Naples in 1424.
Amathus or Amathous () was an ancient city and one of the ancient royal cities of Cyprus until about 300 BC.
Some of its remains can be seen today on the southern coast in front of Agios Tychonas, about  west of Larnaca and  east of Limassol.
Alphons (Latinized Alphonsus, Adelphonsus, or Adefonsus) is a male given name recorded from the 8th century (Alfonso I of Asturias, r. 739–757) in the Christian successor states of the Visigothic kingdom in the Iberian peninsula.
In the later medieval period it became a standard name in the Hispanic and Portuguese royal families.
Amati (, ) is the last name of a family of Italian violin makers who lived at Cremona from about 1538 to 1740.
Their importance is considered equal to those of the Bergonzi, Guarneri, and Stradivari families.
Alfonso II may refer to:Alfonso II of Asturias (791–842)Alfonso II of Aragon (1162–1196)Alfonso II, Count of Provence (1174–1209)Afonso II of Portugal (1185–1223), "the Fat"Alfonso, Count of Poitou (1220–1271), jure uxoris Alfonso II, Count of ToulouseAlfonso II, Duke of Gandia (–1422)Alfonso II of Naples (1448–1495)Alfonso II Piccolomini (1499–1559), Neapolitan nobleman and military leaderAlfonso II d'Este (1533–1597), duke of Ferrarade:Liste der
Herrscher namens Alfons#Alfons II.
In Greek mythology, the Amazons (Ancient Greek:  , singular  , via Latin , ) are portrayed in a number of ancient epic poems and legends, such as the Labours of Heracles, the Argonautica  and the Iliad.
They were a group of female warriors and hunters, who were as skilled and courageous as men in physical agility, strength, archery, riding skills, and the arts of combat.
Ambergris ( or , , ), ambergrease, or grey amber is a solid, waxy, flammable substance of a dull grey or blackish colour produced in the digestive system of sperm whales.
Freshly produced ambergris has a marine, fecal odor.
Ambiorix (Gaulish "king of the surroundings", or "king-protector") ( 54–53 BC) was, together with Cativolcus, prince of the Eburones, leader of a Belgic tribe of north-eastern Gaul (Gallia Belgica), where modern Belgium is located.
In the nineteenth century Ambiorix became a Belgian national hero because of his resistance against Julius Caesar, as written in Caesar's Commentarii de Bello Gallico.
August Wilhelm Ambros (17 November 181628 June 1876) was an Austrian composer and music historian of Czech descent.
Life He was born in Mýto, Rokycany District, Bohemia.
The Amazon River (, ; , ) in South America is the largest river by discharge volume of water in the world, and the disputed longest river system in the world in comparison to the Nile.
The headwaters of the Apurímac River on Nevado Mismi had been considered for nearly a century the Amazon basin's most distant source until a 2014 study found it to be the headwaters of the Mantaro River on the Cordillera Rumi Cruz in Peru.
Beverley, Alfred of (d. c. 1154 x c. 1157), chronicler, and sacrist of the collegiate church of St John the Evangelist and St John of Beverley wrote a history of Britain and England in nine chapters (c. 1148- c.1151) from its supposed foundation by the Trojan Brutus, down to the death of Henry I in 1135.
Alfred's chief sources, in addition to Bede's Historia Ecclesiastica de Gentis Anglorum , are Geoffrey of Monmouth's Historia Regum Britanniae, Henry of Huntingdon's Historia Anglorum,  The Chronicle of John of Worcester, and the Historia Regum, attributed to Symeon of Durham.e BiographyAluredus (Alfred) the sacrist, witnessed charters over the period c.1135 to c. 1154 in favour of Beverley and the nearby religious houses of Bridlington, Warter and Watton and Rufford Abbey.[1]  Alfred’s attestation of a gift of land in Averham, in the East Riding, to the Cistercian Rufford Abbey (Nottinghamshire) is of particular interest.
EventsPre-16001500 – Portuguese navigator Pedro Álvares Cabral lands in Brazil.
1519 – Spanish conquistador Hernán Cortés establishes a settlement at Veracruz, Mexico.1529 – Treaty of Zaragoza divides the eastern hemisphere between Spain and Portugal along a line 297.5 leagues () east of the Moluccas.
EventsPre-16001056 –
After a sudden illness a few days previously, Byzantine Empress Theodora dies childless, thus ending the Macedonian dynasty.
Autpert Ambrose (Ambroise) () (ca. 730 – 784) was a Frankish Benedictine monk.
An abbot of San Vincenzo al Volturno in South Italy in the time of Desiderius, king of the Lombards, Autpert wrote a considerable number of works on the Bible and religious subjects generally.
Abū Bakr ʿAbd Allāh ibn ʿAbī Quḥāfa (; 27 October 573 – 23 August 634) was the senior companion and was, through his daughter Aisha, a father-in-law of the Islamic prophet Muhammad, as well as the first Caliph of the Rashidun Caliphate.
He is known with the honorific title al-Siddiq by Sunni Muslims.
Ambrogio Traversari, also referred to as Ambrose of Camaldoli (138620 October 1439), was an Italian monk and theologian who was a prime supporter of the papal cause in the 15th century.
He is honored as a saint by the Camaldolese Order.
Ambrosians are members of one of the religious brotherhoods which at various times since the 14th century have sprung up in and around Milan, Italy.
In the 16th century, a sect of Anabaptist Ambrosians was founded.
Ambrosiaster or Pseudo-Ambrose is the name given to the unknown author of a commentary on the epistles of Saint Paul, written some time between 366 and 384AD.
The name "Ambrosiaster" in Latin means "would-be Ambrose".
Ambrosius Aurelianus (; Anglicised as Ambrose Aurelian and called  Aurelius Ambrosius in the Historia Regum Britanniae and elsewhere) was a war leader of the Romano-British who won an important battle against the Anglo-Saxons in the 5th century, according to Gildas.
He also appeared independently in the legends of the Britons, beginning with the 9th-century Historia Brittonum.
Ammon (Ammonite: 𐤏𐤌𐤍 ʻAmān;  ; ) was an ancient Semitic-speaking kingdom occupying the east of the Jordan River, between the torrent valleys of Arnon and Jabbok, in present-day Jordan.
The chief city of the country was Rabbah or Rabbat Ammon, site of the modern city of Amman, Jordan's capital.
Ammonius Hermiae (; ;  – between 517 and 526) was a Greek philosopher from Alexandria in the eastern Roman empire during Late Antiquity.
A Neoplatonist, he was the son of the philosophers Hermias and Aedesia, the brother of Heliodorus of Alexandria and the grandson of Syrianus.
Ammonius Saccas (; ; 175 AD242 AD) was a Hellenistic Platonist self-taught philosopher from Alexandria, generally regarded as the precursor of Neoplatonism and/or one of its founders.
He is mainly known as the teacher of Plotinus, whom he taught from 232 to 242.
The Book of Amos is the third of the Twelve Minor Prophets in the Old Testament (Tanakh) and the second in the Greek Septuagint tradition.
Amos, an older contemporary of Hosea and Isaiah, was active c. 750 BC during the reign of Jeroboam II (788–747 BC) of Samaria (aka.
Amphipolis (; ) is a municipality in the Serres regional unit, Macedonia, Greece.
The seat of the municipality is Rodolivos.
In the Book of Exodus, Amram (; ) is the husband of Jochebed and father of Aaron, Moses and Miriam.
In the Bible In addition to being married to Jochebed, Amram is also described in the Bible as having been related to Jochebed prior to the marriage, although the exact relationship is uncertain; some Greek and Latin manuscripts of the Septuagint state that Jochebed was Amram's father's cousin, and others state that Amram was Jochebed's cousin, but the Masoretic Text states that she was his father's sister.
Amyntas I () was king of the ancient Greek kingdom of Macedonia from at least 512/511 until his death in 498/497 BC.
Although there were a number of rulers before him, Amyntas is the first king of Macedonia for which we have any reliable historical information.
Amyntas III () was king of the ancient Greek kingdom of Macedonia from 393/2 to 388/7 BC and again from 387/6 to 370 BC.
He was a member of the Argead dynasty through his father Arrhidaeus, a son of Amyntas, one of the sons of Alexander I.
Anacharsis (; ) was a Scythian prince and philosopher of uncertain historicity who lived in the 6th century BC.
LifeAnacharsis was the brother of the Scythian king Saulius, and both of them were the sons of the previous Scythian king, Gnurus.
Anah or Ana (, ʾĀna, ), formerly also known as Anna, is an Iraqi town on the Euphrates river, approximately midway between the Gulf of Alexandretta and the Persian Gulf.
Anah lies from west to east on the right bank along a bend of the river just before it turns south towards Hit.
Ānanda (Pali and Sanskrit: आनन्द; 5th4th century BCE) was the primary attendant of the Buddha and one of his ten principal disciples.
Among the Buddha's many disciples, Ānanda stood out for having the best memory.
Anaxagoras (; , Anaxagóras, "lord of the assembly";  500 –  428 BC) was a Pre-Socratic Greek philosopher.
Born in Clazomenae at a time when Asia Minor was under the control of the Persian Empire, Anaxagoras came to Athens.
Anaxarchus (; ; c. 380 – c. 320 BC) was a Greek philosopher of the school of Democritus.
Together with Pyrrho, he accompanied Alexander the Great into Asia.
Ancyra is a small genus of planthoppers of the family Eurybrachidae and the only genus in the tribe Ancyrini.
Species in this genus occur in southeast Asia.
Anastasius I or Anastasios I may refer to:Anastasius I Dicorus ( – 518),
Roman emperorAnastasius I of Antioch (d. 599), Patriarch of AntiochPope Anastasius I (died 401), pope of Rome
Anaximenes of Lampsacus (; ; 320 BC) was a Greek rhetorician and historian.
He was one of the teachers of Alexander the Great and accompanied him on his campaigns.
Anastasius (Latinized) or Anastasios () is a masculine given name of Greek origin derived from the Greek word  (anastasis) meaning "resurrection".
Its female form is Anastasia ().
Anaximenes of Miletus (; ; ) was an Ancient Greek, Pre-Socratic philosopher from Miletus in Anatolia (modern-day Turkey).
He was the last of the three philosophers of the Milesian School, after Thales and Anaximander.
Ancus Marcius () was the legendary fourth king of Rome, who traditionally reigned 24 years.
Upon the death of the previous king, Tullus Hostilius, the Roman Senate appointed an interrex, who in turn called a session of the assembly of the people who elected the new king.
The Andaman Islands () are an archipelago in the northeastern Indian Ocean about  southwest off the coasts of Myanmar's Ayeyarwady Region.
Together with the Nicobar Islands to their south, the Andamans serve as a maritime boundary between the Bay of Bengal to the west and the Andaman Sea to the east.
Alexander Anderson ( in Aberdeen –  in Paris) was a Scottish mathematician.
LifeHe was born in Aberdeen, possibly in 1582, according to a print which suggests he was aged 35 in 1617.
Andocides (; , Andokides; c. 440 – c. 390 BC) was a logographer (speech writer) in Ancient Greece.
He was one of the ten Attic orators included in the "Alexandrian Canon" compiled by Aristophanes of Byzantium and Aristarchus of Samothrace in the third century BC.LifeAndocides was the son of Leogoras, and was born in Athens around 440 BC.
Andrea Andreani (1540–1623) was an Italian engraver on wood, who was among the first printmakers in Italy to use chiaroscuro, which required multiple colours.
Andreani was born and generally active in Mantua about 1540 (Brulliot says 1560) and died at Rome in 1623.
Andrew II (, , , ;  117721 September 1235), also known as Andrew of Jerusalem, was King of Hungary and Croatia between 1205 and 1235.
He ruled the Principality of Halych from 1188 until 1189/1190, and again between 1208/1209 and 1210.
An Enquiry Concerning Human Understanding is a book by the Scottish empiricist philosopher David Hume, published in English in 1748.
It was a revision of an earlier effort, Hume's A Treatise of Human Nature, published anonymously in London in 1739–40.
André de Longjumeau (also known as Andrew of Longjumeau in English) was a 13th-century Dominican missionary and diplomat and one of the most active Occidental diplomats in the East in the 13th century.
He led two embassies to the Mongols: the first carried letters from Pope Innocent IV and the second bore gifts and letters from Louis IX of France to Güyük Khan.
Andriscus (, Andrískos;  154/153 BC – 146 BC), also often referenced as Pseudo-Philip, was a Greek pretender who became the last independent king of Macedon in 149 BC as Philip VI (, Philipos), based on his claim of being Philip, a now-obscure son of the last legitimate Macedonian king, Perseus.
His reign lasted just one year and was toppled by the Roman Republic during the Fourth Macedonian War.
Andronikos III Palaiologos (; 25 March 1297 – 15 June 1341), commonly Latinized as Andronicus III Palaeologus, was the Byzantine emperor from 1328 to 1341.
He was the son of Michael IX Palaiologos and Rita of Armenia.
Andronikos II Palaiologos (; 25 March 1259 – 13 February 1332), Latinized as Andronicus II Palaeologus, reigned as Byzantine emperor from 1282 to 1328.
His reign marked the beginning of the recently-restored empire's final decline.
Andronikos I Komnenos (;  – 12 September 1185), Latinized as Andronicus I Comnenus, was Byzantine emperor from 1183 to 1185.
He was the son of Isaac Komnenos and the grandson of the emperor Alexios I.
Andronicus of Cyrrhus or Andronicus Cyrrhestes (Latin; , Andrónikos Kyrrhēstēs; ) was a Hellenized Macedonian astronomer best known for designing the Tower of the Winds in Roman Athens.
LifeLittle is known about the life of Andronicus, although his father is recorded as Hermias.
Andronicoos of Rhodes (; ; ) was a Greek philosopher from Rhodes who was also the scholarch (head) of the Peripatetic school.
He is most famous for publishing a new edition of the works of Aristotle that forms the basis of the texts that survive today.
Andronicus or Andronikos () is a classical Greek name.
The name has the sense of "male victor, warrior".
Ammianus Marcellinus, occasionally anglicised as Ammian (Greek: Αμμιανός Μαρκελλίνος; born , died 400), was a Roman soldier and historian who wrote the penultimate major historical account surviving from antiquity (preceding Procopius).
His work, known as the Res gestae, chronicled in Latin the history of Rome from the accession of the Emperor Nerva in 96 to the death of Valens at the Battle of Adrianople in 378, although only the sections covering the period 353 to 378 survive.
Apollo 13 (April 1117, 1970) was the seventh crewed mission in the Apollo space program and the third meant to land on the Moon.
The craft was launched from Kennedy Space Center on April 11, 1970, but the lunar landing was aborted after an oxygen tank in the service module (SM) failed two days into the mission.
Apollo 7 (October 11–22, 1968) was the first crewed flight in NASA's Apollo program, and saw the resumption of human spaceflight by the agency after the fire that had killed the three Apollo 1 astronauts during a launch rehearsal test on January 27, 1967.
The Apollo7 crew was commanded by Walter M. Schirra, with command module pilot Donn F. Eisele and lunar module pilot R. Walter Cunningham (so designated even though Apollo7 did not carry a Lunar Module).
Apollo 9 (March 313, 1969) was the third human spaceflight in NASA's Apollo program.
Flown in low Earth orbit, it was the second crewed Apollo mission that the United States launched via a Saturn V rocket, and was the first flight of the full Apollo spacecraft: the command and service module (CSM) with the Lunar Module (LM).
Arthritis is a term often used to mean any disorder that affects joints.
Symptoms generally include joint pain and stiffness.
EventsPre-16001513 – Having spotted land on March 27, Spanish explorer Juan Ponce de León comes ashore on what is now the U.S. state of Florida, landing somewhere between the modern city of St. Augustine and the mouth of the St. Johns River.
1601–19001755 – Commodore William James captures the Maratha fortress of Suvarnadurg on the west coast of India.
Acetylene (systematic name: ethyne) is the chemical compound with the formula  and structure .
It is a hydrocarbon and the simplest alkyne.
EventsPre-1600 475 – The Roman general Orestes forces western Roman Emperor Julius Nepos to flee his capital city, Ravenna.
489 – Theodoric, king of the Ostrogoths, defeats Odoacer at the Battle of Isonzo, forcing his way into Italy. 632 – Fatimah, daughter of the Islamic prophet Muhammad, dies, with her cause of death being a controversial topic among the Sunni Muslims and Shia Muslims.
The ten Arabic numerals 0, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 9 are the most commonly used symbols for writing numbers.
The term often also implies a positional notation using the numerals, as well as the use of a decimal base, in particular when contrasted with other systems such as Roman numerals.
EventsPre-1600 193 – The distinguished soldier Septimius Severus is proclaimed emperor by the army in Illyricum.
475 – Byzantine Emperor Basiliscus issues a circular letter (Enkyklikon) to the bishops of his empire, supporting the Monophysite christological position.
Apuleius (, ; also called Lucius Apuleius Madaurensis; c. 124 – after  170) was a Numidian Latin-language prose writer, Platonist philosopher and rhetorician.
He was born in the Roman province of Numidia, in the Berber city of Madauros, modern-day M'Daourouch, Algeria.
Alexander Selkirk (167613 December 1721) was a Scottish privateer and Royal Navy officer who spent four years and four months as a castaway (1704–1709) after being marooned by his captain, initially at his request, on an uninhabited island in the South Pacific Ocean.
He survived that ordeal but died from tropical illness years later while serving as a Lieutenant aboard  off West Africa.
An anti-ballistic missile (ABM) is a surface-to-air missile designed to counter ballistic missiles (missile defense).
Ballistic missiles are used to deliver nuclear, chemical, biological, or conventional warheads in a ballistic flight trajectory.
EventsPre-1600 708 – Copper coins are minted in Japan for the first time (Traditional Japanese date: August 10, 708).
870 – The city of Melite surrenders to an Aghlabid army following a siege, putting an end to Byzantine Malta.
EventsPre-160070
– Titus ends the siege of Jerusalem after destroying Herod's Temple.
The acre ( ) is a unit of land area used in the British imperial and the United States customary systems.
It is traditionally defined as the area of one chain by one furlong (66 by 660 feet), which is exactly equal to 10 square chains,  of a square mile, 4,840 square yards, or 43,560 square feet, and approximately 4,047 m2, or about 40% of a hectare.
ATP may refer to:Science, technology and biology Adenosine triphosphate, an organic chemical used for driving biological processesATPase, any enzyme that makes use of adenosine triphosphateAdvanced Technology Program, US government programAnti-tachycardia pacing, process similar to a pacemakerAlberta Taciuk process, for extracting oil from shale, etc.
Automated theorem proving, method of proving mathematical theorems by computer programsCompanies and organizations  Association of Tennis Professionals, men's professional tennis governing bodyATP Tour American Technical Publishers, employee-owned publishing company Armenia Tree Project, non-profit organization Association for Transpersonal Psychology ATP architects engineers, architecture- and engineering office for integrated design ATP Oil and Gas, defunct US energy companyEntertainment, arts and media Adenosine Tri-Phosphate (band), Japanese alternative rock/pop bandAll Tomorrow's Parties (festival), UK organisati
Adenosine triphosphate (ATP) is an organic compound that provides energy to drive and support many processes in living cells, such as muscle contraction, nerve impulse propagation, condensate dissolution, and chemical synthesis.
Found in all known forms of life, ATP is often referred to as the "molecular unit of currency" of intracellular energy transfer.
Ægir (anglicised as Aegir; Old Norse 'sea'), Hlér (Old Norse 'sea'), or Gymir (Old Norse less clearly 'sea, engulfer'), is a jötunn and a personification of the sea in Norse mythology.
In the Old Norse record, Ægir hosts the gods in his halls and is associated with brewing ale.
An antibiotic is a type of antimicrobial substance active against bacteria.
It is the most important type of antibacterial agent for fighting bacterial infections, and antibiotic medications are widely used in the treatment and prevention of such infections.
Arnold Alois Schwarzenegger (born July 30, 1947) is an Austrian and American actor, businessman, filmmaker, former politician, and former professional bodybuilder best known for his roles in high-profile action movies.
He served as the 38th governor of California from 2003 to 2011 and was among Time magazine's 100 most influential people in the world in 2004 and 2007.
ASA as an abbreviation or initialism may refer to:Biology and medicine Accessible surface area of a biomolecule, accessible to a solvent Acetylsalicylic acid, aspirin Advanced surface ablation, refractive eye surgery Anterior spinal artery, the blood vessel which supplies the anterior portion of the spinal cord Antisperm antibodies, antibodies against sperm antigens Argininosuccinic aciduria, a disorder of the urea cycle ASA physical status classification system, rating of patients undergoing anesthesiaEducation and research African Studies Association of the United Kingdom African Studies AssociationAlandica Shipping Academy, Åland Islands, Finland Albany Students' Association, at Massey University, Auckland, New Zealand Alexander-Smith Academy, in Houston, Texas
Alpha Sigma Alpha, U.S. national sorority American Society for Aesthetics, philosophical organization American Student Assistance, national non-profit organization American Studies Association Arizona Sch
Actium or Aktion () was a town on a promontory in ancient Acarnania at the entrance of the Ambraciot Gulf, off which Octavian gained his celebrated victory, the Battle of Actium, over Antony and Cleopatra, on September 2, 31 BCE.HistoryActium belonged originally to the Corinthian colonists of Anactorium, who probably founded the sanctuary of Apollo Actius.
This temple was of great antiquity.
Amway (short for "American Way") is an American multi-level marketing (MLM) company that sells health, beauty, and home care products.
The company was founded in 1959 by Jay Van Andel and Richard DeVos and is based in Ada, Michigan.
Adam Smith  (baptised  1723 – 17 July 1790)
was a Scottish economist and philosopher who was a pioneer in the thinking of political economy and key figure during the Scottish Enlightenment.
Antoine-Laurent de Lavoisier ( ; ; 26 August 17438 May 1794), also Antoine Lavoisier after the French Revolution, was a French nobleman and chemist who was central to the 18th-century chemical revolution and who had a large influence on both the history of chemistry and the history of biology.
It is generally accepted that Lavoisier's great accomplishments in chemistry stem largely from his changing the science from a qualitative to a quantitative one.
Adolph Wilhelm Hermann Kolbe (27 September 1818 – 25 November 1884) was a major contributor to the birth of modern organic chemistry.
He was a professor at Marburg and Leipzig.
EventsPre-1600 796 – King Æthelred I of Northumbria is murdered in Corbridge by a group led by his ealdormen, Ealdred and Wada.
The patrician Osbald is crowned, but abdicates within 27 days.
EventsPre-1600215 BC – A temple is built on the Capitoline Hill dedicated to Venus Erycina to commemorate the Roman defeat at Lake Trasimene.
599 – Maya king Uneh Chan of Calakmul attacks rival city-state Palenque in southern Mexico, defeating queen Yohl Ik'nal and sacking the city.
Amitabh Bachchan (; born as Amitabh Srivastava; 11 October 1942) is an Indian actor, film producer, television host, occasional playback singer and former politician, who works in Hindi cinema.
In a film career spanning over five decades, he has starred in more than 200 films.
In linguistics, an allomorph is a variant phonetic form of a morpheme, or, a unit of meaning that varies in sound and spelling without changing the meaning.
The term allomorph describes the realization of phonological variations for a specific morpheme.
In phonology, an allophone (; from the Greek , , 'other' and , , 'voice, sound') is one of multiple possible spoken soundsor phonesor signs used to pronounce a single phoneme in a particular language.
For example, in English, the voiceless plosive  (as in stop ) and the aspirated form  (as in top ) are allophones for the phoneme , while these two are considered to be different phonemes in some languages such as Thai.
In linguistics, an affix is a morpheme that is attached to a word stem to form a new word or word form.
The main two categories are derivational and inflectional affixes.
As a literary device or artistic form, an allegory is a narrative or visual representation in which a character, place, or event can be interpreted to represent a hidden meaning with moral or political significance.
Authors have used allegory throughout history in all forms of art to illustrate or convey complex ideas and concepts in ways that are comprehensible or striking to its viewers, readers, or listeners.
Allotropy or allotropism () is the property of some chemical elements to exist in two or more different forms, in the same physical state, known as allotropes of the elements.
Allotropes are different structural modifications of an element: the atoms of the element are bonded together in different manners.
Agathocles (, Agathoklḗs; 361–289 BC) was a Greek tyrant of Syracuse (317–289 BC) and self-styled king of Sicily (304–289 BC).
BiographyAgathocles was born at Thermae Himeraeae (modern name Termini Imerese), Magna Graecia, in Sicily.
The economy of Alberta is the sum of all economic activity in Alberta, Canada's fourth largest province by population.
Alberta's GDP in 2018 was CDN$338.2 billion.
Baron Augustin-Louis Cauchy  ( ,  , ; 21 August 178923 May 1857) was a French mathematician, engineer, and physicist who made pioneering contributions to several branches of mathematics, including mathematical analysis and continuum mechanics.
He was one of the first to state and rigorously prove theorems of calculus, rejecting the heuristic principle of the generality of algebra of earlier authors.
Archimedes of Syracuse (, ; ) was an Ancient Greek mathematician, physicist, engineer, astronomer, and inventor from the ancient city of Syracuse in Sicily.
Although few details of his life are known, he is regarded as one of the leading scientists in classical antiquity.
Alternative medicine is any practice that aims to achieve the healing effects of medicine despite lacking biological plausibility, testability, repeatability or evidence of effectiveness.
Unlike modern medicine, which employs the scientific method to test plausible therapies by way of responsible and ethical clinical trials, producing repeatable evidence of either effect or of no effect, alternative therapies reside outside of medical science and do not originate from using the scientific method, but instead rely on testimonials, anecdotes, religion, tradition, superstition, belief in supernatural "energies", pseudoscience, errors in reasoning, propaganda, fraud, or other unscientific sources.
In geometry, an Archimedean solid is one of 13 convex polyhedra whose faces are regular polygons and whose vertices are all symmetric to each other.
They were first enumerated by Archimedes.
In geometry, an  antiprism or  is a polyhedron composed of two parallel direct copies (not mirror images) of an  polygon, connected by an alternating band of  triangles.
They are represented by the Conway notation .
The natural history of Africa encompasses some of the well known megafauna of that continent.
Natural history is the study and description of organisms and natural objects, especially their origins, evolution, and interrelationships.
Africa is a continent comprising 63 political territories, representing the largest of the great southward projections from the main mass of Earth's surface.
Within its regular outline, it comprises an area of , excluding adjacent islands.
Approval voting is an electoral system in which voters can select many candidates instead of selecting only one candidate.
Description Approval voting ballots show a list of all the candidates running and each voter indicates support for as many candidates as they see fit.
Arizona State University (Arizona State or ASU) is a public research university in the Phoenix metropolitan area.
Founded in 1885 by the 13th Arizona Territorial Legislature, ASU is one of the largest public universities by enrollment in the United States.
EventsPre-160043 BC – Legions loyal to the Roman Senate, commanded by Gaius Pansa, defeat the forces of Mark Antony in the Battle of Forum Gallorum.69 – Vitellius, commanding Rhine-based armies, defeats Roman emperor Otho in the First Battle of Bedriacum to take power over Rome. 966 – Following his marriage to the Christian Doubravka of Bohemia, the pagan ruler of the Polans, Mieszko I, converts to Christianity, an event considered to be the founding of the Polish state.
972 – Otto II, Co-Emperor of the Holy Roman Empire, marries Byzantine princess Theophanu.
Astoria is a port city and the seat of Clatsop County, Oregon, United States.
Founded in 1811, Astoria is the oldest city in the state and was the first permanent American settlement west of the Rocky Mountains.
Alarums and Excursions (A&E) is an amateur press association (APA) started in June 1975 by Lee Gold; publication continues to the present day.
It was one of the first publications to focus solely on role-playing games.
Alfred Jarry (; 8 September 1873 – 1 November 1907) was a French symbolist writer who is best known for his play Ubu Roi (1896), often cited as a forerunner of Dada and the Surrealist and Futurist movements of the 1920s and 1930s.
He also coined the term and philosophical concept of 'pataphysics.
Amalric or Amalaric (also Americ, Almerich, Emeric, Emerick and other variations) is a personal name derived from the tribal name Amal (referring to the Gothic Amali) and ric (Gothic reiks) meaning "ruler, prince".
Equivalents in different languages include:French: Amaury (surname/given name), Amalric (surname), Amaurich (surname), Maury (surname)
Amalric or Amaury I (; ; 113611 July 1174) was King of Jerusalem from 1163, and Count of Jaffa and Ascalon before his accession.
He was the second son of Melisende and Fulk of Jerusalem, and succeeded his older brother Baldwin III.
Aimery of Lusignan (, , Amorí; before 11551 April 1205), erroneously referred to as Amalric or Amaury in earlier scholarship, was the first King of Cyprus, reigning from 1196 to his death.
He also reigned as the King of Jerusalem from his marriage to Isabella I in 1197 to his death.
Anthemius of Tralles (, Medieval Greek: , Anthémios o Trallianós;  – 533  558) was a Byzantine Greek from Tralles who worked as a geometer and architect in Constantinople, the capital of the Byzantine Empire.
With Isidore of Miletus, he designed the Hagia Sophia for Justinian I.LifeAnthemius was one of the five sons of Stephanus of Tralles, a physician.
Absalon (21 March 1201) was a Danish statesman and prelate of the Catholic Church who served as the bishop of Roskilde from 1158 to 1192 and archbishop of Lund from 1178 until his death.
He was the foremost politician and church father of Denmark in the second half of the 12th century, and was the closest advisor of King Valdemar I of Denmark.
Adhemar (also known as Adémar, Aimar, or Aelarz) de Monteil (died 1 August 1098) was one of the principal figures of the First Crusade and was bishop of Puy-en-Velay from before 1087.
He was the chosen representative of Pope Urban II for the expedition to the Holy Land.
Alphonse or Alfonso (11 November 122021 August 1271) was the count of Poitou from 1225 and count of Toulouse (as such called Alphonse II) from 1249.
As count of Toulouse, he also governed the Marquisate of Provence.Birth and early lifeBorn at Poissy, Alphonse was a son of King Louis VIII of France and Blanche of Castile.
Alfonso Jordan, also spelled Alfons Jordan or Alphonse Jourdain (1103–1148), was the Count of Tripoli (1105–09), Count of Rouergue (1109–48) and Count of Toulouse, Margrave of Provence and Duke of Narbonne (1112–48).
LifeAlfonso was the son of Raymond IV of Toulouse by his third wife, Elvira of Castile.
Ambroise, sometimes Ambroise of Normandy, (flourished ) was a Norman poet and chronicler of the Third Crusade, author of a work called , which describes in rhyming Old French verse the adventures of  as a crusader.
The poem is known to us only through one Vatican manuscript, and long escaped the notice of historians.
Art Deco, short for the French , and sometimes referred to simply as Deco, is a style of visual arts, architecture, and product design, that first appeared in France in the 1910s (just before World War I), and flourished in the United States and Europe during the 1920s to early 1930s.
Through styling and design of the exterior and interior of anything from large structures to small objects, including how people look (clothing, fashion and jewelry), Art Deco has influenced bridges, buildings (from skyscrapers to cinemas), ships, ocean liners, trains, cars, trucks, buses, furniture, and everyday objects like radios and vacuum cleaners.
ASCII art is a graphic design technique that uses computers for presentation and consists of pictures pieced together from the 95 printable (from a total of 128) characters defined by the ASCII Standard from 1963 and ASCII compliant character sets with proprietary extended characters (beyond the 128 characters of standard 7-bit ASCII).
The term is also loosely used to refer to text-based visual art in general.
Alexius is the Latinized form of the given name Alexios (, polytonic , "defender", cf. Alexander), especially common in the Byzantine Empire.
The female form is Alexia () and its variants such as Alessia (the masculine form of which is Alessio) in Italian.
American English, sometimes called United States English or U.S. English, is the set of varieties of the English language native to the United States.
English is the most widely spoken language in the United States and in most circumstances is the de facto common language used in government, education and commerce.
Albert Goodwill Spalding (September 2, 1849 – September 9, 1915) was an American pitcher, manager, and executive in the early years of professional baseball, and the co-founder of A.G. Spalding sporting goods company.
He was born and raised in Byron, Illinois, yet graduated from Rockford Central High School in Rockford, Illinois.
The Africa Alphabet (also International African Alphabet or IAI alphabet) is a set of letters designed as the basis for Latin alphabets for the languages of Africa.
It was initially developed in 1928 by the International Institute of African Languages and Cultures from a combination of the English alphabet and the International Phonetic Alphabet (IPA).
Acquire is a board game published by 3M in 1964 that involves multi-player mergers and acquisitions.
It was one of the most popular games in the 3M Bookshelf games series published in the 1960s, and the only one still published in the United States.
Australian English (AusE, AusEng, AuE, AuEng, en-AU) is the set of varieties of the English language native to Australia.
It is the country's common language and de facto national language; while Australia has no official language, English is the first language of the majority of the population, and has been entrenched as the de facto national language since British settlement, being the only language spoken in the home for 72% of Australians.
American Airlines Flight 77 was a scheduled domestic transcontinental passenger flight from Dulles International Airport in Northern Virginia to Los Angeles International Airport in California.
The Boeing 757-223 aircraft serving the flight was hijacked by five al-Qaeda terrorists on the morning of September 11, 2001, as part of the September 11 attacks.
An ambush is a surprise attack by people lying in wait in a concealed position.
Ambushes have been used consistently throughout history, from ancient to modern warfare.
An abzyme (from antibody and enzyme), also called catmab (from catalytic monoclonal antibody), and most often called catalytic antibody or sometimes catab, is a monoclonal antibody with catalytic activity.
Abzymes are usually raised in lab animals immunized against synthetic haptens, but some natural abzymes can be found in normal humans (anti-vasoactive intestinal peptide autoantibodies) and in patients with autoimmune diseases such as systemic lupus erythematosus, where they can bind to and hydrolyze DNA.
In evolutionary biology, adaptive radiation is a process in which organisms diversify rapidly from an ancestral species into a multitude of new forms, particularly when a change in the environment makes new resources available, alters biotic interactions or opens new environmental niches.
Starting with a single ancestor, this process results in the speciation and phenotypic adaptation of an array of species exhibiting different morphological and physiological traits.
Agarose gel electrophoresis is a method of gel electrophoresis used in biochemistry, molecular biology, genetics, and clinical chemistry to separate a mixed population of macromolecules such as DNA or proteins in a matrix of agarose, one of the two main components of agar.
The proteins may be separated by charge and/or size (isoelectric focusing agarose electrophoresis is essentially size independent), and the DNA and RNA fragments by length.
An allele is a variation of the same sequence of nucleotides at the same place on a long DNA molecule, as described in leading textbooks on genetics and evolution.
The word is a short form of "allelomorph".
Ampicillin is an antibiotic belonging to the aminopenicillin class of the penicillin family.
The drug is used to prevent and treat a number of bacterial infections, such as respiratory tract infections, urinary tract infections, meningitis, salmonellosis, and endocarditis.
Antimicrobial resistance (AMR) occurs when microbes evolve mechanisms that protect them from the effects of antimicrobials (drugs used to treat infections).
All classes of microbes can evolve resistance where the drugs are no longer effective.
In immunology, an antigen (Ag) is a molecule, moiety, foreign particulate matter, or an allergen, such as pollen, that can bind to a specific antibody or T-cell receptor.
The presence of antigens in the body may trigger an immune response.
An autosome is any chromosome that is not a sex chromosome.
The members of an autosome pair in a diploid cell have the same morphology, unlike those in allosomal (sex chromosome) pairs, which may have different structures.
Antwerp is a city in Belgium and capital of the Antwerp province.
Antwerp may also refer to:In Belgium Antwerp (district) Antwerp (province)
Aquila may refer to:Arts, entertainment, and media Aquila, a series of books by S.P. Somtow Aquila, a 1997 book by Andrew Norriss Aquila (children's magazine), a UK-based children's magazine Aquila (journal), an ornithological journal Aquila (TV series), a BBC TV production for children based on the Norriss book Aquila Theatre, a theatre company of New YorkFictional entities  Aquila, a ship in the video game Star Ocean:
The Last Hope Aquila, a ship in the video game Assassin's Creed III Aquila Yuna, a character in the anime Saint Seiya Omega Aquila, a medieval city in the fantasy film Ladyhawke (1985)People Aquila (name), a given name or surnamePlaces Aquila, Michoacán, a town in Mexico Aquila, Switzerland, a former municipality Aquila, Veracruz, a municipality in Mexico L'Aquila, sometimes Aquila, the regional capital of Abruzzo in Italy Province of L'Aquila, ItalyTransportationAutomotive Aquila Italiana, Italian car manufacturer or brand Aquila raci
Al-Qaeda is a pan-Islamist militant organization led by Sunni Jihadists who self-identify as a vanguard spearheading a global Islamist revolution to unite the Muslim world under a supra-national Islamic state known as the Caliphate.
Its members are mostly composed of Arabs, but also include other peoples.
Alessandro Giuseppe Antonio Anastasio Volta (, ; 18 February 1745 – 5 March 1827) was an Italian physicist and chemist who was a pioneer of electricity and power and is credited as the inventor of the electric battery and the discoverer of methane.
He invented the voltaic pile in 1799, and reported the results of his experiments in 1800 in a two-part letter to the president of the Royal Society.
Argo Navis (the Ship Argo), or simply Argo, is one of Ptolemy's 48 constellations, now a grouping of three IAU constellations.
It is formerly a single large constellation in the southern sky.
In Greek mythology, Andromeda (;  or ) is the daughter of Cepheus, the king of Aethiopia, and his wife, Cassiopeia.
When Cassiopeia boasts that she (or her daughter) is more beautiful than the Nereids, Poseidon sends the sea monster Cetus to ravage the coast of Aethiopia as divine punishment.
Antlia (; from Ancient Greek ἀντλία) is a constellation in the Southern Celestial Hemisphere.
Its name means "pump" in Latin and Greek; it represents an air pump.
Ara (Latin for "the Altar") is a southern constellation between Scorpius, Telescopium, Triangulum Australe, and Norma.
It was (as ) one of the Greek bulk (namely 48) described by the 2nd-century astronomer Ptolemy, and it remains one of the 88 modern constellations designated by the International Astronomical Union.
Arkansas ( ) is a landlocked state in the south-central region of the Southern United States.
It is bordered by Missouri to the north, Tennessee and Mississippi to the east, Louisiana to the south, Texas to the southwest, and Oklahoma to the west.
An atmosphere is a gas layer around a celestial body.
Atmosphere may also refer to:Science Atmosphere (unit), a unit of pressure Atmosphere of Earth Extraterrestrial atmospheres Stellar atmosphereArts, entertainment, and mediaMusicGroups Atmosphere (music group), an American hip-hop duo from Minnesota Atmosphere (Polish band)Albums Atmosphere (Atmosphere album) (1997) Atmosphere (Eloy Fritsch album) (2003) Atmosphere (Kaskade album) (2013), or the title song Atmosphere (Sevenglory album) (2007) Atmosphere, a 1969 album by Colours, produced by Dan Moore and Richard Delvy Atmospheres (album) (2014)Songs and orchestral pieces "Atmosphere" (Drax Project song) (2023) "Atmosphere" (Joy Division song) (1980) "Atmosphere" (Kaskade song) (2013) "Atmosphere" (1975), from Let's Take It to the Stage by Funkadelic "Atmosphere" (2001), from Singularity by Joe Morris "Atmosphere" (1984), by Russ Abbot Atmosphères (1961), an orchestral piece by György LigetiPeriodical
Apus is a small constellation in the southern sky.
It represents a bird-of-paradise, and its name means "without feet" in Greek because the bird-of-paradise was once wrongly believed to lack feet.
Abadan ( Ābādān, ) is a city in the Central District of Abadan County, Khuzestan province, Iran, and serves as both capital of the county and of the district.
The city is in the southwest of the county.
Sir Alexander Fleming  (6 August 1881 – 11 March 1955) was a Scottish physician and microbiologist, best known for discovering the world's first broadly effective antibiotic substance, which he named penicillin.
His discovery in 1928 of what was later named benzylpenicillin (or penicillin G) from the mould Penicillium rubens has been described as the "single greatest victory ever achieved over disease".
Andrew Carnegie (,  ; November 25, 1835August 11, 1919) was an American industrialist and philanthropist.
Carnegie led the expansion of the American steel industry in the late 19th century and became one of the richest Americans in history.
Approximants are speech sounds that involve the articulators approaching each other but not narrowly enough nor with enough articulatory precision to create turbulent airflow.
Therefore, approximants fall between fricatives, which do produce a turbulent airstream, and vowels, which produce no turbulence.
Astronomer royal is a senior post in the Royal Households of the United Kingdom.
There are two officers, the senior being the astronomer royal dating from 22 June 1675; the junior is the astronomer royal for Scotland dating from 1834.
The word aeon , also spelled eon (in American and Australian English), originally meant "life", "vital force" or "being", "generation" or "a period of time", though it tended to be translated as "age" in the sense of  "ages", "forever", "timeless" or "for eternity".
It is a Latin transliteration from the ancient Greek word  (), from the archaic  () meaning "century".
An airline is a company that provides air transport services for traveling passengers and/or freight.
Airlines use aircraft to supply these services and may form partnerships or alliances with other airlines for codeshare agreements, in which they both offer and operate the same flight.
The Australian Democrats is a centrist political party in Australia.
Founded in 1977 from a merger of the Australia Party and the New Liberal Movement, both of which were descended from Liberal Party dissenting splinter groups, it was Australia's largest minor party from its formation in 1977 through to 2004 and frequently held the balance of power in the Senate during that time.
The Australian Capital Territory (ACT), known as the Federal Capital Territory (FCT) until 1938, is a federal territory of Australia.
Canberra, the capital city of Australia, is located in this territory.
Ally McBeal is an American legal comedy drama television series, originally aired on Fox from September 8, 1997, to May 20, 2002.
Created by David E. Kelley, the series stars Calista Flockhart in the title role as a lawyer working in the Boston law firm Cage and Fish, with other lawyers whose lives and loves are eccentric, humorous, and dramatic.
Andreas Capellanus (Capellanus meaning "chaplain"), also known as Andrew the Chaplain, and occasionally by a French translation of his name, André le Chapelain, was the 12th-century author of a treatise commonly known as De amore ("About Love"), and often known in English, somewhat misleadingly, as The Art of Courtly Love, though its realistic, somewhat cynical tone suggests that it is in some measure an antidote to courtly love.
Little is known of Andreas Capellanus's life, but he is presumed to have been a courtier of Marie de Champagne, and probably of French origin.
The American Civil Liberties Union (ACLU) is an American nonprofit human rights organization founded in 1920.
The organization strives "to defend and preserve the individual rights and liberties guaranteed to every person in this country by the Constitution and laws of the United States".
Adobe Inc. ( ), formerly Adobe Systems Incorporated, is an American multinational computer software company incorporated in Delawareand headquartered in San Jose, California.
It has historically specialized in software for the creation and publication of a wide range of content, including graphics, photography, illustration, animation, multimedia/video, motion pictures, and print.
The Alexander Technique, named after its developer Frederick Matthias Alexander (1869–1955), is a type of  alternative therapy based on the idea that poor posture gives rise to a range of health problems.
The American National Center for Complementary and Integrative Health classifies it as a "psychological and physical" complementary approach to health when used "together with" mainstream methods.
Andrea Alciato (8 May 149212 January 1550), commonly known as Alciati (Andreas Alciatus), was an Italian jurist and writer.
He is regarded as the founder of the French school of legal humanists.
Apparent magnitude () is a measure of the brightness of a star or other astronomical object.
An object's apparent magnitude depends on its intrinsic luminosity, its distance, and any extinction of the object's light caused by interstellar dust along the line of sight to the observer.
In astronomy, absolute magnitude () is a measure of the luminosity of a celestial object on an inverse logarithmic astronomical magnitude scale.
An object's absolute magnitude is defined to be equal to the apparent magnitude that the object would have if it were viewed from a distance of exactly , without extinction (or dimming) of its light due to absorption by interstellar matter and cosmic dust.
Apollo 1, initially designated AS-204, was planned to be the first crewed mission of the Apollo program, the American undertaking to land the first man on the Moon.
It was planned to launch on February 21, 1967, as the first low Earth orbital test of the Apollo command and service module.
Apollo 10 (May 18–26, 1969) was the fourth human spaceflight in the United States' Apollo program and the second to orbit the Moon.
NASA, the mission's operator, described it as a "dress rehearsal" for the first Moon landing (Apollo 11, two months later).
Apollo 12 (November 14–24, 1969) was the sixth crewed flight in the United States Apollo program and the second to land on the Moon.
It was launched on November 14, 1969, by NASA from the Kennedy Space Center, Florida.
Apollo 14 (January 31February 9, 1971) was the eighth crewed mission in the United States Apollo program, the third to land on the Moon, and the first to land in the lunar highlands.
It was the last of the "H missions", landings at specific sites of scientific interest on the Moon for two-day stays with two lunar extravehicular activities (EVAs or moonwalks).
Apollo 15 (July 26August 7, 1971) was the ninth crewed mission in the United States' Apollo program and the fourth to land on the Moon.
It was the first J mission, with a longer stay on the Moon and a greater focus on science than earlier landings.
Apollo 16 (April 1627, 1972) was the tenth crewed mission in the United States Apollo space program, administered by NASA, and the fifth and penultimate to land on the Moon.
It was the second of Apollo's "J missions", with an extended stay on the lunar surface, a focus on science, and the use of the Lunar Roving Vehicle (LRV).
Apollo 17 (December 7–19, 1972) was the eleventh and final mission of NASA's Apollo program, the sixth and most recent time humans have set foot on the Moon or traveled beyond low Earth orbit.
Commander Gene Cernan and Lunar Module Pilot Harrison Schmitt walked on the Moon, while Command Module Pilot Ronald Evans orbited above.
The American Revolution was an ideological and political revolution based on the principles of the American Enlightenment that generally occurred in British America between 1765 and 1789.
It created the environment for the American Revolutionary War, which lasted from 1775 to 1783, whereby the Thirteen Colonies secured their independence from the British Crown and consequently established the United States as the first sovereign nation state founded on Enlightenment principles of the consent of the governed, constitutionalism and liberal democracy.
EventsPre-16001080 – Harald III of Denmark dies and is succeeded by Canute IV, who would later be the first Dane to be canonized.
1349 – The rule of the Bavand dynasty in Mazandaran is brought to an end by the murder of Hasan II.1362 – Kaunas Castle falls to the Teutonic Order after a month-long siege.
Sir Alan Ayckbourn  (born 12 April 1939) is a prolific British playwright and director.
He has written and produced as of 2023, 89 full-length plays in Scarborough and London and was, between 1972 and 2009, the artistic director of the Stephen Joseph Theatre in Scarborough, where all but four of his plays have received their first performance.
Alpha Centauri (α Centauri, Alpha Cen, or α Cen) is a triple star system in the southern constellation of Centaurus.
It consists of three stars: Rigil Kentaurus (Alpha Centauri A), Toliman (B) and Proxima Centauri (C).
Amiga is a family of personal computers introduced by Commodore in 1985.
The original model is one of a number of mid-1980s computers with 16- or 16/32-bit processors, 256 KB or more of RAM, mouse-based GUIs, and significantly improved graphics and audio compared to previous 8-bit systems.
The actinophryids are an order of heliozoa, a polyphyletic array of stramenopiles, having a close relationship with pedinellids and Ciliophrys.
They are common in fresh water and occasionally found in marine and soil habitats.
Abel Janszoon Tasman (; 160310 October 1659) was a Dutch seafarer and explorer, best known for his voyages of 1642 and 1644 in the service of the Dutch East India Company (VOC).
Born in 1603 in Lutjegast, Netherlands, Tasman started his career as a merchant seaman and became a skilled navigator.
EventsPre-1600AD 25 – Guangwu claims the throne as Emperor of China, restoring the Han dynasty after the collapse of the short-lived Xin dynasty.70 – Fires resulting from the destruction of the Second Temple in Jerusalem are extinguished.
642 – Battle of Maserfield: Penda of Mercia defeats and kills Oswald of Northumbria.
Algebraic geometry is a branch of mathematics which classically studies zeros of multivariate polynomials.
Modern algebraic geometry is based on the use of abstract algebraic techniques, mainly from commutative algebra, for solving geometrical problems about these sets of zeros.
Austin ( ,  ) is the capital city of the U.S. state of Texas, as well as the seat and most populous city of Travis County, with portions extending into Hays and Williamson counties.
Incorporated on December 27, 1839, it is the 10th most populous city in the United States, the 4th most populous city in Texas, and the 2nd most populous state capital city.
The argument from morality is an argument for the existence of God.
Arguments from morality tend to be based on moral normativity or moral order.
ASL is a common initialism for American Sign Language, the sign language of the United States and Canada (not be confused with Auslan, also called ASL or Asilulu language which has the ISO code ASL), and may also refer to:CultureSport  American Soccer League (disambiguation) Australia's Surfing Life, surf magazine African Super League, a future CAF club competition  Axpo Super League, former name of the Swiss Super LeagueOther uses  A Static Lullaby, American post-hardcore band Advanced Squad Leader, a tactical board wargame A shorted version of the following slang terms: age/sex/location, internet slang As hell, slang popular amongst members of Generation Z Average shot length, in film editing AfreecaTV StarCraft League, a video game tournament seriesScience and technologyAviation Aeronautical Syndicate Ltd, British aeroplane manufacturer.
Air Serbia, ICAO airline code ASL Airlines Ireland, cargo airlineBiology and medicine  American Society of Lymphology, f
Auschwitz concentration camp (, ; also  or ) was a complex of over 40 concentration and extermination camps operated by Nazi Germany in occupied Poland (in a portion annexed into Germany in 1939) during World War II and the Holocaust.
It consisted of Auschwitz I, the main camp (Stammlager) in Oświęcim; Auschwitz II-Birkenau, a concentration and extermination camp with gas chambers; Auschwitz III-Monowitz, a labour camp for the chemical conglomerate IG Farben; and dozens of subcamps.
Archery is the sport, practice, or skill of using a bow to shoot arrows.
The word comes from the Latin arcus, meaning bow.
Hugo Alvar Henrik Aalto (; 3 February 1898 – 11 May 1976) was a Finnish architect and designer.
His work includes architecture, furniture, textiles and glassware, as well as sculptures and paintings.
The English language was introduced to the Americas by British colonisation, beginning in the late 16th and early 17th centuries.
The language also spread to numerous other parts of the world as a result of British trade and colonisation and the spread of the former British Empire, which, by 1921, included 470–570 million people, about a quarter of the world's population.
Atomic semantics is a type of guarantee provided by a data register shared by several processors in a parallel machine or in a network of computers working together.
Atomic semantics are very strong.
The Antarctic Circumpolar Current (ACC) is an ocean current that flows clockwise (as seen from the South Pole) from west to east around Antarctica.
An alternative name for the ACC is the West Wind Drift.
Arbor Day (or Arbour Day in some countries) is a secular day of observance in which individuals and groups are encouraged to plant trees.
Today, many countries observe such a holiday.
Sir Alfred Jules "Freddie" Ayer  ( ; 29 October 1910 – 27 June 1989), usually cited as A. J. Ayer, was an English philosopher known for his promotion of logical positivism, particularly in his books Language, Truth, and Logic (1936) and The Problem of Knowledge (1956).
Ayer was educated at Eton College and the University of Oxford, after which he studied the philosophy of logical positivism at the University of Vienna.
André Weil (; ; 6 May 1906 – 6 August 1998) was a French mathematician, known for his foundational work in number theory and algebraic geometry.
He was one of the most influential mathematicians of the twentieth century.
The Achaeans or Akhaians (; , "the Achaeans" or "of Achaea") is one of the names in Homer which is used to refer to the Greeks collectively.
The term "Achaean" is believed to be related to the Hittite term Ahhiyawa and the Egyptian term Ekwesh which appear in texts from the Late Bronze Age and are believed to refer to the Mycenaean civilization or some part of it.
Atle Selberg (14 June 1917 – 6 August 2007) was a Norwegian mathematician known for his work in analytic number theory and the theory of automorphic forms, and in particular for bringing them into relation with spectral theory.
He was awarded the Fields Medal in 1950 and an honorary Abel Prize in 2002.
Aeschylus (, ;  ; c. 525/524 – c. 456/455 BC) was an ancient Greek tragedian often described as the father of tragedy.
Academic knowledge of the genre begins with his work, and understanding of earlier Greek tragedy is largely based on inferences made from reading his surviving plays.
The Amber Road was an ancient trade route for the transfer of amber from coastal areas of the North Sea and the Baltic Sea to the Mediterranean Sea.
Prehistoric trade routes between Northern and Southern Europe were defined by the amber trade.
Crandall University is a Baptist Christian liberal arts university located in Moncton, New Brunswick, Canada.
It is affiliated with the Canadian Baptists of Atlantic Canada (Canadian Baptist Ministries).
Sir Andrew John Wiles  (born 11 April 1953) is an English mathematician and a Royal Society Research Professor at the University of Oxford, specialising in number theory.
He is best known for proving Fermat's Last Theorem, for which he was awarded the 2016 Abel Prize and the 2017 Copley Medal by the Royal Society.
Anne Brontë (, commonly ; 17 January 1820 – 28 May 1849) was an English novelist and poet, and the youngest member of the Brontë literary family.
Anne Brontë was the daughter of Maria ( Branwell) and Patrick Brontë, a poor Irish clergyman in the Church of England.
Augustine of Hippo ( ,  ; ; 13 November 354 – 28 August 430), also known as Saint Augustine, was a theologian and philosopher of Berber origin and the bishop of Hippo Regius in Numidia, Roman North Africa.
His writings influenced the development of Western philosophy and Western Christianity, and he is viewed as one of the most important Church Fathers of the Latin Church in the Patristic Period.
Acting is an activity in which a story is told by means of its enactment by an actor who adopts a character—in theatre, television, film, radio, or any other medium that makes use of the mimetic mode.
Acting involves a broad range of skills, including a well-developed imagination, emotional facility, physical expressivity, vocal projection, clarity of speech, and the ability to interpret drama.
The Delian League, founded in 478 BC, was an association of Greek city-states, numbering between 150 and 330, under the leadership of Athens, whose purpose was to continue fighting the Persian Empire after the Greek victory in the Battle of Plataea at the end of the Second Persian invasion of Greece.
The League's modern name derives from its official meeting place, the island of Delos, where congresses were held in the temple and where the treasury stood until, in a symbolic gesture, Pericles moved it to Athens in 454 BC.
August Horch (12 October 1868 – 3 February 1951) was a German engineer and automobile pioneer, the founder of the manufacturing giant which would eventually become Audi.
BeginningsHorch was born in Winningen, Rhenish Prussia.
Avionics (a blend of aviation and electronics) are the electronic systems used on aircraft.
Avionic systems include communications, navigation, the display and management of multiple systems, and the hundreds of systems that are fitted to aircraft to perform individual functions.
Ares (; , Árēs ) is the Greek god of war and courage.
He is one of the Twelve Olympians, and the son of Zeus and Hera.
Alexander Grothendieck (; ; ; 28 March 1928 – 13 November 2014) was a French mathematician who became the leading figure in the creation of modern algebraic geometry.
His research extended the scope of the field and added elements of commutative algebra, homological algebra, sheaf theory, and category theory to its foundations, while his so-called "relative" perspective led to revolutionary advances in many areas of pure mathematics.
Alcoholics Anonymous (AA) is a global peer-led mutual aid fellowship begun in the U.S. and dedicated to abstinence-based recovery from alcoholism through their spiritually inclined twelve-step program.
Besides stressing anonymity and offering membership to anyone wishing to stop drinking, AA's twelve traditions establish it as free to all, non-professional, non-denominational, apolitical and unaffiliated.
In computer graphics, alpha compositing or alpha blending is the process of combining one image with a background to create the appearance of partial or full transparency.
It is often useful to render picture elements (pixels) in separate passes or layers and then combine the resulting 2D images into a single, final image called the composite.
In computer science, an array is a data structure consisting of a collection of elements (values or variables), of same memory size, each identified by at least one array index or key.
An array is stored such that the position of each element can be computed from its index tuple by a mathematical formula.
"Advance Australia Fair" is the national anthem of Australia.
Written by Scottish-born composer Peter Dodds McCormick, the song was first performed as a patriotic song in Australia in 1878.
An automatic number announcement circuit (ANAC) is a component of a central office of a telephone company that provides a service to installation and service technicians to determine the telephone number of a telephone line.
The facility has a telephone number that may be called to listen to an automatic announcement that includes the caller's telephone number.
Amerigo Vespucci (; ; 9 March 1451 – 22 February 1512) was an Italian explorer and navigator from the Republic of Florence, from whose name the term "America" is derived.
Between 1497 and 1504, Vespucci participated in at least two voyages of the Age of Discovery, first on behalf of Spain (14991500) and then for Portugal (15011502).
Aristide Joseph Bonaventure Maillol (; December 8, 1861 – September 27, 1944) was a French sculptor, painter, and printmaker.
BiographyMaillol was born in Banyuls-sur-Mer, Roussillon.
{{Infobox artist| name          = Antonio Canova| image         = Antonio Canova Selfportrait 1792.jpg| alt           =| caption       = Self-portrait, 1792| birth_name    = Antonio Canova| birth_date    = 1 November 1757| birth_place   = Possagno, Republic of Venice| death_date    = | death_place   = Venice, Lombardy–Venetia| nationality   = Republic of Venice (1757–1798)Austria (territory ceded to Austria) (1798–1805)Kingdom of Italy (1805–1814)  Austrian Empire (1814–1822)| field         = Sculpture| training      =| movement      = Neoclassicism| works         = {{unbulleted list|Psyche Revived by Cupid's Kiss|The Three Graces|Napoleon as Mars the Peacemaker|Venus Victrix|George
Washington}}| patrons       =| influenced    =| awards        =| elected       =| website       =}}Antonio Canova (; 1 November 1757 – 13 October 1822) was an Italian Neoclassical sculptor, famous for his marble sculptures.
François Auguste René Rodin (12 November 184017 November 1917) was a French sculptor, generally considered the founder of modern sculpture.
He was schooled traditionally and took a craftsman-like approach to his work.
Ann Arbor is a city in the U.S. state of Michigan and the seat of government of Washtenaw County.
The 2020 census recorded its population to be 123,851, making it the fifth-largest city in Michigan.
The Act of Settlement is an Act of the Parliament of England that settled the succession to the English and Irish crowns to only Protestants, which passed in 1701.
More specifically, anyone who became a Roman Catholic, or who married one, became disqualified to inherit the throne.
Aircraft hijacking (also known as airplane hijacking, skyjacking, plane hijacking, plane jacking, air robbery, air piracy, or aircraft piracy, with the last term used within the special aircraft jurisdiction of the United States) is the unlawful seizure of an aircraft by an individual or a group.
Dating from the earliest of hijackings, most cases involve the pilot being forced to fly according to the hijacker's demands.
The Acropolis of Athens (; ) is an ancient citadel located on a rocky outcrop above the city of Athens, Greece, and contains the remains of several ancient buildings of great architectural and historical significance, the most famous being the Parthenon.
The word Acropolis is from the Greek words  (akron, "highest point, extremity") and  (polis, "city").
Johann Adam Weishaupt (; 6 February 1748 – 18 November 1830) was a German philosopher, professor of civil law and later canon law, and founder of the Illuminati.
Early lifeAdam Weishaupt was born on 6 February 1748 in Ingolstadt in the Electorate of Bavaria.
The Acorn Electron (nicknamed the Elk inside Acorn and beyond) was a lower-cost alternative to the BBC Micro educational/home computer, also developed by Acorn Computers Ltd, to provide many of the features of that more expensive machine at a price more competitive with that of the ZX Spectrum.
It had 32 kilobytes of RAM, and its ROM included BBC BASIC II together with the operating system.
A Fire Upon the Deep is a 1992 science fiction novel by American writer Vernor Vinge.
It is a space opera involving superhuman intelligences, aliens, variable physics, space battles, love, betrayal, genocide, and a communication medium resembling Usenet.
Aeronautics is the science or art involved with the study, design, and manufacturing of air flight–capable machines, and the techniques of operating aircraft and rockets within the atmosphere.
The British Royal Aeronautical Society identifies the aspects of "aeronautical Art, Science and Engineering" and "The profession of Aeronautics (which expression includes Astronautics).
The Lumière brothers (, ; ), Auguste Marie Louis Nicolas Lumière (19 October 1862 – 10 April 1954) and Louis Jean Lumière (5 October 1864 – 6 June 1948), were French manufacturers of photography equipment, best known for their  motion picture system and the short films they produced between 1895 and 1905, which places them among the earliest filmmakers.
Their screening of a single film on 22 March 1895 for around 200 members of the Society for the Development of the National Industry in Paris was probably the first presentation of projected film.
The Acts of the Apostles (, Práxeis Apostólōn; ) is the fifth book of the New Testament; it tells of the founding of the Christian Church and the spread of its message to the Roman Empire.Acts and the Gospel of Luke make up a two-part work, Luke–Acts, by the same anonymous author.
Traditionally, the author is believed to be Luke the Evangelist, a doctor who travelled with Paul the Apostle.
Assyria (Neo-Assyrian cuneiform: , romanized:māt Aššur) was a major ancient Mesopotamian civilization which existed as a city-state from the 21st century BC to the 14th century BC, then to a territorial state, and eventually an empire from the 14th century BC to the 7th century BC.
Spanning from the early Bronze Age to the late Iron Age, modern historians typically divide ancient Assyrian history into the Early Assyrian ( 2600–2025 BC), Old Assyrian ( 2025–1364 BC), Middle Assyrian ( 1363–912 BC), Neo-Assyrian (911–609 BC) and post-imperial (609 BC– AD 240) periods, based on political events and gradual changes in language.
Abijah ( ) is a Biblical Hebrew unisex name which means "my Father is Yah".
The Hebrew form  also occurs in the Bible.
In aphasia (sometimes called dysphasia), a person may be unable to comprehend or unable to formulate language because of damage to specific brain regions.
The major causes are stroke and head trauma; prevalence is hard to determine but aphasia due to stroke is estimated to be 0.1–0.4% in the Global North.
The aorta ( ; : aortas or aortae) is the main and largest artery in the human body, originating from the left ventricle of the heart, branching upwards immediately after, and extending down to the abdomen, where it splits at the aortic bifurcation into two smaller arteries (the common iliac arteries).
The aorta distributes oxygenated blood to all parts of the body through the systemic circulation.
Abimelech (also spelled Abimelek or Avimelech; ) was the generic name given to all Philistine kings in the Hebrew Bible from the time of Abraham through King David.
In the Book of Judges, Abimelech, son of Gideon, of the Tribe of Manasseh, is proclaimed king of Shechem after the death of his father.
Andrew "Tridge" Tridgell  (born 28 February 1967) is an Australian computer programmer.
He is the author of and a contributor to the Samba file server, and co-inventor of the rsync algorithm.
Applesoft BASIC is a dialect of Microsoft BASIC, developed by Marc McDonald and Ric Weiland,  supplied with the Apple II series of computers.
It supersedes Integer BASIC and is the BASIC in ROM in all Apple II series computers after the original Apple II model.
Asterix or The Adventures of Asterix ( or  , "Asterix the Gaul") is a bande dessinée comic book series about a village of indomitable Gaulish warriors who adventure around the world and fight the Roman Republic, with the aid of a magic potion, during the era of Julius Caesar, in an ahistorical telling of the time after the Gallic Wars.
The series first appeared in the Franco-Belgian comic magazine Pilote on 29 October 1959.
The Arizona Cardinals are a professional American football team based in the Phoenix metropolitan area.
The Cardinals compete in the National Football League (NFL) as a member of the National Football Conference (NFC) West division, and play their home games at State Farm Stadium in Glendale, a suburb northwest of Phoenix.
The Atlanta Falcons are a professional American football team based in Atlanta.
The Falcons compete in the National Football League (NFL) as a member club of the league's National Football Conference (NFC) South division.
Heathenry is a modern Pagan new religious movement that has been active in the United States since at least the early 1970s.
Although the term "Heathenry" is often employed to cover the entire religious movement, different Heathen groups within the United States often prefer the term "Ásatrú" or "Odinism" as self-designations.
An ansible is a category of fictional devices or technology capable of near-instantaneous or faster-than-light communication.
It can send and receive messages to and from a corresponding device over any distance or obstacle whatsoever with no delay, even between star systems.
Adalbert of Prague (, , , , ;  95623 April 997), known in the Czech Republic, Poland and Slovakia by his birth name Vojtěch (), was a Czech missionary and Christian saint.
He was the Bishop of Prague and a missionary to the Hungarians, Poles, and Prussians, who was martyred in his efforts to convert the Baltic Prussians to Christianity.
Ælfheah ( – 19 April 1012), more commonly known today as Alphege, was an Anglo-Saxon Bishop of Winchester, later Archbishop of Canterbury.
He became an anchorite before being elected abbot of Bath Abbey.
In mathematics, an associative algebra A over a commutative ring (often a field) K is a ring A together with a ring homomorphism from K into the center of A.
This is thus an algebraic structure with an addition,  a multiplication, and a scalar multiplication (the multiplication by the image by the ring homomorphism of an element of K).
In mathematics, the axiom of regularity (also known as the axiom of foundation) is an axiom of Zermelo–Fraenkel set theory that states that every non-empty set A contains an element that is disjoint from A. In first-order logic, the axiom reads: The axiom of regularity together with the axiom of pairing implies that no set is an element of itself, and that there is no infinite sequence (an) such that ai+1 is an element of ai for all i. With the axiom of dependent choice (which is a weakened form of the axiom of choice), this result can be reversed: if there are no such infinite sequences, then the axiom of regularity is true.
Hence, in this context the axiom of regularity is equivalent to the sentence that there are no downward infinite membership chains.
AIX (Advanced Interactive eXecutive, pronounced  ,) is a series of proprietary Unix operating systems developed and sold by IBM for several of its computer platforms.
Background Originally released for the IBM RT PC RISC workstation in 1986, AIX has supported a wide variety of hardware platforms, including the IBM RS/6000 series and later Power and PowerPC-based systems, IBM System i, System/370 mainframes, PS/2 personal computers, and the Apple Network Server.
AppleTalk is a discontinued proprietary suite of networking protocols developed by Apple Computer for their Macintosh computers.
AppleTalk includes a number of features that allow local area networks to be connected with no prior setup or the need for a centralized router or server of any sort.
The Apple II series (trademarked with square brackets as "Apple ][" and rendered on later models as "Apple //") is a family of home computers, one of the first highly successful mass-produced microcomputer products, designed primarily by Steve Wozniak, manufactured by Apple Computer (now Apple Inc.), and launched in 1977 with the original Apple II.
In  terms of ease of use, features, and expandability, the Apple II was a major advancement over its predecessor, the Apple I, a limited-production bare circuit board computer for electronics hobbyists.
The Apple III (styled as apple ///) is a business-oriented personal computer produced by Apple Computer and released in 1980.
Running the Apple SOS operating system, it was intended as the successor to the Apple II series, but was largely considered a failure in the market.
In computer science, an AVL tree (named after inventors Adelson-Velsky and Landis) is a self-balancing binary search tree.
In an AVL tree, the heights of the two child subtrees of any node differ by at most one; if at any time they differ by more than one, rebalancing is done to restore this property.
In organic chemistry, hydrocarbons (compounds composed solely of carbon and hydrogen) are divided into two classes: aromatic compounds and aliphatic compounds (; G. aleiphar, fat, oil).
Aliphatic compounds can be saturated (in which all the C-C bonds are single requiring the structure to be completed, or 'saturated', by hydrogen) like hexane, or unsaturated, like hexene and hexyne.
Astrology is a range of divinatory practices, recognized as pseudoscientific since the 18th century, that claim to discern information about human affairs and terrestrial events by studying the apparent positions of celestial objects.
Different cultures have employed forms of astrology since at least the 2nd millennium BCE, these practices having originated in calendrical systems used to predict seasonal shifts and to interpret celestial cycles as signs of divine communications.
Abyssinia is a historical name for the Ethiopian Empire.
Abyssinia may also refer to:Arts and media Abyssinia, a theatrical show by Bert Williams Abyssinia (musical), a show first staged in 1987 Abyssinia (1906 musical), 1906 Broadway musical by Will Marion Cook, Bert Williams, Jesse A. Shipp, and Alex Rogers "Abyssinia", a song by the Patti Smith Group on Radio EthiopiaAbyssinia, a 2003 novel by Ursula Dubosarsky "Abyssinia, Henry", an episode of the television series M*A*S*HLanguagesAbyssinian languages, family of languages spoken in Ethiopia, Eritrea, and SudanPeopleAbyssinian peoples, ethnic or pan-ethnic identifier used to refer to Ethiopians and EritreansPlaces  Abyssinia Lines, a neighbourhood of Jamshed Town in Karachi, Sindh, Pakistan Apostolic Vicariate of Abyssinia, the former Eastern Catholic missionaryVessels  HMS Abyssinia (1870), a British armoured ship SS Abyssinia, an 1870 Canadian Pacific steamshipOther uses  Abyssinia (battle honour)
In mathematics, an algebraic extension is a field extension  such that every element of the larger field  is algebraic over the smaller field ; that is, every element of  is a root of a non-zero polynomial with coefficients in .
A field extension that is not algebraic, is said to be transcendental, and must contain transcendental elements, that is, elements that are not algebraic.
Angela Maria "Ani" DiFranco (; born September 23, 1970) is an American-Canadian singer-songwriter.
She has released more than 20 albums.
An Arene, or aromatic hydrocarbon, is a hydrocarbon with alternating double and single bonds between carbon atoms forming rings.
Arene may also refer to: Arene (gastropod), a genus of marine snails in the family Areneidae Arene (mythology), the wife of Aphareus and mother of Idas and Lynceus in Greek mythology Arene, Elis, an ancient town in Elis, Greece, also known as Samiko Jean Arènes (1898–1960), French botanist who described many new species of the genus Dombeya Paul Arène (1843–1896), Provençal poet and French writerSee also Arena (disambiguation)
The Arizona Diamondbacks (colloquially the D-backs) are an American professional baseball team based in Phoenix, Arizona.
The Diamondbacks compete in Major League Baseball (MLB) as a member of the National League (NL) West division.
Aesthetics (also spelled esthetics) is the branch of philosophy concerned with the nature of beauty and the nature of taste; and functions as the philosophy of art.
Aesthetics examines the philosophy of aesthetic value, which is determined by critical judgements of artistic taste; thus, the function of aesthetics is the "critical reflection on art, culture and nature".
The Ark of the Covenant, also known as the Ark of the Testimony or the Ark of God, is an artifact believed to be the most sacred relic of the Israelites, which is described as a wooden chest, covered in pure gold, with an elaborately designed lid called the mercy seat.
According to the Book of Exodus, the Ark contained the two stone tablets of the Ten Commandments.
The Angles (, ; ) were one of the main Germanic peoples who settled in Great Britain in the post-Roman period.
They founded several kingdoms of the Heptarchy in Anglo-Saxon England.
The Aster CT-80 is a 1982 personal computer developed by the small Dutch company MCP (later renamed to Aster Computers), was sold in its first incarnation as a kit for hobbyists.
Later it was sold ready to use.
Arthur Wellesley may refer to:Arthur Wellesley, 1st Duke of Wellington (1769–1852), Anglo-Irish soldier and British prime ministerArthur Wellesley, 2nd Duke of Wellington (1807–1884), British soldier and noblemanArthur Wellesley, 4th Duke of Wellington (1849–1934), British soldier and noblemanArthur Wellesley, 5th Duke of Wellington (1876–1941), British soldier and noblemanArthur Wellesley, Marquess of Douro (born 1978), grandson of the 8th DukeArthur Wellesley Hughes (1870–1950), also known as Arthur Wellesley, Canadian musician and composerArthur Wellesley, 4th Earl Cowley (1890–1962), British actor and noblemanSee also Arthur (disambiguation) Wellesley (disambiguation)
Duke of Wellington (disambiguation)
These are lists of animated television series.
Animated television series are television programs produced by means of animation.
The Atlanta Braves are an American professional baseball team based in the Atlanta metropolitan area.
The Braves compete in Major League Baseball (MLB) as a member club of the National League (NL) East division.
The Atari ST is a line of personal computers from Atari Corporation and the successor to the Atari 8-bit family.
The initial model, the Atari 520ST, had limited release in April–June 1985 and was widely available in July.
The following is a list of current and past, non-classified notable artificial intelligence projects.
Specialized projectsBrain-inspired Blue Brain Project, an attempt to create a synthetic brain by reverse-engineering the mammalian brain down to the molecular level.
Aaliyah Dana Haughton ( ; January 16, 1979 – August 25, 2001) was an American singer and actress.
She has been credited with helping to redefine contemporary R&B, pop, and hip hop, earning her the nicknames the "Princess of R&B" and "Queen of Urban Pop".
Armour (Commonwealth English) or armor (American English; see spelling differences) is a covering used to protect an object, individual, or vehicle from physical injury or damage, especially direct contact weapons or projectiles during combat, or from a potentially dangerous environment or activity (e.g. cycling, construction sites, etc.).
Personal armour is used to protect soldiers and war animals.
An armoured fighting vehicle (British English) or armored fighting vehicle (American English) (AFV) is an armed combat vehicle protected by armour, generally combining operational mobility with offensive and defensive capabilities.
AFVs can be wheeled or tracked.
Anton Drexler (13 June 1884 – 24 February 1942) was a German far-right political agitator for the Völkisch movement in the 1920s.
He founded the pan-German and anti-Semitic German Workers' Party (DAP), the antecedent of the Nazi Party (NSDAP).
All Quiet on the Western Front () is a novel by Erich Maria Remarque, a German veteran of World War I.
The book describes the German soldiers' extreme physical and mental trauma during the war as well as the detachment from civilian life felt by many upon returning home from the war.
African Americans, also known as Afro-Americans or Black Americans, are an ethnic group consisting of Americans with partial or total ancestry from any of the black racial groups of Africa.
The term "African American" generally denotes descendants of enslaved Africans who are from the United States.
The Artistic License is an open-source license used for certain free and open-source software packages, most notably the standard implementation of the Perl programming language and most CPAN modules, which are dual-licensed under the Artistic License and the GNU General Public License (GPL).
HistoryArtistic License 1.0
Afrikaans (, ) is a West Germanic language that evolved in the Dutch Cape Colony from the Dutch vernacular of Holland proper (i.e. the Hollandic dialect) used by Dutch, French, and German settlers and people enslaved by them.
Afrikaans gradually began to develop distinguishing characteristics during the course of the 18th century.
In Greek mythology, Aeolus or Aiolos (;  , ) is a name shared by three mythical characters.
These three personages are often difficult to tell apart, and even the ancient mythographers appear to have been perplexed about which Aeolus was which.
ABC are the first three letters of the Latin script.
ABC or abc may also refer to:Arts, entertainment and mediaBroadcasting American Broadcasting Company, a commercial U.S. TV broadcaster Disney–ABC Television Group, the former name of the parent organization of ABC Australian Broadcasting Corporation, one of the national publicly funded broadcasters of Australia ABC Television (Australian TV network), the national television network of the Australian Broadcasting Corporation ABC TV (Australian TV channel), the flagship TV station of the Australian Broadcasting Corporation ABC Canberra (TV station), Canberra, and other ABC TV local stations in state capitals ABC Australia (Southeast Asian TV channel), an international pay TV channel ABC Radio (disambiguation), several radio stations Associated Broadcasting Corporation, a former name of the Philippine television company TV5 Network, Inc. ABC-5, the former name of TV5 (Philippines), a Philippine free-to-air network ABC (
In United States law, an Alford plea, also called a Kennedy plea in West Virginia, an Alford guilty plea, and the Alford doctrine, is a guilty plea in criminal court, whereby a defendant in a criminal case does not admit to the criminal act and asserts innocence, even if the evidence presented by the prosecution would be likely to persuade a judge or jury to find the defendant guilty beyond a reasonable doubt.
This can be caused by circumstantial evidence and testimony favoring the prosecution and difficulty finding evidence and witnesses that would aid the defense.
ABCD is a list of the first four letters in the English alphabet.
It may also refer to:Film  ABCD (film), a 2005 Indian Tamil-language romance film ABCD:
In analytic philosophy, anti-realism is a position which encompasses many varieties such as metaphysical, mathematical, semantic, scientific, moral and epistemic.
The term was first articulated by British philosopher Michael Dummett in an argument against a form of realism Dummett saw as 'colorless reductionism'.
Arsenal Football Club is an English professional football club based in Holloway, North London.
Arsenal compete in the Premier League, the top flight of English football.
American cuisine consists of the cooking style and traditional dishes prepared in the United States of America.
It has been significantly influenced by Europeans, indigenous Native Americans, Africans, Latin Americans, Asians, Pacific Islanders, and many other cultures and traditions.
Ahmad Shah Massoud (Dari/Pashto: , ; September 2, 1953September 9, 2001) was an Afghan politician and military commander.
He was a powerful guerrilla commander during the resistance against the Soviet occupation between 1979 and 1989.
Atlantis () is a fictional island mentioned in Plato's works Timaeus and Critias as part of an allegory on the hubris of nations.
In the story, Atlantis is described as a naval empire that ruled all Western parts of the known world, making it the literary counter-image of the Achaemenid Empire.
An autobiography, sometimes informally called an autobio, is a self-written biography of one's own life.
DefinitionThe word "autobiography" was first used deprecatingly by William Taylor in 1797 in the English periodical The Monthly Review, when he suggested the word as a hybrid, but condemned it as "pedantic".
Arcadius ( ;  377 – 1 May 408) was Roman emperor from 383 to his death in 408.
He was the eldest son of the Augustus Theodosius I () and his first wife Aelia Flaccilla, and the brother of Honorius ().
The Arabs (, DIN 31635: , Arabic pronunciation: ), also known as the Arab people (), are an ethnic group mainly inhabiting the Arab world in Western Asia and Northern Africa, which formally denotes the "Arab homeland".
Moreover, a significant Arab diaspora is present in various parts of the world.
Armadillos (meaning "little armored ones" in Spanish) are New World placental mammals in the order Cingulata.
The Chlamyphoridae and Dasypodidae are the only surviving families in the order, which is part of the superorder Xenarthra, along with the anteaters and sloths.
Antisemitism (prejudice against and hatred of Jews) has increased greatly in the Arab world since the beginning of the 20th century, for several reasons: the dissolution and breakdown of the Ottoman Empire and traditional Islamic society; European influence, brought about by Western imperialism and Arab Christians; Nazi propaganda and relations between Nazi Germany and the Arab world; resentment over Jewish nationalism; the rise of Arab nationalism; and the widespread proliferation of anti-Jewish and anti-Zionist conspiracy theories.
Traditionally, Jews in the Muslim world were considered to be People of the Book and were subjected to dhimmi status.
EventsPre-16003114 BC – The Mesoamerican Long Count calendar, used by several pre-Columbian Mesoamerican civilizations, notably the Maya, begins.
2492 BC – Traditional date of the defeat of Bel by Hayk, progenitor and founder of the Armenian nation.106 – The south-western part of Dacia (modern Romania) becomes a Roman province: Roman Dacia.
Arcology, a portmanteau of "architecture" and "ecology", is a field of creating architectural design principles for very densely populated and ecologically low-impact human habitats.
The term was coined in 1969 by architect Paolo Soleri, who believed that a completed arcology would provide space for a variety of residential, commercial, and agricultural facilities while minimizing individual human environmental impact.
EventsPre-1600 823 – Lothair I is crowned King of Italy by Pope Paschal I. 919 – The second Fatimid invasion of Egypt begins, when the Fatimid heir-apparent, al-Qa'im bi-Amr Allah, sets out from Raqqada at the head of his army.
1242 – During the Battle on the Ice of Lake Peipus, Russian forces, led by Alexander Nevsky, rebuff an invasion attempt by the Teutonic Knights.
EventsPre-16001303 – The Sapienza University of Rome is instituted by a bull of Pope Boniface VIII.
1601–19001653 – Oliver Cromwell dissolves England's Rump Parliament.
EventsPre-1600AD 65 – The freedman Milichus betrays Piso's plot to kill the Emperor Nero and all of the conspirators are arrested.
531 – Battle of Callinicum:
The Amstrad CPC (short for Colour Personal Computer) is a series of 8-bit home computers produced by Amstrad between 1984 and 1990.
It was designed to compete in the mid-1980s home computer market dominated by the Commodore 64 and the ZX Spectrum, where it successfully established itself primarily in the United Kingdom, France, Spain, and the German-speaking parts of Europe.
Abdulaziz al-Omari (, , also transliterated as Alomari or al-Umari; 28 May 1979 – 11 September 2001) was a Saudi terrorist hijacker who was one of five hijackers of American Airlines Flight 11 as part of the 11 September attacks in 2001.
Prior to the terrorist attack, al-Omari was an airport security guard and imam.
Aage Niels Bohr (; 19 June 1922 – 8 September 2009) was a Danish nuclear physicist who shared the Nobel Prize in Physics in 1975 with Ben Roy Mottelson and James Rainwater "for the discovery of the connection between collective motion and particle motion in atomic nuclei and the development of the theory of the structure of the atomic nucleus based on this connection".
His father was Niels Bohr.
In mathematics, analytic geometry, also known as coordinate geometry or Cartesian geometry, is the study of geometry using a coordinate system.
This contrasts with synthetic geometry.
The Arabic alphabet (,   or , ), or Arabic abjad, is the Arabic script as specifically codified for writing the Arabic language.
It is written from right-to-left in a cursive style, and includes 28 letters, of which most have contextual letterforms.
Angels have appeared in works of art since early Christian art, and they have been a popular subject for Byzantine and European paintings and sculpture.
Normally given wings in art, angels are usually intended, in both Christian and Islamic art, to be beautiful, though several depictions go for more awe-inspiring or frightening attributes, notably in the depiction of the living creatures (which have bestial characteristics), ophanim (which are wheels) and cherubim (which have mosaic features);
The Arctic fox (Vulpes lagopus), also known as the white fox, polar fox, or snow fox, is a small fox that belongs to the family of Canidae, native to the Arctic regions of the Northern Hemisphere and common throughout the Arctic tundra biome.
It is well adapted to living in cold environments, and is best known for its thick, warm fur that is also used as camouflage.
Anglo-Saxons were Germanic tribes that settled in Britain and founded England.
Anglo-Saxon may also refer to: Anglo-Saxon (anthropology) or Nordic race, outdated racial concept Anglo-Saxon England, the history of Anglo-Saxons Anglo-Saxon model, modern macroeconomic term Anglo-Saxon world, modern societies based on or influenced by English customs Old English or Anglo-Saxon, the earliest historical form of the English language , one of several ships White Anglo-Saxon Protestant, sociological term in the U.S. Anglo-Saxons (slur), a derogatory term for English-speaking countries used in Russian propaganda CSS Anglo-Saxon, a Confederate warshipSee also  Anglo (disambiguation), a prefix Saxon (disambiguation)
American folklore encompasses the folklores that have evolved in the present-day United States since Europeans arrived in the 16th century.
While it contains much in the way of Native American tradition, it is not wholly identical to the tribal beliefs of any community of native people.
Sid Meier's Alpha Centauri is a 4X video game, considered a spiritual sequel to the Civilization series.
Set in a science fiction depiction of the 22nd century, the game begins as seven competing ideological factions land on the planet Chiron ("Planet") in the Alpha Centauri star system.
Abu Sayyaf (; ; , ASG), officially known by the Islamic State as the Islamic State – East Asia Province, is a Jihadist militant and pirate group that follows the Wahhabi doctrine of Sunni Islam.
It is based in and around Jolo and Basilan islands in the southwestern part of the Philippines, where for more than four decades, Moro groups have been engaged in an insurgency seeking to make Moro Province independent.
Armenian ( (reformed),  (classical), , ) is an Indo-European language and the sole member of an independent branch of that language family.
It is the native language of the Armenian people and the official language of Armenia.
Additive synthesis is a sound synthesis technique that creates timbre by adding sine waves together.
The timbre of musical instruments can be considered in the light of Fourier theory to consist of multiple harmonic or inharmonic partials or overtones.
An aircraft carrier is a warship that serves as a seagoing airbase, equipped with a full-length flight deck and facilities for carrying, arming, deploying, and recovering aircraft.
Typically, it is the capital ship of a fleet, as it allows a naval force to project air power worldwide without depending on local bases for staging aircraft operations.
The Apicomplexa (also called Apicomplexia) are a large phylum of mainly parasitic alveolates.
Most of them possess a unique form of organelle that comprises a type of non-photosynthetic plastid called an apicoplast, and an apical complex structure.
Argentine cuisine is described as a blending of cultures, from the Indigenous peoples of Argentina who focused on ingredients such as humita, potatoes, cassava, peppers, tomatoes, beans, and yerba mate, to Mediterranean influences brought by the Spanish during the colonial period.
This led to cultural blending of criollos (gauchos and early Spanish settlers), Indigenous, and sub-Saharan African (due to slave trading) in the cuisine.
EventsPre-1600 217 – Roman emperor Caracalla is assassinated and is succeeded by his Praetorian Guard prefect, Marcus Opellius Macrinus.
876 – The Battle of Dayr al-'Aqul saves Baghdad from the Saffarids.
, short for argumentum ad hominem, is a term that refers to several types of arguments, most of which are fallacious.
Typically this term refers to a rhetorical strategy where the speaker attacks the character, motive, or some other attribute of the person making an argument rather than attacking the substance of the argument itself.
In computer science, the analysis of algorithms is the process of finding the computational complexity of algorithms—the amount of time, storage, or other resources needed to execute them.
Usually, this involves determining a function that relates the size of an algorithm's input to the number of steps it takes (its time complexity) or the number of storage locations it uses (its space complexity).
Ælle (also Aelle or Ella) is recorded in early sources as the first king of the South Saxons, reigning in what is now called Sussex, England, from 477 to perhaps as late as 514.
According to the Anglo-Saxon Chronicle, Ælle and three of his sons are said to have landed at a place called Cymensora and fought against the local Britons.
Atari () is a brand name that has been owned by several entities since its inception in 1972.
It is currently owned by French company Atari SA (formerly Infogrames) through a subsidiary named Atari Interactive.
Afghans (; Persian/) or Afghan people are nationals or citizens of Afghanistan, or people with ancestry from there.
Afghanistan is made up of various ethnicities, of which  Pashtuns, Tajiks, Hazaras and Uzbeks are the largest.
Acadia University is a public, predominantly undergraduate university located in Wolfville, Nova Scotia, Canada, with some graduate programs at the master's level and one at the doctoral level.
The enabling legislation consists of the Acadia University Act and the Amended Acadia University Act 2000.
The steel-string acoustic guitar is a modern form of guitar that descends from the gut-strung Romantic guitar, but is strung with steel strings for a brighter, louder sound.
Like the modern classical guitar, it is often referred to simply as an acoustic guitar, or sometimes as a folk guitar.
Baldassarre Cossa ( 1370 – 22 December 1419) was Pisan antipope John XXIII (1410–1415) during the Western Schism.
The Catholic Church regards him as an antipope, as he opposed Pope Gregory XII whom the Catholic Church now recognizes as the rightful successor of Saint Peter.
Antonio Salieri (18 August 17507 May 1825) was an Italian composer and teacher of the classical period.
He was born in Legnago, south of Verona, in the Republic of Venice, and spent his adult life and career as a subject of the Habsburg monarchy.
The Cobble Hill Tunnel (also known as the Atlantic Avenue Tunnel) is an abandoned Long Island Rail Road (LIRR) tunnel beneath Atlantic Avenue in Brooklyn, New York City, running through the neighborhoods of Downtown Brooklyn and Cobble Hill.
When open, it ran for about  between Columbia Street and Boerum Place.
The Annapolis Valley is a valley and region in the province of Nova Scotia, Canada.
It is located in the western part of the Nova Scotia peninsula, formed by a trough between two parallel mountain ranges along the shore of the Bay of Fundy.
An analgesic drug, also called simply an analgesic, pain reliever, or painkiller, is any member of the group of drugs used to achieve relief from pain (that is, analgesia or pain management).
Analgesics are conceptually distinct from anesthetics, which temporarily reduce, and in some instances eliminate, sensation, although analgesia and anesthesia are neurophysiologically overlapping and thus various drugs have both analgesic and anesthetic effects.
Abiotic stress is the negative impact of non-living factors on the living organisms in a specific environment.
The non-living variable must influence the environment beyond its normal range of variation to adversely affect the population performance or individual physiology of the organism in a significant way.
The accusative case (abbreviated ) of a noun is the grammatical case used to receive the direct object of a transitive verb.
In the English language, the only words that occur in the accusative case are pronouns: "me", "him", "her", "us", "whom", and "them".
Apostolic succession is the method whereby the ministry of the Christian Church is considered by some Christian denominations to be derived from the apostles by a continuous succession, which has usually been associated with a claim that the succession is through a series of bishops.
Those of the Anglican, Church of the East, Eastern Orthodox, Hussite, Moravian, Old Catholic, Oriental Orthodox, Catholic and Scandinavian Lutheran traditions maintain that "a bishop cannot have regular or valid orders unless he has been consecrated in this apostolic succession".
Ascorbic acid is an organic compound with formula , originally called hexuronic acid.
It is a white solid, but impure samples can appear yellowish.
Amsterdamsche Football Club Ajax (), also known as AFC Ajax, Ajax Amsterdam, or simply Ajax, is a Dutch professional football club based in Amsterdam, that plays in the , the top tier in Dutch football.
Historically, Ajax (named after the legendary Greek hero) is the most successful club in the Netherlands, with 36  and 20 KNVB Cups.
Sir Arthur Stanley Eddington  (28 December 1882 – 22 November 1944) was an English astronomer, physicist, and mathematician.
He was also a philosopher of science and a populariser of science.
The Apple II (stylized as ) is an 8-bit home computer and one of the world's first highly successful mass-produced microcomputer products.
It was designed primarily by Steve Wozniak; Jerry Manock developed the design of Apple II's foam-molded plastic case, Rod Holt developed the switching power supply, while Steve Jobs's role in the design of the computer was limited to overseeing Jerry Manock's work on the plastic case.
EventsPre-1600 686 – Maya king Yuknoom Yich'aak K'ahk' assumes the crown of Calakmul.
1043 –
Alexis Andrew Nicholas Koerner (19 April 1928 – 1 January 1984), known professionally as Alexis Korner, was a British blues musician and radio broadcaster, who has sometimes been referred to as "a founding father of British blues".
A major influence on the sound of the British music scene in the 1960s, he was instrumental in the formation of several notable British bands including The Rolling Stones and Free.
An assault gun (from , , meaning "assault gun") is a type of self-propelled artillery which uses an infantry support gun mounted on a motorized chassis, normally an armored fighting vehicle, which are designed to provide direct fire support for infantry attacks, especially against other infantry or fortified positions.
Assault guns were pioneered by the Soviet Union and Nazi Germany during the 1930s, initially being self-propelled guns with direct fire in mind (such as the Soviet SU-5-1), with Germany introducing the first purpose-built (and purpose-named) assault gun, the , in 1940.
A tank destroyer, tank hunter or tank killer is a type of armoured fighting vehicle, predominantly intended for anti-tank duties.
They are typically armed with a direct fire artillery gun, also known as a self-propelled anti-tank gun, or missile launcher, also called an anti-tank missile carrier.
A military armored (also spelled armoured) car is a lightweight wheeled armored fighting vehicle, historically employed for reconnaissance, internal security, armed escort, and other subordinate battlefield tasks.
With the gradual decline of mounted cavalry, armored cars were developed for carrying out duties formerly assigned to light cavalry.
An anti-aircraft vehicle, also known as a self-propelled anti-aircraft gun (SPAAG) or self-propelled air defense system (SPAD), is a mobile vehicle with a dedicated anti-aircraft capability.
Specific weapon systems used include machine guns, autocannons, larger guns, or missiles, and some mount both guns and longer-ranged missiles (e.g. the Pantsir-S1).
Alkmaar Zaanstreek (), better known internationally as AZ Alkmaar, or simply and most commonly as AZ () in the Netherlands, is a Dutch professional football club from Alkmaar and the Zaan district.
The club plays in the Eredivisie, the highest professional football league in the Netherlands.
The adrenal glands (also known as suprarenal glands) are endocrine glands that produce a variety of hormones including adrenaline and the steroids aldosterone and cortisol.
They are found above the kidneys.
A360 Media, LLC (branded a360media), formerly American Media, Inc. (AMI), is an American publisher of magazines, supermarket tabloids, and books based in New York City.
Originally affiliated with only the National Enquirer, the media company's holdings expanded considerably in the 1990s and 2000s.
Aramaic (; ; ; ; Western Neo-Aramaic ) is a Northwest Semitic language that originated in the ancient region of Syria, and quickly spread to Mesopotamia, the  Southern Levant and eastern Anatolia where it has been continually written and spoken, in different varieties, for over three thousand years, today largely by Assyrians, Mandeans and Mizrahi Jews.
Aramaic served as a language of public life and administration of ancient kingdoms and empires, and also as a language of divine worship and religious study.
Titus ( ; ; Títos) was an early Christian missionary and church leader, a companion and disciple of Paul the Apostle, mentioned in several of the Pauline epistles including the Epistle to Titus.
He is believed to be a Gentile converted to Christianity by Paul and, according to tradition, he was consecrated as Bishop of the Island of Crete.
The actinide () or actinoid () series encompasses the 14 metallic chemical elements with atomic numbers from 89 to 102, actinium through nobelium.
The actinide series derives its name from the first element in the series, actinium.
Arthur Asher Miller (October 17, 1915 – February 10, 2005) was an American playwright, essayist and screenwriter in the 20th-century American theater.
Among his most popular plays are All My Sons (1947), Death of a Salesman (1949), The Crucible (1953), and A View from the Bridge (1955).
Anton (or Antonio) Diabelli (5 September 17818 April 1858) was an Austrian music publisher, editor and composer.
Best known in his time as a publisher, he is most familiar today as the composer of the waltz on which Ludwig van Beethoven wrote his set of thirty-three Diabelli Variations.
Anita Faye Hill (born July 30, 1956) is an American lawyer, educator and author.
She is a professor of social policy, law, and women's studies at Brandeis University and a faculty member of the university's Heller School for Social Policy and Management.
EventsPre-1600 654 – Pope Eugene I elected to succeed Martinus I. 955 – Battle of Lechfeld:
Otto I, Holy Roman Emperor defeats the Magyars, ending 50 years of Magyar invasion of the West. 991 – Battle of Maldon: The English, led by Byrhtnoth, Ealdorman of Essex, are defeated by a band of inland-raiding Vikings near Maldon, Essex.
An audio file format is a file format for storing digital audio data on a computer system.
The bit layout of the audio data (excluding metadata) is called the audio coding format and can be uncompressed, or compressed to reduce the file size, often using lossy compression.
Area 51 is the common name of a highly classified United States Air Force (USAF) facility within the Nevada Test and Training Range.
A remote detachment administered by Edwards Air Force Base, the facility is officially called Homey Airport  or Groom Lake (after the salt flat next to its airfield).
Audio signal processing is a subfield of signal processing that is concerned with the electronic manipulation of audio signals.
Audio signals are electronic representations of sound waves—longitudinal waves which travel through air, consisting of compressions and rarefactions.
In computer architecture, Amdahl's law (or Amdahl's argument) is a formula which gives the theoretical speedup in latency of the execution of a task at fixed workload that can be expected of a system whose resources are improved.
It states that "the overall performance improvement gained by optimizing a single part of a system is limited by the fraction of time that the improved part is actually used".
EventsPre-1600 247 – Philip the Arab marks the millennium of Rome with a celebration of the ludi saeculares.
395 – Emperor Arcadius marries Aelia Eudoxia, daughter of the Frankish general Flavius Bauto.
Ayahuasca is a South American psychoactive brew, traditionally used by Indigenous cultures and folk healers in Amazon and Orinoco basins for spiritual ceremonies, divination, and healing a variety of psychosomatic complaints.
Originally restricted to areas of Peru, Brazil, Colombia and Ecuador, in the middle of 20th century it became widespread in Brazil in context of appearance of syncretic religions that uses ayahuasca as a sacrament, like Santo Daime, União do Vegetal and Barquinha, which blend elements of Amazonian Shamanism, Christianity, Kardecist Spiritism,  and African-Brazilian religions such as Umbanda, Candomblé and Tambor de Mina, later expanding to several countries across all continents, notably the United States and Western Europe, and, more incipiently, in Eastern Europe, South Africa, Australia, and Japan.
Alfonso Leng Haygus (11 February 1884 – 11 November 1974) was a post-romantic composer of classical music.
He was born in Santiago, Chile.
In optics and lens design, the Abbe number, also known as the V-number or constringence of a transparent material, is an approximate measure of the material's dispersion (change of refractive index versus wavelength), with high values of V indicating low dispersion.
It is named after Ernst Abbe (1840–1905), the German physicist who defined it.
AD (Anno Domini) is a designation used to label years following 1 BC in the Julian and Gregorian calendars while Ad (advertisement) is a form of marketing communication.
AD, A.D. or Ad may also refer to:Art, entertainment, and mediaFilm and television A.D. (film), a 2010 animated zombie horror film A.D. (miniseries), a 1985 television miniseries set in ancient Rome A.D.
In grammar, the ablative case (pronounced ; sometimes abbreviated ) is a grammatical case for nouns, pronouns, and adjectives in the grammars of various languages; it is sometimes used to express motion away from something, among other uses.
The word "ablative" derives from the Latin , the (irregular) perfect, passive participle of auferre "to carry away".
The Adamic language, according to Jewish tradition (as recorded in the midrashim) and some Christians, is the language spoken by Adam (and possibly Eve) in the Garden of Eden.
It is variously interpreted as either the language used by God to address Adam (the divine language), or the language invented by Adam with which he named all things (including Eve), as in the second Genesis creation narrative ().
Rise and Fall of the City of Mahagonny () is a political-satirical opera composed by Kurt Weill to a German libretto by Bertolt Brecht.
It was first performed on 9 March 1930 at the  in Leipzig.
James Avery Hopwood (May 28, 1882 – July 1, 1928) was an American playwright of the Jazz Age.
He had four plays running simultaneously on Broadway in 1920.
Antipope Felix, an archdeacon of Rome, was installed as Pope in 355 AD after the Emperor Constantius II banished the reigning Pope, Liberius, for refusing to subscribe to a sentence of condemnation against Saint Athanasius.
BiographyIn May 357 AD the Roman laity, which had remained faithful to Liberius, demanded that Constantius, who was on a visit to Rome, should recall Liberius.
Alkaloids are a class of basic, naturally occurring organic compounds that contain at least one nitrogen atom.
This group also includes some related compounds with neutral and even weakly acidic properties.
Adventism is a branch of Protestant Christianity that believes in the imminent Second Coming (or the "Second Advent") of Jesus Christ.
It originated in the 1830s in the United States during the Second Great Awakening when Baptist preacher William Miller first publicly shared his belief that the Second Coming would occur at some point between 1843 and 1844.
The archbishop of Canterbury is the senior bishop and a principal leader of the Church of England, the ceremonial head of the worldwide Anglican Communion and the bishop of the Diocese of Canterbury.
The current archbishop is Justin Welby, who was enthroned at Canterbury Cathedral on 21 March 2013.
Albion is a city in Calhoun County in the south central region of the Lower Peninsula of the U.S. state of Michigan.
The population was 7,700 at the 2020 census and is part of the Battle Creek Metropolitan Statistical Area.
Anointing of the sick, known also by other names such as unction, is a form of religious anointing or "unction" (an older term with the same meaning) for the benefit of a sick person.
It is practiced by many Christian churches and denominations.
In computer science, an abstract data type (ADT) is a mathematical model for data types, defined by its behavior (semantics) from the point of view of a user of the data, specifically in terms of possible values, possible operations on data of this type, and the behavior of these operations.
This mathematical model contrasts with data structures, which are concrete representations of data, and are the point of view of an implementer, not a user.
The American Football League (AFL) was a major professional American football league that operated for ten seasons from 1960 until 1970, when it merged with the older National Football League (NFL), and became the American Football Conference.
The upstart AFL operated in direct competition with the more established NFL throughout its existence.
Associazione Sportiva Roma (Rome Sport Association), commonly referred to as Roma (), is a professional football club based in Rome, Italy.
Founded by a merger in 1927, Roma has participated in the top tier of Italian football for all of its existence, except for the 1951–52 season.
The Abu Nidal Organization (ANO;  ), officially Fatah – The Revolutionary Council ( ), was a Palestinian militant group founded by Abu Nidal in 1974.
It broke away from Fatah, a faction within the Palestine Liberation Organization, following the emergence of a rift between Abu Nidal and Yasser Arafat.
An antibody (Ab), also known as an immunoglobulin (Ig), is a large, Y-shaped protein used by the immune system to identify and neutralize foreign objects such as pathogenic bacteria and viruses.
The antibody recognizes a unique molecule of the pathogen, called an antigen.
Pietro Alessandro Gaspare Scarlatti (2 May 1660 – 22 October 1725) was an Italian Baroque composer, known especially for his operas and chamber cantatas.
He is considered the most important representative of the Neapolitan school of opera.
Aston Martin Lagonda Global Holdings PLC is a British manufacturer of luxury sports cars and grand tourers.
Its predecessor was founded in 1913 by Lionel Martin and Robert Bamford.
Albert Pike (December 29, 1809April 2, 1891) was an American author, poet, orator, editor, lawyer, jurist and Confederate States Army general who served as an associate justice of the Arkansas Supreme Court in exile from 1864 to 1865.
He had previously served as a senior officer of the Confederate States Army, commanding the District of Indian Territory in the Trans-Mississippi Theater.
ALF Tales is a 30-minute Saturday morning animated series that aired on NBC from September 10, 1988, to December 9, 1989.
The show is a spin-off of ALF: The Animated Series which featured characters from that series playing various characters from fairy tales.
Abdul Rashid Dostum ( ; ; Uzbek Latin: , Uzbek Cyrillic: , ; born 25 March 1954) is an Afghan exiled politician, former Marshal in the Afghan National Army, founder and leader of the political party Junbish-e Milli.
Dostum was a major army commander in the communist government during the Soviet–Afghan War, and in 2001 was the key indigenous ally to U.S. Special Forces and the CIA during the campaign to topple the Taliban government.
Andhra Pradesh (,  abbr.
AP) is a state in the southern coastal region of India.
Accelerated Graphics Port (AGP) is a parallel expansion card standard, designed for attaching a video card to a computer system to assist in the acceleration of 3D computer graphics.
It was originally designed as a successor to PCI-type connections for video cards.
Andreas Aagesen (5 August 1826 – 26 October 1879) was a Danish jurist.
BiographyAagesen was educated for the law at Christianshavn and Copenhagen, and interrupted his studies in 1848 to take part in the First Schleswig War, in which he served as the leader of a reserve battalion.
Aalen () is a former Free Imperial City located in the eastern part of the German state of Baden-Württemberg, about  east of Stuttgart and  north of Ulm.
It is the seat of the Ostalbkreis district and is its largest town.
Alois Alzheimer ( ,  , ; 14 June 1864 – 19 December 1915) was a German psychiatrist and neuropathologist and a colleague of Emil Kraepelin.
Alzheimer is credited with identifying the first published case of "presenile dementia", which Kraepelin would later identify as Alzheimer's disease.
Aedile ( ;  , from , "temple edifice") was an elected office of the Roman Republic.
Based in Rome, the aediles were responsible for maintenance of public buildings () and regulation of public festivals.
American Airlines is a major US-based airline headquartered in Fort Worth, Texas, within the Dallas–Fort Worth metroplex.
It is the largest airline in the world when measured by scheduled passengers carried and revenue passenger mile.
Antidepressants are a class of medications used to treat major depressive disorder, anxiety disorders, chronic pain, and addiction.
Common side effects of antidepressants include dry mouth, weight gain, dizziness, headaches, akathisia, sexual dysfunction, and emotional blunting.
The Auger effect (; ) or Auger−Meitner effect is a physical phenomenon in which the filling of an inner-shell vacancy of an atom is accompanied by the emission of an electron from the same atom.
When a core electron is removed, leaving a vacancy, an electron from a higher energy level may fall into the vacancy, resulting in a release of energy.
was a Japanese entrepreneur and co-founder of Sony along with Masaru Ibuka.
Early lifeAkio Morita was born in Nagoya.
An anode is an electrode of a polarized electrical device through which conventional current enters the device.
This contrasts with a cathode, an electrode of the device through which conventional current leaves the device.
Analog television is the original television technology that uses analog signals to transmit video and audio.
In an analog television broadcast, the brightness, colors and sound are represented by amplitude, phase and frequency of an analog signal.
EventsPre-1600 491 – Flavius Anastasius becomes Byzantine emperor, with the name of Anastasius I.1241 – Batu Khan defeats Béla IV of Hungary at the Battle of Mohi.1512 – War of the League of Cambrai: Franco-Ferrarese forces led by Gaston de Foix and Alfonso I d'Este win the Battle of Ravenna against the Papal-Spanish forces.
1544 – Italian War of 1542–46: A French army defeats Habsburg forces at the Battle of Ceresole, but fails to exploit its victory.
Adhesive, also known as glue, cement, mucilage, or paste, is any non-metallic substance applied to one or both surfaces of two separate items that  binds them together and resists their separation.
The use of adhesives offers certain advantages over other binding techniques such as sewing, mechanical fastenings, or welding.
Sir Philip Anthony Hopkins  (born 31 December 1937) is a Welsh actor, director, and producer.
One of Britain's most recognisable and prolific actors, he is known for his performances on the screen and stage.
Ardal O'Hanlon () is an Irish comedian, actor, and author.
He played Father Dougal McGuire in Father Ted (1995–1998), George Sunday/Thermoman in My Hero (2000–2006), and DI Jack Mooney in Death in Paradise (2017–2020).
Advanced Micro Devices, Inc., commonly abbreviated as AMD, is an American multinational semiconductor company based in Santa Clara, California, that develops computer processors and related technologies for business and consumer markets.
The company was founded in 1969 by Jerry Sanders and a group of other technology professionals.
Albrecht Dürer (; ; 21 May 1471 – 6 April 1528), sometimes spelled in English as Durer, was a German painter, printmaker, and theorist of the German Renaissance.
Born in Nuremberg, Dürer established his reputation and influence across Europe in his twenties due to his high-quality woodcut prints.
Australian rules football, also called Australian football or Aussie rules, or more simply football or footy, is a contact sport played between two teams of 18 players on an oval field, often a modified cricket ground.
Points are scored by kicking the oval ball between the central goal posts (worth six points), or between a central and outer post (worth one point, otherwise known as a "behind").
Aon PLC () is a British-American professional services and management consulting firm that offers a range of risk-mitigation products.
The firm also provides data and analytics services, strategy consulting through Aon Inpoint and investment banking advisory through Aon Securities.
Alban Maria Johannes Berg ( , ; 9 February 1885 – 24 December 1935) was an Austrian composer of the Second Viennese School.
His compositional style combined Romantic lyricism with the twelve-tone technique.
Analytical chemistry studies and uses instruments and methods to separate, identify, and quantify matter.
In practice, separation, identification or quantification may constitute the entire analysis or be combined with another method.
A cappella (, , ; ) music is a performance by a singer or a singing group without instrumental accompaniment, or a piece intended to be performed in this fashion.
The term a cappella was originally intended to differentiate between Renaissance polyphony and Baroque concertato musical styles.
In music, an arrangement is a musical adaptation of an existing composition.
Differences from the original composition may include reharmonization, melodic paraphrasing, orchestration, or formal development.
The Athanasian Creed — also called the Pseudo-Athanasian Creed or Quicunque Vult (or Quicumque Vult), which is both its Latin name and its opening words, meaning "Whosoever wishes" — is a Christian statement of belief focused on Trinitarian doctrine and Christology.
Used by Christian churches since the early sixth century, it was the first creed to  explicitly state the equality of the three hypostases of the Trinity.
Alicante () is a city and municipality in the Valencian Community, Spain.
It is the capital of the province of Alicante and a historic Mediterranean port.
EventsPre-1600 598 – Goguryeo-Sui War:
In response to a Goguryeo (Korean) incursion into Liaoxi, Emperor Wéndi of Sui orders his youngest son, Yang Liang (assisted by the co-prime minister Gao Jiong), to conquer Goguryeo during the Manchurian rainy season, with a Chinese army and navy.
Ann Noreen Widdecombe  (born 4 October 1947) is a British politician and television personality.
She was Member of Parliament (MP) for Maidstone and The Weald, and the former Maidstone constituency, from 1987 to 2010 and Member of the European Parliament (MEP) for South West England from 2019 to 2020.
Muhi al-Din Muhammad ( – 3 March 1707), commonly known as  ( ) and by his regnal name Alamgir I ( ), was the sixth Mughal emperor, reigning from 1658 until his death in 1707.
Under his emperorship, the Mughal Empire reached its greatest extent with territory spanning nearly the entirety of the Indian subcontinent.
Alexandrine is a name used for several distinct types of verse line with related metrical structures, most of which are ultimately derived from the classical French alexandrine.
The line's name derives from its use in the Medieval French Roman d'Alexandre of 1170, although it had already been used several decades earlier in Le Pèlerinage de Charlemagne.
An analog computer or analogue computer is a type of computer that uses the continuous variation aspect of physical phenomena such as electrical, mechanical, or hydraulic quantities (analog signals) to model the problem being solved.
In contrast, digital computers represent varying quantities symbolically and by discrete values of both time and amplitude (digital signals).
Audio most commonly refers to sound, as it is transmitted in signal form.
It may also refer to:SoundAudio signal, an electrical representation of soundAudio frequency, a frequency in the audio spectrumDigital audio, representation of sound in a form processed and/or stored by computers or digital electronicsAudio, audible content (media) in audio production and publishingSemantic audio, extraction of symbols or meaning from audioStereophonic audio, method of sound reproduction that creates an illusion of multi-directional audible perspectiveAudio equipmentEntertainmentAUDIO (group), an American R&B band of 5 brothers formerly known as TNT Boyz and as B5Audio (album), an album by the Blue Man GroupAudio (magazine), a magazine published from 1947 to 2000Audio (musician), British drum and bass artist"Audio" (song), a song by LSDComputing, an HTML element, see HTML5 audioSee alsoAcoustic (disambiguation)
A minute of arc, arcminute (arcmin), arc minute, or minute arc, denoted by the symbol , is a unit of angular measurement equal to  of one degree.
Since one degree is  of a turn, or complete rotation, one arcminute is  of a turn.
Alberto Giacometti (, , ; 10 October 1901 – 11 January 1966) was a Swiss sculptor, painter, draftsman and printmaker.
Beginning in 1922, he lived and worked mainly in Paris but regularly visited his hometown Borgonovo to see his family and work on his art.
An anthem is a musical composition of celebration, usually used as a symbol for a distinct group, particularly the national anthems of countries.
Originally, and in music theory and religious contexts, it also refers more particularly to short sacred choral work (still frequently seen in Sacred Harp and other types of shape note singing) and still more particularly to a specific form of liturgical music.
Albrecht Altdorfer (12 February 1538) was a German painter, engraver and architect of the Renaissance working in Regensburg, Bavaria.
Along with Lucas Cranach the Elder and Wolf Huber he is regarded to be the main representative of the Danube School, setting biblical and historical subjects against landscape backgrounds of expressive colours.
The House of Ascania () was a dynasty of German rulers.
It is also known as the House of Anhalt, which refers to its longest-held possession, Anhalt.
In mechanics, acceleration is the rate of change of the velocity of an object with respect to time.
Acceleration is one of several components of kinematics, the study of motion.
The conservation and restoration of cultural property focuses on protection and care of cultural property (tangible cultural heritage), including artworks, architecture, archaeology, and museum collections.
Conservation activities include preventive conservation, examination, documentation, research, treatment, and education.
Anton Pavlovich Chekhov (; 29 January 1860 – 15 July 1904) was a Russian playwright and short-story writer who is considered to be one of the greatest writers of all time.
His career as a playwright produced four classics, and his best short stories are held in high esteem by writers and critics.
Action Against Hunger () is a global humanitarian organization which originated in France and is committed to ending world hunger.
The organization helps malnourished children and provides communities with access to safe water and sustainable solutions to hunger.
Apoptosis (from ) is a form of programmed cell death that occurs in multicellular organisms and in some eukaryotic, single-celled microorganisms such as yeast.
Biochemical events lead to characteristic cell changes (morphology) and death.
Anal sex or anal intercourse is generally the insertion and thrusting of the erect penis into a person's anus, or anus and rectum, for sexual pleasure.
Other forms of anal sex include anal fingering, the use of sex toys, anilingus, pegging, as well as electrostimulation and erotic torture such as figging.
Aarau (, ) is a town, a municipality, and the capital of the northern Swiss canton of Aargau.
The town is also the capital of the district of Aarau.
Aargau ( , ), more formally the Canton of Aargau (; ; ; ), is one of the 26 cantons forming the Swiss Confederation.
It is composed of eleven districts and its capital is Aarau.
Aba may refer to:Animals  Aba roundleaf bat Gymnarchus (or aba), an electric fishPeopleClans  Aba (family), in Hungary Aba people, in RussiaIn arts and entertainment  Aba Bayefsky, Canadian artist and teacher Aba Cercato, Italian television presenter Vilmos Aba-Novák, a Hungarian painterRulers  Aba, ruler of Olba Samuel Aba, 11th-century Hungarian kingOther people
Aba I, patriarch of the Church of the East from 540 to 552 Aba II, patriarch of the Church of the East from 741 to 751 Aba Andam, Ghanaian physicist Johnny Aba (born 1956), a Papua New Guinean boxerPlacesAfrica  Aba, Nigeria Aba River (Nigeria) Aba Island, on Sudan's White Nile river Aba, Democratic Republic of the CongoAsia  Aba (Russia), a river Aba, Okayama, Japan Aba Prefecture, Sichuan, China Aba County Aba, Sichuan Upu (also transliterated Aba), a historic region around DamascusEurope  Aba, HungaryReligion and mythology  Aba (mythology), Hellenic Thracian naiad nymph Ang
The Ababda ( or ) are an Arab or Beja tribe in eastern Egypt and Sudan.
Historically, most were Bedouins living in the area between the Nile and the Red Sea, with some settling along the trade route linking Korosko with Abu Hamad.
The American Quarter Horse, or Quarter Horse, is an American breed of horse that excels at sprinting short distances.
Its name is derived from its ability to outrun other horse breeds in races of a quarter mile or less; some have been clocked at speeds up to 44 mph (70.8 km/h).
Abacá (Spanish) ( ;  ), Musa textilis, is a species of banana native to the Philippines.
The plant grows to , and averages about .
The Hebrew term Abaddon ( ’Ăḇaddōn, meaning "destruction", "doom"), and its Greek equivalent Apollyon (, Apollúōn meaning "Destroyer") appear in the Bible as both a place of destruction and an angel of the abyss.
In the Hebrew Bible, abaddon is used with reference to a bottomless pit, often appearing alongside the place Sheol ( Šəʾōl), meaning the resting place of dead peoples.
Abadeh (, also Romanized as Ābādeh) is a city in the Central District of Abadeh County, Fars province, Iran, serving as both capital of the district and of the county.
At the 2006 National Census, its population was 52,042 in 14,184 households.
Abae (, ) was an ancient town in the northeastern corner of ancient Phocis, in Greece, near the frontiers of the Opuntian Locrians, said to have been built by the Argive Abas, son of Lynceus and Hypermnestra, and grandson of Danaus.
This bit of legend suggests an origin or at least an existence in the Bronze Age.
Abakan (; Khakas: , Ağban, or , Abaxan) is the capital city of Khakassia, Russia, located in the central part of the Minusinsk Depression, at the confluence of the Yenisei and Abakan Rivers.
As of the 2010 Census, it had a population of 165,214—a slight increase over 165,197 recorded during the 2002 Census and a further increase from 154,092 recorded during the 1989 Census.
The Arc de Triomphe de l'Étoile (, , ; ) is one of the most famous monuments in Paris, France, standing at the western end of the Champs-Élysées at the centre of Place Charles de Gaulle, formerly named Place de l'Étoile—the étoile or "star" of the juncture formed by its twelve radiating avenues.
The location of the arc and the plaza is shared between three arrondissements, 16th (south and west), 17th (north), and 8th (east).
EventsPre-1600753 BC – Romulus founds Rome (traditional date).
43 BC – Battle of Mutina: Mark Antony is again defeated in battle by Aulus Hirtius, who is killed.
ATM or atm often refers to: Atmosphere (unit) or atm, a unit of atmospheric pressure Automated teller machine, a cash dispenser or cash machineATM or atm may also refer to:Computing  ATM (computer), a ZX Spectrum clone developed in Moscow in 1991 Adobe Type Manager, a computer program for managing fonts Accelerated Turing machine, or Zeno machine, a model of computation used in theoretical computer science Alternating Turing machine, a model of computation used in theoretical computer science Asynchronous Transfer Mode, a telecommunications protocol used in networking ATM adaptation layer ATM Adaptation Layer 5Media  Amateur Telescope Making, a series of books by Albert Graham Ingalls ATM (2012 film), an American film ATM:
Er Rak Error, a 2012 Thai film Azhagiya Tamil Magan, a 2007 Indian film "ATM" (song), a 2018 song by J. Cole from KODPeople and organizations  Abiding Truth Ministries, anti-LGBT organization in Springfield, Massachusetts, US Association of T
Amazonite, also known as Amazonstone, is a green tectosilicate mineral, a variety of the potassium feldspar called microcline.
Its chemical formula is KAlSi3O8, which is polymorphic to orthoclase.
Ambrosius Bosschaert the Elder (18 January 1573 – 1621) was a Flemish-born Dutch still life painter and art dealer.
He is recognised as one of the earliest painters who created floral still lifes as an independent genre.
Anthroposophy is a spiritual movement which was founded in the early 20th century by the esotericist Rudolf Steiner that postulates the existence of an objective, intellectually comprehensible spiritual world, accessible to human experience.
Followers of anthroposophy aim to engage in spiritual discovery through a mode of thought independent of sensory experience.
The aurochs (Bos primigenius) ( or ) is an extinct cattle species, considered to be the wild ancestor of modern domestic cattle.
With a shoulder height of up to  in bulls and  in cows, it was one of the largest herbivores in the Holocene; it had massive elongated and broad horns that reached  in length.
Asynchronous Transfer Mode (ATM) is a telecommunications standard defined by the American National Standards Institute and ITU-T (formerly CCITT) for digital transmission of multiple types of traffic.
ATM was developed to meet the needs of the Broadband Integrated Services Digital Network as defined in the late 1980s, and designed to integrate telecommunication networks.
The anus (: anuses or ani; from Latin, 'ring' or 'circle') is an opening at the opposite end of an animal's digestive tract from the mouth.
Its function is to control the expulsion of feces, the residual semi-solid waste that remains after food digestion, which, depending on the type of animal, includes: matter which the animal cannot digest, such as bones; food material after the nutrients have been extracted, for example cellulose or lignin; ingested matter which would be toxic if it remained in the digestive tract; and dead or excess gut bacteria and other endosymbionts.
The Acantharea (Acantharia) are a group of radiolarian protozoa, distinguished mainly by their strontium sulfate skeletons.
Acantharians are heterotrophic marine microplankton that range in size from about 200 microns in diameter up to several millimeters.
The African National Congress (ANC) is a social-democratic political party in South Africa.
A liberation movement known for its opposition to apartheid, it has governed the country since 1994, when the first post-apartheid election resulted in Nelson Mandela being elected as President of South Africa.
Amphetamine (contracted from alpha-methylphenethylamine) is a central nervous system (CNS) stimulant that is used in the treatment of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), narcolepsy, and obesity.
Amphetamine was discovered as a chemical in 1887 by Lazăr Edeleanu, and then as a drug in the late 1920s.
In telecommunications, asynchronous communication is transmission of data, generally without the use of an external clock signal, where data can be transmitted intermittently rather than in a steady stream.
Any timing required to recover data from the communication symbols is encoded within the symbols.
Artillery is a class of heavy military ranged weapons that launch munitions far beyond the range and power of infantry firearms.
Early artillery development focused on the ability to breach defensive walls and fortifications during sieges, and led to heavy, fairly immobile siege engines.
Arnulf of Carinthia ( 850 – 8 December 899) was the duke of Carinthia who overthrew his uncle Emperor Charles the Fat to become the Carolingian king of East Francia from 887, the disputed king of Italy from 894 and the disputed emperor from February 22, 896, until his death at Regensburg, Bavaria.
Early lifeIllegitimacy and early lifeArnulf was the illegitimate son of Carloman of Bavaria, and Liutswind, who may have been the sister of Ernst, Count of the Bavarian Nordgau Margraviate, in the area of the Upper Palatinate, or perhaps the burgrave of Passau, according to other sources.
() () is a large public square and transport hub in the central Mitte district of Berlin.
The square is named after the Russian Tsar Alexander I, which also denotes the larger neighbourhood stretching from  in the north-east to  and the  in the south-west.
The Asian Development Bank (ADB) is a regional development bank established on 19 December 1966, which is headquartered in 6 ADB Avenue, Mandaluyong, Metro Manila 1550, Philippines.
The bank also maintains 31 field offices around the world to promote social and economic development in Asia.
Aswan (, also ;  ;   ) is a city in Southern Egypt, and is the capital of the Aswan Governorate.
Aswan is a busy market and tourist centre located just north of the Aswan Dam on the east bank of the Nile at the first cataract.
Adelaide of Italy (; 931 – 16 December 999 AD), also called Adelaide of Burgundy, was Holy Roman Empress by marriage to Emperor Otto the Great.
She was crowned with him by Pope John XII in Rome on 2 February 962.
The Airbus A300 is Airbus' first production aircraft and the world's first twin-engine, double-aisle (wide-body) airliner, developed and manufactured by Airbus from 1971–2007.
In September 1967, aircraft manufacturers in the United Kingdom, France, and West Germany signed an initial memorandum of understanding to collaborate to develop an innovative large airliner.
Agostino Carracci (or Caracci; 16 August 1557 – 22 March 1602) was an Italian painter, printmaker, tapestry designer, and art teacher.
He was, together with his brother, Annibale Carracci, and cousin, Ludovico Carracci, one of the founders of the Accademia degli Incamminati (Academy of the Progressives) in Bologna.
Adenylate cyclase (EC 4.6.1.1, also commonly known as adenyl cyclase and adenylyl cyclase, abbreviated AC) is an enzyme with systematic name ATP diphosphate-lyase (cyclizing; 3′,5′-cyclic-AMP-forming).
It catalyzes the following reaction:ATP = 3′,5′-cyclic AMP + diphosphateIt has key regulatory roles in essentially all cells.
Alexandra () is the feminine form of the given name Alexander (, ).
Etymologically, the name is a compound of the Greek verb  (; meaning 'to defend') and  (; GEN , ; meaning 'man').
Articolo 31 is a band from Milan, Italy, formed in 1990 by J-Ax and DJ Jad, combining hip hop, funk, pop and traditional Italian musical forms.
They are one of the most popular Italian hip hop groups.
Alexander Fyodorovich Kerensky ( – 11 June 1970) was a Russian lawyer and revolutionary who led the Russian Provisional Government and the short-lived Russian Republic for three months from late July to early November 1917.
After the February Revolution of 1917, he joined the newly formed provisional government, first as Minister of Justice, then as Minister of War, and after July as the government's second Minister-Chairman.
Ansgar (8 September 801 – 3 February 865), also known as Anskar, Saint Ansgar, Saint Anschar or Oscar, was Archbishop of Hamburg-Bremen in the northern part of the Kingdom of the East Franks.
Ansgar became known as the "Apostle of the North" because of his travels and the See of Hamburg received the missionary mandate to bring Christianity to Northern Europe.
Automated theorem proving (also known as ATP or automated deduction) is a subfield of automated reasoning and mathematical logic dealing with proving mathematical theorems by computer programs.
Automated reasoning over mathematical proof was a major impetus for the development of computer science.
Agent Orange is a chemical herbicide and defoliant, one of the tactical use Rainbow Herbicides.
It was used by the U.S. military as part of its herbicidal warfare program, Operation Ranch Hand, during the Vietnam War from 1961 to 1971.
Astronomical year numbering is based on AD/CE year numbering, but follows normal decimal integer numbering more strictly.
Thus, it has a year 0; the years before that are designated with negative numbers and the years after that are designated with positive numbers.
Adam of Bremen (; ; before 1050 – 12 October 1081/1085) was a German medieval chronicler.
He lived and worked in the second half of the eleventh century.
Ab urbe condita (; 'from the founding of the City'), or  (; 'in the year since the city's founding'), abbreviated as AUC or AVC, expresses a date in years since 753 BC, the traditional founding of Rome.
It is an expression used in antiquity and by classical historians to refer to a given year in Ancient Rome.
Arapaoa Island (formerly spelled Arapawa Island) is the second-largest island in the Marlborough Sounds, at the north-east tip of the South Island of New Zealand.
The island has a land area of .
Administrative law is a division of law governing the activities of executive branch agencies of government.
Administrative law includes executive branch rule making (executive branch rules are generally referred to as "regulations"), adjudication, and the enforcement of laws.
Arthur Phillip (11 October 1738 – 31 August 1814) was a British Royal Navy officer who served as the first governor of the Colony of New South Wales.
Phillip was educated at Greenwich Hospital School from June 1751 until December 1753.
EventsPre-1600 428 – Nestorius becomes the Patriarch of Constantinople.
837 – Halley's Comet makes its closest approach to Earth at a distance equal to 0.0342 AU (5.1 million kilometres/3.2 million miles).
Angus (; ) is one of the 32 local government council areas of Scotland, a registration county and a lieutenancy area.
The council area borders Aberdeenshire, Dundee City and Perth and Kinross.
André René Roussimoff (; 19 May 1946 – 28 January 1993), better known by his ring name André the Giant, was a French professional wrestler and actor.
Known as "the Eighth Wonder of the World," Roussimoff was known for his great size, which was a result of gigantism caused by excess growth hormones.
Adrastea (), also known as , is the second by distance, and the smallest of the four inner moons of Jupiter.
It was discovered in photographs taken by Voyager 2 in 1979, making it the first natural satellite to be discovered from images taken by an interplanetary spacecraft, rather than through a telescope.
Ananke is a deity in Greek mythology.
Ananke may also refer to:Ananke (moon), a moon of JupiterAnanke group, a group of satellites of Jupiter that follow similar orbits to Ananke"Ananke", a short story by Stanisław Lem from Tales of Pirx the PilotCosmopterix ananke, a moth of family Cosmopterigidae
The Apache HTTP Server ( ) is a free and open-source cross-platform web server software, released under the terms of Apache License 2.0.
It is developed and maintained by a community of developers under the auspices of the Apache Software Foundation.
Alph may refer to:Alpheus River, a river on the PeloponneseAlph River, a river in AntarcticaAlph Lake, a lake in AntarcticaAlph, a fictional river in the poem Kubla Khan by Samuel Taylor ColeridgeAlph, a character from Luminous ArcAlph, a character from the game Pikmin 3See alsoALF (disambiguation)
Alph Lyla, the in-house band of video game developer Capcom
Arbroath Abbey, in the Scottish town of Arbroath, was founded in 1178 by King William the Lion for a group of Tironensian Benedictine monks from Kelso Abbey.
It was consecrated in 1197 with a dedication to the deceased Saint Thomas Becket, whom the king had met at the English court.
Accounting, also known as accountancy, is the processing of information about economic entities, such as businesses and corporations.
Accounting measures the results of an organization's economic activities and conveys this information to a variety of stakeholders, including investors, creditors, management, and regulators.
Ants are eusocial insects of the family Formicidae and, along with the related wasps and bees, belong to the order Hymenoptera.
Ants evolved from vespoid wasp ancestors in the Cretaceous period.
Arbitration, in the context of the law of the United States, is a form of alternative dispute resolution.
Specifically, arbitration is an alternative to litigation through which the parties to a dispute agree to submit their respective evidence and legal arguments to a neutral third party (the arbitrator(s) or arbiter(s)) for resolution.
The adversarial system or adversary system is a legal system used in the common law countries where two advocates represent their parties' case or position before an impartial person or group of people, usually a judge or jury, who attempt to determine the truth and pass judgment accordingly.
It is in contrast to the inquisitorial system used in some civil law systems (i.e. those deriving from Roman law or the Napoleonic code) where a judge investigates the case.
Abano Terme (known as Abano Bagni until 1924) is a town and comune in the Province of Padua, in the Veneto region, Italy, on the eastern slope of the Euganean Hills; it is  southwest by rail from Padua.
Abano Terme's population is 19,062 (2001) (in 1901 it was 4,556).
See also, Abatement.
Abated, an ancient technical term applied in masonry and metal work to those portions which are sunk beneath the surface, as in inscriptions where the ground is sunk round the letters so as to leave the letters or ornament in relief.
Abati is a surname.
It was used by an ancient noble family of Florence.
An abatis, abattis, or abbattis is a field fortification consisting of an obstacle formed (in the modern era) of the branches of trees laid in a row, with the sharpened tops directed outwards, towards the enemy.
The trees are usually interlaced or tied with wire.
Antoine Thomson d'Abbadie d'Arrast (3 January 1810 – 19 March 1897) was an Irish-born French explorer, geographer, ethnologist, linguist and astronomer notable for his travels in Ethiopia during the first half of the 19th century.
He was the older brother of Arnaud-Michel d'Abbadie, with whom he travelled.
Abba Mari ben Moses ben Joseph, was a Provençal rabbi, born at Lunel, near Montpellier, towards the end of the 13th century.
He is also known as Yarhi from his birthplace (Hebrew Yerah, i.e. moon, lune), and he further took the name Astruc, Don Astruc or En Astruc of Lunel from the word "astruc" meaning lucky.
Abbas Helmy II (also known as ʿAbbās Ḥilmī Pāshā, ) (14 July 1874 – 19 December 1944) was the last Khedive (Ottoman viceroy) of Egypt and the Sudan, ruling from 8January 1892 to 19 December 1914.
In 1914, after the Ottoman Empire joined the Central Powers in World War I, the nationalist Khedive was removed by the British, then ruling Egypt, in favour of his more pro-British uncle, Hussein Kamel, marking the de jure end of Egypt's four-century era as a province of the Ottoman Empire, which had begun in 1517.
Abbas Mirza (; August 26, 1789October 25, 1833) was a Qajar crown prince of Iran.
He developed a reputation as a military commander during the Russo-Persian War of 1804–1813 and the Russo-Persian War of 1826–1828, as well as through the Ottoman–Persian War of 1821–1823.
George Abbot (29 October 15624 August 1633) was an English divine who was Archbishop of Canterbury from 1611 to 1633.
He also served as the fourth Chancellor of the University of Dublin, from 1612 to 1633.
Adware, often called advertising-supported software by its developers, is software that generates revenue for its developer by automatically generating online advertisements in the user interface of the software or on a screen presented to the user during the installation process.
The software may generate two types of revenue: one is for the display of the advertisement and another on a "pay-per-click" basis, if the user clicks on the advertisement.
Aeacus (; also spelled Eacus; Ancient Greek: Αἰακός) was a mythological king of the island of Aegina in the Saronic Gulf.
He was a son of Zeus and the nymph Aegina, and the father of the heroes Peleus and Telamon.
Aeclanum (also spelled Aeculanum, , ) was an ancient town of Samnium, Southern Italy, about 25 km east-southeast of Beneventum, on the Via Appia.
It lies in Passo di Mirabella, near the modern Mirabella Eclano.
Aedesius (, died 355 AD) was a Neoplatonist philosopher and mystic.
He was born into a wealthy Cappadocian family, but he moved to Syria, where he was apprenticed to Iamblichos.
In ancient Roman religion, an aedicula (plural aediculae) is a small shrine, and in classical architecture refers to a niche covered by a pediment or entablature supported by a pair of columns and typically framing a statue, the early Christian ones sometimes contained funeral urns.
Aediculae are also represented in art as a form of ornamentation.
The Aedui or Haedui (Gaulish: *Aiduoi, 'the Ardent'; ) were a Gallic tribe dwelling in what is now the region of Burgundy during the Iron Age and the Roman period.
The Aedui had an ambiguous relationship with the Roman Republic, as well as other Gallic tribes.
The Aegadian Islands  (; , ; ) are a group of five small mountainous islands in the Mediterranean Sea off the northwest coast of Sicily, Italy, near the cities of Trapani and Marsala, with a total area of .
The island of Favignana (Aegusa), the largest, lies  southwest of Trapani; Levanzo (Phorbantia) lies  west; and Marettimo, the ancient Hiera Nesos,  west of Trapani, is now reckoned as a part of the group.
Aegean civilization is a general term for the Bronze Age civilizations of Greece around the Aegean Sea.
There are three distinct but communicating and interacting geographic regions covered by this term: Crete, the Cyclades and the Greek mainland.
In Greek mythology, Aegeus (, ; , also spelled Aegeas) was an archaic figure in the founding myth of Athens.
The "goat-man" who gave his name to the Aegean Sea was the father of Theseus.
Aegina (; , Aígina; ) is one of the Saronic Islands of Greece in the Saronic Gulf,  from Athens.
Tradition derives the name from Aegina, the mother of the hero Aeacus, who was born on the island and became its king.
The aegis ( ;  aigís), as stated in the Iliad, is a device carried by Athena and Zeus, variously interpreted as an animal skin or a shield and sometimes featuring the head of a Gorgon.
There may be a connection with a deity named Aex, a daughter of Helios and a nurse of Zeus or alternatively a mistress of Zeus (Hyginus, Astronomica 2. 13).
Aegisthus (; ; also transliterated as Aigisthos, ) was a figure in Greek mythology.
Aegisthus is known from two primary sources: the first is Homer's Odyssey, believed to have been first written down by Homer at the end of the 8th century BC, and the second from Aeschylus's Oresteia, written in the 5th century BC.
Aegospotami (, Aigos Potamoi) or Aegospotamos (i.e. Goat Streams) is the ancient Greek name for a small river issuing into the Hellespont (Modern Turkish Çanakkale Boğazı), northeast of Sestos.
At its mouth was the scene of the decisive battle in 405 BC in which Lysander destroyed the Athenian fleet, ending the Peloponnesian War.
Aelia Capitolina (Traditional English Pronunciation: ; Latin in full: ) was a Roman colony founded during Emperor Hadrian's visit to Judaea in 129/130 AD,  centered around Jerusalem, which had been almost totally razed after the siege of 70 AD.
The foundation of Aelia Capitolina and the construction of a temple to Jupiter at the site of the former temple may have been one of the causes for the outbreak of the Bar Kokhba revolt in 132.
Aelianus Tacticus (; fl.
2nd century AD), also known as Aelian (), was a Greek military writer who lived in Rome.
Agarose is a heteropolysaccharide, generally extracted from certain red seaweed.
It is a linear polymer made up of the repeating unit of agarobiose, which is a disaccharide made up of D-galactose and 3,6-anhydro-L-galactopyranose.
Atomic absorption spectroscopy (AAS) and atomic emission spectroscopy (AES)  is a spectroanalytical procedure for the quantitative determination of chemical elements by free atoms in the gaseous state.
Atomic absorption spectroscopy is based on absorption of light by free metallic ions.
Arthur St. Clair ( – August 31, 1818) was a Scottish-American soldier and politician.
Born in Thurso, Scotland, he served in the British Army during the French and Indian War before settling in Pennsylvania, where he held local office.
Ajaccio (, , ; French: ;  or  ;  , locally:  ; ) is a French commune, prefecture of the department of Corse-du-Sud, and head office of the Collectivité territoriale de Corse (capital city of Corsica).
It is also the largest settlement on the island.
Ajaigarh or Ajaygarh is a town and a nagar panchayat in the Panna District of Madhya Pradesh state in central India.
Ajaigarh State was one of the princely states of India during the period of the British Raj.
The Ajanta Caves are 29 rock-cut Buddhist cave monuments dating from the second century BCE to about 480 CE in the Aurangabad District of Maharashtra state in India.
Ajanta Caves are a  UNESCO World Heritage Site.
Ajmer  is one of the major and oldest cities in the Indian state of Rajasthan and the centre of the eponymous Ajmer District.
It is located at the centre of Rajasthan.
Ajmer-Merwara (also known as Ajmir Province, and Ajmer-Merwara-Kekri) was a former province of British India in the historical Ajmer region.
The territory was ceded to the British by Daulat Rao Sindhia by a treaty on 25 June 1818.
Abatement of debts and legacies is a common law doctrine of wills that holds that when the equitable assets of a deceased person are not sufficient to satisfy fully all the creditors, their debts must abate proportionately, and they must accept a dividend.
Also, in the case of legacies when the funds or assets out of which they are payable are not sufficient to pay them in full, the legacies abate in proportion, unless there is a priority given specially to any particular legacy.
Affection or fondness is a "disposition or state of mind or body" commonly linked to a feeling or type of love.
It has led to multiple branches in philosophy and psychology that discuss emotion, disease, influence, and state of being.
In law, affiliation (from Latin , "to adopt as a son") was previously the term to describe legal establishment of paternity.
The following description, for the most part, was written in the early 20th century, and it should be understood as a historical document.
In many legal jurisdictions related to English common law, affray is a public order offence consisting of the fighting of one or more persons in a public place to the terror (in ) of ordinary people.
Depending on their actions, and the laws of the prevailing jurisdiction, those engaged in an affray may also render themselves liable to prosecution for assault, unlawful assembly, or riot; if so, it is for one of these offences that they are usually charged.
Afghan Turkestan, also known as Southern Turkestan, is a region in northern Afghanistan, on the border with the former Soviet republics of Turkmenistan, Uzbekistan and Tajikistan.
In the 19th century, there was a province in Afghanistan named Turkestan with Mazari Sharif as provincial capital.
Afyonkarahisar (,  "poppy, opium", kara "black", hisar "fortress") is a city in western Turkey.
It is the administrative centre of Afyonkarahisar Province and Afyonkarahisar District.
Rav Abba bar Aybo (; 175–247 CE), commonly known as Abba Arikha () or simply as Rav (), was a Jewish amora of the 3rd century.
He was born and lived in Kafri, Asoristan, in the Sasanian Empire.
Rabbi Abbahu () was a Jew and Talmudist of the Talmudic Academies in Syria Palaestina from about 279 to 320 CE and is counted a member of the third generation of Amoraim.
He is sometimes cited as Rabbi Abbahu of Kisrin (Caesarea Maritima).
An Abbreviator (plural "Abbreviators" in English and "Abbreviatores" in Latin) or Breviator was a writer of the Papal Chancery who adumbrated and prepared in correct form Papal bulls, briefs, and consistorial decrees before these were written out in extenso by the scriptores.
They are first mentioned in the Papal bull Extravagantes of Pope John XXII and in a Papal bull of Pope Benedict XII.
ʿAbd al-Laṭīf al-Baghdādī (, 1162 Baghdad–1231 Baghdad), short for Muwaffaq al-Dīn Muḥammad ʿAbd al-Laṭīf ibn Yūsuf al-Baghdādī (), was a physician, philosopher, historian, Arabic grammarian and traveller, and one of the most voluminous writers of his time.
BiographyMany details of ʿAbd al-Laṭīf al-Baghdādī's life are known from his autobiography as presented in Ibn Abī Uṣaybiʿah's literary history of medicine.
Abd al-Rahman I ibn Mu’awiya (in full: Abd al-Rahman ibn Mu'awiya ibn Hisham ibn Abd al-Malik ibn Marwan; 7 March 731 – 30 September 788; Arabic: عبد الرحمن الأول) was the founder of the Umayyad dynasty that ruled the greater part of Iberia in Al-Andalus for nearly three centuries (including the succeeding Caliphate of Córdoba).
Abd al-Rahman was a member of the Umayyad dynasty in Damascus, and his establishment of a government in Iberia represented a break with the Abbasids, who had overthrown the Umayyads in Damascus in 750.
Abd ar-Rahman II () (792–852) was the fourth Umayyad Emir of Córdoba in al-Andalus from 822 until his death.
A vigorous and effective frontier warrior, he was also well known as a patron of the arts.
ʿAbd al-Raḥmān ibn Muḥammad ibn ʿAbd Allāh ibn Muḥammad ibn ʿAbd al-Raḥmān ibn al-Ḥakam al-Rabdī ibn Hishām ibn ʿAbd al-Raḥmān al-Dākhil (; 890–961), or simply ʿAbd al-Raḥmān III, was the Umayyad Emir of Córdoba from 912 to 929, at which point he founded the Caliphate of Córdoba, serving as its first caliph until his death.
Abd al-Rahman won the laqab (sobriquet)  () in his early 20s when he supported the Maghrawa Berbers in North Africa against Fatimid expansion and later claimed the title of Caliph for himself.
Abd ar-Rahman IV Mortada () was the Caliph of Córdoba in the Umayyad dynasty in Al-Andalus, succeeding Sulayman ibn al-Hakam, in 1018.
That same year, he was murdered at Cadiz while fleeing from a battle in which he had been deserted by the very supporters which had brought him into power.
Abd ar-Rahman V () was an Umayyad Caliph of Córdoba.
In the agony of the Umayyad dynasty in the Al-Andalus (Moorish Iberia), two princes of the house were proclaimed Caliph of Córdoba for a very short time, Abd-ar-Rahman IV Mortada (1017), and Abd-ar-Rahman V Mostadir (1023–1024).
Abdulaziz (; ; 8 February 18304 June 1876) was the sultan of the Ottoman Empire from 25 June 1861 to 30 May 1876, when he was overthrown in a government coup.
He was a son of Sultan Mahmud II and succeeded his brother Abdulmejid I in 1861.
Abdera was an ancient Carthaginian and Roman port on a hill above the modern Adra on the southeastern Mediterranean coast of Spain.
It was located between Malaca (now Málaga) and Carthago Nova (now Cartagena) in the district inhabited by the Bastuli.
Abdera () is a municipality in the Xanthi regional unit of Thrace, Greece.
In classical antiquity, it was a major Greek polis on the Thracian coast.
Apollos () was a 1st-century Alexandrian Jewish Christian mentioned several times in the New Testament.
A contemporary and colleague of Paul the Apostle, he played an important role in the early development of the churches of Ephesus and Corinth.
The Community acquis or acquis communautaire (; ), sometimes called the EU acquis and often shortened to acquis, is the accumulated legislation, legal acts and court decisions that constitute the body of European Union law that came into being since 1993.
The term is French: acquis meaning "that which has been acquired or obtained", and communautaire meaning "of the community".
An antacid is a substance which neutralizes stomach acidity and is used to relieve heartburn, indigestion or an upset stomach.
Some antacids have been used in the treatment of constipation and diarrhea.
An anti-diarrhoeal drug (or anti-diarrheal drug in American English) is any medication which provides symptomatic relief for diarrhoea.
Types Electrolyte solutions, while not true antidiarrhoeals, are used to replace lost fluids and salts in acute cases.
Áed mac Cináeda (Modern Scottish Gaelic:
Aodh mac Choinnich; ; Anglicized: Hugh; died 878) was a son of Cináed mac Ailpín.
Abdulhamid or Abdul Hamid I (, `Abdü’l-Ḥamīd-i evvel; ; 20 March 1725 – 7 April 1789) was the 27th sultan of the Ottoman Empire from 1774 to 1789.
Early lifeAbdul Hamid was born on 20 March 1725, in Constantinople.
Abdur Rahman Khan, GCSI (Pashto/Dari: ) (between 1840 and 1844 – 1 October 1901) also known by his epithets, The Iron Amir, or The Dracula Amir, was Amir of Afghanistan from 1880 to his death in 1901.
He is known for uniting the country after years of internal fighting and negotiation of the Durand Line Agreement with British India.
The Abencerrages or Abencerrajes (from the Arabic for "Saddler's Son") were a family or faction that is said to have held a prominent position in the Kingdom of Granada in the 15th century.
The name appears to have been derived from Yussuf ben-Serragh, the head of the tribe in the time of Muhammed VII, Sultan of Granada (1370–1408), who did that sovereign good service in his struggles to retain the crown of which he was three times deprived.
Aberavon (Welsh: Aberafan) is a constituency represented in the House of Commons of the Parliament of the United Kingdom since 2015 by Stephen Kinnock of the Welsh Labour Party.
It includes the town of Aberavon, although the largest town in the constituency is Port Talbot.
Abercarn is a town and community in Caerphilly county borough, Wales.
It is 10 miles (16 km) northwest of Newport on the A467 between Cwmcarn and Newbridge, within the historic boundaries of Monmouthshire.
Aberdare ( ; ) is a town in the Cynon Valley area of Rhondda Cynon Taf, Wales, at the confluence of the Rivers Dare (Dâr) and Cynon.
Aberdare has a population of 39,550 (mid-2017 estimate).
An aberration is something that deviates from the normal way.
Aberration may also refer to:Biology and medicine Form (zoology) or aberration, a rare mutant butterfly or moth wing patternCardiac aberrancy, aberration in the shape of the EKG signalChromosome aberration, abnormal number or structure of chromosomesEntertainmentAberration, a DLC for the video game Ark: Survival EvolvedAberration (film), a 1997 horror filmAberration (EP), by Neurosis, 1989Aberrations, or abbies, human-like creatures in the American TV series Wayward PinesOptics and physicsAstronomical aberration, phenomenon wherein objects appear to move about their true positions in the skyChromatic aberration, failure of a lens to focus all colors on the same pointDefocus aberration, in which an image is out of focusOptical aberration, an imperfection in image formation by an optical systemRelativistic aberration, the distortion of light at high velocitiesSpherical aberration, which occurs when light ra
In astronomy, aberration (also referred to as astronomical aberration, stellar aberration, or velocity aberration) is a phenomenon where celestial objects exhibit an apparent motion about their true positions based on the velocity of the observer: It causes objects to appear to be displaced towards the observer's direction of motion.
The change in angle is of the order of v/c where c is the speed of light and v the velocity of the observer.
In optics, aberration is a property of optical systems, such as lenses, that causes light to be spread out over some region of space rather than focused to a point.
Aberrations cause the image formed by a lens to be blurred or distorted, with the nature of the distortion depending on the type of aberration.
Amy Lee Grant (born November 25, 1960) is an American singer-songwriter and musician.
She began in contemporary Christian music (CCM) before crossing over to pop music in the 1980s and 1990s.
Arthur William à Beckett (25 October 1844 – 14 January 1909) was an English journalist and intellectual.
Biography
Aberdeen (Lakota: Ablíla) is a city in and the county seat of Brown County, South Dakota, United States, located approximately  northeast of Pierre.
The city population was 28,495 at the 2020 census, making it the third most populous city in the state after Sioux Falls and Rapid City.
Au, AU,  au or a.u. may refer to:Science and technologyComputing .au, the internet country code for Australia Au file format, Sun Microsystems' audio format Audio Units, a system level plug-in architecture from Apple Computer Adobe Audition, a sound editor program Windows Update or Automatic Updates, in Microsoft Windows Windows 10 Anniversary Update, of August 2016aPhysics and chemistry Gold, symbol Au (from Latin ), a chemical element Absorbance unit, a reporting unit in spectroscopy Atomic units, a system of units convenient for atomic physics and other fields Ångström unit, a unit of length equal to 10−10 m or 0.1 nanometre.
Astronomical unit, a unit of length often used in planetary systems astronomy, an approximation for the average distance between the Earth and the Sun Arbitrary unit, a relative placeholder unit for when the actual value of a measurement is unknown or unimportant ("a.u." is deprecated, use  "arb. unit" instead)Arts and entertainmentMusic
Aberdour (; Scots: , ) is a scenic and historic village on the south coast of Fife, Scotland.
It is on the north shore of the Firth of Forth, looking south to the island of Inchcolm and its Abbey, and to Leith and Edinburgh beyond.
Aberfoyle () is a village in the historic county and registration county of Perthshire and the council area of Stirling, Scotland.
The settlement lies  northwest of Glasgow.
Abergavenny (;  , archaically Abergafenni meaning "mouth of the River Gavenny") is a market town and community in Monmouthshire, Wales.
Abergavenny is promoted as a Gateway to Wales; it is approximately  from the border with England and is located where the A40 trunk road and the A465 Heads of the Valleys road meet.
Abersychan is a town and community north of Pontypool in Torfaen, Wales, and lies within the boundaries of the historic county of Monmouthshire and the preserved county of Gwent.
Abersychan lies in the narrow northern section of the Afon Lwyd valley.
Abertillery (; ) is a town and a community of the Ebbw Fach valley in the historic county of Monmouthshire, Wales.
Following local government reorganisation it became part of the Blaenau Gwent County Borough administrative area.
Abeyance (from the Old French  meaning "gaping") is a state of expectancy in respect of property, titles or office, when the right to them is not vested in any one person, but awaits the appearance or determination of the true owner.
In law, the term abeyance can be applied only to such future estates as have not yet vested or possibly may not vest.
Anders Celsius (; 27 November 170125 April 1744) was a Swedish astronomer, physicist and mathematician.
He was professor of astronomy at Uppsala University from 1730 to 1744, but traveled from 1732 to 1735 visiting notable observatories in Germany, Italy and France.
Adam Carolla (born May 27, 1964) is an American radio personality, comedian, actor and podcaster.
He hosts The Adam Carolla Show, a talk show distributed as a podcast which set the record as the "most downloaded podcast" as judged by Guinness World Records in 2011.
Autocorrelation, sometimes known as serial correlation in the discrete time case, is the correlation of a signal with a delayed copy of itself as a function of delay.
Informally, it is the similarity between observations of a random variable as a function of the time lag between them.
Atlas Autocode (AA) is a programming language developed around 1963 at the University of Manchester.
A variant of the language ALGOL, it was developed by Tony Brooker and Derrick Morris for the Atlas computer.
Arthur J. Stone (1847–1938), a leading American silversmith, was born, trained and worked in Sheffield, England, and Edinburgh, Scotland, before travelling to the United States in 1884.
He was one of the last silversmiths in America to train apprentices to carry out designs in hand-wrought silver.
The Au file format is a simple audio file format introduced by Sun Microsystems.
The format was common on NeXT systems and on early Web pages.
EventsPre-1600404 BC – Admiral Lysander and King Pausanias of Sparta blockade Athens and bring the Peloponnesian War to a successful conclusion. 775 – The Battle of Bagrevand puts an end to an Armenian rebellion against the Abbasid Caliphate.
Muslim control over the South Caucasus is solidified and its Islamization begins, while several major Armenian nakharar families lose power and their remnants flee to the Byzantine Empire.
EventsPre-16001479 BC – Thutmose III ascends to the throne of Egypt, although power effectively shifts to Hatshepsut (according to the Low Chronology of the 18th dynasty).
1183 BC – Traditional reckoning of the Fall of Troy marking the end of the legendary Trojan War, given by chief librarian of the Library of Alexandria Eratosthenes, among others.
EventsPre-1600 451 – Attila the Hun captures Metz in France, killing most of its inhabitants and burning the town.
529 – First Corpus Juris Civilis, a fundamental work in jurisprudence, is issued by Eastern Roman Emperor Justinian I.1141 – Empress Matilda becomes the first female ruler of England, adopting the title "Lady of the English".
Andalusia (, ;  ) is the southernmost autonomous community in Peninsular Spain.
Andalusia is located in the south of the Iberian Peninsula, in southwestern Europe.
Abhorrers, the name given in 1679 to the persons who expressed their abhorrence at the action of those who had signed petitions urging King Charles II of England to assemble Parliament.
Feeling against Catholics, and especially against James, Duke of York, was running strongly; the Exclusion Bill had been passed by the House of Commons, and the popularity of James Scott, 1st Duke of Monmouth, was very great.
Abiathar ( ʾEḇyāṯār, "father (of) abundance"/"abundant father"), in the Hebrew Bible, is a son of Ahimelech or Ahijah, High Priest at Nob, the fourth in descent from Eli and the last of Eli's House to be a High Priest.
Bible accountAbiathar was the only one of the priests to escape from Saul's (reigned c. 1020–1000 BCE) massacre in Nob, when his father and the priests of Nob were slain on the command of Saul.
Abigail () was an Israelite woman in the Hebrew Bible married to Nabal; she married the future King David after Nabal's death (1 Samuel ).
Abigail was David's third wife, after Ahinoam and Saul's daughter, Michal, whom Saul later married to Palti, son of Laish, when David went into hiding.
Azad Jammu and Kashmir (; ,  ), abbreviated as AJK and colloquially referred to as simply Azad Kashmir, is a region administered by Pakistan as a nominally self-governing entity and constituting the western portion of the larger Kashmir region, which has been the subject of a dispute between India and Pakistan since 1947.
Azad Kashmir also shares borders with the Pakistani provinces of Punjab and Khyber Pakhtunkhwa to the south and west, respectively.
The Arabian Sea () is a region of sea in the northern Indian Ocean, bounded on the west by the Arabian Peninsula, Gulf of Aden and Guardafui Channel, on the northwest by Gulf of Oman and Iran, on the north by Pakistan, on the east by India, and on the southeast by the Laccadive Sea and the Maldives, on the southwest by Somalia.
Its total area is 3,862,000 km2 (1,491,000 sq mi) and its maximum depth is 4,652 meters (15,262 ft).
Aspartame is an artificial non-saccharide sweetener 200 times sweeter than sucrose and is commonly used as a sugar substitute in foods and beverages.
It is a methyl ester of the aspartic acid/phenylalanine dipeptide with brand names NutraSweet, Equal, and Canderel.
AutoCAD is a 2D and 3D computer-aided design (CAD) software application for desktop, web, and mobile developed by Autodesk.
It was first released in December 1982 for the CP/M and IBM PC platforms as a desktop app running on microcomputers with internal graphics controllers.
AutoCAD DXF (Drawing Interchange Format, or Drawing Exchange Format) is a CAD data file format developed by Autodesk for enabling data interoperability between AutoCAD and other programs.
DXF was introduced in December 1982 as part of AutoCAD 1.0, and was intended to provide an exact representation of the data in the AutoCAD native file format, DWG (Drawing).
Asexual reproduction is a type of reproduction that does not involve the fusion of gametes or change in the number of chromosomes.
The offspring that arise by asexual reproduction from either unicellular or multicellular organisms inherit the full set of genes of their single parent and thus the newly created individual is genetically and physically similar to the parent or an exact clone of the parent.
Aelbert Jacobszoon Cuyp or Cuijp (; 20 October 1620 – 15 November 1691) was one of the leading Dutch Golden Age painters, producing mainly landscapes.
The most famous of a family of painters, the pupil of his father, Jacob Gerritszoon Cuyp (1594–1651/52), he is especially known for his large views of Dutch riverside scenes in a golden early morning or late afternoon light.
In organic chemistry, an alkene is a hydrocarbon containing a carbon–carbon double bond.
The double bond may be internal or in the terminal position.
In organic chemistry, allenes are organic compounds in which one carbon atom has double bonds with each of its two adjacent carbon atoms (, where R is H or some organyl group).
Allenes are classified as cumulated dienes.
AcetylenePropyne1-ButyneIn organic chemistry, an alkyne is an unsaturated hydrocarbon containing at least one carbon—carbon triple bond.
The simplest acyclic alkynes with only one triple bond and no other functional groups form a homologous series with the general chemical formula  .
AbiWord () is a free and open-source software word processor.
It is written in C++ and since version 3 it is based on GTK+ 3.
The Ames test is a widely employed method that uses bacteria to test whether a given chemical can cause mutations in the DNA of the test organism.
More formally, it is a biological assay to assess the mutagenic potential of chemical compounds.
Angiotensin-converting-enzyme inhibitors (ACE inhibitors) are a class of medication used primarily for the treatment of high blood pressure and heart failure.
This class of medicine works by causing relaxation of blood vessels as well as a decrease in blood volume, which leads to lower blood pressure and decreased oxygen demand from the heart.
An antianginal is a drug used in the treatment of angina pectoris, a symptom of ischaemic heart disease.
ExamplesDrugs used are nitrates, beta blockers, or calcium channel blockers.
The Anatomical Therapeutic Chemical (ATC) Classification System is a drug classification system that classifies the active ingredients of drugs according to the organ or system on which they act and their therapeutic, pharmacological and chemical properties.
Its purpose is an aid to monitor drug use and for research to improve quality medication use.
Parallel ATA (PATA), originally , also known as IDE, is a standard interface designed for IBM PC-compatible computers.
It was first developed by Western Digital and Compaq in 1986 for compatible hard drives and CD or DVD drives.
The Atari 2600 is a home video game console developed and produced by Atari, Inc.
Released in September 1977, it popularized microprocessor-based hardware and games stored on swappable ROM cartridges, a format first used with the Fairchild Channel F in 1976.
The Atari 5200 SuperSystem or simply Atari 5200 is a home video game console introduced in 1982 by Atari, Inc. as a higher-end complement for the popular Atari Video Computer System.
The VCS was renamed to the Atari 2600 at the time of the 5200's launch.
The Atari 7800 ProSystem, or simply the Atari 7800, is a home video game console officially released by Atari Corporation in 1986 as the successor to both the Atari 2600 and Atari 5200.
It can run almost all Atari 2600 cartridges, making it one of the first consoles with backward compatibility.
The Atari Jaguar is a home video game console developed by Atari Corporation and  released in North America in November 1993.
Part of the fifth generation of video game consoles, it competed with the 16-bit Sega Genesis, the Super NES and the 32-bit 3DO Interactive Multiplayer that launched the same year.
The Atari Lynx is a hybrid 8/16-bit fourth-generation hand-held game console released by Atari Corporation in September 1989 in North America and 1990 in Europe and Japan.
It was the first handheld game console with a color liquid-crystal display.
(, IAST: , ) is the ancient Indian principle of nonviolence which applies to actions towards all living beings.
It is a key virtue in Indian religions like Jainism, Buddhism, Hinduism, and Sikhism.
The Annals of Mathematics is a mathematical journal published every two months by Princeton University and the Institute for Advanced Study.
History The journal was established as The Analyst in 1874 and with Joel E. Hendricks as the founding editor-in-chief.
Andrei Dmitrievich Sakharov (; 21 May 192114 December 1989) was a Soviet physicist and a Nobel Peace Prize laureate, which he was awarded in 1975 for emphasizing human rights around the world.
Although he spent his career in physics in the Soviet program of nuclear weapons, overseeing the development of thermonuclear weapons, Sakharov also did fundamental work in understanding particle physics, magnetism, and physical cosmology.
Astrobiology is a scientific field within the life and environmental sciences that studies the origins, early evolution, distribution, and future of life in the universe by investigating its deterministic conditions and contingent events.
As a discipline, astrobiology is founded on the premise that life may exist beyond Earth.
An air show (or airshow, air fair, air tattoo) is a public event where aircraft are exhibited.
They often include aerobatics demonstrations, without they are called "static air shows" with aircraft parked on the ground.
The anthropic principle, also known as the "observation selection effect", is the hypothesis, first proposed in 1957 by Robert Dicke, that the range of possible observations that could be made about the universe is limited by the fact that observations could happen only in a universe capable of developing intelligent life.
Proponents of the anthropic principle argue that it explains why the universe has the age and the fundamental physical constants necessary to accommodate conscious life, since if either had been different, no one would have been around to make observations.
The Australian Army is the principal land warfare force of Australia, a part of the Australian Defence Force (ADF) along with the Royal Australian Navy and the Royal Australian Air Force.
The Army is commanded by the Chief of Army (CA), who is subordinate to the Chief of the Defence Force (CDF) who commands the ADF.
The American Registry for Internet Numbers (ARIN) is the regional Internet registry  for the United States, Canada, and many Caribbean and North Atlantic islands.
ARIN manages the distribution of Internet number resources, including IPv4 and IPv6 address space and AS numbers.
Isaac Asimov (1920–1992) was a writer.
Asimov may also refer to:People  Stanley Asimov, Isaac Asimov's brother.
is a neighborhood in the Chiyoda ward of Tokyo, Japan, generally considered to be the area surrounding Akihabara Station.
Administratively, the area named Akihabara is actually found in the  and Kanda-Sakumachō districts in Chiyoda.
Active Directory (AD) is a directory service developed by Microsoft for Windows domain networks.
Windows Server operating systems include it as a set of processes and services.
Arianism is a nontrinitarian Christological doctrine.
Arian may also refer to:Pertaining to Arius A follower of Arius, a Christian presbyter in the 3rd and 4th centuryArian controversy, several controversies which divided the early Christian churchArian fragment, Arian palimpsestPeopleGroups of people Arians or Areians, ancient people living in Ariana (origin of the modern name Iran) Aryan, a term associated with the Proto-Indo-Iranians Aryan race, the racial concept An inhabitant of Aria (today's Herat, Afghanistan), used by the ancient and medieval Greeks (as Ἄρ(ε)ιοι/Ar(e)ioi) and Romans (as Arii)Given nameArian Asllani (born 1983), American rapper known as Action BronsonArian Bimo (born 1959), Albanian footballerArian Çuliqi, Albanian television director and screenwriterArian Foster (born 1986), American football playerArian Hametaj (born 1957), Albanian footballerArián Iznaga, Cuban Paralympian sprinterArian Kabashi (born 1996), Kosovan footballerArian Kaba
Aldona (baptized Ona or Anna; her pagan name, Aldona, is known only from the writings of Maciej Stryjkowski;  –  26 May 1339) was Queen consort of Poland (1333–1339), and a princess of the Grand Duchy of Lithuania.
She was the daughter of Gediminas, Grand Duke of Lithuania.
Aron Nimzowitsch (, , Aron Isayevich Nimtsovich; 7 November 1886 – 16 March 1935) was a Latvian born-Danish chess player and writer.
In the late 1920s, Nimzowitsch was one of the best chess players in the world.
Aragonese ( ;   in Aragonese) is a Romance language spoken in several dialects by about 12,000 people as of 2011, in the Pyrenees valleys of Aragon, Spain, primarily in the comarcas of Somontano de Barbastro, Jacetania, Alto Gállego, Sobrarbe, and Ribagorza/Ribagorça.
It is the only modern language which survived from medieval Navarro-Aragonese in a form distinct from Spanish.
Advanced Mobile Phone System (AMPS) was an analog mobile phone system standard originally developed by Bell Labs and later modified in a cooperative effort between Bell Labs and Motorola.
It was officially introduced in the Americas on October 13, 1983, and was deployed in many other countries too, including Israel in 1986, Australia in 1987, Singapore in 1988, and Pakistan in 1990.
Aerodynamics ( aero (air) +  (dynamics)) is the study of the motion of air, particularly when affected by a solid object, such as an airplane wing.
It involves topics covered in the field of fluid dynamics and its subfield of gas dynamics, and is an important domain of study in aeronautics.
Andreas Schlüter (1659 – c. June 1714) was a German baroque sculptor and architect, active in the Holy Roman Empire of the German Nation, the Polish–Lithuanian Commonwealth, and the Russian Tsardom.
BiographyAndreas Schlüter was born probably in Hamburg.
Ash or ashes are the solid remnants of fires.
Specifically, ash refers to all non-aqueous, non-gaseous residues that remain after something burns.
In calculus, an antiderivative, inverse derivative, primitive function, primitive integral or indefinite integral of a function  is a differentiable function  whose derivative is equal to the original function .
This can be stated symbolically as .
"The ABC Song" is the best-known song used to recite the English alphabet in alphabetical order.
It is commonly used to teach the alphabet to children in English-speaking countries.
The Antigonid dynasty (; ) was a Hellenistic dynasty of Dorian Greek provenance, descended from Alexander the Great's general Antigonus
I Monophthalmus ("the One-Eyed") that ruled mainly in Macedonia.
Abingdon may refer to:PlacesUnited KingdomAbingdon-on-Thames, Oxfordshire Abingdon (UK Parliament constituency)
1558–1983 Abingdon railway station (closed)United StatesAbingdon, IowaAbingdon, IllinoisAbingdon, MarylandAbingdon, VirginiaAbingdon (plantation), VirginiaOther countries Abingdon Downs, Queensland, AustraliaAbingdon AirportAbingdon, Ontario, CanadaAbingdon Island, Galápagos Islands, EcuadorOther usesAbingdon (1902 automobile)
Abjuration is the solemn repudiation, abandonment, or renunciation by or upon oath, often the renunciation of citizenship or some other right or privilege.
The term comes from the Latin abjurare, "to forswear".
A Vindication of the Rights of Woman: with Strictures on Political and Moral Subjects (1792), written by British philosopher and women's rights advocate Mary Wollstonecraft (1759–1797), is one of the earliest works of feminist philosophy.
In it, Wollstonecraft responds to those educational and political theorists of the eighteenth century who did not believe women should receive a rational education.
The Afghan Hound is a hound distinguished by its thick, fine, silky coat, and a tail with a ring curl at the end.
The breed is selectively bred for its unique features in the cold mountains of Afghanistan.
The Azawakh is a breed of dog from West Africa.
With ancient origins, it is raised throughout the Sahelian zone of Mali, Niger,  and Burkina Faso.
Acrylic paint is a fast-drying paint made of pigment suspended in acrylic polymer emulsion and plasticizers, silicone oils, defoamers, stabilizers, or metal soaps.
Most acrylic paints are water-based, but become water-resistant when dry.
In physics, angular momentum (sometimes called moment of momentum or rotational momentum) is the rotational analog of linear momentum.
It is an important physical quantity because it is a conserved quantity – the total angular momentum of a closed system remains constant.
The plum pudding model is one of several historical scientific models of the atom.
First proposed by J. J. Thomson in 1904 soon after the discovery of the electron, but before the discovery of the atomic nucleus, the model tried to account for two properties of atoms then known: that electrons are negatively charged subatomic particles and that atoms have no net electric charge.
Atomic theory is the scientific theory that matter is composed of particles called atoms.
The concept that matter is composed of discrete particles is an ancient idea, but gained scientific credence in the 18th and 19th centuries when scientists found it could explain the behaviors of gases and how chemical elements reacted with each other.
AI is artificial intelligence, intellectual ability in machines and robots.
Ai, AI or A.I. may also refer to:Animals Ai (chimpanzee), an individual experimental subject in Japan Ai (sloth) or the pale-throated sloth, northern Amazonian mammal speciesArts, entertainment and mediaWorks Ai (album), a 2004 release by Seraphim A.I. Artificial Intelligence, a 2001 American film A.I. Rising, a 2018 Serbian film AI: The Somnium Files, a 2019 video game American Idol, televised singing contest The American Interest, a bimonthly magazine (2005–2020) I (2015 film), an Indian Tamil film (initial title: Ai)Other uses in arts and media A.i. (band), a Californian rock–electroclash group All in (poker), wagering one's entire stake Appreciation Index, a British measure of broadcast programme approval The Art Institutes, a chain of American art schools Non-player character, in gaming (colloquially, an AI)Business , a phrase in job titles Appreciative inquiry, an organization
Aung San Suu Kyi (;  ; born 19 June 1945), sometimes abbreviated to Suu Kyi, is a Burmese politician, diplomat, author, and a 1991 Nobel Peace Prize laureate who served as State Counsellor of Myanmar (equivalent to a prime minister) and Minister of Foreign Affairs from 2016 to 2021.
She has served as the general secretary of the National League for Democracy (NLD) since the party's founding in 1988, and was registered as its chairperson while it was a legal party from 2011 to 2023.
Abraham Joshua Heschel (January 11, 1907 – December 23, 1972) was a Polish-American rabbi and one of the leading Jewish theologians and Jewish philosophers of the 20th century.
Heschel, a professor of Jewish mysticism at the Jewish Theological Seminary of America, authored a number of widely read books on Jewish philosophy and was a leader in the civil rights movement.
The Aberdeen Bestiary (Aberdeen University Library, Univ Lib.
MS 24) is a 12th-century English illuminated manuscript bestiary that was first listed in 1542 in the inventory of the Old Royal Library at the Palace of Westminster.
The Latin American Integration Association / Asociación Latinoamericana de Integración / Associação Latino-Americana de Integração (LAIA / ALADI) is an international and regional scope organization.
It was created on 12 August 1980 by the 1980 Montevideo Treaty, replacing the Latin American Free Trade Association (LAFTA/ALALC).
Aircraft spotting, or planespotting, is a hobby consisting of tracking the movement of aircraft, which is usually accomplished by photography or videography.
Besides monitoring aircraft, planespotting enthusiasts (who are usually called planespotters) also record information regarding airports, air traffic control communications, airline routes, and more.History and evolutionAviation enthusiasts have been watching airplanes and other aircraft since aviation began.
Advertising is the practice and techniques employed to bring attention to a product or service.
Advertising aims to put a product or service in the spotlight in hopes of drawing it attention from consumers.
In the field of artificial intelligence, the most difficult problems are informally known as AI-complete or AI-hard, implying that the difficulty of these computational problems, assuming intelligence is computational, is equivalent to that of solving the central artificial intelligence problem—making computers as intelligent as people, or strong AI.
To call a problem AI-complete reflects an attitude that it would not be solved by a simple specific algorithm.
Archaeoastronomy (also spelled archeoastronomy) is the interdisciplinary or multidisciplinary study of how people in the past "have understood the phenomena in the sky, how they used these phenomena and what role the sky played in their cultures".
Clive Ruggles argues it is misleading to consider archaeoastronomy to be the study of ancient astronomy, as modern astronomy is a scientific discipline, while archaeoastronomy considers symbolically rich cultural interpretations of phenomena in the sky by other cultures.
Andrzej Sapkowski (; born 21 June 1948) is a Polish fantasy writer, essayist, translator and a trained economist.
He is best known for his six-volume series of books The Witcher, which revolves around the eponymous "witcher," a monster-hunter, Geralt of Rivia.
An ammeter (abbreviation of Ampere meter) is an instrument used to measure the current in a circuit.
Electric currents are measured in amperes (A), hence the name.
Amanda Hesser (born 1971) is an American food writer, editor, cookbook author and entrepreneur.
Most notably, she was the food editor of The New York Times Magazine, the editor of T Living, a quarterly publication of The New York Times, author of The Essential New York Times Cookbook which was a New York Times bestseller, and co-founder and CEO of Food52.
An anxiolytic (; also antipanic or anti-anxiety agent) is a medication or other intervention that reduces anxiety.
This effect is in contrast to anxiogenic agents which increase anxiety.
Antipsychotics, also known as neuroleptics, are a class of psychotropic medication primarily used to manage psychosis (including delusions, hallucinations, paranoia or disordered thought), principally in schizophrenia but also in a range of other psychotic disorders.
They are also the mainstay together with mood stabilizers in the treatment of bipolar disorder.
Archduke Charles Louis John Joseph Laurentius of Austria, Duke of Teschen (; 5 September 177130 April 1847) was an Austrian field-marshal, the third son of Emperor Leopold II and his wife, Maria Luisa of Spain.
He was also the younger brother of Francis II, Holy Roman Emperor.
Augustine of Canterbury (early 6th century – most likely 26 May 604) was a Christian monk who became the first archbishop of Canterbury in the year 597.
He is considered the "Apostle to the English" and a founding figure of the Church of England.
Alexander of Hales (also Halensis, Alensis, Halesius, Alesius ; 21 August 1245), also called Doctor Irrefragibilis (by Pope Alexander IV in the Bull De Fontibus Paradisi) and Theologorum Monarcha, was a Franciscan friar, theologian and philosopher important in the development of scholasticism.
LifeAlexander was born at Hales, Shropshire (today Halesowen, West Midlands), England, between 1180 and 1186.
Active Server Pages (ASP) is Microsoft's first server-side scripting language and engine for dynamic web pages.
It was first released in December 1996, before being superseded in January 2002 by ASP.NET.
Amoxicillin is an antibiotic medication belonging to the aminopenicillin class of the penicillin family.
The drug is used to treat bacterial infections such as middle ear infection, strep throat, pneumonia, skin infections, odontogenic infections, and urinary tract infections.
In condensed matter physics and materials science, an amorphous solid (or non-crystalline solid) is a solid that lacks the long-range order that is characteristic of a crystal.
The terms "glass" and "glassy solid" are sometimes used synonymously with amorphous solid; however, these terms refer specifically to amorphous materials that undergo a glass transition.
A Wizard of Earthsea is a fantasy novel written by American author Ursula K. Le Guin and first published by the small press Parnassus in 1968.
It is regarded as a classic of children's literature and of fantasy, within which it is widely influential.
Aleksandar Živojinović  (born 27 August 1953), known professionally as Alex Lifeson (), is a Canadian musician, best known as the guitarist for the rock band Rush.
In 1968, Lifeson co-founded a band that would later become Rush, with drummer John Rutsey and bassist and lead vocalist Jeff Jones.
ArgoUML is an UML diagramming application written in Java and released under the open source Eclipse Public License.
By virtue of being a Java application, it is available on any platform supported by Java SE.
A file archiver is a computer program that combines a number of files together into one archive file, or a series of archive files, for easier transportation or storage.
File archivers may employ lossless data compression in their archive formats to reduce the size of the archive.
In ancient Greek religion and mythology, Artemis (; ) is the goddess of the hunt, the wilderness, wild animals, nature, vegetation, childbirth, care of children, and chastity.
In later times, in some places, she was identified with Selene, the personification of the Moon.
() is a German phrase meaning "Work sets you free" or "Work makes one free".
The slogan originates from a 1873 novel by Lorenz Diefenbach.
Axayacatl (;  ;  ; meaning "face of water"; –1481) was the sixth  of the  of Tenochtitlan and Emperor of the Aztec Triple Alliance.
BiographyEarly life and backgroundAxayacatl was a son of the princess Atotoztli II and her cousin, prince Tezozomoc.
Ahuitzotl (, ) was the eighth Aztec ruler, the Huey Tlatoani of the city of Tenochtitlan, son of princess Atotoztli II.
His name literally means "Water Thorny" and was also applied to the otter.
Albinism is a congenital condition characterized in humans by the partial or complete absence of pigment in the skin, hair and eyes.
Albinism is associated with a number of vision defects, such as photophobia, nystagmus, and amblyopia.
Amr Abdel Basset Abdel Azeez Diab (, ; born 11 October 1961) is an Egyptian singer, composer and actor.
He has established himself as a globally acclaimed recording artist and author.
Belgian hip hop music has a few rappers stemming from Africa and Italy.
Belgium, like France, controlled African countries like the Democratic Republic of the Congo (formerly Zaire), Rwanda, and Burundi until the early 1960s.
Dutch hip hop or Nederhop ("Netherhop"), is hip hop / rap music created by Dutch speaking musicians in the Netherlands and Flanders (Belgium).
Although the first Dutch speaking rappers in Europe typically worked in English, this began to change after 1986, at first in an underground scene.
Angela Anaïs Juana Antolina Rosa Edelmira Nin y Culmell ( , ; February 21, 1903 – January 14, 1977) was a French-born American diarist, essayist, novelist, and writer of short stories and erotica.
Born to Cuban parents in France, Nin was the daughter of the composer Joaquín Nin and the classically trained singer Rosa Culmell.
AIM (AOL Instant Messenger) was an instant messaging and presence computer program created by AOL, which used the proprietary OSCAR instant messaging protocol and the TOC protocol to allow registered users to communicate in real time.
AIM was popular by the late 1990s, in United States and other countries, and was the leading instant messaging application in that region into the following decade.
In computability theory, the Ackermann function, named after Wilhelm Ackermann, is one of the simplest and earliest-discovered examples of a total computable function that is not primitive recursive.
All primitive recursive functions are total and computable, but the Ackermann function illustrates that not all total computable functions are primitive recursive.
The Antarctic ( or , American English also  or ; commonly ) is a polar region around Earth's South Pole, opposite the Arctic region around the North Pole.
The Antarctic comprises the continent of Antarctica, the Kerguelen Plateau, and other island territories located on the Antarctic Plate or south of the Antarctic Convergence.
The Albanians ( ; , ) are an ethnic group native to the Balkan Peninsula who share a common Albanian ancestry, culture, history and language.
They primarily live in Albania, Kosovo, North Macedonia, Montenegro, Serbia as well as in Croatia, Greece, Italy and Turkey.
The Association for Computing Machinery (ACM) is a US-based international learned society for computing.
It was founded in 1947 and is the world's largest scientific and educational computing society.
Anabaptism (from Neo-Latin , from the Greek :  're-' and  'baptism', , earlier also ) is a Christian movement which traces its origins to the Radical Reformation.
The early Anabaptists formulated their beliefs in a confession of faith called the Schleitheim Confession.
Southeast Alaska, often abbreviated to Southeast or Southeastern, and sometimes called the Alaska(n) Panhandle, is the southeastern portion of the U.S. state of Alaska, bordered to the east and north by the northern half of the Canadian province of British Columbia (and a small part of Yukon).
The majority of Southeast Alaska's area is part of the Tongass National Forest, the United States' largest national forest.
The Algemeen Nijmeegs Studentenblad is an independent student magazine for the Radboud University Nijmegen.
Founded in 1985 by members of the local student union AKKU, it is now published by the Stichting Multimedia.
Interior Alaska is the central region of Alaska's territory, roughly bounded by the Alaska Range to the south and the Brooks Range to the north.
It is largely wilderness.
"And did those feet in ancient time" is a poem by William Blake from the preface to his epic Milton:
A Poem in Two Books, one of a collection of writings known as the Prophetic Books.
In Alaska, the Bush typically refers to any region of the state that is not connected to the North American road network or does not have ready access to the state's ferry system.
A large proportion of Alaska Native populations live in the Bush, often depending on subsistence hunting and fishing.
A Little Night Music is a musical with music and lyrics by  Stephen Sondheim and book by Hugh Wheeler.
Inspired by the 1955 Ingmar Bergman film Smiles of a Summer Night, it involves the romantic lives of several couples.
Dual wielding is the technique of using two weapons, one in each hand for training or combat.
It is not a common combat practice.
Ariel Sharon (; ; ; also known by his diminutive Arik, ; 26 February 1928 – 11 January 2014) was an Israeli general and politician who served as the 11th prime minister of Israel from March 2001 until April 2006.
Born in Kfar Malal in Mandatory Palestine to Russian Jewish immigrants, he rose in the ranks of the Israeli Army from its creation in 1948, participating in the 1948 Palestine war as platoon commander of the Alexandroni Brigade and taking part in several battles.
A person's romantic orientation, also called affectional orientation, is the classification of the sex or gender with which a person experiences romantic attraction towards or is likely to have a romantic relationship with.
The term is used alongside the term "sexual orientation", as well as being used alternatively to it, based upon the perspective that sexual attraction is only a single component of a larger concept.
Anoa, also known as dwarf buffalo and sapiutan, are two species of the genus Bubalus, placed within the subgenus Anoa and endemic to the island of Sulawesi in Indonesia: the mountain anoa (Bubalus quarlesi) and the lowland anoa (Bubalus depressicornis).
Both live in undisturbed rainforest and are similar in appearance to miniature water buffaloes, weighing .
Agner Krarup Erlang (1 January 1878 – 3 February 1929) was a Danish mathematician, statistician and engineer, who invented the fields of traffic engineering and queueing theory.
By the time of his relatively early death at the age of 51, Erlang had created the field of telephone networks analysis.
Anyone Can Whistle is a musical with music and lyrics by Stephen Sondheim, and a book by Arthur Laurents.
Described as "a satire on conformity and the insanity of the so-called sane," the show tells a story of an economically depressed town whose corrupt mayor decides to create a fake miracle in order to attract tourists.
An alcopop (or cooler) is any of certain mixed alcoholic beverages with relatively low alcohol content (e.g., 3–7% alcohol by volume), including: Malt beverages to which various fruit juices or other flavorings have been added Wine coolers: beverages containing wine to which ingredients such as fruit juice or other flavorings have been added Mixed drinks containing distilled alcohol and sweet liquids such as fruit juices or other flavouringsThe term alcopop (a portmanteau of the words alcohol and pop) is used commonly in the United Kingdom and Ireland to describe these drinks.
In English-speaking Canada, "cooler" is more common but "alcopop" may also be used.
In chemistry, an alkali (; from ) is a basic, ionic salt of an alkali metal or an alkaline earth metal.
An alkali can also be defined as a base that dissolves in water.
Ain't I a Woman?
Black Women and Feminism is a 1981 book by bell hooks titled after Sojourner Truth's "Ain't I a Woman?" speech.
AMOS BASIC is a dialect of the BASIC programming language for the Amiga computer.
Following on from the successful STOS BASIC for the Atari ST, AMOS BASIC was written for the Amiga by François Lionet with Constantin Sotiropoulos and published by Europress Software in 1990.
The Arcadia 2001 is a second-generation 8-bit home video game console released by Emerson Radio in May 1982 for a price of US$ 99, several months before the release of ColecoVision.
It was discontinued only 18 months later, with a total of 35 games having been released.
In geometry, a convex uniform honeycomb is a uniform tessellation which fills three-dimensional Euclidean space with non-overlapping convex uniform polyhedral cells.
Twenty-eight such honeycombs are known: the familiar cubic honeycomb and 7 truncations thereof; the alternated cubic honeycomb and 4 truncations thereof; 10 prismatic forms based on the uniform plane tilings (11 if including the cubic honeycomb); 5 modifications of some of the above by elongation and/or gyration.
Assassination is the willful killing, by a sudden, secret, or planned attack, of a personespecially if prominent or important.
It may be prompted by grievances, notoriety, financial, military, political or other motives.
An audio optical disc is an optical disc that stores sound information such as music or speech.
It may specifically refer to:Audio CDs Compact disc (CD), an optical disc used to store digital data (700 MB storage) Compact Disc Digital Audio (CD-DA), a CD that contains PCM encoded digital audio in the original "Red Book" CD-DA format 5.1 Music Disc, an extension to the Red Book standard that uses DTS Coherent Acoustics 5.1 surround sound Compressed audio optical disc, an optical disc storing MP3s and other compressed audio files as data, rather than in the Red Book formatAudio DVDsDVD, 4 GB single layer, 8 GB double layer storage DVD-Audio, a DVD that plays audio Super Audio CD (SACD), a format which competes with DVD-AudioAudio Blu-raysBlu-ray, 25 GB single layer, 50 GB double layer BD-Audio, a Blu-ray disc that is capable of audio-only playbackSee alsoCD-4 or Compatible discrete four-channel sound, a variety of quadrophonic audio for vinyl records
Alcoholism is the continued drinking of alcohol despite negative results.
Problematic use of alcohol has been mentioned in the earliest historical records, such as in ancient Egypt and in the Bible, and remains widespread; the World Health Organization (WHO) estimated there were 283 million people with alcohol use disorders worldwide .
Abstraction is a conceptual process wherein general rules and concepts are derived from the usage and classification of specific examples, literal (real or concrete) signifiers, first principles, or other methods.
"An abstraction" is the outcome of this process—a concept that acts as a common noun for all subordinate concepts and connects any related concepts as a group, field, or category.
In mathematics, an abelian group, also called a commutative group, is a group in which the result of applying the group operation to two group elements does not depend on the order in which they are written.
That is, the group operation is commutative.
The Anti-Ballistic Missile Treaty (ABM Treaty or ABMT) (1972–2002) was an arms control treaty between the United States and the Soviet Union on the limitation of the anti-ballistic missile (ABM) systems used in defending areas against ballistic missile-delivered nuclear weapons.
It was intended to reduce pressures to build more nuclear weapons to maintain deterrence.
Austria-Hungary, formally known as the Austro-Hungarian Monarchy, often referred to as the Austro-Hungarian Empire or the Dual Monarchy, was a multi-national constitutional monarchy in Central Europe between 1867 and 1918.
Austria-Hungary was a military and diplomatic alliance of two sovereign states with a single monarch who was titled both Emperor of Austria and King of Hungary.
Abracadabra is a magic word, historically used as an incantation on amulets and common today in stage magic.
Etymology Abracadabra is of unknown origin, but according to the Oxford English Dictionary, its first known occurrence is in the second-century works of Serenus Sammonicus.
The Acts of Union () were two Acts of Parliament: the Union with Scotland Act 1706 passed by the Parliament of England, and the Union with England Act 1707 passed by the Parliament of Scotland.
They put into effect the terms of the Treaty of Union that had been agreed on 22 July 1706, following negotiation between commissioners representing the parliaments of the two countries.
The Admiralty was a department of the Government of the United Kingdom responsible for the command of the Royal Navy until 1964, historically under its titular head, the Lord High Admiral – one of the Great Officers of State.
For much of its history, from the early 18th century until its abolition, the role of the Lord High Admiral was almost invariably put "in commission" and exercised by the Lords Commissioner of the Admiralty, who sat on the governing Board of Admiralty, rather than by a single person.
An amphibian is a member of the class Amphibia of ectothermic, tetrapod vertebratesAmphibian may also refer to:Amphibian (comics), two superheroes from Marvel Comics"Amphibian" (song), by BjörkAmphibious aircraft, an aircraft that can operate from water or landLoening OL or Loening Amphibian, an amphibious biplane built for the US Army Air Corps and NavyMark IV Amphibian, a type of World War II period British rebreatherSee also Amphibia (disambiguation)
Amphibious (disambiguation)
Amputation is the removal of a limb by trauma, medical illness, or surgery.
As a surgical measure, it is used to control pain or a disease process in the affected limb, such as malignancy or gangrene.
In meteorology, an anemometer () is a device that measures wind speed and direction.
It is a common instrument used in weather stations.
Archaeopteryx (; ), sometimes referred to by its German name, "" ( Primeval Bird), is a genus of avian dinosaurs.
The name derives from the ancient Greek  (archaīos), meaning "ancient", and  (ptéryx), meaning "feather" or "wing".
Arthur Laurents (July 14, 1917 – May 5, 2011) was an American playwright, theatre director, film producer and screenwriter.
With a career spanning seven decades he received numerous accolades including two Tony Awards, and a Drama Desk Award as well as nominations for two Academy Awards, two BAFTA Awards, and a Golden Globe Award.
Adrián Alfonso Lamo Atwood (February 20, 1981 – March 14, 2018) was an American threat analyst and hacker.
Lamo first gained media attention for breaking into several high-profile computer networks, including those of The New York Times, Yahoo!, and Microsoft, culminating in his 2003 arrest.
An associate justice of the Supreme Court of the United States is any justice of the Supreme Court of the United States other than the chief justice of the United States.
The number of associate justices is eight, as set by the Judiciary Act of 1869.
Alan Jay Lerner (August 31, 1918 – June 14, 1986) was an American lyricist and librettist.
In collaboration with Frederick Loewe, and later Burton Lane, he created some of the world's most popular and enduring works of musical theatre both for the stage and on film.
Alfred Gerald Caplin (September 28, 1909 – November 5, 1979), better known as Al Capp, was an American cartoonist and humorist best known for the satirical comic strip Li'l
Abner, which he created in 1934 and continued writing and (with help from assistants) drawing until 1977.
Ann Druyan ( ; born June 13, 1949) is an Emmy and Peabody Award-winning American documentary producer and director specializing in the communication of science.
She co-wrote the 1980 PBS documentary series Cosmos, hosted by Carl Sagan, whom she married in 1981.
Analcime (; ) or analcite is a white, gray, or colorless tectosilicate mineral.
Analcime consists of hydrated sodium aluminium silicate in cubic crystalline form.
Alexey Leonidovich Pajitnov (born April 16, 1955) is a Russian computer engineer and video game designer who is best known for creating, designing, and developing Tetris in 1985 while working at the Dorodnitsyn Computing Centre under the Academy of Sciences of the Soviet Union (now the Russian Academy of Sciences).
In 1991, he moved to the United States and later became a U.S. citizen.
ʻAbdu'l-Bahá (; Persian: ‎, 23 May 1844 – 28 November 1921), born ʻAbbás (), was the eldest son of Baháʼu'lláh and served as head of the Baháʼí Faith from 1892 until 1921.
ʻAbdu'l-Bahá was later canonized as the last of three "central figures" of the religion, along with Baháʼu'lláh and the Báb, and his writings and authenticated talks are regarded as sources of Baháʼí sacred literature.
Ambrose of Alexandria (before 212 – c. 250) was a friend of the Christian theologian Origen.
Ambrose was attracted by Origen's fame as a teacher, and visited the Catechetical School of Alexandria in 212.
An autonomous building is a building designed to be operated independently from infrastructural support services such as the electric power grid, gas grid, municipal water systems, sewage treatment systems, storm drains, communication services, and in some cases, public roads.
Advocates of autonomous building describe advantages that include reduced environmental impacts, increased security, and lower costs of ownership.
Anubis (; ), also known as Inpu, Inpw, Jnpw, or Anpu in Ancient Egyptian (), is the god of funerary rites, protector of graves, and guide to the underworld, in ancient Egyptian religion, usually depicted as a canine or a man with a canine head.
Like many ancient Egyptian deities, Anubis assumed different roles in various contexts.
Arthur Robert Jensen (August 24, 1923 – October 22, 2012) was an American psychologist and writer.
He was a professor of educational psychology at the University of California, Berkeley.
A Funny Thing Happened on the Way to the Forum (or A Funny Thing for short) is a musical with music and lyrics by Stephen Sondheim and book by Burt Shevelove and Larry Gelbart.
Inspired by the farces of the ancient Roman playwright Plautus (254–184 BC), specifically Curculio, Pseudolus, Miles Gloriosus, and Mostellaria, the musical tells the bawdy story of a slave named Pseudolus and his attempts to win his freedom by helping his young master woo the girl next door.
The Aleuts ( ; ) are the Indigenous people of the Aleutian Islands, which are located between the North Pacific Ocean and the Bering Sea.
Both the Aleut people and the islands are politically divided between the US state of Alaska and the Russian administrative division of Kamchatka Krai.
The Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act (ANCSA) was signed into law by President Richard Nixon on December 18, 1971, constituting at the time the largest land claims settlement in United States history.
ANCSA was intended to resolve long-standing issues surrounding aboriginal land claims in Alaska, as well as to stimulate economic development throughout Alaska.
Adoptionism, also called dynamic monarchianism, is an early Christian nontrinitarian theological doctrine, subsequently revived in various forms, which holds that Jesus was adopted as the Son of God at his baptism, his resurrection, or his ascension.
How common adoptionist views were among early Christians is debated, but it appears to have been most popular in the first, second, and third centuries.
Apollinarism or Apollinarianism is a Christological heresy proposed by Apollinaris of Laodicea (died 390) that argues that Jesus had a human body and sensitive human soul, but a divine mind and not a human rational mind, the Divine Logos taking the place of the latter.
It was deemed heretical in 381 and virtually died out within the following decades.
In chemistry, an acid–base reaction is a chemical reaction that occurs between an acid and a base.
It can be used to determine pH via titration.
Ali ibn al-Husayn al-Iṣfahānī (), also known as Abul-Faraj, (full form: Abū al-Faraj ʿAlī ibn al-Ḥusayn ibn Muḥammad ibn Aḥmad ibn al-Ḥaytham al-Umawī al-Iṣfahānī) (897-967CE / 284–356AH) was a writer, historian, genealogist, poet, musicologist and scribe.
He was of Arab-Quraysh origin and mainly based in Baghdad.
Alcobaça () is a Portuguese city and municipality in the Oeste region, in the historical province of Estremadura, and in the Leiria District.
The city grew along the valleys of the rivers Alcoa and Baça, from which it derives its name.
The amphisbaena (, , or , plural: amphisbaenae; ) is a mythological, ant-eating serpent with a head at each end.
The creature is alternatively called the amphisbaina, amphisbene, amphisboena, amphisbona, amphista, amfivena, amphivena, or anphivena (the last two being feminine), and is also known as the "Mother of Ants".
Amyl alcohols are alcohols with the formula C5H11OH.
Eight are known.
Amyl nitrite is a chemical compound with the formula C5H11ONO.
A variety of isomers are known, but they all feature an amyl group attached to the nitrite functional group.
Autumn, also known as fall in North American English, is one of the four temperate seasons on Earth.
Outside the tropics, autumn marks the transition from summer to winter, in September (Northern Hemisphere) or March (Southern Hemisphere).
Alameda ( ; ; Spanish for "tree-lined path") is a city in Alameda County, California, United States, located in the East Bay region of the Bay Area.
The city is primarily located on Alameda Island, but also spans Bay Farm Island and Coast Guard Island, as well as a few other smaller islands in San Francisco Bay.
An alpha helix (or α-helix) is a sequence of amino acids in a protein that are twisted into a coil (a helix).
The alpha helix is the most common structural arrangement in the secondary structure of proteins.
Accrington  is a town in the Hyndburn borough of Lancashire, England.
It lies about  east of Blackburn,  west of Burnley,  east of Preston,  north of Manchester and is situated on the culverted River Hyndburn.
According to the Book of Revelation in the New Testament of the Christian Bible, Armageddon (; , Late Latin: , from Hebrew:  Har Məgīddō) is the prophesied location of a gathering of armies for a battle during the end times, which is variously interpreted as either a literal or a symbolic location.
The term is also used in a generic sense to refer to any end-of-the-world scenario.
Athlon is the brand name applied to a series of x86-compatible microprocessors designed and manufactured by AMD.
The original Athlon (now called Athlon Classic) was the first seventh-generation x86 processor and the first desktop processor to reach speeds of one gigahertz (GHz).
Amnon ( ’Amnōn, "faithful") was, in the Hebrew Bible, the oldest son of King David and his second wife, Ahinoam of Jezreel.
He was born in Hebron during his father's reign in Judah.
The Amu Darya (also called the Amu, Amo River, and historically known by its Latin name  or Greek ) is a major river in Central Asia and Afghanistan.
Rising in the Pamir Mountains, north of the Hindu Kush, the Amu Darya is formed by the confluence of the Vakhsh and Panj rivers, in the Tigrovaya Balka Nature Reserve on the border between Afghanistan and Tajikistan, and flows from there north-westwards into the southern remnants of the Aral Sea.
The Muslim conquests of Afghanistan began during the Muslim conquest of Persia as the Arab Muslims migrated eastwards to Khorasan, Sistan and Transoxiana.
Fifteen years after the Battle of Nahāvand in 642 AD, they controlled all Sasanian domains except in Afghanistan.
The Durrani Empire (; ) or the Afghan Empire (; ), also known as the Sadozai Kingdom (; ), was an Afghan empire that was founded by Ahmad Shah Durrani in 1747, that spanned parts of Central Asia, the Iranian plateau, and the Indian Subcontinent.
At its peak, it ruled over the present-day Afghanistan, much of Pakistan, parts of northeastern and southeastern Iran, eastern Turkmenistan, and northwestern India.
The Aimaq () or Chahar Aimaq (), also transliterated as Aymaq, Aimagh, Aimak and Aymak, are a collection of Sunni and mostly Persian-speaking nomadic and semi-nomadic tribes.
They live mostly in the central and western highlands of Afghanistan, especially in Ghor and Badghis.
|- bgcolor="#FFFAFA"| Note (category: variability): || H and K emission vary.
Arcturus is the brightest star in the northern constellation of Boötes.
The Androphagi were an ancient Scythian tribe whose existence was recorded by ancient Greco-Roman authors.
The Androphagi were closely related to the Melanchlaeni and the Budini.
Albert Brooks (born Albert Lawrence Einstein ; July 22, 1947) is an American actor, comedian, director and screenwriter.
He received an Academy Award nomination for Best Supporting Actor for 1987's Broadcast News and was widely praised for his performance in the 2011 action drama film Drive.
Antares is the brightest star in the constellation of Scorpius.
It has the Bayer designation α Scorpii, which is Latinised to Alpha Scorpii.
Aldebaran () is a star located in the zodiac constellation of Taurus.
It has the Bayer designation α Tauri, which is Latinized to Alpha Tauri and abbreviated Alpha Tau or α Tau.
Altair is the brightest star in the constellation of Aquila and the twelfth-brightest star in the night sky.
It has the Bayer designation Alpha Aquilae, which is Latinised from α Aquilae and abbreviated Alpha Aql or α Aql.
The Australian Broadcasting Corporation (ABC) is the national broadcaster of Australia.
It is principally funded by direct grants from the Australian Government and is administered by a government-appointed board.
Alexandria ( ; ; ) is the second largest city in Egypt, and the largest city on the Mediterranean coast.
Founded in  by Alexander the Great, Alexandria grew rapidly and became a major centre of Hellenic civilization, eventually replacing Memphis, in present-day Greater Cairo, as Egypt's capital.
Alexandria is a city in Monroe Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
It is about  northeast of Indianapolis.
Alexandria is the ninth-largest city in the state of Louisiana and is the parish seat of Rapides Parish, Louisiana, United States.
It lies on the south bank of the Red River in almost the exact geographic center of the state.
Alexandria Troas ("Alexandria of the Troad"; ; ) is the site of an ancient Greek city situated on the Aegean Sea near the northern tip of Turkey's western coast, the area known historically as Troad, a little south of Tenedos (modern Bozcaada).
It is located southeast of modern Dalyan, a village in the Ezine district of Çanakkale Province.
Alexandria (, ) is a town in West Dunbartonshire, Scotland.
The town is on the River Leven,  north of Dumbarton and  north-west of Glasgow.
Alexandria () is the capital city of the Teleorman County, Muntenia, Romania.
It is located south-west of Bucharest, towards the Bulgarian border, and has over 40,000 inhabitants.
Angela Vincent  (born 1942) is Emeritus professor at the University of Oxford and a Fellow of Somerville College, Oxford.
Career and researchAngela Vincent was born in 1942, the third child of Carmen and Joseph Molony (later KCVO).
In mathematics, the arithmetic–geometric mean of two positive real numbers  and  is the mutual limit of a sequence of arithmetic means and a sequence of geometric means:Begin the sequences with x and y:Then define the two interdependent sequences  and  asThese two sequences converge to the same number, the arithmetic–geometric mean of  and ; it is denoted by , or sometimes by  or .
The arithmetic–geometric mean is used in fast algorithms for exponential and trigonometric functions, as well as some mathematical constants, in particular, computing .
is a Japanese manga artist and character designer.
He first achieved mainstream recognition for his highly successful manga series Dr. Slump, before going on to create Dragon Ball (his best-known work) and acting as a character designer for several popular video games such as the Dragon Quest series, Chrono Trigger, and Blue Dragon.
Epsilon Ursae Majoris is a star in the northern constellation of Ursa Major.
The designation is Latinised from ε Ursae Majoris and abbreviated Epsilon UMa or ε UMa.
The Amiga 500, also known as the A500, was the first popular version of the Amiga home computer, "redefining the home computer market and making so-called luxury features such as multitasking and colour a standard long before Microsoft or Apple sold these to the masses".
It contains the same Motorola 68000 as the Amiga 1000, as well as the same graphics and sound coprocessors, but is in a smaller case similar to that of the Commodore 128.
The Amiga 1000, also known as the A1000, is the first personal computer released by Commodore International in the Amiga line.
It combines the 16/32-bit Motorola 68000 CPU which was powerful by 1985 standards with one of the most advanced graphics and sound systems in its class.
In analytic geometry, an asymptote () of a curve is a line such that the distance between the curve and the line approaches zero as one or both of the x or y coordinates tends to infinity.
In projective geometry and related contexts, an asymptote of a curve is a line which is tangent to the curve at a point at infinity.
Andrew Stuart Tanenbaum (born March 16, 1944), sometimes referred to by the handle ast, is an American-Dutch computer scientist and professor emeritus of computer science at the Vrije Universiteit Amsterdam in the Netherlands.
He is the author of MINIX, a free Unix-like operating system for teaching purposes, and has written multiple computer science textbooks regarded as standard texts in the field.
Ariane 5 was a retired European heavy-lift space launch vehicle developed and operated by Arianespace for the European Space Agency (ESA).
It was launched from the Centre Spatial Guyanais (CSG) in French Guiana.
Arianespace SA is a French company founded in 1980 as the world's first commercial launch service provider.
It undertakes the operation and marketing of the Ariane programme.
In a computer's central processing unit (CPU), the accumulator is a register in which intermediate arithmetic logic unit results are stored.
Without a register like an accumulator, it would be necessary to write the result of each calculation (addition, multiplication, shift, etc.) to main memory, perhaps only to be read right back again for use in the next operation.
Abu Zubaydah ( ; , Abū Zubaydah; born March 12, 1971, as Zayn al-Abidin Muhammad Husayn) is a Palestinian citizen and alleged terrorist born in Saudi Arabia currently held by the U.S. in the Guantanamo Bay detention camp in Cuba.
He is held under the authority of Authorization for Use of Military Force Against Terrorists (AUMF).
Arithmetic () is an elementary part of mathematics that consists of the study of the properties of the traditional operations on numbers—addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, exponentiation, and extraction of roots.
In the 19th century, Italian mathematician Giuseppe Peano formalized arithmetic with his Peano axioms, which are highly important to the field of mathematical logic today.
Andersonville is a city in Sumter County, Georgia, United States.
As of the 2020 census, the city had a population of 237.
The Agra Canal is an important Indian irrigation work which starts from Okhla in Delhi.
The Agra canal originates at the Okhla barrage, downstream of Nizamuddin bridge.
, which means "Heaven's Grass," is a series of islands off the west coast of Kyushu, the southernmost of the four main islands of Japan.
Geography The largest island of the Amakusa group is Shimoshima, which is 26.5 miles long and 13.5 miles at its widest ().
An afterglow in meteorology consists of several atmospheric optical phenomena, with a general definition as a broad arch of whitish or pinkish sunlight in the twilight sky, consisting of the bright segment and the purple light.
Purple light mainly occurs when the Sun is 2–6° below the horizon, from civil to nautical twilight, while the bright segment lasts until the end of the nautical twilight.
Ammonius Grammaticus (; ) was a 4th-century Egyptian priest.
In 391, he was involved in a violent revolt centred at Alexandria's Serapeum, where the pagan rebels tortured and killed captured Christians.
In mathematics, particularly abstract algebra, an algebraic closure of a field K is an algebraic extension of K that is algebraically closed.
It is one of many closures in mathematics.
Advanced power management (APM) is a technical standard for power management developed by Intel and Microsoft and released in 1992 which enables an operating system running an IBM-compatible personal computer to work with the BIOS (part of the computer's firmware) to achieve power management.
Revision 1.2 was the last version of the APM specification, released in 1996.
Antoine-Joseph "Adolphe" Sax (; 6 November 1814 –  7 February 1894) was a Belgian inventor and musician who invented the saxophone in the early 1840s, patenting it in 1846.
He also invented the saxotromba, saxhorn and saxtuba.
In phonetics, aspiration is the strong burst of breath that accompanies either the release or, in the case of preaspiration, the closure of some obstruents.
In English, aspirated consonants are allophones in complementary distribution with their unaspirated counterparts, but in some other languages, notably most South Asian languages (including Indian ones) and East Asian languages, the difference is contrastive.
An arteriovenous malformation (AVM) is an abnormal connection between arteries and veins, bypassing the capillary system.
Usually congenital, this vascular anomaly is widely known because of its occurrence in the central nervous system (usually as a cerebral AVM), but can appear anywhere in the body.
Atlanta ( , or  ) is the capital and most populous city of the U.S. state of Georgia.
It is the seat of Fulton County, although a portion of the city extends into neighboring DeKalb County.
Axiology (from Greek , axia: "value, worth"; and , -logia: "study of") is the philosophical study of value.
It includes questions about the nature and classification of values and about what kinds of things have value.
A Doll's House (Danish and ; also translated as A Doll House) is a three-act play written by Norwegian playwright Henrik Ibsen.
It premiered at the Royal Theatre in Copenhagen, Denmark, on 21 December 1879, having been published earlier that month.
The AIM-7 Sparrow (Air Intercept Missile) is an American medium-range semi-active radar homing air-to-air missile operated by the United States Air Force, United States Navy, United States Marine Corps, and various other air forces and navies.
Sparrow and its derivatives were the West's principal beyond visual range (BVR) air-to-air missile from the late 1950s until the 1990s.
The AIM-120 Advanced Medium-Range Air-to-Air Missile (AMRAAM) (pronounced  /æmɹæm/), is an American beyond-visual-range air-to-air missile capable of all-weather day-and-night operations.
It uses active transmit-receive radar guidance instead of semi-active receive-only radar guidance.
The AGM-88 HARM (High-speed Anti-Radiation Missile) is a tactical, air-to-surface anti-radiation missile designed to home in on electronic transmissions coming from surface-to-air radar systems.
It was originally developed by Texas Instruments as a replacement for the AGM-45 Shrike and AGM-78 Standard ARM system.
The AGM-65 Maverick is an air-to-ground missile (AGM) designed for close air support.
It is the most widely produced precision-guided missile in the Western world, and is effective against a wide range of tactical targets, including armor, air defenses, ships, ground transportation and fuel storage facilities.
The AIM-54 Phoenix is an American radar-guided, long-range air-to-air missile (AAM), carried in clusters of up to six missiles on the Grumman F-14 Tomcat, its only operational launch platform.
The Phoenix was the United States' only long-range air-to-air missile.
The Lockheed AC-130 gunship is a heavily armed, long-endurance, ground-attack variant of the C-130 Hercules transport, fixed-wing aircraft.
It carries a wide array of ground-attack weapons that are integrated with sophisticated sensors, navigation, and fire-control systems.
In abstract algebra, an alternative algebra is an algebra in which multiplication need not be associative, only alternative.
That is, one must havefor all x and y in the algebra.
In economics and finance, arbitrage (,  ) is the practice of taking advantage of a difference in prices in two or more markets; striking a combination of matching deals to capitalise on the difference, the profit being the difference between the market prices at which the unit is traded.
When used by academics, an arbitrage is a transaction that involves no negative cash flow at any probabilistic or temporal state and a positive cash flow in at least one state; in simple terms, it is the possibility of a risk-free profit after transaction costs.
Associazione Calcio Firenze Fiorentina, commonly referred to as Fiorentina (), is an Italian professional football club based in Florence, Tuscany, Italy.
The original team was founded by a merger in August 1926, while the current club was refounded in August 2002
Afrobeat is a Nigerian music genre that involves the combination of West African musical styles (such as traditional Yoruba and Igbo music and highlife) with American funk, jazz, and soul influences, with a focus on chanted vocals, complex intersecting rhythms, and percussion.
The style was pioneered in the 1960s by Nigerian multi-instrumentalist and bandleader Fela Kuti, who is responsible for popularizing the style both within and outside Nigeria.
In number theory, an arithmetic, arithmetical, or number-theoretic function is for most authors any function f(n) whose domain is the positive integers and whose range is a subset of the complex numbers.
Hardy & Wright include in their definition the requirement that an arithmetical function "expresses some arithmetical property of n".
ANSI C, ISO C, and Standard C are successive standards for the C programming language published by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) and ISO/IEC JTC 1/SC 22/WG 14 of the International Organization for Standardization (ISO) and the International Electrotechnical Commission (IEC).
Historically, the names referred specifically to the original and best-supported version of the standard (known as C89 or C90).
The Alien and Sedition Acts were a set of four laws enacted in 1798 that applied restrictions to immigration and speech in the United States.
The Naturalization Act increased the requirements to seek citizenship, the Alien Friends Act allowed the president to imprison and deport non-citizens, the Alien Enemies Act gave the president additional powers to detain non-citizens during times of war, and the Sedition Act criminalized false and malicious statements about the federal government.
Antinomy (Greek ἀντί, antí, "against, in opposition to", and νόμος, nómos, "law") refers to a real or apparent mutual incompatibility of two laws.
It is a term used in logic and epistemology, particularly in the philosophy of Immanuel Kant.
In mathematics, the ascending chain condition (ACC) and descending chain condition (DCC) are finiteness properties satisfied by some algebraic structures, most importantly ideals in certain commutative rings.
These conditions played an important role in the development of the structure theory of commutative rings in the works of David Hilbert, Emmy Noether, and Emil Artin.
Rabbi Adin Even-Israel Steinsaltz (11 July 19377 August 2020) () was an Israeli Chabad Chasidic rabbi, teacher, philosopher, social critic, author, translator and publisher.
His Steinsaltz edition of the Talmud was originally published in modern Hebrew, with a running commentary to facilitate learning, and has also been translated into English, French, Russian, and Spanish.
Alfred Edward Housman (; 26 March 1859 – 30 April 1936) was an English classical scholar and poet.
After an initially poor performance while at university, he took employment as a clerk in London and established his academic reputation by publishing as a private scholar at first.
Efforts to scientifically ascertain and attribute mechanisms responsible for recent global warming and related climate changes on Earth have found that the main driver is elevated levels of greenhouse gases produced by human activities, with natural forces adding variability.
The likely range of human-induced surface-level air warming by 2010–2019 compared to levels in 1850–1900 is 0.8 °C to 1.3 °C, with a best estimate of 1.07 °C.
Achduart (Gaelic: Achadh Dhubhaird) is a coastal hamlet in Coigach, Wester Ross in northwestern Scotland, now within the Highland council area.
It is situated about 4 km southeast of the village of Achiltibuie, at the end of a minor road.
Achiltibuie (;  or Field of the yellow-haired boy) is a long linear village in Ross and Cromarty, Highland, on the Coigach coast of northwestern Scotland, overlooking Badentarbet Bay to the west.
Loch Broom and the Summer Isles  lie to the south.
In economics, adaptive expectations is a hypothesized process by which people form their expectations about what will happen in the future based on what has happened in the past.
For example, if people want to create an expectation of the inflation rate in the future, they can refer to past inflation rates to infer some consistencies and could derive a more accurate expectation the more years they consider.
The Mexican tetra (Astyanax mexicanus), also known as the blind cave fish, blind cave characin, and blind cave tetra, is a freshwater fish of the family Characidae of the order Characiformes.
The type species of its genus, it is native to the Nearctic realm, originating in the lower Rio Grande and the Neueces and Pecos Rivers in Texas, as well as the central and eastern parts of Mexico.
The atom probe was introduced at the 14th Field Emission Symposium in 1967 by Erwin Wilhelm Müller and J. A. Panitz.
It combined a field ion microscope with a mass spectrometer having a single particle detection capability and, for the first time, an instrument could “... determine the nature of one single atom seen on a metal surface and selected from neighboring atoms at the discretion of the observer”.
Alphonse Gabriel Capone (; January 17, 1899 – January 25, 1947), sometimes known by the nickname "Scarface", was an American gangster and businessman who attained notoriety during the Prohibition era as the co-founder and boss of the Chicago Outfit.
His seven-year reign as a crime boss ended when he went to prison at the age of 33.
In electronics, the figures of merit of an amplifier are numerical measures that characterize its properties and performance.
Figures of merit can be given as a list of specifications that include properties such as gain, bandwidth, noise and linearity, among others listed in this article.
Army of Darkness is a 1992 American dark fantasy horror comedy film directed, co-written, and co-edited by Sam Raimi.
The film is the third installment in the Evil Dead film series and the sequel to Evil Dead II (1987).
The RUR-5 ASROC (for "Anti-Submarine Rocket") is an all-weather, all sea-conditions anti-submarine missile system.
Developed by the United States Navy in the 1950s, it was deployed in the 1960s, updated in the 1990s, and eventually installed on over 200 USN surface ships, specifically cruisers, destroyers, and frigates.
Ahmed bin Abdullah al-Nami (; 7 December 197711 September 2001) was a Saudi terrorist hijacker.
He was one of the four hijackers of United Airlines Flight 93, which was crashed into a field in Stonycreek Township, Pennsylvania, following a passenger revolt, as part of the 11 September attacks.
Ahmed Ibrahim al-Haznawi al-Ghamdi (; 11 October 198011 September 2001) was a Saudi terrorist hijacker.
He was one of the four hijackers of United Airlines Flight 93, which was crashed into a field in Stonycreek Township, Pennsylvania, following a passenger revolt, as part of the 11 September attacks.
Athanasius I of Alexandria ( – 2 May 373), also called Athanasius the Great, Athanasius the Confessor, or, among Coptic Christians, Athanasius the Apostolic, was a church father and the 20th pope of Alexandria (as Athanasius I).
His intermittent episcopacy spanned 45 years ( – 2 May 373), of which over 17 encompassed five exiles, when he was replaced on the order of four different Roman emperors.
The Azores ( , , ; , ), officially the Autonomous Region of the Azores (), is one of the two autonomous regions of Portugal (along with Madeira).
It is an archipelago composed of nine volcanic islands in the Macaronesia region of the North Atlantic Ocean, about  west of Lisbon, about  northwest of Morocco, and about  southeast of Newfoundland, Canada.
The Outback is a remote, vast, sparsely populated area of Australia.
The Outback is more remote than the bush.
The Absolute Infinite (symbol: Ω) is an extension of the idea of infinity proposed by mathematician Georg Cantor.
It can be thought of as a number that is bigger than any other conceivable or inconceivable quantity, either finite or transfinite.
In engineering and its various subdisciplines, acceptance testing is a test conducted to determine if the requirements of a specification or contract are met.
It may involve chemical tests, physical tests, or performance tests.
The Archbishopric of Riga (, ) was an archbishopric in Medieval Livonia, a subject to the Holy See.
It was established in 1186 as the bishopric of Livonia at Ikšķile, then after moving to Riga it became the bishopric of Riga in 1202 and was elevated to an archbishopric in 1255.
Albert Frederick (; ; 7 May 1553 – 27 August 1618) was the Duke of Prussia, from 1568 until his death.
He was a son of Albert of Prussia and Anna Marie of Brunswick-Lüneburg.
Ansbach ( , ; ) is a city in the German state of Bavaria.
It is the capital of the administrative region of Middle Franconia.
National Alliance (, AN) was a national conservative political party in Italy.
It was the successor of the Italian Social Movement (MSI), a neo-fascist party founded in 1946 by former followers of Benito Mussolini that had moderated its policies over its last decades and finally distanced itself from its former ideology, a move known as , during a convention in Fiuggi by dissolving into the new party in 1995.
The Arno is a river in the Tuscany region of Italy.
It is the most important river of central Italy after the Tiber.Source and route The river originates on Monte Falterona in the Casentino area of the Apennines, and initially takes a southward curve.
Aveiro () is a city and a municipality in Portugal.
In 2021, the population was 80,880, in an area of : it is the second most populous city in the Centro Region of Portugal (after Coimbra).
Anthony the Great ( Antṓnios; ; ; ;  – 17 January 356) was a Christian monk from Egypt, revered since his death as a saint.
He is distinguished from other saints named Anthony, such as , by various epithets: , , , , , and .
Amblypoda was a taxonomic hypothesis uniting a group of extinct, herbivorous mammals.
They were considered a suborder of the primitive ungulate mammals and have since been shown to represent a polyphyletic group.
Amblygonite () is a fluorophosphate mineral, , composed of lithium, sodium, aluminium, phosphate, fluoride and hydroxide.
The mineral occurs in pegmatite deposits and is easily mistaken for albite and other feldspars.
Amygdalin (from Ancient Greek:   'almond') is a naturally occurring chemical compound found in many plants, most notably in the seeds (kernels) of apricots, bitter almonds, apples, peaches, cherries and plums, and in the roots of manioc.
Amygdalin is classified as a cyanogenic glycoside, because each amygdalin molecule includes a nitrile group, which can be released as the toxic cyanide anion by the action of a beta-glucosidase.
Amok syndrome is an aggressive dissociative behavioral pattern derived from Indonesia and Malaysia that led to the English phrase, running amok.
The word derives from the Malay word , traditionally meaning "an episode of sudden mass assault against people or objects, usually by a single individual, following a period of brooding, which has traditionally been regarded as occurring especially in Malaysian culture but is now increasingly viewed as psychopathological behavior".
The Apostles' Creed (Latin: Symbolum Apostolorum or Symbolum Apostolicum), sometimes titled the Apostolic Creed or the Symbol of the Apostles, is a Christian creed or "symbol of faith".
The creed most likely originated in 5th-century Gaul as a development of the Old Roman Symbol: the old Latin creed of the 4th century.
Amicable numbers are two different natural numbers related in such a way that the sum of the proper divisors of each is equal to the other number.
That is, s(a)=b and s(b)=a, where s(n)=σ(n)-n is equal to the sum of positive divisors of n except n itself (see also divisor function).
Agar ( or ), or agar-agar, is a jelly-like substance consisting of  polysaccharides obtained from the cell walls of some species of red algae, primarily from "ogonori" (Gracilaria) and "tengusa" (Gelidiaceae).
As found in nature, agar is a mixture of two components, the linear polysaccharide agarose and a heterogeneous mixture of smaller molecules called agaropectin.
Acid rain is rain or any other form of precipitation that is unusually acidic, meaning that it has elevated levels of hydrogen ions (low pH).
Most water, including drinking water, has a neutral pH that exists between 6.5 and 8.5, but acid rain has a pH level lower than this and ranges from 4–5 on average.
In church history, the term  (from Ancient Greek:  , "headless", singular   from  , "without", and  , "head") has been applied to several sects that supposedly had no leader.
E. Cobham Brewer wrote, in Dictionary of Phrase and Fable, that acephalites, "properly means men without a head."
Anthony of Saxony (; 27 December 1755 – 6 June 1836) was a King of Saxony from the House of Wettin.
He became known as Anton der Gütige ("Anthony the Kind").
Albert III () (27 January 144312 September 1500) was a Duke of Saxony.
He was nicknamed Albert the Bold or Albert the Courageous and founded the Albertine line of the House of Wettin.
Arlo Davy Guthrie (born July 10, 1947) is an American folk singer-songwriter.
He is known for singing songs of protest against social injustice, and storytelling while performing songs, following the tradition of his father, Woody Guthrie.
The Book of Alma: The Son of Alma (), usually referred to as the Book of Alma, is one of the books that make up the Book of Mormon.
The title refers to Alma the Younger, a prophet and "chief judge" of the Nephites.
Antioxidants are compounds that inhibit oxidation (usually occurring as autoxidation), a chemical reaction that can produce free radicals.
Autoxidation leads to degradation of organic compounds, including living matter.
Brass is an alloy of copper (Cu) and zinc (Zn), in proportions which can be varied to achieve different colours and mechanical, electrical, acoustic, and chemical properties, but copper typically has the larger proportion.
In use since prehistoric times, it is a substitutional alloy: atoms of the two constituents may replace each other within the same crystal structure.
Bonn () is a federal city in the German state of North Rhine-Westphalia, located on the banks of the Rhine.
It has a population of over 300,000.
Ballroom dance is a set of partner dances, which are enjoyed both socially and competitively around the world, mostly because of its performance and entertainment aspects.
Ballroom dancing is also widely enjoyed on stage, film, and television.
The Birth of a Nation, originally called The Clansman, is a 1915 American silent epic drama film directed by D. W. Griffith and starring Lillian Gish.
The screenplay is adapted from Thomas Dixon Jr.'s 1905 novel and play The Clansman.
The Baltic Sea is an arm of the Atlantic Ocean that is enclosed by Denmark, Estonia, Finland, Germany, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland, Russia, Sweden, and the North and Central European Plain.
The sea stretches from 53°N to 66°N latitude and from 10°E to 30°E longitude.
Brackish water, sometimes termed brack water, is water occurring in a natural environment that has more salinity than freshwater, but not as much as seawater.
It may result from mixing seawater (salt water) and fresh water together, as in estuaries, or it may occur in brackish fossil aquifers.
The Bronx () is a borough of New York City, coextensive with Bronx County, in the U.S. state of New York.
It is south of Westchester County; north and east of the New York City borough of Manhattan, across the Harlem River; and north of the New York City borough of Queens, across the East River.
BearShare was a peer-to-peer-file-sharing-application originally created by Free Peers, Inc. for Microsoft Windows and also a rebranded version of iMesh by MusicLab, LLC, tightly integrated  with their music subscription service.
HistoryThe principal operators of Free Peers, Inc. were Vincent Falco and Louis Tatta.
Belgium, officially the Kingdom of Belgium, is a country in Northwestern Europe.
The country is bordered by the Netherlands to the north, Germany to the east, Luxembourg to the southeast, France to the southwest, and the North Sea to the northwest.
Blues is a music genre and musical form that originated in the Deep South of the United States around the 1860s.
Blues incorporated spirituals, work songs, field hollers, shouts, chants, and rhymed simple narrative ballads from the African-American culture.
Berlin ( , ) is the capital and largest city of Germany by both area and population.
Its more than 3.85 million inhabitants make it the European Union's most populous city, according to population within city limits.
Benjamin Lee Whorf (; April 24, 1897 – July 26, 1941) was an American linguist and fire prevention engineer who is famous for proposing the "Sapir–Whorf hypothesis."
He believed that the structures of different languages shape how their speakers perceive and conceptualize the world.
William Jefferson Clinton (né Blythe III; born August 19, 1946) is an American politician  who served as the 42nd president of the United States from 1993 to 2001.
A member of the Democratic Party, he previously served as governor of Arkansas from 1979 to 1981 and again from 1983 to 1992.
In common law legal systems, black-letter law refers to well-established legal rules that are no longer subject to reasonable dispute.
For example, it is "black-letter law" that the formation of a contract requires consideration, or that the registration of a trademark requires established use in the course of trade.
Blue laws, also known as Sunday laws, Sunday trade laws and Sunday closing laws, are laws restricting or banning certain activities on specified days, usually Sundays in the western world.
The laws were adopted originally for religious reasons, specifically to promote the observance of the Christian day of worship, but since then have come to serve secular purposes as well.
Bar or BAR may refer to:Food and drink  Bar (establishment), selling alcoholic beverages Candy bar Chocolate barScience and technology Bar (river morphology), a deposit of sediment Bar (tropical cyclone), a layer of cloud Bar (unit), a unit of pressure BAR domain, a protein domain Bar stock, of metal SandbarComputing Bar (computer science), a placeholder Base Address Register in PCI Bar, a mobile phone form factor Bar, a type of graphical control elementLaw Bar (law), the legal profession Bar association Bar examinationMedia and entertainment Bar (Croatian TV series) Bar (Czech TV series)
Bar (dance), Turkey Bar (music), a segment Bar (Polish TV series)
Beer is one of the oldest types of alcoholic drinks in the world, and the most widely consumed.
It is the third most popular drink overall after potable water and tea.
The bit is the most basic unit of information in computing and digital communications.
The name is a portmanteau of binary digit.
The byte is a unit of digital information that most commonly consists of eight bits.
Historically, the byte was the number of bits used to encode a single character of text in a computer and for this reason it is the smallest addressable unit of memory in many computer architectures.
Boron nitride is a thermally and chemically resistant refractory compound of boron and nitrogen with the chemical formula BN.
It exists in various crystalline forms that are isoelectronic to a similarly structured carbon lattice.
Johann Sebastian Bach (1685–1750) was a German composer of the Baroque period.
Bach may also refer to:People Bach (surname) Bach family, a noted family in music Bach (actor), stage name of French actor, singer and music hall performer Charles-Joseph Pasquier (1882–1953) Sebastian Bach (born 1968), stage name of Canadian heavy metal singer Sebastian Bierk King Bach, American actor, comedian, and Internet personality Bill Bachrach (1879–1959), American swim coach known as "Bach" Joel Sirkis (1561–1640), Polish posek and halakhist, known as "the Bach" P. D. Q. Bach (1807–1742), a fictitious composer invented by musical satirist Peter Schickele Nigel Bach, the nom de plume of Tom Fanslau, the creator of the Bad Ben seriesPlaces Bach, Austria, a municipality in Reutte Bach, Lot, a commune in France Bach an der Donau, a town in Regensburg, Bavaria, Germany Bäch, a settlement of the Freienbach municipality in Schwyz, Switzerland Bäch railway station, in Freienbach, Switzerl
Blood on the Tracks is the fifteenth studio album by American singer-songwriter Bob Dylan, released on January 20, 1975, by Columbia Records.
The album marked Dylan's return to Columbia Records after a two-album stint with Asylum Records.
"Love and Theft" is the 31st studio album by American singer-songwriter Bob Dylan, released on September 11, 2001, by Columbia Records.
It featured backing by his touring band of the time, with keyboardist Augie Meyers added for the sessions.
The Beverly Hillbillies is an American television sitcom that was broadcast on CBS from 1962 to 1971.
It had an ensemble cast featuring Buddy Ebsen, Irene Ryan, Donna Douglas, and Max Baer Jr. as the Clampetts, a poor, backwoods family from Silver Dollar City in the Ozark Mountains of Missouri, who move to posh Beverly Hills, California, after striking oil on their land.
Beryllium is a chemical element with the symbol Be and atomic number 4.
It is a steel-gray, strong, lightweight and brittle alkaline earth metal.
Britney Jean Spears (born December 2, 1981) is an American singer.
Often referred to as the "Princess of Pop", she is credited with influencing the revival of teen pop during the late 1990s and early 2000s.
Brazil (; ), officially the Federative Republic of Brazil (Portuguese: ), is the largest country in South America and in Latin America.
Brazil is the world's fifth-largest country by area and the seventh most populous.
The Black Forest ( ) is a large forested mountain range in the state of Baden-Württemberg in southwest Germany, bounded by the Rhine Valley to the west and south and close to the borders with France and Switzerland.
It is the source of the Danube and Neckar rivers.
The Black Sea is a marginal mediterranean sea lying between Europe and Asia, east of the Balkans, south of the East European Plain, west of the Caucasus, and north of Anatolia.
It is bounded by Bulgaria, Georgia, Romania, Russia, Turkey, and Ukraine.
The Bible (from Koine Greek , , 'the books') is a collection of religious texts or scriptures, some, all, or a variant of which, are held to be sacred in Christianity, Judaism, Samaritanism, Islam, Baha'i'ism and many other religions.
The Bible is an anthology, a compilation of texts of a variety of forms, originally written in Hebrew, Aramaic, and Koine Greek.
British Columbia (commonly abbreviated as BC) is the westernmost province of Canada.
Situated between the Pacific Ocean and the Rocky Mountains, the province has a diverse geography, with rugged landscapes that include rocky coastlines, sandy beaches, forests, lakes, mountains, inland deserts and grassy plains.
Siddhartha Gautama, most commonly referred to as the Buddha ('the awakened'), was a wandering ascetic and religious teacher who lived in South Asia during the 6th or 5th century BCE and founded Buddhism.
According to Buddhist tradition, he was born in Lumbini, in what is now Nepal, to royal parents of the Shakya clan, but renounced his home life to live as a wandering ascetic ().
A bridge is a structure built to span a physical obstacle (such as a body of water, valley, road, or railway) without blocking the way underneath.
It is constructed for the purpose of providing passage over the obstacle, which is usually something that is otherwise difficult or impossible to cross.
Beadwork is the art or craft of attaching beads to one another by stringing them onto a thread or thin wire with a sewing or beading needle or sewing them to cloth.
Beads are produced in a diverse range of materials, shapes, and sizes, and vary by the kind of art produced.
Board games are tabletop games that typically use .
These pieces are moved or placed on a pre-marked board (playing surface) and often include elements of table, card, role-playing, and miniatures games as well.
A bead is a small, decorative object that is formed in a variety of shapes and sizes of a material such as stone, bone, shell, glass, plastic, wood, or pearl and with a small hole for threading or stringing.
Beads range in size from under  to over  in diameter.
Bead weaving (or beadweaving) is a set of techniques for weaving sheets and objects of seed beads.
Threads are strung through and/or around the beads to hold them together.
Branchiopoda is a class of crustaceans.
It comprises fairy shrimp, clam shrimp, Diplostraca (or Cladocera), Notostraca and the Devonian Lepidocaris.
Baruch (de) Spinoza (24 November 1632 – 21 February 1677) was a philosopher of Portuguese-Jewish origin, born in Amsterdam, the Dutch Republic,  and mostly known under his Latinized pen name Benedictus de Spinoza.
One of the foremost and seminal thinkers of the Enlightenment, modern biblical criticism, and 17th-century Rationalism, including modern conceptions of the self and the universe, he came to be considered "one of the most important philosophers—and certainly the most radical—of the early modern period".
Birds are a group of warm-blooded vertebrates constituting the class Aves (), characterised by feathers, toothless beaked jaws, the laying of hard-shelled eggs, a high metabolic rate, a four-chambered heart, and a strong yet lightweight skeleton.
Birds live worldwide and range in size from the  bee hummingbird to the  common ostrich.
...
Baby One More Time is the debut studio album by American singer Britney Spears.
In card games, a burn card is a playing card dealt from the top of a deck, and discarded ("burned"), unused by the players.
Burn cards are usually not shown to the players.
Bulgaria (; ), officially the Republic of Bulgaria, is a country in Southeast Europe.
Located west of the Black Sea and south of the Danube river, Bulgaria is bordered by Greece and Turkey to the south, Serbia and North Macedonia to the west, and Romania to the north.
Bryozoa (also known as the Polyzoa, Ectoprocta or commonly as moss animals) are a phylum of simple, aquatic invertebrate animals, nearly all living in sedentary colonies.
Typically about  long, they have a special feeding structure called a lophophore, a "crown" of tentacles used for filter feeding.
A biennial plant is a flowering plant that, generally in a temperate climate, takes two years to complete its biological life cycle.
In its first year, the biennial plant undergoes primary growth, during which its vegetative structures (leaves, stems, and roots) develop.
The bay leaf is an aromatic leaf commonly used as a herb in cooking.
It can be used whole, either dried or fresh, in which case it is removed from the dish before consumption, or less commonly used in ground form.
Basis may refer to:Finance and accounting Adjusted basis, the net cost of an asset after adjusting for various tax-related itemsBasis point, 0.01%, often used in the context of interest ratesBasis trading, a trading strategy consisting of the purchase of a security and the sale of a similar securityBasis of futures, the value differential between a future and the spot priceBasis (options), the value differential between a call option and a put optionBasis swap, an interest rate swapCost basis, in income tax law, the original cost of property adjusted for factors such as depreciationTax basis, cost of an assetand technology Basis functionBasis (linear algebra)
Dual basisOrthonormal basisSchauder basisBasis (universal algebra)Basis of a matroidGenerating set of an ideal:Gröbner basisHilbert's basis theoremGenerating set of a groupBase (topology)Change of basisGreedoidNormal basisPolynomial basisRadial basis functionStandard basisTranscendence basis of a fiel
The Burgess Shale is a fossil-bearing deposit exposed in the Canadian Rockies of British Columbia, Canada.
It is famous for the exceptional preservation of the soft parts of its fossils.
Beavis and Butt-Head is an American adult animated television series created by Mike Judge for MTV (seasons 1–8) and later Paramount+ (season 9–present, as Mike Judge's Beavis and Butt-Head).
The series follows Beavis and Butt-Head, both voiced by Judge, a pair of teenage slackers characterized by their apathy, lack of intelligence, lowbrow humor, and love for hard rock and heavy metal.
Bromeliales is an order of flowering plants.
Such an order has been recognized by a few systems of plant taxonomy, with a various placement.
The Brassicales (or Cruciales) are an order of flowering plants, belonging to the eurosids II group of dicotyledons under the APG II system.
One character common to many members of the order is the production of glucosinolate (mustard oil) compounds.
A bulletin board system (BBS), also called a computer bulletin board service (CBBS), is a computer server running software that allows users to connect to the system using a terminal program.
Once logged in, the user can perform functions such as uploading and downloading software and data, reading news and bulletins, and exchanging messages with other users through public message boards and sometimes via direct chatting.
The String Quartet No. 16 in F major, Op. 135, by Ludwig van Beethoven  was written in October 1826 and was the last major work he completed.
Only the final movement of the Quartet Op.
The Symphony No. 9 in D minor, Op. 125, is a choral symphony, the final complete symphony by Ludwig van Beethoven, composed between 1822 and 1824.
It was first performed in Vienna on 7 May 1824.
Ludwig van Beethoven's Opus 1 is a set of three piano trios (written for piano, violin, and cello), first performed in 1795 in the house of Prince Lichnowsky, to whom they are dedicated.
The trios were published in 1795.
Op.
70 is a set of two Piano Trios by Ludwig van Beethoven, written for piano, violin, and cello.
The Piano Trio in B-flat major, Op. 97, by Ludwig van Beethoven is a piano trio completed in 1811.
It is commonly referred to as the Archduke Trio, because it was dedicated to Archduke Rudolph of Austria, the youngest of twelve children of Leopold II, Holy Roman Emperor.
The Violin Sonata No. 5 in F major, Op. 24, is a four movement work for violin and piano by Ludwig van Beethoven.
It was first published in 1801.
Barratry ( ) is a legal term that, at common law, described a criminal offense committed by people who are overly officious in instigating or encouraging prosecution of groundless litigation, or who bring repeated or persistent acts of litigation for the purposes of profit or harassment.
Although it remains a crime in some jurisdictions, barratry has frequently been abolished as being anachronistic and obsolete.
A bomber is a military combat aircraft designed to attack ground and naval targets by dropping air-to-ground weaponry (such as bombs), launching torpedoes, or deploying air-launched cruise missiles.
The first use of bombs dropped from an aircraft occurred in the Italo-Turkish War, with the first major deployments coming in the First World War and Second World War by all major airforces causing devastating damage to cities, towns, and rural areas.
Cue sports are a wide variety of games of skill played with a cue, which is used to strike billiard balls and thereby cause them to move around a cloth-covered table bounded by elastic bumpers known as .
There are three major subdivisions of games within cue sports:Carom billiards, played on tables without , typically ten feet in length, including straight rail, balkline, one-cushion carom, three-cushion billiards, artistic billiards, and four-ballPocket billiards (or pool), played on six-pocket tables of seven, eight, nine, or ten-foot length, including among others eight-ball (the world's most widely played cue sport), nine-ball (the dominant professional game), ten-ball, straight pool (the formerly dominant pro game), one-pocket, and bank poolSnooker, English billiards, and Russian pyramid, played on a large, six-pocket table (dimensions just under 12 ft by 6 ft), all of which are classified separately from pool based on distinct development histories, player culture, rules, and
The Big/Great Dipper is the American English term for the seven brightest stars of Ursa Major (The Plough in British English).
Big Dipper also may refer to:Entertainment Big Dipper (Battersea Park), a wooden roller coaster operating in Battersea Park, London, England, from 1951 until 1972 Big Dipper (Blackpool), a wooden roller coaster at Blackpool Pleasure Beach, England Big Dipper (Geauga Lake), a wooden roller coaster formerly at the now defunct Geauga Lake Park in Ohio, US Big Dipper (Luna Park Sydney), a wooden roller coaster operating at Luna Park Sydney, Australia from 1935 until 1981 Big Dipper (Michigan's Adventure), a steel roller coaster in Michigan, US Cyclone (Dreamworld), a steel roller coaster which operated as Big Dipper at Luna Park Sydney, Australia from 1995 to 2001Sport Wilt Chamberlain (1936–1999), American basketball player Robert DiPierdomenico (born 1958), Australian rules footballer Chris Duncan (born 1981), American baseball playerMusic Big Di
(, Latin: Prusa, ) is a city in northwestern Turkey and the administrative center of Bursa Province.
The fourth-most populous city in Turkey and second-most populous in the Marmara Region, Bursa is one of the industrial centers of the country.
The Bahamas ( ), officially the Commonwealth of The Bahamas, is an island country within the Lucayan Archipelago of the West Indies in the North Atlantic.
It takes up 97% of the Lucayan Archipelago's land area and is home to 88% of the archipelago's population.
Baker Island, formerly known as New Nantucket, is an uninhabited atoll just north of the Equator in the central Pacific Ocean about  southwest of Honolulu.
The island lies almost halfway between Hawaii and Australia.
Bangladesh (; , ), officially the People's Republic of Bangladesh, is a country in South Asia.
It is the eighth-most-populous and among the most densely populated countries, with a population of around 170 million in an area of .
Barbados ( ;  ;  ) is an island country in the Lesser Antilles of the West Indies, in the Caribbean region of North America and the most easterly of the Caribbean Islands.
It lies on the boundary of the South American and the Caribbean Plates.
Bassas da India (; ) is an uninhabited, roughly circular French atoll that is part of the French Southern and Antarctic Lands.
Located in the southern Mozambique Channel, about halfway between Mozambique and Madagascar (about  further east) and around  northwest of Europa Island, the rim of the atoll averages around  in width and encloses a shallow lagoon of depth no greater than .
Belarus, officially the Republic of Belarus, is a landlocked country in Eastern Europe.
It is bordered by Russia to the east and northeast, Ukraine to the south, Poland to the west, and Lithuania and Latvia to the northwest.
Belize (, ; ) is a country on the north-eastern coast of Central America.
It is bordered by Mexico to the north, the Caribbean Sea to the east, and Guatemala to the west and south.
Benin ( ,  ;  , , ), officially the Republic of Benin (), and formerly Dahomey, is a country in West Africa.
It is bordered by Togo to the west, Nigeria to the east, Burkina Faso to the north-west, and Niger to the north-east.
Bermuda (; historically known as the Bermudas or Somers Isles) is a British Overseas Territory in the North Atlantic Ocean.
The closest land outside the territory is in the American state of North Carolina, about  to the west-northwest.
Bolivia, officially the Plurinational State of Bolivia, is a landlocked country located in western-central South America.
It is bordered by Brazil to the north and east, Paraguay to the southeast, Argentina to the south, Chile to the southwest, and Peru to the west.
Bosnia and Herzegovina (; sometimes known as Bosnia-Herzegovina and informally as Bosnia) is a country in Southeast Europe, in the Balkans, bordering Serbia to the east, Montenegro to the southeast, and Croatia to the north and southwest.
In the south it has a  long coast on the Adriatic Sea.
Botswana (; ,  ), officially the Republic of Botswana (, ), is a landlocked country in Southern Africa.
Botswana is topographically flat, with approximately 70 per cent of its territory being the Kalahari Desert.
Brunei ( , ), formally Brunei Darussalam (, Jawi: , ), is a country in Southeast Asia, situated on the northern coast of the island of Borneo.
Apart from its coastline on the South China Sea, it is completely surrounded by the Malaysian state of Sarawak, with its territory bifurcated by the Sarawak district of Limbang.
The British Virgin Islands (BVI), officially the Virgin Islands, is a British Overseas Territory in the Caribbean, to the east of Puerto Rico and the US Virgin Islands and north-west of Anguilla.
The islands are geographically part of the Virgin Islands archipelago and are located in the Leeward Islands of the Lesser Antilles and part of the West Indies.
Burkina Faso ( ,  ; , ) is a landlocked country in West Africa with an area of , bordered by Mali to the northwest, Niger to the northeast, Benin to the southeast, Togo and Ghana to the south, and the Ivory Coast to the southwest.
As of 2021, the country had an estimated population of 20,321,378.
The economy of the Bahamas is dependent upon tourism and offshore banking.
The Bahamas is the richest country in the West Indies and is ranked 14th in North America for nominal GDP.
The Government of Barbados (GoB), is a unitary parliamentary republic, where the President of Barbados is the head of state and the Prime Minister of Barbados is the head of government.
StructureThe country has a bicameral legislature and a political party system, based on universal adult suffrage and fair elections.
The Government of the Republic of Belarus (), which consists of the Council of Ministers of the Republic of Belarus (), is the executive branch of state power in Belarus, and is appointed by the President of Belarus.
The head of the Government is the President of Belarus, who manages the main agenda of the government and direct the ministers.
Telecommunications in Belarus involves the availability and use of electronic devices and services, such as the telephone, television, radio or computer, for the purpose of communication.
Telephone system Telephone lines in use: 3,9741 million (2011).
This article is about transport in Belarus.
Railways Rail transport in Belarus is operated by Belarusskaya Chyhunkatotal:country comparison to the world: 32broad gauge: of  gauge ( electrified) (2006)
The Armed Forces of the Republic of Belarus (; ) are the military forces of Belarus.
It consists of the Ground Forces and the Air Force and Air Defence Forces, all under the command of the Ministry of Defence.
The Byelorussian SSR was one of only two Soviet republics to be separate members of the United Nations (the other being the Ukrainian SSR).
Both republics and the Soviet Union joined the UN when the organization was founded in 1945.
Communications in Belgium are extensive and advanced.
Belgium possesses the infrastructure for both mobile and land-based telecom, as well as having significant television, radio and internet infrastructure.
Transport in Belgium is facilitated with well-developed road, air, rail and water networks.
The rail network has  of electrified tracks.
The economy of Benin remains underdeveloped and dependent on subsistence agriculture and cotton.
Cotton accounts for 40% of Benin's GDP and roughly 80% of official export receipts.
The economy of Bhutan is based on agriculture and forestry, which provide the main livelihood for more than 60% of the population.
Agriculture consists largely of subsistence farming and animal husbandry.
The Lhop or Doya people are a little-known tribe of southwest Bhutan.
The Bhutanese believe them to be the aboriginal inhabitants of the country.
Bosnia and Herzegovina is located in Southeastern Europe.
Situated in the western Balkans, it has a  border with Croatia to the north and southwest, a  border with Serbia to the east, and a  border with Montenegro to the southeast.
Demographic features of the population of Bosnia and Herzegovina include population density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status,  religious affiliations and other aspects of the population.
Demographic characteristicsPopulationVital statisticsSource: Agency for Statistics of Bosnia and Herzegovina*No data for the period 1992-1995Current vital statisticsStructure of the populationVital statistics by entityFederation of Bosnia and HerzegovinaSource: Institute for Statistics of the Federation of Bosnia and HerzegovinaCurrent vital statisticsRepublika SrpskaSource: Republika Srpska Institute of StatisticsCurrent vital statisticsBrčko DistrictSource: Agency for Statistics of Bosnia and Herzegovina - Statistics of the Brčko District BiHCurrent vital statisticsMarriages and divorcesFederation of Bosnia and HerzegovinaRepublika SrpskaBrčko DistrictLife expectancy at birth in Bosnia and HerzegovinaEthnic groups Acco
The Politics of Bosnia and Herzegovina takes place in a framework of a parliamentary representative democracy, whereby executive power is exercised by the Council of Ministers of Bosnia and Herzegovina.
Legislative power is vested in both the Council of Ministers and the Parliamentary Assembly of Bosnia and Herzegovina.
The economy of Bosnia and Herzegovina is a transitional, upper middle income economy.
Bosnia and Herzegovina declared independence from socialist Yugoslavia on 1 March 1992.
Bosnia and Herzegovina has facilities for road, rail and air transport.
There are five international road routes and 20 state highways, with bus connections to many countries.
The Armed Forces of Bosnia and Herzegovina () is the official military force of Bosnia and Herzegovina.
The BiH armed forces were officially unified in 2005 and are composed of two founding armies: the Bosniak-Croat Army of the Federation of Bosnia and Herzegovina (VFBiH) and the Bosnian Serbs' Army of Republika Srpska (VRS).
The implementation of the Dayton Accords of 1995 has focused the efforts of policymakers in Bosnia and Herzegovina, as well as the international community, on regional stabilization in the countries-successors of the former Yugoslavia.
Relations with its neighbors of Croatia and Serbia have been fairly stable since the signing of the Dayton Agreement in 1995.
The Batswana, a term also used to denote all citizens of Botswana, refers to the country's major ethnic group (called the Tswana in Southern Africa).
Prior to European contact, the Batswana lived as herders and farmers under tribal rule.
Botswana is a landlocked country located in Southern Africa, north of South Africa.
Botswana occupies an area of , of which  are land.
Demographic features of the population of Botswana include population density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status, religious affiliations and other aspects.
Botswana, like many nations in southern Africa, suffers from a high HIV infection rate, estimated among adults ages 15 to 49 to be 20.7%.
Botswana is a parliamentary republic in which the President of Botswana is both head of state and head of government.
The nation's politics are based heavily on British parliamentary politics and on traditional Batswana chiefdom.
The economy of Botswana is currently one of the world's fastest growing economies, averaging about 5% per annum over the past decade.
Growth in private sector employment averaged about 10% per annum during the first 30 years of the country's independence.
Telecommunications in Botswana include newspapers, radio, television, fixed and mobile telephones, and the Internet.
In addition to the government-owned newspaper and national radio network, there is an active, independent press (six weekly newspapers).
Transportation in Botswana is provided by an extensive network of railways, highways, ferry services and air routes that criss-cross the country.
The transport sector in Botswana played an important role in economic growth following its independence in 1966.
Botswana has put a premium on economic and political integration in southern Africa.
It has sought to make the Southern African Development Community (SADC) a working vehicle for economic development, and it has promoted efforts to make the region self-policing in terms of preventive diplomacy, conflict resolution, and good governance.
The country of Brazil occupies roughly half of South America, bordering the Atlantic Ocean.
Brazil covers a total area of  which includes  of land and  of water.
The politics of Brazil take place in a framework of a federal presidential representative democratic republic, whereby the President is both head of state and head of government, and of a multi-party system.
The political and administrative organization of Brazil comprises the federal government, the 26 states and a federal district, and the municipalities.
The economy of Brazil is historically the largest in Latin America and the Southern Hemisphere in nominal terms.
The Brazilian economy is the second largest in the Americas.
Brazil has both modern technologies in the center-south portion, counting with LTE, 3G HSPA, DSL ISDB based Digital TV.
Other areas of the country, particularly the North and Northeast regions, lack even basic analog PSTN telephone lines.
Transport infrastructure in Brazil is characterized by strong regional differences and lack of development of the national rail network.
Brazil's fast-growing economy, and especially the growth in exports, will place increasing demands on the transport networks.
The Brazilian Armed Forces (, ) are the unified military forces of the Federative Republic of Brazil.
Consisting of three service branches, it comprises the Brazilian Army (including the Brazilian Army Aviation), the Brazilian Navy (including the Brazilian Marine Corps and Brazilian Naval Aviation) and the Brazilian Air Force (including the Aerospace Operations Command).
The Ministry of Foreign Affairs is responsible for managing the foreign relations of Brazil.
Brazil is a significant political and economic power in Latin America and a key player on the world stage.
The British Virgin Islands (BVI) are one of three political divisions of the Virgin Islands archipelago located in the Lesser Antilles, between the Caribbean Sea and the North Atlantic Ocean.
The BVI  are the easternmost part of the island chain.
This is a demography of the population of the British Virgin Islands including population density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status, religious affiliations and various other aspects.
PopulationA July 2009 estimate placed the population of the British Virgin Islands at 24,491.
The economy of the British Virgin Islands is one of the most prosperous in the Caribbean.
Although tiny in absolute terms, because of the very small population of the British Virgin Islands, in 2010 the Territory had the 19th highest GDP per capita in the world according to the CIA World factbook.
Country Code: +1284International Call Prefix: 011 (outside NANP)Calls from the British Virgin Islands to the US, Canada, and other NANP Caribbean nations, are dialled as 1 + NANP area code + 7-digit number.
Calls from the British Virgin Islands to non-NANP countries are dialled as 011 + country code + phone number with local area code.
The systems of transport in the British Virgin Islands include 113 kilometres of highway and a harbour at Road Town.
Roads  total: 200 km paved: 200 km unpaved: 0 km (2007)
Brunei is a country in Southeast Asia, bordering the South China Sea and East Malaysia.
Its geographical coordinates are .
The economy of Brunei, a small and wealthy country, is a mixture of foreign and domestic entrepreneurship, government regulation and welfare measures, and village traditions.
It is almost entirely supported by exports of crude oil and natural gas, with revenues from the petroleum sector accounting for over half of GDP.
TelecommunicationsTelephoneTelephone service throughout the country is excellent; international service is good to Southeast Asia, Middle East, Western Europe, and the US Main lines in use: 82,588 (2020) Mobile phones: 565,949 (2020)Landing points for the SEA-ME-WE-3, SJC, AAG, Lubuan-Brunei Submarine Cable via optical telecommunications submarine cables that provides links to Asia, the Middle East, Southeast Asia, Africa, Australia, and the US; satellite earth stations - 2 Intelsat (1 Indian Ocean and 1 Pacific Ocean) (2019)IDD Country Code: +673Mobile TelephoneBrunei has 3 major telco namely DST, Imagine (TelBru) and Progresif which offers prepaid and postpaid plan.
UNN is the Single Wholesale Network with holds all the telecommunication infrastructures in Brunei.InternetInternet service providers: 3 (2020), Telbru, Progresif Cellular and DSTCom Country code: .bn
Brunei joined ASEAN on 7 January 1984, one week after resuming full independence, and gives its ASEAN membership the highest priority in its foreign relations.
Brunei joined the United Nations in September 1984.
Bulgaria is a country situated in Southeast Europe that occupies the eastern quarter of the Balkan peninsula, being the largest country within its geographic boundaries.
It borders Romania to the north, Serbia and North Macedonia to the west, Greece and Turkey to the south, and the Black Sea to the east.
The politics of Bulgaria take place in a framework of a parliamentary representative democratic republic, whereby the prime minister is the head of government, and of a multi-party system.
Executive power is exercised by the government.
The economy of Bulgaria functions on the principles of the free market, having a large private sector and a smaller public one.
Bulgaria is an industrialised high-income country according to the World Bank, and is a member of the European Union (EU), the World Trade Organization (WTO), the Organization for Security and Co-operation in Europe (OSCE) and the Organization of the Black Sea Economic Cooperation (BSEC).
Telecommunications in Bulgaria include radio, television, fixed and mobile telephones, and the Internet.
Radio and television Radio broadcast stations: AM 31, FM 63, shortwave 2 (2001).
Transport in Bulgaria is dominated by road transport, despite nearly half of all paved roads belonging to the lowest category of roads.
As of December 2015, the country had 829 kilometers of highways.
The Bulgarian Army () is the military of Bulgaria.
The commander-in-chief is the president of Bulgaria.
Burkina Faso (formerly Upper Volta) is a landlocked Sahel country that shares borders with six nations.
It lies between the Sahara desert and the Gulf of Guinea, south of the loop of the Niger River, mostly between latitudes 9° and 15°N (a small area is north of 15°), and longitudes 6°W and 3°E. The land is green in the south, with forests and fruit trees, and semi-arid in the north.
Burkina Faso's  million people belong to two major West African cultural groups: the Gur (Voltaic) and the Mandé.
The Voltaic are far more numerous and include the Mossi, who make up about one-half of the population.
The Politics of Burkina Faso takes place in a framework of a semi-presidential republic, whereby the Prime Minister of Burkina Faso is the head of government, and of a multi-party system.
The President of Burkina Faso is the head of state.
The economy of Burkina Faso is based primarily on subsistence farming and livestock raising.
Burkina Faso has an average income purchasing-power-parity per capita of $1,900 and nominal per capita of $790 in 2014.
Telecommunications in Burkina Faso include radio, television, fixed and mobile telephones, and the Internet.
The telephony market in Burkina Faso is still relatively underdeveloped.
Transport in Burkina Faso consists primarily of road, air and rail transportation.
The World Bank classified country's transportation as underdeveloped
The Burkina Faso Armed Forces () is the term used for the national military of Burkina Faso.
The service branches of the armed forces include its Army, Air Force, National Gendarmerie and People's Militia.
Burkina Faso has good relations with the European Union, African and certain Asian countries.
France, the former colonial power, in particular, continues to provide significant aid and supports Compaoré's developing role as a regional powerbroker.
Burundi is located in East Africa, to the east of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, at the coordinates .
Physical geographyBurundi occupies an area equal to   in size, of which  is land.
Demographic features of the population of Burundi include population density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status, religious affiliations and other aspects.
At 206.1 persons per km², Burundi has the second-largest population density in Sub-Saharan Africa.
The Politics of Burundi takes place in a framework of a transitional presidential representative democratic republic, whereby the President of Burundi is both head of state and head of government, and of a multi-party system.
Executive power is exercised by the government.
The economy of Burundi is $3.436 billion by gross domestic product as of 2018, being heavily dependent on agriculture, which accounts for 32.9% of gross domestic product as of 2008.
Burundi itself is a landlocked country lacking resources, and with almost nonexistent industrialization.
Communications in Burundi include radio, television, fixed and mobile telephones, the Internet, and the postal service in Burundi.
Radio and televisionRadio is the main source of information for many Burundians.
There are a number of systems of transport in Burundi, including road and water-based infrastructure, the latter of which makes use of Lake Tanganyika.
Furthermore, there are also some airports in Burundi.
The Burundi National Defence Force (French: Force de Défense Nationale Burundaise, or FDNB) is the state military organisation responsible for the defence of Burundi.
A general staff (État-Major Général) commands the armed forces, consisting of a joint staff (État-Major inter-armes); a training staff (État-Major de la Formation), and a logistics staff (État-Major de la Logistique).
Burundi's relations with its neighbours have often been affected by security concerns.
Hundreds of thousands of Burundian refugees have at various times crossed to neighboring Rwanda, Tanzania, and the Democratic Republic of the Congo.
The Bosporus or Bosphorus Strait ( ; , ; , colloquially ) is a natural strait and an internationally significant waterway located in Istanbul in northwestern Turkey that connects the Black Sea to the Sea of Marmara.
It forms part of the continental boundary between Asia and Europe, and divides Turkey by separating Anatolia from Thrace.
Brussels (  or ;  ), officially the Brussels-Capital Region (; ), is a region of Belgium comprising 19 municipalities, including the City of Brussels, which is the capital of Belgium.
The Brussels-Capital Region is located in the central portion of the country and is a part of both the French Community of Belgium and the Flemish Community, but is separate from the Flemish Region (within which it forms an enclave) and the Walloon Region.
A bell is a percussion instrument, usually cup-shaped.
Bell may also refer to:Sound and music Bell (wind instrument), a part of a wind instrument Bell cymbal, a type of cymbal, tending to be thick and uniformly so, and small Bell effect, a musical technique Cymbal bell, the most central part of a cymbalSignals Bell, a signal from an engine order telegraph, a communications device used on a ship or submarine Alarm bell, used to alert people of a fire or burglary detected or, as part of a traditional alarm clock, to awaken or remind Church bell, indicating when to go to church Doorbell, a signaling device to alert residents to visitors Division bell, used in a parliament to call members to a vote Last call bell, a signal that a bar is closing soon School bell, a signal used for transitions during a school day Ship's bell, a signal for marking time on a shipPeople Bell (surname), a list of people with the surname Bell Alexander Graham Bell (1847–1922), Scottish-Canad
Nokia Bell Labs, originally named Bell Telephone Laboratories (1925–1984),then AT&T Bell Laboratories (1984–1996)and Bell Labs Innovations (1996–2007),is an American industrial research and scientific development company owned by Finnish company Nokia.
It is headquartered in Murray Hill, New Jersey, and operates a global network of laboratories.
Bjarne Stroustrup (; ; born 30 December 1950) is a computer scientist, most notable for the invention and development of the C++ programming language.
Stroustrup served as a visiting professor of computer science at Columbia University in the City of New York beginning in 2014, where he has been a full professor since 2022.
The brain (or encephalon) is an organ that serves as the center of the nervous system in all vertebrate and most invertebrate animals.
The brain is the largest cluster of neurons in the body and is typically located in the head, usually near organs for special senses such as vision, hearing and olfaction.
Byzantium () or Byzantion () was an ancient Greek city in classical antiquity that became known as Constantinople in late antiquity and Istanbul today.
The Greek name Byzantion and its Latinization Byzantium continued to be used as a name of Constantinople sporadically and to varying degrees during the thousand year existence of the Byzantine Empire.
Biotics describe living or once living components of a community; for example organisms, such as animals and plants.
Biotic may refer to:Life, the condition of living organismsBiology, the study of lifeBiotic material, which is derived from living organismsBiotic components in ecologyBiotic potential, an organism's reproductive capacityBiotic community, all the interacting organisms living together in a specific habitatBiotic energy, a vital force theorized by biochemist Benjamin MooreBiotic Baking Brigade, an unofficial group of pie-throwing activistsSee alsoAbioticAntibiotics are agents that either kill bacteria or inhibit their growth Prebiotics are non-digestible food ingredients that stimulate the growth or activity of bacteria in the digestive systemProbiotics consist of a live culture of bacteria that inhibit or interfere with colonization by microbial pathogensSynbiotics refer to nutritional supplements combining probiotics and prebiotics
The Berlin Wall (, ) was a guarded concrete barrier that encircled West Berlin of the Federal Republic of Germany (FRG; West Germany) from 1961 to 1989, separating it from East Berlin and the German Democratic Republic (GDR; East Germany).
Construction of the Berlin Wall was commenced by the government of the GDR on 13 August 1961.
Bass ( ) (also called bottom end) describes tones of low (also called "deep") frequency, pitch and range from 16 to 250 Hz (C0 to middle C4) and bass instruments that produce tones in the low-pitched range C2-C4.
They belong to different families of instruments and can cover a wide range of musical roles.
UK bass, also called bass music, is club music that emerged in the United Kingdom during the mid-2000s under the influence of diverse genres such as house, grime, dubstep, UK garage, R&B, and UK funky.
The term "UK bass" came into use as artists began ambiguously blending the sounds of these defined genres while maintaining an emphasis on percussive, bass-led rhythm.
A burning glass or burning lens is a large convex lens that can concentrate the sun's rays onto a small area, heating up the area and thus resulting in ignition of the exposed surface.
Burning mirrors achieve a similar effect by using reflecting surfaces to focus the light.
The Battle of Adrianople (378 CE), in which Gothic rebels defeated the Eastern Roman Empire, was the main battle of the Gothic War (376–382).
Battle of Adrianople may also refer to:Battle of Adrianople (324), a battle in which Constantine the Great defeated Licinius in a Roman civil warSiege of Adrianople (378), an unsuccessful siege by the Goths following the Battle of AdrianopleBattle of Adrianople (718), a battle between an alliance of Bulgarians and Byzantines against the Umayyad Caliphate, during the Siege of Constantinople (717–718)Battle of Adrianople (813), a successful Bulgarian siege of the Byzantine cityBattle of Adrianople (914), a battle between Bulgarians and ByzantinesBattle of Adrianople (972), a battle between Byzantines and Kievan Rus' led by Sviatoslav I of KievBattle of Adrianople (1003), a battle between Bulgarians and ByzantinesBattle of Adrianople (1094), part of the revolt of Constantine Diogenes (pretender) and his Cuman alliesBattle of Adrianople (12
A beacon is an intentionally conspicuous device designed to attract attention to a specific location.
A common example is the lighthouse, which draws attention to a fixed point that can be used to navigate around obstacles or into port.
Bhangra () is a type of non-traditional music of Punjab originating in Britain, specifically Southall.
It is a type of upbeat popular music associated with the Punjabi diaspora in Britain.
Beastie Boys were an American hip hop/rap rock group from New York City, formed in 1981.
The group was composed of Michael "Mike D" Diamond (vocals, drums), Adam "MCA" Yauch (vocals, bass), and Adam "Ad-Rock" Horovitz (vocals, guitar, programming).
The British Isles are a group of islands in the North Atlantic Ocean off the north-western coast of continental Europe, consisting of the islands of Great Britain, Ireland, the Isle of Man, the Inner and Outer Hebrides, the Northern Isles (Orkney and Shetland), and over six thousand smaller islands.
They have a total area of  and a combined population of almost 72 million, and include two sovereign states, the Republic of Ireland (which covers roughly five-sixths of Ireland), and the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland.
Basque (;  ) is a language spoken by Basques and others of the Basque Country, a region that straddles the westernmost Pyrenees in adjacent parts of northern Spain and southwestern France.
Linguistically, Basque is a language isolate (unrelated to any other existing languages).
Björn Kristian Ulvæus (; born 25 April 1945) is a Swedish musician, singer, songwriter, and producer best known as a member of the musical group ABBA.
He is also the co-composer of the musicals Chess, Kristina från Duvemåla, and Mamma Mia!
Göran Bror
Benny Andersson (; born 16 December 1946) is a Swedish musician, composer and producer best known as a member of the pop group ABBA and co-composer of the musicals Chess, Kristina från Duvemåla, and Mamma Mia!
Bluetooth is a short-range wireless technology standard that is used for exchanging data between fixed and mobile devices over short distances and building personal area networks (PANs).
In the most widely used mode, transmission power is limited to 2.5 milliwatts, giving it a very short range of up to .
The Bluetooth Special Interest Group (Bluetooth SIG) is the standards organization that oversees the development of Bluetooth standards and the licensing of the Bluetooth technologies and trademarks to manufacturers.
The SIG is a not-for-profit, non-stock corporation founded in September 1998.
Boney M. were a German vocal group that specializes in disco and funk, created by German record producer Frank Farian, who was the group's primary songwriter.
Originally based in West Germany, the four original members of the group's official line-up were Liz Mitchell and Marcia Barrett from Jamaica, Maizie Williams from Montserrat, and Bobby Farrell from Aruba.
Britain most often refers to: The United Kingdom, a sovereign state in Europe comprising the island of Great Britain, the north-eastern part of the island of Ireland and many smaller islands Great Britain, the largest island in: the United Kingdom; the British Isles archipelago; and Europe.
Britain may also refer to:Places British Isles, an archipelago comprising Great Britain, Ireland and many other smaller islands British Islands, the UK, Channel Islands and Isle of Man collectively Roman Britain, a Roman province corresponding roughly to modern-day England and Wales Historical predecessors to the present-day United Kingdom: Kingdom of Great Britain (1707 to 1801) United Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland (1801 to 1922)
Blade Runner is a 1982 science fiction film directed by Ridley Scott, and written by Hampton Fancher and David Peoples.
Starring Harrison Ford, Rutger Hauer, Sean Young, and Edward James Olmos, it is an adaptation of Philip K. Dick's 1968 novel Do Androids Dream of Electric Sheep?
William Henry Gates III  (born October 28, 1955) is an American business magnate, investor, philanthropist, and writer best known for co-founding the software giant Microsoft, along with his childhood friend Paul Allen.
During his career at Microsoft, Gates held the positions of chairman, chief executive officer (CEO), president, and chief software architect, while also being its largest individual shareholder until May 2014.
The Belgian Blue (, , both literally meaning "Belgian White-Blue") is a breed of beef cattle from Belgium.
It may also be known as the , or  (literally "fat buttocks" in Dutch).
Boron is a chemical element with the symbol B and atomic number 5.
In its crystalline form it is a brittle, dark, lustrous metalloid; in its amorphous form it is a brown powder.
Bromine is a chemical element with the symbol Br and atomic number 35.
It is a volatile red-brown liquid at room temperature that evaporates readily to form a similarly coloured vapour.
Barium is a chemical element with the symbol Ba and atomic number 56.
It is the fifth element in group 2 and is a soft, silvery alkaline earth metal.
Berkelium is a transuranic radioactive chemical element with the symbol Bk and atomic number 97.
It is a member of the actinide and transuranium element series.
Bauxite is a sedimentary rock with a relatively high aluminium content.
It is the world's main source of aluminium and gallium.
Bavaria ( ;  ), officially the Free State of Bavaria ( ; ), is a state in the south-east of Germany.
With an area of , Bavaria is the largest German state by land area, comprising roughly a fifth of the total land area of Germany.
Brandenburg (; ; Polabian: Branibor  ), officially the State of Brandenburg (German: Land Brandenburg; Low German: Land Brannenborg; ), is a state in the northeast of Germany bordering the states of Mecklenburg-Vorpommern, Lower Saxony, Saxony-Anhalt, and Saxony, as well as the country of Poland.
With an area of 29,480 square kilometres (11,382 square miles) and a population of 2.5 million residents, it is the fifth-largest German state by area and the tenth-most populous.
The Bundestag (, "Federal Diet") is the German federal parliament.
It is the only federal representative body that is directly elected by the German people, comparable to the United States House of Representatives or the House of Commons of the United Kingdom.
Bayerische Motoren Werke AG, abbreviated as BMW (), is a German multinational manufacturer of luxury vehicles and motorcycles headquartered in Munich, Bavaria, Germany.
The company was founded in 1916 as a manufacturer of aircraft engines, which it produced from 1917 to 1918 and again from 1933 to 1945.
Bisexuality better known as bisexual, in human sexuality, describes a person that is sexually attracted to persons of both the same sex and persons of the opposite sex.
Bisexual may also refer to:Bisexual characteristics, having an ambiguous sexual identity (e.g. epicenity or androgyny)A bisexual flower (monoicy), in botany, one that possesses both male (pollen-producing) and female (seed-producing) partsA bisexual plant (monoecy), in botany, having separate male and female cones or flowers on the same plantDioecy, in biology, a species that has members of two different distinct sexes (e.g. humans), opposed to unisexual (only one sex present, always females)
Bornholm () is a Danish island in the Baltic Sea, to the east of the rest of Denmark, south of Sweden, northeast of Germany and north of Poland.
Strategically located, Bornholm has been fought over for centuries.
A bay is an area of water bordered by land on three sides.
Bay, Bays or baying may also refer to:PlacesChina  Bay County or Baicheng County, Aksu Prefecture, Xinjiang Uyghur Autonomous RegionFrance  Bay, Haute-Saône, a communePhilippines  Bay, Laguna, a municipality Bay RiverSomalia  Bay, SomaliaUnited Kingdom  Morecambe Bay, the largest intertidal bay in EnglandUnited States  Bay, Arkansas Bay, Springfield, Massachusetts, a neighborhood Bay, Missouri Bay County, Florida Bay County, Michigan Bays, Kentucky Bays, Ohio Chesapeake Bay, an estuary in the District of Columbia, Maryland, Delaware, and Virginia Jamaica Bay, in Queens, New York San Francisco Bay, a shallow estuary in the U.S. state of California San Francisco Bay Area, or simply the Bay AreaAnimals and plantsAnimals Bay (horse), a color of the hair coats of some horses Baying, a kind of howling made by caninesPlants Bay laurel, the evergreen laurel tree species Laurus nobilis Bay leaf,
A book is a medium for recording information in the form of writing or images, typically composed of many pages (made of papyrus, parchment, vellum, or paper) bound together and protected by a cover.
It can also be a  handwritten or printed work of fiction or nonfiction, usually on sheets of paper fastened or bound together within covers.
The B-52 is an American strategic bomber aircraft.
B-52 or B52 may also refer to: The B-52's, an American new wave band The B-52's (album) B52 (New York City bus), a bus line in Brooklyn, New York B52 (chess opening), a chess opening based on the Sicilian Defence B-52 (cocktail) B-52 (hairstyle) or beehive, a hairstyle B-52 Memorial Park, a park within the Orlando International Airport, Florida Volvo B52 engine, a group of Volvo engines Nora B-52, a Serbian self-propelled howitzer HLA-B52, an HLA-B serotype Bundesstraße 52, a federal highway in Germany B52, route number for Kings Highway in Australia B-52, a coded reference to Mao Zedong in Project 571 B-52, a pennant number of the Argentinian fast transport ship ARA Hércules (B-52)
Bal Keshav Thackeray (; 23 January 1926 – 17 November 2012) also known as Balasaheb Thackeray, was an Indian politician who founded the Shiv Sena, a right-wing pro-Marathi and Hindu nationalist party active mainly in the state of Maharashtra.
Thackeray began his professional career as a cartoonist with the English-language daily, The Free Press Journal in Bombay, but he left the paper in 1960 to form his own political weekly, Marmik.
Bille August  (born 9 November 1948) is a Danish director, screenwriter, and cinematographer of film and television.
In a career spanning over four decades, he has been the recipient of numerous accolades, making him one of the most acclaimed contemporary Danish filmmakers.
Bitola (;  ) is a city in the southwestern part of North Macedonia.
It is located in the southern part of the Pelagonia valley, surrounded by the Baba, Nidže, and Kajmakčalan mountain ranges,  north of the Medžitlija-Níki border crossing with Greece.
The Battle of Bosworth or Bosworth Field ( ) was the last significant battle of the Wars of the Roses, the civil war between the houses of Lancaster and York that extended across England in the latter half of the 15th century.
Fought on 22 August 1485, the battle was won by an alliance of Lancastrians and disaffected Yorkists.
Brassicaceae () or (the older) Cruciferae () is a medium-sized and economically important family of flowering plants commonly known as the mustards, the crucifers, or the cabbage family.
Most are herbaceous plants, while some are shrubs.
Baseball statistics play an important role in evaluating the progress of a player or team.
Since the flow of a baseball game has natural breaks to it, and normally players act individually rather than performing in clusters, the sport lends itself to easy record-keeping and statistics.
In baseball, an at bat (AB) or time at bat is a batter's turn batting against a pitcher.
An at bat is different from a plate appearance.
In baseball, an earned run is any run that was fully enabled by the offensive team's production in the face of competent play from the defensive team.
Conversely, an unearned run is a run that would not have been scored without the aid of an error or a passed ball committed by the defense.
A base on balls (BB), also known as a walk, occurs in baseball when a batter receives four pitches during a plate appearance that the umpire calls balls, and is in turn awarded first base without the possibility of being called out.
The base on balls is defined in Section 2.00 of baseball's Official Rules, and further detail is given in 6.08(a).
In baseball statistics, total bases (TB) is the number of bases a player has gained with hits.
It is a weighted sum for which the weight value is 1 for a single, 2 for a double, 3 for a triple and 4 for a home run.
In baseball, hit by pitch (HBP) is an event in which a batter or his clothing or equipment (other than his bat) is struck directly by a pitch from the pitcher; the batter is called a hit batsman (HB).
A hit batsman is awarded first base, provided that (in the plate umpire's judgment) he made an honest effort to avoid the pitch, although failure to do so is rarely called by an umpire.
In baseball statistics, a hit (denoted by H), also called a base hit, is credited to a batter when the batter safely reaches or passes first base after hitting the ball into fair territory with neither the benefit of an error nor a fielder's choice.
Scoring a hitTo achieve a hit, the batter must reach first base before any fielder can either tag him with the ball, throw to another player protecting the base before the batter reaches it, or tag first base while carrying the ball.
In baseball statistics, on-base percentage (OBP) measures how frequently a batter reaches base.
An official Major League Baseball (MLB) statistic since 1984, it is sometimes referred to as on-base average (OBA), as it is rarely presented as a true percentage.
In baseball, a sacrifice fly (sometimes abbreviated to sac fly) is defined by Rule 9.08(d):"Score a sacrifice fly when, before two are out, the batter hits a ball in flight handled by an outfielder or an infielder running in the outfield in fair or foul territory that is caught, and a run scores after the catch, or is dropped, and a runner scores, if in the scorer's judgment the runner could have scored after the catch had the fly ball been caught.
"They are so named because the batter allows a teammate to score a run, while "sacrificing" his or her ability to do so.
On-base plus slugging (OPS) is a sabermetric baseball statistic calculated as the sum of a player's on-base percentage and slugging percentage.
The ability of a player both to get on base and to hit for power, two important offensive skills, are represented.
In baseball, a stolen base occurs when a runner advances to a base unaided by other actions and the official scorer rules that the advance should be credited to the action of the runner.
The umpires determine whether the runner is safe or out at the next base, but the official scorer rules on the question of credit or blame for the advance under Rule 10 (Rules of Scoring) of the MLB's Official Rules.
In baseball, a player is credited with a plate appearance (denoted by PA) each time he completes a turn batting.
Under Rule 5.04(c) of the Official Baseball Rules, a player completes a turn batting when he is put out or becomes a runner.
Games played (GP) is a statistic used in team sports to indicate the total number of games in which a player has participated (in any capacity); the statistic is generally applied irrespective of whatever portion of the game is contested.
BaseballIn baseball, the statistic applies to players, who prior to a game, are included on a starting lineup card or are announced as an ex ante substitute, whether or not they play.
Boogie Down Productions (BDP) was an American hip hop group originally composed of KRS-One, D-Nice, and DJ Scott La Rock.
DJ Scott La Rock was murdered on August 27, 1987, five months after the release of BDP's debut album, Criminal Minded.
In computing and electronic systems, binary-coded decimal (BCD) is a class of binary encodings of decimal numbers where each digit is represented by a fixed number of bits, usually four or eight.
Sometimes, special bit patterns are used for a sign or other indications (e.g. error or overflow).
BCD may refer to:Computing Binary-coded decimal, a representation of decimal digits in binary BCD (character encoding), a 6-bit superset of binary-coded decimal derived from the binary encoding of the same name Boot Configuration Data, the configuration data required to boot Microsoft Windows Vista and later Bipolar-CMOS-DMOS, a type of BiCMOS semiconductor technologyOrganisations Basnahira Cricket Dundee, a Sri Lankan cricket team BCD Tofu House, a Los Angeles-based Korean restaurant chain BCD Travel, a provider of global corporate travel management Belarusian Christian Democracy, a Christian-democratic political party in Belarus.
Berkshire Country Day School, an independent school in Lenox, Massachusetts, US Bid Closing Date
Bumin Qaghan (, also known as Illig Qaghan (Chinese: 伊利可汗, Pinyin: Yīlì Kèhán, Wade–Giles: i-li k'o-han) or Yamï Qaghan (, died 552 AD) was the founder of the Turkic Khaganate.
He was the eldest son of Ashina Tuwu (吐務 / 吐务).
Bilge Qaghan (; ; 683 – 25 November 734) was the fourth Qaghan of the Second Turkic Khaganate.
His accomplishments were described in the Orkhon inscriptions.
The Staatliches Bauhaus (), commonly known as the , was a German art school operational from 1919 to 1933 that combined crafts and the fine arts.
The school became famous for its approach to design, which attempted to unify individual artistic vision with the principles of mass production and emphasis on function.
Beowulf (;  ) is an Old English epic poem in the tradition of Germanic heroic legend consisting of 3,182 alliterative lines.
It is one of the most important and most often translated works of Old English literature.
Barb Wire is a fictional character appearing in Comics Greatest World, an imprint of Dark Horse Comics.
Created by Chris Warner and Team CGW, the character first appeared in Comics' Greatest World:
Blazing Saddles is a 1974 American satirical postmodernist Western black comedy film directed by Mel Brooks, who co-wrote the screenplay with Andrew Bergman, Richard Pryor, Norman Steinberg and Alan Uger, based on a story treatment by Bergman.
The film stars Cleavon Little and Gene Wilder.
Michael Bruce Sterling (born April 14, 1954) is an American science fiction author known for his novels and short fiction and editorship of the Mirrorshades anthology.
In particular, he is linked to the cyberpunk subgenre.
Brain abscess (or cerebral abscess) is an abscess within the brain tissue caused by inflammation and collection of infected material coming from local (ear infection, dental abscess, infection of paranasal sinuses, infection of the mastoid air cells of the temporal bone, epidural abscess) or remote (lung, heart, kidney etc.) infectious sources.
The infection may also be introduced through a skull fracture following a head trauma or surgical procedures.
Brigitte Anne-Marie Bardot ( ; ; born 28 September 1934), often referred to by her initials B.B., is a French animal rights activist and former actress, singer, and model.
Famous for portraying sexually emancipated characters, often with hedonistic lifestyles, she was one of the best known sex symbols of the 1950s–1970s.
The banjo is a stringed instrument with a thin membrane stretched over a frame or cavity to form a resonator.
The membrane is typically circular, in modern forms usually made of plastic, originally of animal skin.
Baseball is a bat-and-ball sport played between two teams of nine players each, taking turns batting and fielding.
The game occurs over the course of several plays, with each play generally beginning when a player on the fielding team, called the pitcher, throws a ball that a player on the batting team, called the batter, tries to hit with a bat.
In the sport of baseball, each of the nine players on a team is assigned a particular fielding position when it is their turn to play defense.
Each position conventionally has an associated number, for use in scorekeeping by the official scorer: 1 (pitcher), 2 (catcher), 3 (first baseman), 4 (second baseman), 5 (third baseman), 6 (shortstop), 7 (left fielder), 8 (center fielder), and 9 (right fielder).
The history of baseball in the United States dates to the 18th century, when boys and amateur enthusiasts played a baseball-like game by their own informal rules using homemade equipment.
The popularity of the sport grew and amateur men's ball clubs were formed in the 1830–50s.
The Major League Baseball Most Valuable Player Award (MVP) is an annual Major League Baseball (MLB) award given to one outstanding player in the American League and one in the National League.
The award has been presented by the Baseball Writers' Association of America (BBWAA) since 1931.
In Major League Baseball, the Rookie of the Year Award is given annually to two outstanding rookie players, one each for the American League (AL) and National League (NL), as voted on by the Baseball Writers' Association of America (BBWAA).
The award was established in 1940 by the Chicago chapter of the BBWAA, which selected an annual winner from 1940 through 1946.
The National League Championship Series (NLCS), also known as the National League Pennant, is a best-of-seven playoff and one of two League Championship Series comprising the penultimate round of Major League Baseball's (MLB) postseason.
It is contested by the winners of the two National League (NL) Division Series.
The American League Championship Series (ALCS), also known as the American League Pennant, is a best-of-seven playoff and one of two League Championship Series comprising the penultimate round of Major League Baseball's (MLB) postseason.
The winner of the ALCS wins the AL pennant and advances to the World Series, MLB's championship series, to play the winner of the National League's (NL) Championship Series.
In Major League Baseball, the American League Division Series (ALDS) determines which two teams from the American League will advance to the American League Championship Series.
The Division Series consists of two best-of-five series, featuring each of the two division winners with the best records and the winners of the wild-card play-off.
In Major League Baseball, the National League Division Series (NLDS) determines which two teams from the National League will advance to the National League Championship Series.
The Division Series consists of two best-of-five series, featuring each of the two division winners with the best records and the winners of the wild-card play-offs.
The 2001 World Series was the championship series of Major League Baseball's (MLB) 2001 season.
The 97th edition of the World Series, it was a best-of-seven playoff between the National League (NL) champion Arizona Diamondbacks and the three-time defending World Series champions and American League (AL) champion New York Yankees.
The 1903 World Series was the first modern World Series to be played in Major League Baseball.
It matched the American League (AL) champion Boston Americans against the National League (NL) champion Pittsburgh Pirates in a best-of-nine series, with Boston prevailing five games to three, winning the last four.
Bluetongue disease is a noncontagious, insect-borne, viral disease of ruminants, mainly sheep and less frequently cattle, yaks, goats, buffalo, deer, dromedaries, and antelope.
It is caused by Bluetongue virus (BTV).
Bruce Perens (born around 1958) is an American computer programmer and advocate in the free software movement.
He created The Open Source Definition and published the first formal announcement and manifesto of open source.
Bundle theory, originated by the 18th century Scottish philosopher David Hume, is the ontological theory about objecthood in which an object consists only of a collection (bundle) of properties, relations or tropes.
According to bundle theory, an object consists of its properties and nothing more; thus, there cannot be an object without properties and one cannot conceive of such an object.
Field Marshal Bernard Law Montgomery, 1st Viscount Montgomery of Alamein,  (; 17 November 1887 – 24 March 1976), nicknamed "Monty", was a senior British Army officer who served in the First World War, the Irish War of Independence and the Second World War.
Montgomery first saw action in the First World War as a junior officer of the Royal Warwickshire Regiment.
Herman Boerhaave (, 31 December 1668 – 23 September 1738) was a Dutch botanist, chemist, Christian humanist, and physician of European fame.
He is regarded as the founder of clinical teaching and of the modern academic hospital and is sometimes referred to as "the father of physiology," along with Venetian physician Santorio Santorio (1561–1636).
Benjamin Disraeli, 1st Earl of Beaconsfield,  (21 December 1804 – 19 April 1881) was a British statesman, Conservative politician and writer who twice served as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom.
He played a central role in the creation of the modern Conservative Party, defining its policies and its broad outreach.
In probability theory and statistics, the binomial distribution with parameters n and p is the discrete probability distribution of the number of successes in a sequence of n independent experiments, each asking a yes–no question, and each with its own Boolean-valued outcome: success (with probability p) or failure (with probability ).
A single success/failure experiment is also called a Bernoulli trial or Bernoulli experiment, and a sequence of outcomes is called a Bernoulli process; for a single trial, i.e., n = 1, the binomial distribution is a Bernoulli distribution.
Biostatistics (also known as biometry) is a branch of statistics that applies statistical methods to a wide range of topics in biology.
It encompasses the design of biological experiments, the collection and analysis of data from those experiments and the interpretation of the results.
The Bible is a canonical collection of texts considered sacred in Judaism or Christianity.
Different religious groups include different books within their canons, in different orders, and sometimes divide or combine books, or incorporate additional material into canonical books.
The British & Irish Lions is a rugby union team selected from players eligible for the national teams of England, Ireland, Scotland, and Wales.
The Lions are a test side and most often select players who have already played for their national team, although they can pick uncapped players who are eligible for any of the four unions.
The bass guitar, electric bass or simply bass () is the lowest-pitched member of the guitar family.
It is a plucked string instrument similar in appearance and construction to an electric or acoustic guitar, but with a longer neck and scale length, and typically four to six strings or courses.
Basketball is a team sport in which two teams, most commonly of five players each, opposing one another on a rectangular court, compete with the primary objective of shooting a basketball (approximately  in diameter) through the defender's hoop (a basket  in diameter mounted  high to a backboard at each end of the court), while preventing the opposing team from shooting through their own hoop.
A field goal is worth two points, unless made from behind the three-point line, when it is worth three.
Blowfish are species of fish in the family Tetraodontidae.
Blowfish may also refer to: Porcupinefish, belonging to the family Diodontidae Blowfish (cipher), an encryption algorithm Blowfish (company), an American erotic goods supplier The Blowfish, a satirical newspaper at Brandeis University Lexington County Blowfish, a baseball team Vice President Blowfish, a character in the animated series Adventure Time episode "President Porpoise Is Missing!"See also Hootie & the Blowfish, an American rock band
A ball is a round object (usually spherical, but can sometimes be ovoid) with several uses.
It is used in ball games, where the play of the game follows the state of the ball as it is hit, kicked or thrown by players.
In mathematics, a binary relation associates elements of one set, called the domain, with elements of another set, called the codomain.
A binary relation over sets  and  is a new set of ordered pairs  consisting of elements  from  and  from .
Braille ( , ) is a tactile writing system used by people who are visually impaired.
It can be read either on embossed paper or by using refreshable braille displays that connect to computers and smartphone devices.
Bastille Day is the common name given in English-speaking countries to the national day of France, which is celebrated on 14 July each year.
In French, it is formally called the  (; ); legally it is known as  (; ).
Blowfish is a symmetric-key block cipher, designed in 1993 by Bruce Schneier and included in many cipher suites and encryption products.
Blowfish provides a good encryption rate in software, and no effective cryptanalysis of it has been found to date.
A bijection is a function that is both injective (one-to-one) and surjective (onto).
In other words, every element in the codomain of the function is mapped to by exactly one element in the domain of the function.
In mathematics, a binary function (also called bivariate function, or function of two variables) is a function that takes two inputs.
Precisely stated, a function  is binary if there exists sets  such thatwhere  is the Cartesian product of  andAlternative definitionsSet-theoretically, a binary function can be represented as a subset of the Cartesian product , where  belongs to the subset if and only if .
Blue Velvet is a 1986 American neo-noir mystery thriller film written and directed by David Lynch.
Blending psychological horror with film noir, the film stars Kyle MacLachlan, Isabella Rossellini, Dennis Hopper, and Laura Dern, and is named after the 1951 song of the same name.
In mathematics, a binary operation or dyadic operation is a rule for combining two elements (called operands) to produce another element.
More formally, a binary operation is an operation of arity two.
Bagpipes are a woodwind instrument using enclosed reeds fed from a constant reservoir of air in the form of a bag.
The Great Highland bagpipes are well known, but people have played bagpipes for centuries throughout large parts of Europe, Northern Africa, Western Asia, around the Persian Gulf and northern parts of South Asia.
Bedrock Records is an English record label for trance, progressive house and techno started by John Digweed.
Its name comes from a long running and successful club night held in Hastings and also at Heaven nightclub, London - both also called Bedrock.
Biochemistry or biological chemistry is the study of chemical processes within and relating to living organisms.
A sub-discipline of both chemistry and biology, biochemistry may be divided into three fields: structural biology, enzymology, and metabolism.
Badminton is a racquet sport played using racquets to hit a shuttlecock across a net.
Although it may be played with larger teams, the most common forms of the game are "singles" (with one player per side) and "doubles" (with two players per side).
The Baroque (, ; ) or Baroquism is a Western style of architecture, music, dance, painting, sculpture, poetry, and other arts that flourished from the early 17th century until the 1750s.
It followed Renaissance art and Mannerism and preceded the Rococo (in the past often referred to as "late Baroque") and Neoclassical styles.
In abstract algebra, a Boolean algebra or Boolean lattice is a complemented distributive lattice.
This type of algebraic structure captures essential properties of both set operations and logic operations.
The Bank of Italy (Italian: Banca d'Italia,  informally referred to as Bankitalia) () is the central bank of Italy and part of the European System of Central Banks.
It is located in Palazzo Koch, via Nazionale, Rome.
British may refer to:Peoples, culture, and language British people, nationals or natives of the United Kingdom, British Overseas Territories, and Crown Dependencies.
British national identity, the characteristics of British people and culture British English, the English language as spoken and written in the United Kingdom or, more broadly, throughout the British Isles Celtic Britons, an ancient ethno-linguistic group Brittonic languages, a branch of the Insular Celtic language family (formerly called British) Common Brittonic, an ancient languageOther usesBrit(ish), a 2018 memoir by Afua HirschPeople or things associated with: Great Britain, an island United Kingdom, a sovereign state  Kingdom of Great Britain (1707–1800) United Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland (1801–1922)See also Terminology of the British Isles Alternative names for the British English (disambiguation)
Beachcomber is a nom de plume that has been used by several journalists writing a long-running humorous column in the Daily Express.
It was originated in 1917 by Major John Bernard Arbuthnot MVO as his signature on the column, titled 'By the Way'.
William Nelson Joy (born November 8, 1954) is an American computer engineer and venture capitalist.
He co-founded Sun Microsystems in 1982 along with Scott McNealy, Vinod Khosla, and Andy Bechtolsheim, and served as Chief Scientist and CTO at the company until 2003.
Bandwidth is the difference between the upper and lower frequencies in a continuous band of frequencies.
It is typically measured in hertz, and depending on context, may specifically refer to passband bandwidth or baseband bandwidth.
In Buddhism, a bodhisattva ( ; () or bodhisatva is a person who is on the path towards bodhi ('awakening') or Buddhahood.
In the Early Buddhist schools, as well as modern Theravāda Buddhism, bodhisattva (Pāli: bodhisatta) refers to someone who has made a resolution to become a Buddha and has also received a confirmation or prediction from a living Buddha that this will be so.
Buckingham Palace () is a royal residence in London and the administrative headquarters of the monarch of the United Kingdom.
Located in the City of Westminster, the palace is often at the centre of state occasions and royal hospitality.
British Airways (BA) is the flag carrier of the United Kingdom.
It is headquartered in London, England, near its main hub at Heathrow Airport.
A bicycle, also called a pedal cycle, bike, push-bike or cycle, is a human-powered or motor-powered assisted, pedal-driven, single-track vehicle, having two wheels attached to a frame, one behind the other.
A  is called a cyclist, or bicyclist.
Biopolymers are natural polymers produced by the cells of living organisms.
Like other polymers, biopolymers consist of monomeric units that are covalently bonded in chains to form larger molecules.
The 2001 United Kingdom general election was held on Thursday 7 June 2001, four years after the previous election on 1 May 1997, to elect 659 members to the House of Commons.
The governing Labour Party was re-elected to serve a second term in government with another landslide victory with a 167 majority, returning 412 members of Parliament versus 418 from the 1997 general election, a net loss of six seats, though with a significantly lower turnout than before—59.4%, compared to 71.6% at the previous election.
The Book of Mormon is a religious text of the Latter Day Saint movement, which, according to Latter Day Saint theology, contains writings of ancient prophets who lived on the American continent from 600 BC to AD 421 and during an interlude dated by the text to the unspecified time of the Tower of Babel.
It was first published in March 1830 by Joseph Smith as The Book of Mormon: An Account Written by the Hand of Mormon upon Plates Taken from the Plates of Nephi.
Baptists form a major branch of Protestantism distinguished by baptizing only professing Christian believers (believer's baptism), and doing so by complete immersion.
Baptist churches also generally subscribe to the doctrines of soul competency (the responsibility and accountability of every person before God), sola fide (salvation by just faith alone), sola scriptura (scripture alone as the rule of faith and practice) and congregationalist church government.
Blackjack (formerly black jack and vingt-un) is a casino banking game.
It is the most widely played casino banking game in the world.
In inorganic chemistry, bicarbonate (IUPAC-recommended nomenclature: hydrogencarbonate) is an intermediate form in the deprotonation of carbonic acid.
It is a polyatomic anion with the chemical formula .
Bernard Allan Federko (born May 12, 1956) is a Canadian former professional ice hockey centre who played fourteen seasons in the National Hockey League from 1976 through 1990.
Playing careerFederko began playing hockey at a young age in his home town of Foam Lake, Saskatchewan.
Buffalo is the second-most populated city in the U.S. state of New York and the seat of Erie County.
It lies in Western New York, at the eastern end of Lake Erie, at the head of the Niagara River, on the United States border with Canada.
Benjamin Franklin  ( April 17, 1790) was an American polymath who was active as a writer, scientist, inventor, statesman, diplomat, printer, publisher, and political philosopher.
Among the leading intellectuals of his time, Franklin was one of the Founding Fathers of the United States, a drafter and signer of the Declaration of Independence, and the first postmaster general.
In mathematics, more specifically in functional analysis, a Banach space (pronounced ) is a complete normed vector space.
Thus, a Banach space is a vector space with a metric that allows the computation of vector length and distance between vectors and is complete in the sense that a Cauchy sequence of vectors always converges to a well-defined limit that is within the space.
Abraham Stoker (8 November 1847 – 20 April 1912) was an Irish author who wrote the 1897 Gothic horror novel Dracula.
During his lifetime, he was better known as the personal assistant of actor Sir Henry Irving and business manager of the West End's Lyceum Theatre, which Irving owned.
Billion is a name for a large number.
It may refer specifically to: 1,000,000,000 (, one thousand million), the short scale definition 1,000,000,000,000 (, one million million), the long scale definitionBillion may also refer to:Film and TV Billions (TV series), a Showtime series Billions (film), a 1920 silent comedy Mr. Billion, a 1977 film by Jonathan KaplanMusic "Billions" a 2023 song by Caroline Polachek, from the album Desire, I Want to Turn Into You "Billions", a 2017 song by Russell Dickerson, from the album Yours "Billion", a 1996 song by Cardiacs, from the album Sing to GodOther Billion (company), a Taiwanese modem manufacturer Jack Billion (1939–2023), American politicianSee also Long and short scales Names of large numbers Billion laughs, an XML parser vulnerability Golden billion, a Russian term for the wealthy people of the developed world Billon (disambiguation)
Contract bridge, or simply bridge, is a trick-taking card game using a standard 52-card deck.
In its basic format, it is played by four players in two competing partnerships, with partners sitting opposite each other around a table.
A boat is a watercraft of a large range of types and sizes, but generally smaller than a ship, which is distinguished by its larger size, shape, cargo or passenger capacity, or its ability to carry boats.
Small boats are typically found on inland waterways such as rivers and lakes, or in protected coastal areas.
Blood is a body fluid in the circulatory system of humans and other vertebrates that delivers necessary substances such as nutrients and oxygen to the cells, and transports metabolic waste products away from those same cells.
Blood in the circulatory system is also known as peripheral blood, and the blood cells it carries, peripheral blood cells.
Benoit B. Mandelbrot (20 November 1924 – 14 October 2010) was a Polish-born French-American mathematician and polymath with broad interests in the practical sciences, especially regarding what he labeled as "the art of roughness" of physical phenomena and "the uncontrolled element in life".
He referred to himself as a "fractalist" and is recognized for his contribution to the field of fractal geometry, which included coining the word "fractal", as well as developing a theory of "roughness and self-similarity" in nature.
Benedict of Nursia  (; ; 2 March AD 480 – 21 March AD 547), often known as Saint Benedict, was an  Italian Christian monk, writer, and theologian - venerated in the Catholic Church, the Eastern Orthodox Church, the Oriental Orthodox Churches, the Anglican Communion, and Old Catholic Churches.
In 1964 Pope Paul VI declared Benedict a patron saint of Europe.
The Battle of Pharsalus was the decisive battle of Caesar's Civil War fought on 9 August 48 BC near Pharsalus in Central Greece.
Julius Caesar and his allies formed up opposite the army of the Roman Republic under the command of Pompey.
Bigfoot, also commonly referred to as Sasquatch, is a large and hairy human-like mythical creature purported to inhabit forests in North America, particularly in the Pacific Northwest.
Enthusiasts of the subject have offered various forms of dubious evidence to prove Bigfoot's existence, including anecdotal claims of sightings, as well as alleged photographs, video and audio recordings, hair samples, and casts of large footprints.
Harry Lillis "Bing" Crosby Jr. (May 3, 1903 – October 14, 1977) was an American singer, actor, television producer, television and radio personality and businessman.
The first multimedia star, he was one of the most popular and influential musical artists of the 20th century worldwide.
The Basel Convention on the Control of Transboundary Movements of Hazardous Wastes and Their Disposal, usually known as the Basel Convention, is an international treaty that was designed to reduce the movements of hazardous waste between nations, and specifically to prevent transfer of hazardous waste from developed to less developed countries.
It does not, however, address the movement of radioactive waste.
Bar Kokhba is a double album by John Zorn, recorded between 1994 and 1996.
It features music from Zorn's Masada project, rearranged for small ensembles.
BASIC (Beginners' All-purpose Symbolic Instruction Code) is a family of general-purpose, high-level programming languages designed for ease of use.
The original version was created by John G. Kemeny and Thomas E. Kurtz at Dartmouth College in 1963.
This is a list of the Byzantine emperors from the foundation of Constantinople in 330 AD, which marks the conventional start of the Eastern Roman Empire, to its fall to the Ottoman Empire in 1453 AD.
Only the emperors who were recognized as legitimate rulers and exercised sovereign authority are included, to the exclusion of junior co-emperors (symbasileis) who never attained the status of sole or senior ruler, as well as of the various usurpers or rebels who claimed the imperial title.
In chaos theory, the butterfly effect is the sensitive dependence on initial conditions in which a small change in one state of a deterministic nonlinear system can result in large differences in a later state.
The term is closely associated with the work of mathematician and meteorologist Edward Norton Lorenz.
Borland Software Corporation was a computer technology company founded in 1983 by Niels Jensen, Ole Henriksen, Mogens Glad, and Philippe Kahn.
Its main business was the development and sale of software development and software deployment products.
Richard Buckminster Fuller (; July 12, 1895 – July 1, 1983) was an American architect, systems theorist, writer, designer, inventor, philosopher, and futurist.
He styled his name as R. Buckminster Fuller in his writings, publishing more than 30 books and coining or popularizing such terms as "Spaceship Earth", "Dymaxion" (e.g., Dymaxion house, Dymaxion car, Dymaxion map), "ephemeralization", "synergetics", and "tensegrity".
William Boyd Watterson II (born July 5, 1958) is an American cartoonist who authored the comic strip Calvin and Hobbes.
The strip was syndicated from 1985 to 1995.
Black is a color that results from the absence or complete absorption of visible light.
It is an achromatic color, without hue, like white and grey.
Bletchley Park is an English country house and estate in Bletchley, Milton Keynes (Buckinghamshire) that became the principal centre of Allied code-breaking during the Second World War.
The mansion was constructed during the years following 1883 for the financier and politician Sir Herbert Leon in the Victorian Gothic, Tudor, and Dutch Baroque styles, on the site of older buildings of the same name.
Bede (;  ,  ;
672/326 May 735), also known as Saint Bede, The Venerable Bede, and Bede the Venerable (), was an English monk and an author and scholar.
Bubble tea (also known as pearl milk tea, bubble milk tea, tapioca milk tea, boba tea, or boba; , ) is a tea-based drink that originated in Taiwan in the early 1980s.
Taiwanese immigrants brought it to the United States in the 1990s, initially in California through regions including Los Angeles County, but the drink has also spread to other countries where there is a large East Asian diaspora population.
The Battle of Blenheim (; ; ) fought on , was a major battle of the War of the Spanish Succession.
The overwhelming Allied victory ensured the safety of Vienna from the Franco-Bavarian army, thus preventing the collapse of the reconstituted Grand Alliance.
The Battle of Ramillies (), fought on 23 May 1706, was a battle of the War of the Spanish Succession.
For the Grand AllianceAustria, England, and the Dutch Republicthe battle had followed an indecisive campaign against the Bourbon armies of King Louis XIV of France in 1705.
Brian Wilson Kernighan (; born January 30, 1942) is a Canadian computer scientist.
He worked at Bell Labs and contributed to the development of Unix alongside Unix creators Ken Thompson and Dennis Ritchie.
BCPL ("Basic Combined Programming Language") is a procedural, imperative, and structured programming language.
Originally intended for writing compilers for other languages, BCPL is no longer in common use.
A battleship is a large armored warship with a main battery consisting of large caliber guns.
It dominated naval warfare in the late 19th and early 20th centuries.
In Norse mythology, Bifröst (), also called Bilröst, is a burning rainbow bridge that reaches between Midgard (Earth) and Asgard, the realm of the gods.
The bridge is attested as Bilröst in the Poetic Edda; compiled in the 13th century from earlier traditional sources, and as Bifröst in the Prose Edda; written in the 13th century by Snorri Sturluson, and in the poetry of skalds.
The battlecruiser (also written as battle cruiser or battle-cruiser) was a type of capital ship of the first half of the 20th century.
These were similar in displacement, armament and cost to battleships, but differed in form and balance of attributes.
Robert James Lee Hawke  (9 December 1929 – 16 May 2019) was an Australian politician and trade unionist who served as the 23rd prime minister of Australia from 1983 to 1991.
He held office as the leader of the Australian Labor Party (ALP), having previously served as the president of the Australian Council of Trade Unions from 1969 to 1980 and president of the Labor Party national executive from 1973 to 1978.
Baldr (Old Norse: ; also Balder, Baldur) is a god in Germanic mythology.
In Norse mythology, he is a son of the god Odin and the goddess Frigg, and has numerous brothers, such as Thor and Váli.
<noinclude>Breiðablik (sometimes anglicised as Breithablik or Breidablik) is the home of Baldr in Nordic mythology.
MeaningThe word  has been variously translated as 'broad sheen', 'Broad gleam', 'Broad-gleaming' or 'the far-shining one',AttestationsGrímismálThe Eddic poem Grímnismál describes Breiðablik as the fair home of Baldr:
Bilskirnir (Old Norse "lightning-crack") is the hall of the god Thor in Norse mythology.
Here he lives with his wife Sif and their children.
In Norse mythology, Brísingamen (or Brísinga men) is the torc or necklace of the goddess Freyja.
The name is an Old Norse compound brísinga-men whose second element is men "(ornamental) neck-ring (of precious metal), torc".
In mathematics, the Borsuk–Ulam theorem states that every continuous function from an n-sphere into Euclidean n-space maps some pair of antipodal points to the same point.
Here, two points on a sphere are called antipodal if they are in exactly opposite directions from the sphere's center.
Bragi (; Old Norse: ) is the skaldic god of poetry in Norse mythology.
EtymologyThe theonym Bragi probably stems from the masculine noun bragr, which can be translated in Old Norse as 'poetry' (cf.
Blaise Pascal ( ,  ,  ; ; 19 June 1623 – 19 August 1662) was a French mathematician, physicist, inventor, philosopher, and Catholic writer.
Pascal was a child prodigy who was educated by his father, a tax collector in Rouen.
The Brittonic languages (also Brythonic or British Celtic; ; ; ) form one of the two branches of the Insular Celtic language family; the other is Goidelic.
It comprises the extant languages Breton, Cornish, and Welsh.
Bronski Beat were a British synth-pop band formed in 1983 in London, England.
The initial lineup, which recorded the majority of their hits, consisted of Jimmy Somerville (vocals), Steve Bronski (keyboards, percussion) and Larry Steinbachek (keyboards, percussion).
A barrel is a cylindrical container, traditionally made with wooden material.
Barrel may also refer to: BARREL (Balloon Array for RBSP Relativistic Electron Losses), a NASA mission Barrel (album), a 1970 album by Lee Michaels Barrel (horology), a watch component Barrel (unit), several units of volume Barrel (wine), for fermenting or ageing wine Barrel (fastener), a simple hinge consisting of a barrel and a pivot Gun barrel the venturi of a carburetor a component of a clarinet a component of a snorkel a tank in Harry Turtledove's books; see Victoria: An Empire Under the Sun the outside of a low voltage DC connector "The Barrel", a song by Aldous Harding from her 2019 album DesignerSee also Barrel roll (disambiguation)  Barrell, a surname Barrow (disambiguation) Beryl (disambiguation)
A binary prefix is a unit prefix that indicates a multiple of a unit of measurement by an integer power of two.
The most commonly used binary prefixes are kibi (symbol Ki, meaning 210= 1024), mebi (Mi, 220 = ), and gibi (Gi, 230 = ).
The National Baseball Hall of Fame and Museum is a history museum and hall of fame in Cooperstown, New York, operated by private interests.
It serves as the central point of the history of baseball in the United States and displays baseball-related artifacts and exhibits, honoring those who have excelled in playing, managing, and serving the sport.
In computational complexity theory, a branch of computer science, bounded-error probabilistic polynomial time (BPP) is the class of decision problems solvable by a probabilistic Turing machine in polynomial time with an error probability bounded by 1/3 for all instances.
BPP is one of the largest practical classes of problems, meaning most problems of interest in BPP have efficient probabilistic algorithms that can be run quickly on real modern machines.
In computational complexity theory, bounded-error quantum polynomial time (BQP) is the class of decision problems solvable by a quantum computer in polynomial time, with an error probability of at most 1/3 for all instances.
It is the quantum analogue to the complexity class BPP.
Blade Runner 3: Replicant Night is a science fiction novel by an American writer K. W. Jeter, first published in 1996.
It is a continuation of Jeter's novel Blade Runner 2: The Edge of Human, which was itself a sequel to both the film Blade Runner and the novel upon which the film was based, Philip K. Dick's Do Androids Dream of Electric Sheep?Plot introduction Living on Mars, Deckard is acting as a consultant to a movie crew filming the story of his days as a blade runner.
Blade Runner 2: The Edge of Human (1995) is a science fiction novel by American writer K. W. Jeter.
It is a continuation of both the film Blade Runner and the novel upon which the film was based, Philip K. Dick's Do Androids Dream of Electric Sheep?
Brainfuck is an esoteric programming language created in 1993 by Urban Müller.
Notable for its extreme minimalism, the language consists of only eight simple commands, a data pointer and an instruction pointer.
Bartolomeo Ammannati (18 June 151113 April 1592) was an Italian architect and sculptor, born at Settignano, near Florence, Italy.
He studied under Baccio Bandinelli and Jacopo Sansovino (assisting on the design of the Library of St. Mark's, the , Venice) and closely imitated the style of Michelangelo.
A bishop is an ordained member of the clergy who is entrusted with a position of authority and oversight in a religious institution.
In Christianity, bishops are normally responsible for the governance of dioceses.
Bertrand Andrieu (24 November 1761 – 6 December 1822) was a French engraver of medals.
He was born in Bordeaux.
Bordeaux ( , ; Gascon  ; ) is a city on the river Garonne in the Gironde department, southwestern France.
A port city, it is the capital of the Nouvelle-Aquitaine region, as well as the prefecture of the Gironde department.
internationally known as Bust-A-Move, is a 1994 tile-matching puzzle arcade game developed and published by Taito.
It is based on the 1986 arcade game Bubble Bobble, featuring characters and themes from that game.
A bone is a rigid organ that constitutes part of the skeleton in most vertebrate animals.
Bones protect the various other organs of the body, produce red and white blood cells, store minerals, provide structure and support for the body, and enable mobility.
Bretwalda (also brytenwalda and bretenanwealda, sometimes capitalised) is an Old English word.
The first record comes from the late 9th-century Anglo-Saxon Chronicle.
Brouwer's fixed-point theorem is a fixed-point theorem in topology, named after L. E. J. (Bertus) Brouwer.
It states that for any continuous function  mapping a nonempty compact convex set to itself, there is a point  such that .
Benzoic acid  is a white (or colorless) solid organic compound with the formula , whose structure consists of a benzene ring () with a carboxyl () substituent.
The benzoyl group is often abbreviated "Bz" (not to be confused with "Bn" which is used for benzyl), thus benzoic acid is also denoted as BzOH, since the benzoyl group has the formula –.
In statistical mechanics and mathematics, a Boltzmann distribution (also called Gibbs distribution) is a probability distribution or probability measure that gives the probability that a system will be in a certain state as a function of that state's energy and the temperature of the system.
The distribution is expressed in the form:where  is the probability of the system being in state ,  is the exponential function,  is the energy of that state, and a constant  of the distribution is the product of the Boltzmann constant  and thermodynamic temperature .
Leg theory is a bowling tactic in the sport of cricket.
The term leg theory is somewhat archaic, but the basic tactic remains a play in modern cricket.
Blythe Katherine Danner (born February 3, 1943) is an American actress.
Accolades she has received include two Primetime Emmy Awards for Best Supporting Actress in a Drama Series for her role as Izzy Huffstodt on Huff (2004–2006), and a Tony Award for Best Actress for her performance in Butterflies Are Free on Broadway (1969–1972).
Bioleaching is the extraction or liberation of metals from their ores through the use of living organisms.
Bioleaching is one of several applications within biohydrometallurgy and several methods are used to treat ores or concentrates containing copper, zinc, lead,  arsenic, antimony, nickel, molybdenum, gold, silver, and cobalt.
Bouldering is a form of free climbing that is performed on small rock formations or artificial rock walls without the use of ropes or harnesses.
While bouldering can be done without any equipment, most climbers use climbing shoes to help secure footholds, chalk to keep their hands dry and to provide a firmer grip, and bouldering mats to prevent injuries from falls.
The boiling point of a substance is the temperature at which the vapor pressure of a liquid equals the pressure surrounding the liquid and the liquid changes into a vapor.
The boiling point of a liquid varies depending upon the surrounding environmental pressure.
The Big Bang event is a physical theory that describes how the universe expanded from an initial state of high density and temperature.
Various cosmological models of the Big Bang explain the evolution of the observable universe from the earliest known periods through its subsequent large-scale form.
Bock (or bok () is a strong beer in Germany, usually a dark lager.
Several substyles exist, including:Doppelbock (Double Bock), a stronger and maltier versionEisbock (Ice Bock), a much stronger version made by partially freezing the beer and removing the ice that formsMaibock (May Bock), a paler, more hopped version generally made for consumption at spring festivals.
The Bantu languages (English: ,  Proto-Bantu: *bantʊ̀) are a language family of about 600 languages that are spoken by the Bantu peoples of Central, Southern, Eastern and Southeast Africa.
They form the largest branch of the Southern Bantoid languages.
The Boeing CIM-10 Bomarc ("Boeing Michigan Aeronautical Research Center") (IM-99 Weapon System prior to September 1962) was a supersonic ramjet powered long-range surface-to-air missile (SAM) used during the Cold War for the air defense of North America.
In addition to being the first operational long-range SAM and the first operational pulse doppler aviation radar, it was the only SAM deployed by the United States Air Force.Stored horizontally in a launcher shelter with a movable roof, the missile was erected, fired vertically using rocket boosters to high altitude, and then tipped over into a horizontal Mach 2.5 cruise powered by ramjet engines.
The Branco River (; Engl: White River) is the principal affluent of the Rio Negro from the north.
BasinThe river drains the Guayanan Highlands moist forests ecoregion.
A bus (contracted from omnibus, with variants multibus, motorbus, autobus, etc.) is a road vehicle that carries significantly more passengers than an average car or van.
It is most commonly used in public transport, but is also in use for charter purposes, or through private ownership.
Bali (; ) is a province of Indonesia and the westernmost of the Lesser Sunda Islands.
East of Java and west of Lombok, the province includes the island of Bali and a few smaller offshore islands, notably Nusa Penida, Nusa Lembongan, and Nusa Ceningan to the southeast.
Bulgarian (,  ; , ) is an Eastern South Slavic language spoken in Southeast Europe, primarily in Bulgaria.
It is the language of the Bulgarians.
A (symmetric) -gonal bipyramid or dipyramid is a polyhedron formed by joining an -gonal pyramid and its mirror image base-to-base.
An -gonal bipyramid has  triangle faces,  edges, and  vertices.
Brown University is a private Ivy League research university in Providence, Rhode Island.
It is the seventh-oldest institution of higher education in the United States, founded in 1764 as the College in the English Colony of Rhode Island and Providence Plantations.
William "Bill" D. Atkinson (born March 17, 1951) is an American computer engineer and photographer.
Atkinson worked at Apple Computer from 1978 to 1990.
The Battle of Lostwithiel took place over a 13-day period from 21 August to 2 September 1644, around the town of Lostwithiel and along the River Fowey valley in Cornwall during the First English Civil War.
A Royalist army led by Charles I of England defeated a Parliamentarian force commanded by the Earl of Essex.
Beeb or BEEB may refer to: BBC, the British Broadcasting Corporation, sometimes called the Beeb or Auntie Beeb BEEB, a BBC children's magazine published in 1985 BBC Micro, a home computer built for the BBC by Acorn Computers Ltd., nicknamed The Beeb Beeb.com or BBC online Beeb Birtles (born 1948), Dutch-Australian musicianSee also Bebe (disambiguation) Beebe (disambiguation)
The Bieb
Bertrand Arthur William Russell, 3rd Earl Russell,  (18 May 1872 – 2 February 1970) was a British mathematician, philosopher, logician, and public intellectual.
He had a considerable influence on mathematics, logic, set theory, linguistics, artificial intelligence, cognitive science, computer science, and various areas of analytic philosophy, especially philosophy of mathematics, philosophy of language, epistemology, and metaphysics.
The Boeing 767 is an American wide-body aircraft developed and manufactured by Boeing Commercial Airplanes.
The aircraft was launched as the 7X7 program on July 14, 1978, the prototype first flew on September 26, 1981, and it was certified on July 30, 1982.
William Ernest Walsh (November 30, 1931 – July 30, 2007) was an American professional and college football coach.
He served as head coach of the San Francisco 49ers and the Stanford Cardinal, during which time he popularized the West Coast offense.
A utility knife is any type of knife used for general manual work purposes.
Such knives were originally fixed-blade knives with durable cutting edges suitable for rough work such as cutting cordage, cutting/scraping hides, butchering animals, cleaning fish scales, reshaping timber, and other tasks.
Bronze is an alloy consisting primarily of copper, commonly with about 12–12.5% tin and often with the addition of other metals (including aluminium, manganese, nickel, or zinc) and sometimes non-metals, such as phosphorus, or metalloids such as arsenic or silicon.
These additions produce a range of alloys that may be harder than copper alone, or have other useful properties, such as strength, ductility, or machinability.
The Benelux Union (; ; ) or Benelux is a politico-economic union and formal international intergovernmental cooperation of three neighbouring states in western Europe: Belgium, the Netherlands, and Luxembourg.
The name is a portmanteau formed from joining the first few letters of each country's name and was first used to name the customs agreement that initiated the union (signed in 1944).
The Boston Herald is an American daily newspaper whose primary market is Boston, Massachusetts, and its surrounding area.
It was founded in 1846 and is one of the oldest daily newspapers in the United States.
George Herman "Babe" Ruth (February 6, 1895 – August 16, 1948) was an American professional baseball player whose career in Major League Baseball (MLB) spanned 22 seasons, from 1914 through 1935.
Nicknamed "the Bambino" and "the Sultan of Swat", he began his MLB career as a star left-handed pitcher for the Boston Red Sox, but achieved his greatest fame as a slugging outfielder for the New York Yankees.
Barge often refers to a flat-bottomed inland waterway vessel which does not have its own means of mechanical propulsion.
The first modern barges were pulled by tugs, but on inland waterways, most are pushed by pusher boats, or other vessels.
William Frederick Schelter (1947 – July 30, 2001) was a professor of mathematics at The University of Texas at Austin and a Lisp developer and programmer.
Schelter is credited with the development of the GNU Common Lisp (GCL) implementation of Common Lisp and the GPL'd version of the computer algebra system Macsyma called Maxima.
British English (BrE, en-GB, or BE) is the set of varieties of the English language native to Great Britain.
More narrowly, it can refer specifically to the English language in England, or, more broadly, to the collective dialects of English throughout the British Isles taken as a single umbrella variety, for instance additionally incorporating Scottish English, Welsh English, and Northern Irish English.
A  battle  is an occurrence of combat in warfare between opposing military units of any number or size.
A war usually consists of multiple battles.
Berinthia "Berry" Berenson-Perkins ( Berenson; April 14, 1948 – September 11, 2001) was an American actress, model and photographer.
She was the widow of actor Anthony Perkins.
Botany, also called plant science (or plant sciences), plant biology or phytology, is the science of plant life and a branch of biology.
A botanist, plant scientist or phytologist is a scientist who specialises in this field.
Bacillus thuringiensis (or Bt) is a gram-positive, soil-dwelling bacterium, the most commonly used biological pesticide worldwide.
B. thuringiensis also occurs naturally in the gut of caterpillars of various types of moths and butterflies, as well on leaf surfaces, aquatic environments, animal feces, insect-rich environments, and flour mills and grain-storage facilities.
A bacteriophage (), also known informally as a phage (), is a virus that infects and replicates within bacteria and archaea.
The term was derived from "bacteria" and the Greek φαγεῖν (), meaning "to devour".
A bactericide or bacteriocide, sometimes abbreviated Bcidal, is a substance which kills bacteria.
Bactericides are disinfectants, antiseptics, or antibiotics.
Brion Gysin  (19 January 1916 – 13 July 1986) was a British-Canadian painter, writer, sound poet, performance artist and inventor of experimental devices.
He is best known for his use of the cut-up technique, alongside his close friend, the novelist William S. Burroughs.
Bacillus Calmette–Guérin (BCG) vaccine is a vaccine primarily used against tuberculosis (TB).
It is named after its inventors Albert Calmette and Camille Guérin.
The common buzzard (Buteo buteo) is a medium-to-large bird of prey which has a large range.
It is a member of the genus Buteo in the family Accipitridae.
Bohrium is a synthetic chemical element with the symbol Bh and atomic number 107.
It is named after Danish physicist Niels Bohr.
Barbara Kay Olson (née Bracher; December 27, 1955September 11, 2001) was an American lawyer and conservative television commentator who worked for CNN, Fox News Channel, and several other outlets.
She was a passenger on American Airlines Flight 77 en route to a taping of Bill Maher's television show Politically Incorrect when it was flown into the Pentagon in the September 11 attacks.
Barnard's Star is a small red dwarf star in the constellation of Ophiuchus.
At a distance of  from Earth, it is the fourth-nearest-known individual star to the Sun after the three components of the Alpha Centauri system, and the closest star in the northern celestial hemisphere.
A Bayer designation is a stellar designation in which a specific star is identified by a Greek or Latin letter followed by the genitive form of its parent constellation's Latin name.
The original list of Bayer designations contained 1,564 stars.
Boötes ( ) is a constellation in the northern sky, located between 0° and +60° declination, and 13 and 16 hours of right ascension on the celestial sphere.
The name comes from , which comes from  'herdsman' or 'plowman' (literally, 'ox-driver'; from  boûs 'cow').
Bernardino Ochino (1487–1564) was an Italian, who was raised a Roman Catholic and later turned to Protestantism and became a Protestant reformer.
BiographyBernardino Ochino was born in Siena, the son of the barber Domenico Ochino, and at the age of 7 or 8, in around 1504, was entrusted to the order of Franciscan Friars.
The Bay of Quinte () is a long, narrow bay shaped like the letter "Z" on the northern shore of Lake Ontario in the province of Ontario, Canada.
It is just west of the head of the Saint Lawrence River that drains the Great Lakes into the Gulf of Saint Lawrence.
The bassoon is a musical instrument in the woodwind family, which plays in the tenor and bass ranges.
It is composed of six pieces, and is usually made of wood.
Bipedalism is a form of terrestrial locomotion where a tetrapod moves by means of its two rear (or lower) limbs or legs.
An animal or machine that usually moves in a bipedal manner is known as a biped , meaning 'two feet' (from Latin bis
In general, bootstrapping usually refers to a self-starting process that is supposed to continue or grow without external input.
Etymology Tall boots may have a tab, loop or handle at the top known as a bootstrap, allowing one to use fingers or a boot hook tool to help pull the boots on.
The Baltic languages are a branch of the Indo-European language family spoken natively or as a second language by a population of about 6.5–7.0 million people mainly in areas extending east and southeast of the Baltic Sea in Europe.
Together with the Slavic languages, they form the Balto-Slavic branch of the Indo-European family.
Bioinformatics () is an interdisciplinary field of science that develops methods and software tools for understanding biological data, especially when the data sets are large and complex.
Bioinformatics uses biology, chemistry, physics, computer science, computer programming, information engineering, mathematics and statistics to analyze and interpret biological data.
Brian Russell De Palma (born September 11, 1940) is an American film director and screenwriter.
With a career spanning over 50 years, he is best known for work in the suspense, crime and psychological thriller genres.
The North American B-25 Mitchell is an American medium bomber that was introduced in 1941 and named in honor of Brigadier General William "Billy" Mitchell, a pioneer of U.S. military aviation.
Used by many Allied air forces, the B-25 served in every theater of World War II, and after the war ended, many remained in service, operating across four decades.
The British Open is the Open Championship men's golf tournament.
British Open may also refer to: British Open (ballroom), the dancing competitions of the Blackpool Dance Festival British Open (darts), a darts tournament Women's British Open of golf British Open Show Jumping Championships British Open (snooker), an annual tournament which was originally run from 1980 until 2004 before it was revived in 2021.
Sir Robert Charlton  (11 October 1937 – 21 October 2023) was an English professional footballer who played as an attacking midfielder, central midfielder, and left winger.
Widely considered one of the greatest players of all time, he was a member of the England team that won the 1966 FIFA World Cup, the year he also won the Ballon d'Or.
Barry Lyndon is a 1975 historical drama film written, directed, and produced by Stanley Kubrick, based on the 1844 novel The Luck of Barry Lyndon by William Makepeace Thackeray.
Starring Ryan O'Neal, Marisa Berenson, Patrick Magee, Leonard Rossiter, and Hardy Krüger, the film recounts the early exploits and later unravelling of an 18th-century Anglo-Irish rogue and golddigger who marries a rich widow to climb the social ladder and assume her late husband's aristocratic position.
The cell is the basic structural and functional unit of all forms of life.
Every cell consists of cytoplasm enclosed within a membrane, and contains many macromolecules such as proteins, DNA and RNA, as well as many small molecules of nutrients and metabolites.
Buffy the Vampire Slayer is a 1992 American comedy vampire film directed by Fran Rubel Kuzui and starring Kristy Swanson, Donald Sutherland, Paul Reubens, Rutger Hauer, Luke Perry, Hilary Swank, and David Arquette.
It follows a Valley Girl cheerleader named Buffy who learns that it is her fate to hunt vampires.
In trade, barter (derived from baretor) is a system of exchange in which participants in a transaction directly exchange goods or services for other goods or services without using a medium of exchange, such as money.
Economists usually distinguish barter from gift economies in many ways; barter, for example, features immediate reciprocal exchange, not one delayed in time.
{{Infobox artist| name = Berthe Morisot| image = Morisot berthe photo.jpg| caption = Berthe Morisot| birth_name
= Berthe Marie Pauline Morisot| birth_date = | birth_place
Barnard College, officially titled as Barnard College, Columbia University, is a private women's liberal arts college in the borough of Manhattan in New York City.
It was founded in 1889 by a group of women led by young student activist Annie Nathan Meyer, who petitioned Columbia University's trustees to create an affiliated college named after Columbia's recently deceased 10th president, Frederick A.P. Barnard.
The Benedictines, officially the Order of Saint Benedict (, abbreviated as OSB), are a mainly a contemplative monastic religious order of the Catholic Church for men and for women who follow the Rule of Saint Benedict.
The male religious are also sometimes called the Black Monks, in reference to the colour of their religious habits.
Bayezid I (, ), also known as Bayezid the Thunderbolt (, ;  – 8 March 1403), was the sultan of the Ottoman Empire from 1389 to 1402.
He adopted the title of Sultan-i Rûm, Rûm being the Arabic name for the Eastern Roman Empire.
Bayezid II (; ; 3 December 1447 – 26 May 1512) was the sultan of the Ottoman Empire from 1481 to 1512.
During his reign, Bayezid consolidated the Ottoman Empire, thwarted a Safavid rebellion and finally abdicated his throne to his son, Selim I. Bayezid evacuated Sephardi Jews from Spain after the proclamation of the Alhambra Decree and resettled them throughout Ottoman lands, especially in Salonica.
Boxing (also known as "western boxing" or "pugilism") is a combat sport and a martial art in which two people, usually wearing protective gloves and other protective equipment such as hand wraps and mouthguards, throw punches at each other for a predetermined amount of time in a boxing ring.
Although the term boxing is commonly attributed to Western boxing, in which only fists are involved, it has developed in different ways in different geographical areas and cultures of the World.
Hindi cinema, popularly known as Bollywood and formerly as Bombay cinema, refers to the film industry based in Mumbai, engaged in production of motion pictures in Hindi language.
The popular term Bollywood, is a portmanteau of "Bombay" (former name of Mumbai) and "Hollywood".
Bowls, also known as lawn bowls or lawn bowling, is a sport in which the objective is to roll biased balls so that they stop close to a smaller ball called a  "jack" or "kitty".
It is played on a bowling green, which may be flat (for "flat-green bowls") or convex or uneven (for "crown green bowls").
Barcelonnette (; , also ; obsolete ) is a commune of France and a subprefecture in the department of Alpes-de-Haute-Provence, in the Provence-Alpes-Côte d'Azur region.
It is located in the southern French Alps, at the crossroads between Provence, Piedmont and the Dauphiné, and is the largest town in the Ubaye Valley.
The Baháʼí Faith is a religion founded in the 19th century that teaches the essential worth of all religions and the unity of all people.
Established by Baháʼu'lláh ("Bahaa Allah", Arabic: "Glory to God"), it initially developed in Iran and parts of the Middle East, where it has faced ongoing persecution since its inception.
The Baiuvarii, Bavarii, or Bavarians () were a Germanic people.
The Baiuvarii had settled in modern-day Bavaria (which is named after them), Austria, and South Tyrol by the 6th century AD, and are considered to be the ancestors of modern-day Bavarians, Austrians and South Tyroleans.
The Burgundians (; ; ; ) were an early Germanic tribe or group of tribes.
They appeared in the middle Rhine region, near the Roman Empire, and were later moved into the empire, in eastern Gaul.
Dots and boxes is a pencil-and-paper game for two players (sometimes more).
It was first published in the 19th century by French mathematician Édouard Lucas, who called it .
Big Brother is a fictional character and symbol in George Orwell's dystopian 1949 novel Nineteen Eighty-Four.
He is ostensibly the leader of Oceania, a totalitarian state wherein the ruling party, Ingsoc, wields total power "for its own sake" over the inhabitants.
In computer science, binary search, also known as half-interval search, logarithmic search, or binary chop, is a search algorithm that finds the position of a target value within a sorted array.
Binary search compares the target value to the middle element of the array.
Belle & Sebastian are a Scottish indie pop band formed in Glasgow in 1996.
Led by Stuart Murdoch, the band has released twelve studio albums.
A broadcast domain is a logical division of a computer network, in which all nodes can reach each other by broadcast at the data link layer.
A broadcast domain can be within the same LAN segment or it can be bridged to other LAN segments.
Beechcraft is an American brand of civil aviation and military aircraft owned by Textron Aviation since 2014, headquartered in Wichita, Kansas.
Originally, it was a brand of Beech Aircraft Corporation, an American manufacturer of general aviation, commercial, and military aircraft, ranging from light single-engined aircraft to twin-engined turboprop transports, business jets, and military trainers.
The Battle of Peleliu, codenamed Operation Stalemate II by the US military, was fought between the United States and Japan during the Mariana and Palau Islands campaign of World War II, from 15 September to 27 November 1944, on the island of Peleliu.
US Marines of the 1st Marine Division and then soldiers of the US Army's 81st Infantry Division fought to capture an airfield on the small coral island of Peleliu.
The Battle of Stalingrad (23 August 19422 February 1943) was a major battle on the Eastern Front of World War II where Nazi Germany and its allies unsuccessfully fought the Soviet Union for control of the city of Stalingrad (later renamed Volgograd) in Southern Russia.
The battle was marked by fierce close-quarters combat and direct assaults on civilians in air raids, with the battle epitomizing urban warfare.
Bodhidharma   was a semi-legendary Buddhist monk who lived during the 5th or 6th century CE.
He is traditionally credited as the transmitter of Chan Buddhism to China, and is regarded as its first Chinese patriarch.
In propositional logic, biconditional introduction is a valid rule of inference.
It allows for one to infer a biconditional from two conditional statements.
Biconditional elimination is the name of two valid rules of inference of propositional logic.
It allows for one to infer a conditional from a biconditional.
A base pair (bp) is a fundamental unit of double-stranded nucleic acids consisting of two nucleobases bound to each other by hydrogen bonds.
They form the building blocks of the DNA double helix and contribute to the folded structure of both DNA and RNA.
The Baltimore Ravens are a professional American football team based in Baltimore.
The Ravens compete in the National Football League (NFL) as a member of the American Football Conference (AFC)
The British National Party (BNP) is a far-right, British fascist political party in the United Kingdom.
It is headquartered in Wigton, Cumbria, and is led by Adam Walker.
The Batavi were an ancient Germanic tribe that lived around the modern Dutch Rhine delta in the area that the Romans called Batavia, from the second half of the first century BC to the third century AD.
The name is also applied to several military units employed by the Romans that were originally raised among the Batavi.
Baptism (from ) is a Christian sacrament of initiation and adoption, almost invariably with the use of water.
It may be performed by sprinkling or pouring water on the head, or by immersing in water either partially or completely, traditionally three times, once for each person of the Trinity.
(, or , ), sometimes anglicized as bocce ball, bocci, or boccie, is a ball sport belonging to the boules family.
Developed into its present form in Italy, it is closely related to British bowls and French , with a common ancestry from ancient games played in the Roman Empire.
Beatmatching or pitch cue is a disc jockey technique of pitch shifting or time stretching an upcoming track to match its tempo to that of the currently playing track, and to adjust them such that the beats (and, usually, the bars) are synchronized—e.g. the kicks and snares in two house records hit at the same time when both records are played simultaneously.
Beatmatching is a component of beatmixing which employs beatmatching combined with equalization, attention to phrasing and track selection in an attempt to make a single mix that flows together and has a good structure.
Bealtaine (, approximated in English as /ˈbɒltɪnə/ or /ˈbjɒltɪnə/ ) is the Gaelic May Day festival.
It is traditionally held on May 1st in the Northern Hemisphere and November 1st in the Southern Hemisphere, or about midway between the spring equinox and summer solstice in the northern hemisphere.
Bethlehem (; , , ;  ) is a city in the West Bank, Palestine, located about  south of Jerusalem.
It is the capital of the Bethlehem Governorate, and has a population of approximately 25,000 people.
Benjamin ( Bīnyāmīn; "Son of (the) right") was the last of the two sons of Jacob and Rachel (i.e., Jacob's thirteenth child and twelfth and youngest son) in Jewish, Christian and Islamic tradition.
He was also the progenitor of the Israelite Tribe of Benjamin.
Black Sabbath were an English rock band formed in Birmingham in 1968 by guitarist Tony Iommi, drummer Bill Ward, bassist Geezer Butler and vocalist Ozzy Osbourne.
They are often cited as pioneers of heavy metal music.
The Buffalo Bills are a professional American football team based in the Buffalo-Niagara Falls metropolitan area.
The Bills compete in the National Football League (NFL) as a member club of the league's American Football Conference (AFC) East division.
The Central Artery/Tunnel Project (CA/T Project), commonly known as the Big Dig, was a megaproject in Boston that rerouted the Central Artery of Interstate 93 (I-93), the chief highway through the heart of the city, into the 1.5-mile (2.4 km) Thomas P. O'Neill Jr. Tunnel.
The project also included the construction of the Ted Williams Tunnel (extending I-90 to Logan International Airport), the Leonard P. Zakim Bunker Hill Memorial Bridge over the Charles River, and the Rose Kennedy Greenway in the space vacated by the previous I-93 elevated roadway.
The Book of Chronicles ( , "words of the days") is a book in the Hebrew Bible, found as two books (1–2 Chronicles) in the Christian Old Testament.
Chronicles is the final book of the Hebrew Bible, concluding the third section of the Jewish Tanakh, the Ketuvim ("Writings").
In computer science, a binary search tree (BST), also called an ordered or sorted binary tree, is a rooted binary tree data structure with the key of each internal node being greater than all the keys in the respective node's left subtree and less than the ones in its right subtree.
The time complexity of operations on the binary search tree is linear with respect to the height of the tree.
In computer science, a binary tree is a tree data structure in which each node has at most two children, referred to as the left child and the right child.
That is, it is a k-ary tree with .
In mathematics, specifically in measure theory, a Borel measure on  a topological space is a measure that is defined on all open sets (and thus on all Borel sets).
Some authors require additional restrictions on the measure, as described below.
Blackadder is a series of four period British sitcoms, plus several one-off installments, which originally aired on BBC1 from 1983 to 1989.
All television episodes starred Rowan Atkinson as the antihero Edmund Blackadder and Tony Robinson as Blackadder's dogsbody, Baldrick.
The Boii (Latin plural, singular Boius; ) were a Celtic tribe of the later Iron Age, attested at various times in Cisalpine Gaul (present-day Northern Italy), Pannonia (present-day Austria and Hungary), present-day Bavaria, in and around present-day Bohemia (after whom the region is named in most languages; comprising the bulk of today's Czech Republic), parts of present-day Slovakia and Poland, and Gallia Narbonensis (located in modern Languedoc and Provence).
In addition, the archaeological evidence indicates that in the 2nd century BC Celts expanded from Bohemia through the Kłodzko Valley into Silesia, now part of Poland and the Czech Republic.
Backgammon is a two-player board game played with counters and dice on tables boards.
It is the most widespread Western member of the large family of tables games, whose ancestors date back nearly 5,000 years to the regions of Mesopotamia and Persia.
The Book of Joshua ( , Tiberian: Sēp̄er Yŏhōšūaʿ) is the sixth book in the Hebrew Bible and the Old Testament, and is the first book of the Deuteronomistic history, the story of Israel from the conquest of Canaan to the Babylonian exile.
It tells of the campaigns of the Israelites in central, southern and northern Canaan, the destruction of their enemies, and the division of the land among the Twelve Tribes, framed by two set-piece speeches, the first by God commanding the conquest of the land, and, at the end, the second by Joshua warning of the need for faithful observance of the Law (torah) revealed to Moses.
The Book of Ezra is a book of the Hebrew Bible; which formerly included the Book of Nehemiah in a single book, commonly distinguished in scholarship as Ezra–Nehemiah.
The two became separated with the first printed rabbinic bibles of the early 16th century, following late medieval Latin Christian tradition.
The Book of Daniel is a 2nd-century BC biblical apocalypse with a 6th century BC setting.
Ostensibly "an account of the activities and visions of Daniel, a noble Jew exiled at Babylon", it combines a prophecy of history with an eschatology (a portrayal of end times) both cosmic in scope and political in focus, and its message is that just as the God of Israel saves Daniel from his enemies, so he would save all Israel in their present oppression.
Batman is a superhero appearing in American comic books published by DC Comics.
The character was created by artist Bob Kane and writer Bill Finger, and debuted in the 27th issue of the comic book Detective Comics on March 30, 1939.
The Boston Red Sox are an American professional baseball team based in Boston.
The Red Sox compete in Major League Baseball (MLB) as a member club of the American League (AL) East division.
The Baltimore Orioles (also known as the O's) are an American professional baseball team based in Baltimore, Maryland.
The Orioles compete in Major League Baseball (MLB) as a member of the American League (AL) East division.
The Bastarnae (Latin variants: Bastarni or Basternae; ), sometimes called the Peuci or Peucini (), were an ancient people who between 200 BC and 300 AD inhabited areas north of the Roman frontier on the Lower Danube.
The Bastarnae lived in the region between the Carpathian Mountains and the river Dnieper, to the north and east of ancient Dacia.
Bavarian is the adjective form of the German state of Bavaria, and refers to people of ancestry from Bavaria.
Bavarian may also refer to: Bavarii, a Germanic tribe Bavarians, a nation and ethnographic group of Germans Bavarian, Iran, a village in Fars Province Bavarian language, a West Germanic languageSee also   Bavaria (disambiguation)Language and nationality disambiguation pages
Bohemia ( ;  ; ; ; ) is the westernmost and largest historical region of the Czech Republic.
Bohemia can also refer to a wider area consisting of the historical Lands of the Bohemian Crown ruled by the Bohemian kings, including Moravia and Czech Silesia, in which case the smaller region is referred to as Bohemia proper as a means of distinction.
BBC Radio 1 is  a British national radio station owned and operated by the BBC.
It specialises in modern popular music and current chart hits throughout the day.
BBC Red Button is a brand used for digital interactive television services provided by the BBC, and broadcast in the United Kingdom.
The services replaced Ceefax, the BBC's analogue teletext service.
A backplane (or "backplane system") is a group of electrical connectors in parallel with each other, so that each pin of each connector is linked to the same relative pin of all the other connectors, forming a computer bus.
It is used to connect several printed circuit boards together to make up a complete computer system.
A baldric (also baldrick, bawdrick, bauldrick as well as other rare or obsolete variations) is a belt worn over one shoulder that is typically used to carry a weapon (usually a sword) or other implement such as a bugle or drum.
The word may also refer to any belt in general, but this usage is poetic or archaic.
The Battle of Waterloo () was fought on Sunday 18 June 1815, near Waterloo (at that time in the United Kingdom of the Netherlands, now in Belgium), marking  the end of the Napoleonic Wars.
A French army under the command of Napoleon was defeated by two armies of the Seventh Coalition.
A boomerang () is a thrown tool typically constructed with aerofoil sections and designed to spin about an axis perpendicular to the direction of its flight.
A returning boomerang is designed to return to the thrower, while a non-returning boomerang is designed as a weapon to be thrown straight and is traditionally used by some Aboriginal Australians for hunting.
Bodybuilding is the practice of progressive resistance exercise to build, control, and develop one's muscles via hypertrophy.
An individual who engages in this activity is referred to as a bodybuilder.
Biological warfare, also known as germ warfare, is the use of biological toxins or infectious agents such as bacteria, viruses, insects, and fungi with the intent to kill, harm or incapacitate humans, animals or plants as an act of war.
Biological weapons (often termed "bio-weapons", "biological threat agents", or "bio-agents") are living organisms or replicating entities (i.e. viruses, which are not universally considered "alive").
The Book of Nehemiah in the Hebrew Bible, largely takes the form of a first-person memoir by Nehemiah, a Jew who is a high official at the Persian court,  concerning the rebuilding of the walls of Jerusalem after the Babylonian exile and the dedication of the city and its people to God's laws (Torah).
Since the 16th century, it has generally been treated as a separate book within the Bible.
The Book of Jeremiah () is the second of the Latter Prophets in the Hebrew Bible, and the second of the Prophets in the Christian Old Testament.
The superscription at chapter Jeremiah 1:1–3 identifies the book as "the words of Jeremiah son of Hilkiah".
The Book of Isaiah ( ) is the first of the Latter Prophets in the Hebrew Bible and the first of the Major Prophets in the Christian Old Testament.
It is identified by a superscription as the words of the 8th-century BCE prophet Isaiah ben Amoz, but there is evidence that much of it was composed during the Babylonian captivity and later.
In mathematics, a bilinear map is a function combining elements of two vector spaces to yield an element of a third vector space, and is linear in each of its arguments.
Matrix multiplication is an example.
Arthur Blake (1896 – December 1, 1934), known as Blind Blake, was an American blues and ragtime singer and guitarist.
He is known for recordings he made for Paramount Records between 1926 and 1932.
Brian Charles Lara,  (born 2 May 1969) is a Trinidadian former international cricketer, widely acknowledged as one of the greatest batsmen of all time.
He topped the Test batting rankings on several occasions and holds several cricketing records, including the record for the highest individual score in first-class cricket, with 501 not out for Warwickshire against Durham at Edgbaston in 1994, which is the only quintuple-hundred in first-class cricket history.
The beagle is a breed of  small scent hound, similar in appearance to the much larger foxhound.
The beagle was developed primarily for hunting hare, known as beagling.
Boiled leather, often referred to by its French translation, cuir bouilli (), was a historical material common in the Middle Ages and Early Modern Period and used for various purposes.
It was leather that had been treated so that it became tough and rigid, as well as able to hold moulded decoration.
In programming and information security, a buffer overflow or buffer overrun is an anomaly whereby a program writes data to a buffer beyond the buffer's allocated memory, overwriting adjacent memory locations.
Buffers are areas of memory set aside to hold data, often while moving it from one section of a program to another, or between programs.
Bug or BUG may refer to:Common uses  A terrestrial arthropod animal (with at least six legs) Insect, a six-legged arthropodHemiptera, the true bugs Covert listening device, used in surveillance and espionage Bug (engineering), a defect in  an engineered system  Software bug  Hardware bug BUG (tag), a computer programming comment tagPathogen, colloquiallyArts, entertainment and mediaFictional entities Bug (comics), a superhero in Marvel comics Bug (Starship Troopers), an alien race from the novel and film Bug, Michael Lee's younger brother in The Wire Bug, in the TV series WordWorld Bobby "Bug" Guthrie, in the TV series
Life UnexpectedFilm and television Bug (1975 film), an American horror film Bug (2002 film), an American comedy film Bug (2006 film), a psychological horror film adaptation of the Tracy Letts play Bug, a 2017 film starring Gene Jones "Bug" (Breaking Bad), a 2011 TV episodeGaming Bug (poker), a limited form of wild card Bug, a Pokémon type
Barry Lamar Bonds (born July 24, 1964) is an American former professional baseball left fielder who played 22 seasons in Major League Baseball (MLB).
Bonds was a member of the Pittsburgh Pirates from 1986 to 1992 and the San Francisco Giants from 1993 to 2007.
The Book of Numbers (from Greek Ἀριθμοί, Arithmoi, literally "numbers"; , Bəmiḏbar, literally "In the desert [of]") is the fourth book of the Hebrew Bible and the fourth of five books of the Jewish Torah.
The book has a long and complex history; its final form is possibly due to a Priestly redaction (i.e., editing) of a Yahwistic source made sometime in the early Persian period (5th century BC).
The Book of Judges (, ) is the seventh book of the Hebrew Bible and the Christian Old Testament.
In the narrative of the Hebrew Bible, it covers the time between the conquest described in the Book of Joshua and the establishment of a kingdom in the Books of Samuel, during which biblical judges served as temporary leaders.
The Book of Samuel (, Sefer Shmuel) is a book in the Hebrew Bible, found as two books (1–2 Samuel) in the Old Testament.
The book is part of the Deuteronomistic history, a series of books (Joshua, Judges, Samuel, and Kings) that constitute a theological history of the Israelites and that aim to explain God's law for Israel under the guidance of the prophets.
The Book of Revelation, also erroneously called the Book of Revelations, is the final book of the New Testament (and therefore the final book of the Christian Bible).
Written in Koine Greek, its title is derived from the first word of the text: , meaning 'unveiling' or 'revelation'.
The Book of Kings (, Sēfer Məlāḵīm) is a book in the Hebrew Bible, found as two books (1–2 Kings) in the Old Testament of the Christian Bible.
It concludes the Deuteronomistic history, a history of Israel also including the books of Joshua, Judges and Samuel.
The Book of Ruth (, Megillath Ruth, "the Scroll of Ruth", one of the Five Megillot) is included in the third division, or the Writings (Ketuvim), of the Hebrew Bible.
In most Christian canons it is treated as one of the historical books and placed between Judges and 1 Samuel.
The Book of Esther (), also known in Hebrew as "the Scroll" ("the Megillah"), is a book in the third section (,  "Writings") of the Hebrew Bible.
It is one of the five Scrolls () in the Hebrew Bible and later became part of the Christian Old Testament.
The railway system in Great Britain is the oldest railway system in history.
The first locomotive-hauled public railway opened in 1825, which was followed by an era of rapid expansion.
British Railways (BR), which from 1965 traded as British Rail, was a state-owned company that operated most of the overground rail transport in Great Britain from 1948 to 1997.
It was formed from the nationalisation of the Big Four British railway companies, and was privatised in stages between 1994 and 1997.
The Book of Job (; ), or simply Job, is a book found in the Ketuvim ("Writings") section of the Hebrew Bible (Tanakh) and the first of the Poetic Books in the Old Testament of the Christian Bible.
Scholars generally agree that it was written between the 7th and 4th centuries BCE.
The Book of Proverbs (, , "Proverbs (of Solomon)") is a book in the third section (called Ketuvim) of the Hebrew Bible and a book of the Christian Old Testament.
When translated into Greek and Latin, the title took on different forms: in the Greek Septuagint (LXX) it became  (, "Proverbs"); in the Latin Vulgate the title was , from which the English name is derived.
The Book of Lamentations (, , from its incipit meaning "how") is a collection of poetic laments for the destruction of Jerusalem in 586 BCE.
In the Hebrew Bible it appears in the Ketuvim ("Writings") as one of the Five Megillot (or "Five Scrolls") alongside the Song of Songs, Book of Ruth, Ecclesiastes and the Book of Esther although there is no set order.
The Book of Ezekiel is the third of the Latter Prophets in the Tanakh (Hebrew Bible) and one of the major prophetic books in the Christian Bible, where it follows Isaiah and Jeremiah.
According to the book itself, it records six visions of the prophet Ezekiel, exiled in Babylon, during the 22 years from 593 to 571 BCE, although it is the product of a long and complex history and does not necessarily preserve the very words of the prophet.
Big Brother is a Dutch reality competition television franchise created by John de Mol Jr., first broadcast in the Netherlands in 1999 and subsequently syndicated internationally.
The show features contestants called "housemates" or "HouseGuests" who live together in a specially constructed house that is isolated from the outside world.
Bristol City Football Club is a professional football club based in Bristol, England, which compete in the , the second tier of English football.
They have played their home games at Ashton Gate since moving from St John's Lane in 1904.
Bioterrorism is terrorism involving the intentional release or dissemination of biological agents.
These agents include bacteria, viruses, insects, fungi, and/or toxins, and may be in a naturally occurring or a human-modified form, in much the same way as in biological warfare.
Bitter may refer to:Common uses Resentment, negative emotion or attitude, similar to being jaded, cynical or otherwise negatively affected by experience Bitter (taste), one of the five basic tastesBooks  Bitter (novel), a 2022 novel by Akwaeke Emezi.
Food and drink Bitter (beer), a British term for pale ale Bitters, an herbal preparation now used mostly in cocktailsMusicAlbums Bitter (Jupiter Apple album), 2007 Bitter (Meshell Ndegeocello album), 1999Songs "Bitter" (Fletcher song) (2020) "Bitter", by Lit from Tripping the Light Fantastic, 1997 "Bitter", by Reks from More Grey Hairs "Bitter", by Remy Zero from The Golden Hum "Bitter", by Freya Ridings from Blood Orange, 2023 "Bitter", by Shihad "Bitter", by Jill Sobule from Happy Town, 1997 "Bitter", by The Vamps from Cherry BlossomOther uses Bitter (surname) (including a list of persons with the name) Bitter Cars, a German car companySee also Bitter end (disambiguation)
The Northrop Grumman B-2 Spirit, also known as the Stealth Bomber, is an American heavy strategic bomber, featuring low-observable stealth technology designed to penetrate dense anti-aircraft defenses.
A subsonic flying wing with a crew of two, the plane was designed by Northrop (later Northrop Grumman) and produced from 1987 to 2000.
Beavers (genus Castor) are large, semiaquatic rodents of the Northern Hemisphere.
There are two existing species: the North American beaver (Castor canadensis) and the Eurasian beaver (C. fiber).
Bears are carnivoran mammals of the family Ursidae ().
They are classified as caniforms, or doglike carnivorans.
The bald eagle (Haliaeetus leucocephalus) is a bird of prey found in North America.
A sea eagle, it has two known subspecies and forms a species pair with the white-tailed eagle (Haliaeetus albicilla), which occupies the same niche as the bald eagle in the Palearctic.
The brown bear (Ursus arctos) is a large bear species found across Eurasia and North America.
In North America, the populations of brown bears are called grizzly bears, while the subspecies that inhabits the Kodiak Islands of Alaska is known as the Kodiak bear.
In physics, the Bardeen–Cooper–Schrieffer (BCS) theory (named after John Bardeen, Leon Cooper, and John Robert Schrieffer) is the first microscopic theory of superconductivity since  Heike Kamerlingh Onnes's 1911 discovery.
The theory describes superconductivity as a microscopic effect caused by a condensation of Cooper pairs.
The biathlon is a winter sport that combines cross-country skiing and rifle shooting.
It is treated as a race, with contestants skiing through a cross-country trail whose distance is divided into shooting rounds.
Bubble and squeak is a British dish made from cooked potatoes and cabbage, mixed together and fried.
The food writer Howard Hillman classes it as one of the "great peasant dishes of the world".
Charles Hardin Holley (September 7, 1936 – February 3, 1959), known as Buddy Holly, was an American singer and songwriter who was a central and pioneering figure of mid-1950s rock and roll.
He was born to a musical family in Lubbock, Texas, during the Great Depression, and learned to play guitar and sing alongside his siblings.
Brewing is the production of beer by steeping a starch source (commonly cereal grains, the most popular of which is barley) in water and fermenting the resulting sweet liquid with yeast.
It may be done in a brewery by a commercial brewer, at home by a homebrewer, or communally.
Breast reconstruction is the surgical process of rebuilding the shape and look of a breast, most commonly in women who have had surgery to treat breast cancer.
It involves using autologous tissue, prosthetic implants, or a combination of both with the goal of reconstructing a natural-looking breast.
The Brooklyn Historic Railway Association (BHRA) is a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization with a shop, trolley barn and offices located in Red Hook, Brooklyn, New York, on the historic Beard Street Piers (c. 1870).
BHRA had a fleet of 16 trolleys (15 PCC trolleys and a leased 1897 trolley car from the Oslo Trams, in Oslo, Norway).
A  beta-lactam (β-lactam) ring is a four-membered lactam.
A lactam is a cyclic amide, and beta-lactams are named so because the nitrogen atom is attached to the β-carbon atom relative to the carbonyl.
The Prince-Bishopric of Brandenburg () was an ecclesiastical principality of the Holy Roman Empire from the 12th century until it was secularized during the second half of the 16th century.
It should not be confused with the larger Diocese of Brandenburg () established by King Otto I of Germany in 948, in the territory of the Marca Geronis (Saxon Eastern March) east of the Elbe river.
BASE jumping () is the recreational sport of jumping from fixed objects, using a parachute to descend safely to the ground.
"BASE" is an acronym that stands for four categories of fixed objects from which one can jump: buildings, antennae (referring to radio masts), spans (bridges), and earth (cliffs).
Beauty is commonly described as a feature of objects that makes these objects pleasurable to perceive.
Such objects include landscapes, sunsets, humans and works of art.
Brownian motion is the random motion of particles suspended in a medium (a liquid or a gas).
This motion pattern typically consists of random fluctuations in a particle's position inside a fluid sub-domain, followed by a relocation to another sub-domain.
Barcelona ( , , ) is a city on the northeastern coast of Spain.
It is the capital and largest city of the autonomous community of Catalonia, as well as the second-most populous municipality of Spain.
Bandy is a winter sport and ball sport played by two teams wearing ice skates on a large ice surface (either indoors or outdoors) while using sticks to direct a ball into the opposing team's goal.
The playing surface, called a bandy field or bandy rink, is a sheet of ice which measures 90–110 metres by 45–65 metres, about the size of a football pitch.
Robert M. Frankston (born June 14, 1949) is an American software engineer and businessman who co-created, with Dan Bricklin, the VisiCalc spreadsheet program.
Frankston is also the co-founder of Software Arts.
The Booker Prize, formerly the Booker Prize for Fiction (1969–2001) and the Man Booker Prize (2002–2019), is a literary award conferred each year for the best novel written in the English language, which was published in the United Kingdom and Ireland.
The winner of the Booker Prize receives international publicity that usually leads to a sales boost.
The Book of Joel is a Jewish prophetic text containing a series of "divine announcements".
The first line attributes authorship to "Joel the son of Pethuel".
The Book of Hosea () is collected as one of the twelve minor prophets of the Nevi'im ("Prophets") in the Tanakh, and as a book in its own right in the Christian Old Testament.
According to the traditional order of most Hebrew Bibles, it is the first of the Twelve.
The book of Obadiah is a book of the Bible whose authorship is attributed to Obadiah, a prophet who lived in the Assyrian Period.
Obadiah is one of the Twelve Minor Prophets in the final section of Nevi'im, the second main division of the Hebrew Bible.
The Book of Jonah is one of the twelve minor prophets of the Nevi'im ("Prophets") in the Hebrew Bible, and an individual book in the Christian Old Testament.
The book tells of a Hebrew prophet named Jonah, son of Amittai, who is sent by God to prophesy the destruction of Nineveh, but attempts to escape his divine mission.
The Book of Micah is the sixth of the twelve minor prophets in the Hebrew Bible.
Ostensibly, it records the sayings of Micah, whose name is Mikayahu (), meaning "Who is like Yahweh?", an 8th-century BCE prophet from the village of Moresheth in Judah (Hebrew name from the opening verse: מיכה המרשתי).
The Book of Nahum is the seventh book of the 12 minor prophets of the Hebrew Bible.
It is attributed to the prophet Nahum, and was probably written in Jerusalem in the 7th century BC.
The Book of Haggai (; ) is a book of the Hebrew Bible or Tanakh, and is the third-to-last of the Twelve Minor Prophets.
It is a short book, consisting of only two chapters.
The Book of Malachi (Hebrew: , ) is the last book of the Neviim contained in the Tanakh, canonically the last of the Twelve Minor Prophets.
In most Christian orderings, the grouping of the prophetic books is the last section of the Old Testament, making Malachi the last book before the New Testament.
The Book of Zechariah, attributed to the Hebrew prophet Zechariah,  is included in the Twelve Minor Prophets in the Hebrew Bible.
Historical context Zechariah's prophecies took place during the reign of Darius the Great and were contemporary with Haggai in a post-exilic world after the fall of Jerusalem in 587/586 BC.
The Book of Zephaniah  (, Ṣəfanyā; sometimes Latinized as Sophonias) is the ninth of the Twelve Minor Prophets of the Old Testament and Tanakh, preceded by the Book of Habakkuk and followed by the Book of Haggai.
Zephaniah means "Yahweh has hidden/protected," or "Yahweh hides".
The Book of Habakkuk is the eighth book of the 12 minor prophets of the Bible.
It is attributed to the prophet Habakkuk, and was probably composed in the late 7th century BC.
Backward compatibility (sometimes known as backwards compatibility) is a property of an operating system, software, real-world product, or technology that allows for interoperability with an older legacy system, or with input designed for such a system, especially in telecommunications and computing.
Modifying a system in a way that does not allow backward compatibility is sometimes called "breaking" backward compatibility.
Bacterial conjugation is the transfer of genetic material between bacterial cells by direct cell-to-cell contact or by a bridge-like connection between two cells.
This takes place through a pilus.
The galjoen, black bream, or blackfish (Dichistius capensis) is a species of marine fish found only along the  coast of South Africa.
Galjoen is the national fish of South Africa.
The blue crane (Grus paradisea), also known as the Stanley crane and the paradise crane, is the national bird of South Africa.
The species is listed as Vulnerable by the IUCN.
Babrak Karmal (Dari/Pashto: , born Sultan Hussein; 6 January 1929 – 1 or 3 December 1996) was an Afghan communist revolutionary and politician who was the leader of Afghanistan, serving in the post of general secretary of the People's Democratic Party of Afghanistan from 1979 to 1986.
Born in Kabul Province into a Tajik or Pashtun family, Karmal attended Kabul University and developed openly leftist views there, having been introduced to Marxism by Mir Akbar Khyber during his imprisonment for activities deemed too radical by the government.
Buddhist philosophy is the ancient Indian philosophical system that developed within the religio-philosophical tradition of Buddhism.
It comprises all the philosophical investigations and systems of rational inquiry that developed among various schools of Buddhism in ancient India following the parinirvāṇa of Gautama Buddha (c. 5th century BCE), as well as the further developments which followed the spread of Buddhism throughout Asia.
Billy Bob Thornton (born August 4, 1955) is an American film actor, writer and director.
He had his first break when he co-wrote and starred in the 1992 thriller One False Move, and received international attention after writing, directing, and starring in the independent drama film Sling Blade (1996), for which he won an Academy Award for Best Adapted Screenplay and was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actor.
is a Japanese mecha-anime television series created by designer Keiichi Sato and director Kazuyoshi Katayama for Sunrise.
The writing staff was assembled by the series' head writer, Chiaki J. Konaka, who is known for his work on Serial Experiments Lain and Hellsing.
In computing, BIOS (, ; Basic Input/Output System, also known as the System BIOS, ROM BIOS, BIOS ROM or PC BIOS) is firmware used to provide runtime services for operating systems and programs and to perform hardware initialization during the booting process (power-on startup).
The BIOS firmware comes pre-installed on an IBM PC or IBM PC compatible's system board and exists in some UEFI-based systems to maintain compatibility with operating systems that do not support UEFI native operation.
In condensed matter physics, a Bose–Einstein condensate (BEC) is a state of matter that is typically formed when a gas of bosons at very low densities is cooled to temperatures very close to absolute zero (−273.15 °C or −459.67 °F).
Under such conditions, a large fraction of bosons occupy the lowest quantum state, at which microscopic quantum mechanical phenomena, particularly wavefunction interference, become apparent macroscopically.
B is a programming language developed at Bell Labs circa 1969 by Ken Thompson and Dennis Ritchie.
B was derived from BCPL, and its name may possibly be a contraction of BCPL.
The Beer-Lambert law is commonly applied to chemical analysis measurements to determine the concentration of chemical species that absorb light.
It is often referred to as Beer's law.
The Beach Boys are an American rock band who was formed in Hawthorne, California, in 1961.
The group's original lineup consisted of brothers Brian, Dennis, and Carl Wilson, their cousin Mike Love, and friend Al Jardine.
BC most often refers to: Before Christ, a calendar era based on the traditionally reckoned year of the birth of Jesus of Nazareth British Columbia, the westernmost province of Canada Baja California, a state of MexicoBC may also refer to:Arts and entertainment  "B.C.", a song by Sparks from the 1974 album Propaganda B.C. (comic strip) by Johnny Hart, and one of its characters BC (video game) by Lionhead Studios BC The Archaeology of the Bible Lands, a BBC television series Bullet Club, a professional wrestling stableBusinesses and organizations  Basilian Chouerite Order of Saint John the Baptist, an order of the Greek Catholic Church BC Card, a Korean credit card company Bella Center, a conference center in Copenhagen, Denmark Brasseries du Cameroun, a brewery in Cameroon (also known as SABC)
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE ticker symbol BC)EducationUnited States  Bakersfield College, a college in Bakersfield, California Bellevue College, a college in Bellevue, Wa
Helen Beatrix Potter (, 28 July 186622 December 1943) was an English writer, illustrator, natural scientist, and conservationist.
She is best known for her children's books featuring animals, such as The Tale of Peter Rabbit, which was her first commercially published work in 1902.
The Liberal Party was one of the two major political parties in the United Kingdom, along with the Conservative Party, in the 19th and early 20th centuries.
Beginning as an alliance of Whigs, free trade–supporting Peelites, and reformist Radicals in the 1850s, by the end of the 19th century, it had formed four governments under William Gladstone.
The Bank of England is the central bank of the United Kingdom and the model on which most modern central banks have been based.
Established in 1694 to act as the English Government's banker, and still one of the bankers for the Government of the United Kingdom, it is the world's eighth-oldest bank.
Bakelite ( ), formally Polyoxybenzylmethyleneglycolanhydride, is a thermosetting phenol formaldehyde resin, formed from a condensation reaction of phenol with formaldehyde.
The first plastic made from synthetic components, it was developed by Leo Baekeland in Yonkers, New York in 1907, and patented on December 7, 1909 ().
A bean is the seed of several plants in the family Fabaceae, which are used as vegetables for human or animal food.
They can be cooked in many different ways, including boiling, frying, and baking, and are used in many traditional dishes throughout the world.
The breast is one of two prominences located on the upper ventral region of a primate's torso.
Both females and males develop breasts from the same embryological tissues.
Baghdad (;   ) is the capital of Iraq and the second-largest city in the Arab world after Cairo.
It is located on the Tigris river.
Biology – The natural science that studies life.
Areas of focus include structure, function, growth, origin, evolution, distribution, and taxonomy.
The British thermal unit (BTU or Btu) is a measure of heat, which is a form of energy.
It was originally defined as the amount of heat required to raise the temperature of one pound of water by one degree Fahrenheit.
Automobiles Ettore Bugatti was a German then French manufacturer of high-performance automobiles.
The company was founded in 1909 in the then-German city of Molsheim, Alsace, by the Italian-born industrial designer Ettore Bugatti.
The Black Death (also known as the Pestilence, the Great Mortality or the Plague) was a bubonic plague pandemic occurring in Western Eurasia and North Africa from 1346 to 1353.
It is the most fatal pandemic recorded in human history, causing the deaths of  people, peaking in Europe from 1347 to 1351.
Biotechnology is a multidisciplinary field that involves the integration of natural sciences and engineering sciences in order to achieve the application of organisms, cells, parts thereof and molecular analogues for products and services.
The term biotechnology was first used by Károly Ereky in 1919, to refer to the production of products from raw materials with the aid of living organisms.
The Battle of Poitiers was fought on 19September 1356 between a French army commanded by King JohnII and an Anglo-Gascon force under Edward, the Black Prince, during the Hundred Years' War.
It took place in western France,  south of Poitiers, when approximately 14,000 to 16,000 French attacked a strong defensive position held by 6,000 Anglo-Gascons.
The backbone cabal was an informal organization of large-site news server administrators of the worldwide distributed newsgroup-based discussion system Usenet.
It existed from about 1983 at least into the 2000s.
The bongo (Tragelaphus eurycerus) is a large, mostly nocturnal, forest-dwelling antelope, native to sub-Saharan Africa.
Bongos are characterised by a striking reddish-brown coat, black and white markings, white-yellow stripes and long slightly spiralled horns.
The bunyip is a creature from the aboriginal mythology of southeastern Australia, said to lurk in swamps, billabongs, creeks, riverbeds, and waterholes.
NameThe origin of the word bunyip has been traced to the Wemba-Wemba or Wergaia language of the Aboriginal people of Victoria, in South-Eastern Australia.
Brabant is a traditional geographical region (or regions) in the Low Countries of Europe.
It may refer to:Place names in EuropeBelgium Province of Brabant, which in 1995 was split up into two provinces and an autonomous region: Flemish Brabant, in the Flanders region Walloon Brabant, in the Wallonia region Brussels-Capital Region Klein-Brabant, the municipalities Bornem, Puurs and Sint-Amands in the Antwerp province of Flanders region East Brabant, or Hageland, an area east of Brussels between the cities of Leuven, Aarschot, Diest and TienenNetherlands North Brabant provinceFrance Brabant-en-Argonne, commune in the Meuse department Brabant-le-Roi, commune in the Meuse department Brabant-lès-Villers (1973–1982), former commune, amalgamation of Brabant-le-Roi and Villers-aux-VentsGeology London-Brabant Massif, a geological structure stretching from England to northern GermanyHistorical use Pagus of Brabant, the original, early medieval territory, divided between s
Boone is a town in and the county seat of Watauga County, North Carolina, United States.
Located in the Blue Ridge Mountains of western North Carolina, Boone is the home of Appalachian State University and the headquarters for the disaster and medical relief organization Samaritan's Purse.
A banshee ( ; Modern Irish , from  , "woman of the fairy mound" or "fairy woman") is a female spirit in Irish folklore who heralds the death of a family member, usually by screaming, wailing, shrieking, or keening.
Her name is connected to the mythologically important tumuli or "mounds" that dot the Irish countryside, which are known as  (singular ) in Old Irish.
Genetically modified maize (corn) is a genetically modified crop.
Specific maize strains have been genetically engineered to express agriculturally-desirable traits, including resistance to pests and to herbicides.
Body substance isolation is a practice of isolating all body substances (blood, urine, feces, tears, etc.) of individuals undergoing medical treatment, particularly emergency medical treatment of those who might be infected with illnesses such as HIV, or hepatitis so as to reduce as much as possible the chances of transmitting these illnesses.
BSI is similar in nature to universal precautions, but goes further in isolating workers from pathogens, including substances now known to carry HIV.
Boudica or Boudicca (, from Brythonic *boudi 'victory, win' + *-kā 'having' suffix, i.e. 'Victorious Woman', known in Latin chronicles as Boadicea or Boudicea, and in Welsh as  ()) was a queen of the ancient British Iceni tribe, who led a failed uprising against the conquering forces of the Roman Empire in AD 60 or 61.
She is considered a British national heroine and a symbol of the struggle for justice and independence.
Borneo (; also known as Kalimantan in the Indonesian language) is the third-largest island in the world, with an area of .
Situated at the geographic centre of Maritime Southeast Asia, it is one of the Greater Sunda Islands, located north of Java, west of Sulawesi, and east of Sumatra.
A ballpoint pen, also known as a biro (British English), ball pen (Hong Kong, Indian and Philippine English), or dot pen (Nepali English), is a pen that dispenses ink (usually in paste form) over a metal ball at its point, i.e. over a "ball point".
The metal commonly used is steel, brass, or tungsten carbide.
The Burroughs Corporation was a major American manufacturer of business equipment.
The company was founded in 1886 as the American Arithmometer Company.
A brick is a type of construction material used to build walls, pavements and other elements in masonry construction.
Properly, the term brick denotes a unit primarily composed of clay, but is now also used informally to denote units made of other materials or other chemically cured construction blocks.
Béla Viktor János Bartók (; ; 25 March 1881 – 26 September 1945) was a Hungarian composer, pianist, and ethnomusicologist.
He is considered one of the most important composers of the 20th century; he and Franz Liszt are regarded as Hungary's greatest composers.
William John Clifton Haley (; July 6, 1925 – February 9, 1981) was an American rock and roll musician.
He is credited by many with first popularizing this form of music in the early 1950s with his group Bill Haley & His Comets and million-selling hits such as "Rock Around the Clock", "See You Later, Alligator", "Shake, Rattle and Roll", "Rocket 88", "Skinny Minnie", and "Razzle Dazzle".
The northern bobwhite (Colinus virginianus), also known as the Virginia quail or (in its home range) bobwhite quail, is a ground-dwelling bird native to Canada, the United States, Mexico, and Cuba, with introduced populations elsewhere in the Caribbean, Europe, and Asia.
It is a member of the group of species known as New World quail (Odontophoridae).
Bipolar disorder, previously known as manic depression, is a mental disorder characterized by periods of depression and periods of abnormally elevated mood that each last from days to weeks.
If the elevated mood is severe or associated with psychosis, it is called mania; if it is less severe, it is called hypomania.
Burton Stephen Lancaster (November 2, 1913 – October 20, 1994) was an American actor and producer.
Initially known for playing tough guys with a tender heart, he went on to achieve success with more complex and challenging roles over a 45-year career in films and television series.
The Balts or Baltic peoples (, ) are an ethno-linguistic group of peoples who speak the Baltic languages of the Balto-Slavic branch of the Indo-European languages.
One of the features of Baltic languages is the number of conservative or archaic features retained.
Burnt-in timecode (often abbreviated to BITC by analogy to VITC) is a human-readable on-screen version of the timecode information for a piece of material superimposed on a video image.
BITC is sometimes used in conjunction with "real" machine-readable timecode, but more often used in copies of original material on to a non-broadcast format such as VHS, so that the VHS copies can be traced back to their master tape and the original time codes easily located.
Bra–ket notation, also called Dirac notation, is a notation for linear algebra and linear operators on complex vector spaces together with their dual space both in the finite-dimensional and infinite-dimensional case.
It is specifically designed to ease the types of calculations that frequently come up in quantum mechanics.
Blue is one of the three primary colours in the RYB colour model (traditional colour theory), as well as in the RGB (additive) colour model.
It lies between violet and cyan on the spectrum of visible light.
Blind Willie McTell (born William Samuel McTier; May 5, 1898 – August 19, 1959) was a Piedmont blues and ragtime singer and guitarist.
He played with a fluid, syncopated fingerstyle guitar technique, common among many exponents of Piedmont blues.
BDSM is a variety of often erotic practices or roleplaying involving bondage, discipline, dominance and submission, sadomasochism, and other related interpersonal dynamics.
Given the wide range of practices, some of which may be engaged in by people who do not consider themselves to be practising BDSM, inclusion in the BDSM community or subculture often is said to depend on self-identification and shared experience.
Bash is a Unix shell and command language written by Brian Fox for the GNU Project as a free software replacement for the Bourne shell.
First released in 1989, it has been used as the default login shell for most Linux distributions.
A blizzard is a severe snowstorm characterized by strong sustained winds and low visibility, lasting for a prolonged period of time—typically at least three or four hours.
A ground blizzard is a weather condition where snow is not falling but loose snow on the ground is lifted and blown by strong winds.
A bikini is a two-piece swimsuit primarily worn by girls and women that features one piece on top that covers the breasts, and a second piece on the bottom: the front covering the pelvis but usually exposing the navel, and the back generally covering the intergluteal cleft and a little, some, or all of the buttocks.
The size of the top and bottom can vary, from bikinis that offer full coverage of the breasts, pelvis, and buttocks, to more revealing designs with a thong or G-string bottom that covers only the mons pubis, but exposes the buttocks, and a top that covers only the areolae.
Babur (; ; 14 February 148326 December 1530), born Zahīr ud-Dīn Muhammad, was the founder of the Mughal Empire in the Indian subcontinent.
He was a descendant of Timur and Genghis Khan through his father and mother respectively.
Bernard of Clairvaux, O. Cist.
(; 109020 August 1153), venerated as Saint Bernard, was an abbot, mystic, co-founder of the Knights Templar, and a major leader in the reformation of the Benedictine Order through the nascent Cistercian Order.
Bishkek (, ; ), formerly Pishpek and Frunze, is the capital and largest city of Kyrgyzstan.
Bishkek is also the administrative centre of the Chüy Region.
Braveheart is a 1995 American epic historical drama film directed by, produced by, and starring Mel Gibson.
Gibson portrays Sir William Wallace, a late-13th century Scottish warrior who led the Scots in the First War of Scottish Independence against King Edward I of England.
Brian Wilson Aldiss  (; 18 August 1925 – 19 August 2017) was an English writer, artist and anthology editor, best known for science fiction novels and short stories.
His byline reads either Brian W. Aldiss or simply Brian Aldiss, except for occasional pseudonyms during the mid-1960s.Greatly influenced by science fiction pioneer H. G. Wells, Aldiss was a vice-president of the international group in Wells' honour.
The Battle of Jutland (, the Battle of the Skagerrak) was a naval battle fought between Britain's Royal Navy Grand Fleet, under Admiral Sir John Jellicoe, and the Imperial German Navy's High Seas Fleet, under Vice-Admiral Reinhard Scheer, during the First World War.
The battle unfolded in extensive manoeuvring and three main engagements (the battlecruiser action, the fleet action, and the night action), from 31 May to 1 June 1916, off the North Sea coast of Denmark's Jutland Peninsula.
Bambara, also known as Bamana (N'Ko script: ) or Bamanankan (N'Ko script: ; Arabic script: ), is a lingua franca and national language of Mali spoken by perhaps 15 million people, natively by 5 million Bambara people and about 10 million second-language users.
It is estimated that about 80 percent of the population of Mali speak Bambara as a first or second language.
Baku (, ;  ) is the capital and largest city of Azerbaijan, as well as the largest city on the Caspian Sea and in the Caucasus region.
Baku is  below sea level, which makes it the lowest lying national capital in the world and also the largest city in the world below sea level.
The balalaika (, ) is a Russian stringed musical instrument with a characteristic triangular wooden, hollow body, fretted neck and three strings.
Two strings are usually tuned to the same note and the third string is a perfect fourth higher.
The Bank of China Tower (BOC Tower) is a skyscraper located in Central, Hong Kong.
Located at 1 Garden Road on Hong Kong Island, the tower houses the headquarters of the Bank of China (Hong Kong) Limited.
Lemon Henry "Blind Lemon" Jefferson (September 24, 1893 – December 19, 1929) was an American blues and gospel singer-songwriter and musician.
He was one of the most popular blues singers of the 1920s and has been called the "Father of the Texas Blues".
are Japanese supernatural beings that are said to devour nightmares.
According to legend, they were created by the spare pieces that were left over when the gods finished creating all other animals.
Edward Teach (alternatively spelled Edward Thatch,  – 22 November 1718), better known as Blackbeard, was an English pirate who operated around the West Indies and the eastern coast of Britain's North American colonies.
Little is known about his early life, but he may have been a sailor on privateer ships during Queen Anne's War before he settled on the Bahamian island of New Providence, a base for Captain Benjamin Hornigold, whose crew Teach joined around 1716.
Bugzilla is a web-based general-purpose bug tracking system and testing tool originally developed and used by the Mozilla project, and licensed under the Mozilla Public License.
Released as open-source software by Netscape Communications in 1998, it has been adopted by a variety of organizations for use as a bug tracking system for both free and open-source software and proprietary projects and products.
Bangor or City of Bangor may refer to:PlacesAustralia Bangor, New South Wales Bangor, TasmaniaCanada Bangor, Nova Scotia Bangor, Saskatchewan Bangor, Prince Edward IslandUnited KingdomNorthern Ireland Bangor, County DownBangor railway station (Northern Ireland) Bangor (Northern Ireland Parliament constituency), Bangor's former constituency in the Parliament of Northern Ireland Bangor (Parliament of Ireland constituency), Bangor's former constituency in the Parliament of Ireland Bangor (civil parish)
Wales Bangor, Gwynedd Bangor railway station (Wales) Bangor-on-Dee ( or ), Wrexham Bangor Teifi, Ceredigion Capel Bangor, CeredigionUnited States Bangor, Alabama Bangor, California Bangor, Iowa Bangor, Maine Bangor Air National Guard Base Bangor International Airport Bangor, Michigan Bangor (Amtrak station) Bangor Township, Van Buren County, Michigan Bangor Township, Bay County, Michigan Bangor, New York Bangor, Pennsylvania Bangor Base, Washington
A ballad is a form of verse, often a narrative set to music.
Ballads derive from the medieval French chanson balladée or ballade, which were originally "dance songs".
Blue Öyster Cult ( ; sometimes abbreviated BÖC or BOC) is  an American rock band formed on Long Island in Stony Brook, New York, in 1967.
The band has sold 25 million records worldwide, including 7 million in the United States.
Battery Park City is a mainly residential  planned community and neighborhood on the west side of the southern tip of the island of Manhattan in New York City.
It is bounded by the Hudson River on the west, the Hudson River shoreline on the north and south, and the West Side Highway on the east.
Bacterial vaginosis (BV) is an infection of the vagina caused by excessive growth of bacteria.
Common symptoms include increased vaginal discharge that often smells like fish.
Allan Huber "Bud" Selig (; born July 30, 1934) is an American baseball executive who currently serves as the Commissioner Emeritus of Baseball.
Previously, he served as the ninth Commissioner of Baseball from 1998 to 2015.
A bison (: bison) is a large bovine in the genus Bison (Greek: "wild ox" (bison)) within the tribe Bovini.
Two extant and numerous extinct species are recognised.
In particle physics, a baryon is a type of composite subatomic particle which contains an odd number of valence quarks (at least 3).
Baryons belong to the hadron family of particles; hadrons are composed of quarks.
A braille embosser is an impact printer that renders text as tactile braille cells.
Using braille translation software, a document or digital text can be embossed with relative ease.
Basic Role-Playing (BRP) is a tabletop role-playing game which originated in the RuneQuest fantasy role-playing game.
Chaosium released the BRP standalone booklet in 1980 in the boxed set release of the second edition of RuneQuest.
In cryptography, a block cipher is a deterministic algorithm that operates on fixed-length groups of bits, called blocks.
Block ciphers are the elementary building blocks of many cryptographic protocols.
Wireless broadband is a telecommunications technology that provides high-speed wireless Internet access or computer networking access over a wide area.
The term encompasses both fixed and mobile broadband.
Björn Rune Borg (; born 6 June 1956) is a Swedish former world No.
1 tennis player.
The Booch method is a method for object-oriented software development.
It is composed of an object modeling language, an iterative object-oriented development process, and a set of recommended practices.
The Battle of the Nile (also known as the Battle of Aboukir Bay; ) was a major naval battle fought between the British Royal Navy and the Navy of the French Republic at Aboukir Bay on the Mediterranean coast off the Nile Delta of Egypt from the 1st to the 3rd of August 1798.
The battle was the climax of a naval campaign that had raged across the Mediterranean during the previous three months, as a large French convoy sailed from Toulon to Alexandria carrying an expeditionary force under General Napoleon Bonaparte.
Barnabas (; ; ), born Joseph () or Joses (), was according to tradition an early Christian, one of the prominent Christian disciples in Jerusalem.
According to Acts 4:36, Barnabas was a Cypriot Jew.
Birka  (Birca in medieval sources), on the island of Björkö (lit.
"Birch Island") in present-day Sweden, was an important Viking Age trading center which handled goods from Scandinavia as well as many parts of the European continent and the Orient.
Beta-lactamases (β-lactamases)  are enzymes () produced by bacteria that provide multi-resistance to beta-lactam antibiotics such as penicillins, cephalosporins, cephamycins, monobactams and carbapenems (ertapenem), although carbapenems are relatively resistant to beta-lactamase.
Beta-lactamase provides antibiotic resistance by breaking the antibiotics' structure.
Burhānuddīn Rabbānī (Persian: ; 20 September 1940 – 20 September 2011) was an Afghan politician and teacher who served as President of Afghanistan from 1992 to 1996, and again from November to December 2001 (in exile from 1996 to 2001).
Born in the Badakhshan Province, Rabbani studied at Kabul University and worked there as a professor of Islamic theology.
The Boeing 747 is a large, long-range wide-body airliner designed and manufactured by Boeing Commercial Airplanes in the United States between 1968 and 2023.
After introducing the 707 in October 1958, Pan Am wanted a jet  times its size, to reduce its seat cost by 30%.
The Battle of Agincourt ( ;  ) was an  English victory in the Hundred Years' War.
It took place on 25 October 1415 (Saint Crispin's Day) near Azincourt, in northern France.
Burgundian can refer to any of the following:Someone or something from Burgundy.Burgundians, an East Germanic tribe, who first appear in history in South East Europe.
Later Burgundians colonised the area of Gaul that is now known as Burgundy (French Bourgogne)
The Bronze Age is a historic period, lasting approximately from 3300 BC to 1200 BC, characterized by the use of bronze, the presence of writing in some areas, and other early features of urban civilization.
The Bronze Age is the second principal period of the three-age system proposed in 1836 by Christian Jürgensen Thomsen for classifying and studying ancient societies and history.
The BBC News channel is a British free-to-air public broadcast television news channel owned and operated by the BBC.
The channel is based at and broadcasts from Broadcasting House in the West End of London from which it is anchored during British daytime, with overnight broadcasts anchored from Washington, D.C. and Singapore.
William Edgar Oddie  (born 7 July 1941) is an English actor, artist, birder, comedian, conservationist, musician, songwriter, television presenter and writer.
He was a member of comedy trio The Goodies.
Broadway () is a road in the U.S. state of New York.
Broadway runs from State Street at Bowling Green for  through the borough of Manhattan and  through the Bronx, exiting north from New York City to run an additional  through the Westchester County municipalities of Yonkers, Hastings-On-Hudson, Dobbs Ferry, Irvington, and Tarrytown, and terminating north of Sleepy Hollow.
The bilinear transform (also known as Tustin's method, after Arnold Tustin) is used in digital signal processing and discrete-time control theory to transform continuous-time system representations to discrete-time and vice versa.
The bilinear transform is a special case of a conformal mapping (namely, a Möbius transformation), often used to convert a transfer function  of a linear, time-invariant (LTI) filter in the continuous-time domain (often called an analog filter) to a transfer function  of a linear, shift-invariant filter in the discrete-time domain (often called a digital filter although there are analog filters constructed with switched capacitors that are discrete-time filters).
Brian Anthony Boitano (born October 22, 1963) is an American figure skater from Sunnyvale, California.
He is the 1988 Olympic champion, the 1986 and 1988 World Champion, and the 1985–1988 U.S. National Champion.
This is a list of political scandals in the United Kingdom in chronological order.
Scandals implicating political figures or governments of the UK, often reported in the mass media, have long had repercussions for their popularity.
Bombardier Inc. () is a Canadian business jet manufacturer.
Headquartered in Montreal, the company was founded in 1942 by Joseph-Armand Bombardier to market his snowmobiles and became one of the world's biggest producers of aircraft and trains.
The Break key (or the symbol ⎉) of a computer keyboard refers to breaking a telegraph circuit and originated with 19th century practice.
In modern usage, the key has no well-defined purpose, but while this is the case, it can be used by software for miscellaneous tasks, such as to switch between multiple login sessions, to terminate a program, or to interrupt a modem connection.
A bogie ( ) (or truck in North American English) is a chassis or framework that carries a wheelset, attached to a vehicle—a modular subassembly of wheels and axles.
Bogies take various forms in various modes of transport.
British Steel was a major British steel producer.
It originated from the nationalised British Steel Corporation (BSC), formed in 1967, which was privatised as a public limited company, British Steel plc, in 1988.
BT Group plc (trading as BT and formerly British Telecom) is a British multinational telecommunications holding company headquartered in London, England.
It has operations in around 180 countries and is the largest provider of fixed-line, broadband and mobile services in the UK, and also provides subscription television and IT services.
Balmoral Castle () is a large estate house in Aberdeenshire, Scotland, and a residence of the British royal family.
It is near the village of Crathie,  west of Ballater and  west of Aberdeen.
Breton ( , ;   or  in Morbihan) is a Southwestern Brittonic language of the Celtic language group spoken in Brittany, part of modern-day France.
It is the only Celtic language still widely in use on the European mainland, albeit as a member of the insular branch instead of the continental grouping.
In archaeology, a broch  is an Iron Age drystone hollow-walled structure found in Scotland.
Brochs belong to the classification "complex Atlantic roundhouse" devised by Scottish archaeologists in the 1980s.
William Edward Crystal (born March 14, 1948) is an American actor, comedian, and filmmaker.
Crystal is known as a standup comedian, and for his film and stage roles.
A black hole is a region of spacetime where gravity is so strong that nothing, including light and other electromagnetic waves, has enough energy to escape it.
The theory of general relativity predicts that a sufficiently compact mass can deform spacetime to form a black hole.
In nuclear physics, beta decay (β-decay) is a type of radioactive decay in which an atomic nucleus emits a beta particle (fast energetic electron or positron), transforming into an isobar of that nuclide.
For example, beta decay of a neutron transforms it into a proton by the emission of an electron accompanied by an antineutrino; or, conversely a proton is converted into a neutron by the emission of a positron with a neutrino in so-called positron emission.
Blitzkrieg ( , ; from  'lightning' +  'war') or Bewegungskrieg is a word used to describe a combined arms surprise attack using a rapid, overwhelming force concentration that may consist of armored and motorized or mechanized infantry formations, together with artillery, air assault and close air support, with intent to break through the opponent's lines of defense, dislocate the defenders, unbalance the enemies by making it difficult to respond to the continuously-changing front, and defeat them in a decisive : a battle of annihilation.
During the interwar period, aircraft and tank technologies matured and were combined with systematic application of the traditional German tactic of  (maneuver warfare), deep penetrations and the bypassing of enemy strong points to encircle and destroy enemy forces in a  (cauldron battle/battle of encirclement).
The Beano   (formerly The Beano Comic, also known as Beano) is a British anthology comic magazine created by Scottish publishing company DC Thomson.
Its first issue was published on 30 July 1938, and it published its 4000th issue in August 2019.
Bees are winged insects closely related to wasps and ants, known for their roles in pollination and, in the case of the best-known bee species, the western honey bee, for producing honey.
Bees are a monophyletic lineage within the superfamily Apoidea.
The Basques (  or  ;  ;  ;  ) are a Southwestern European ethnic group, characterised by the Basque language, a common culture and shared genetic ancestry to the ancient Vascones and Aquitanians.
Basques are indigenous to, and primarily inhabit, an area traditionally known as the Basque Country ()—a region that is located around the western end of the Pyrenees on the coast of the Bay of Biscay and straddles parts of north-central Spain and south-western France.
Bookkeeping is the recording of financial transactions, and is part of the process of accounting in business and other organizations.
It involves preparing source documents for all transactions, operations, and other events of a business.
A Bézier curve ( ) is a parametric curve used in computer graphics and related fields.
A set of discrete "control points" defines a smooth, continuous curve by means of a formula.
In mathematics, especially functional analysis, a Banach algebra, named after Stefan Banach, is an associative algebra  over the real or complex numbers (or over a non-Archimedean complete normed field) that at the same time is also a Banach space, that is, a normed space that is complete in the metric induced by the norm.
The norm is required to satisfyThis ensures that the multiplication operation is continuous.
Boris Leonidovich Pasternak (; ; 30 May 1960) was a Russian poet, novelist, composer, and literary translator.
Composed in 1917, Pasternak's first book of poems, My Sister, Life, was published in Berlin in 1922 and soon became an important collection in the Russian language.
In mathematics, the binomial coefficients are the positive integers that occur as coefficients in the binomial theorem.
Commonly, a binomial coefficient is indexed by a pair of integers  and is written  It is the coefficient of the  term in the polynomial expansion of the binomial power ; this coefficient can be computed by the multiplicative formulawhich using factorial notation can be compactly expressed asFor example, the fourth power of  isand the binomial coefficient  is the coefficient of the  term.
Bill Holbrook (born 1958) is an American cartoonist and webcomic writer and artist, best known for his syndicated comic strip On the Fastrack.
Born in Los Angeles, Holbrook grew up in Huntsville, Alabama, and began drawing at an early age.
Bruce Lorne Campbell (born June 22, 1958) is an American actor and moviemaker.
He is known best for his role as Ash Williams in Sam Raimi's Evil Dead horror series, beginning with the short movie Within the Woods (1978).
Baron Aberdare, of Duffryn in the County of Glamorgan, is a title in the Peerage of the United Kingdom.
It was created on 23 August 1873 for the Liberal politician Henry Bruce.
A boy band is loosely defined as a vocal group consisting of young male singers, usually in their teenage years or in their twenties at the time of formation.
Generally, boy bands perform love songs marketed towards girls and young women.
In computer science, a B-tree is a self-balancing tree data structure that maintains sorted data and allows searches, sequential access, insertions, and deletions in logarithmic time.
The B-tree generalizes the binary search tree, allowing for nodes with more than two children.
The British Museum is a public museum dedicated to human history, art and culture located in the Bloomsbury area of London.
Its permanent collection of eight million works is the largest in the world.
In elementary algebra, the binomial theorem (or binomial expansion) describes the algebraic expansion of powers of a binomial.
According to the theorem, it is possible to expand the polynomial  into a sum involving terms of the form , where the exponents  and  are nonnegative integers with , and the coefficient  of each term is a specific positive integer depending on  and .
Boxing Day is a holiday celebrated after Christmas Day, occurring on the second day of Christmastide (26 December).
Though it originated as a holiday to give gifts to poor people, today, Boxing Day forms part of Christmas celebrations, with many people choosing to take advantage of Boxing Day sales.
Balochistan (; ; , ) is a province of Pakistan.
Located in the southwestern region of the country, Balochistan is the largest province of Pakistan by land area but is the least populated one.
William Magear Tweed (April 3, 1823 – April 12, 1878), often erroneously referred to as William "Marcy" Tweed (see below), and widely known as "Boss" Tweed, was an American politician most notable for being the political boss of Tammany Hall, the Democratic Party's political machine that played a major role in the politics of 19th-century New York City and state.
At the height of his influence, Tweed was the third-largest landowner in New York City, a director of the Erie Railroad, a director of the Tenth National Bank, a director of the New-York Printing Company, the proprietor of the Metropolitan Hotel, a significant stockholder in iron mines and gas companies, a board member of the Harlem Gas Light Company, a board member of the Third Avenue Railway Company, a board member of the Brooklyn Bridge Company, and the president of the Guardian Savings Bank.
Balsall Heath is an inner-city area of Birmingham, West Midlands, England.
It has a diverse cultural mix of people and is the location of the Balti Triangle.
Bunge & Born was a multinational corporation based in Buenos Aires, Argentina, whose diverse interests included food processing and international trade in grains and oilseeds.
It is now known as Bunge Limited.
"The Big Apple" is a nickname for New York City.
It was first popularized in the 1920s by John J. Fitz Gerald, a sportswriter for the New York Morning Telegraph.
Sergeant Thomas H. "Boston" Corbett (January 29, 1832 – presumed dead ) was an English-born American soldier and milliner who shot and killed John Wilkes Booth, the man who committed the assassination of Abraham Lincoln.
Corbett was initially arrested for disobeying orders, but was later released on the orders of Secretary of War Edwin Stanton, who referred to Corbett as "the patriot" upon dismissing him.
The Berber languages, also known as the Amazigh languages or Tamazight, are a branch of the Afroasiatic language family.
They comprise a group of closely related but mostly mutually unintelligible languages spoken by Berber communities, who are indigenous to North Africa.
Bankruptcy is a legal process through which people or other entities who cannot repay debts to creditors may seek relief from some or all of their debts.
In most jurisdictions, bankruptcy is imposed by a court order, often initiated by the debtor.
Blissymbols or Blissymbolics is a constructed language conceived as an ideographic writing system called Semantography consisting of several hundred basic symbols, each representing a concept, which can be composed together to generate new symbols that represent new concepts.
Blissymbols differ from most of the world's major writing systems in that the characters do not correspond at all to the sounds of any spoken language.
Bessel functions, first defined by the mathematician Daniel Bernoulli and then generalized by Friedrich Bessel, are canonical solutions  of Bessel's differential equationfor an arbitrary complex number , which represents the order of the Bessel function.
Although  and  produce the same differential equation, it is conventional to define different Bessel functions for these two values in such a way that the Bessel functions are mostly smooth functions of .
Backpacking may refer to: Backpacking (travel), low-cost, independent, international travel Backpacking (hiking), trekking and camping overnight in the wilderness Ultralight backpacking, a style of wilderness backpacking with an emphasis on carrying as little as possibleSee alsoHikingBackpacking with animals, using pack animals to carry gear while hiking or campingBackpacker (disambiguation)
Backpack (disambiguation)Tramping (disambiguation), also called backpacking
Brahui ( ; ; also known as Brahvi or Brohi) is a Dravidian language spoken by some of the Brahui people.
The language is spoken primarily in the central part of the Balochistan Province of Pakistan, with smaller communities of speakers scattered in parts of Iranian Baluchestan, Afghanistan, and Turkmenistan (around Merv) and by expatriate Brahui communities in Iraq, Qatar, and the United Arab Emirates.
Berkeley DB (BDB) is an unmaintained embedded database software library for key/value data, historically significant in open source software.
Berkeley DB is written in C with API bindings for many other programming languages.
In logic and computer science, the Boolean satisfiability problem (sometimes called propositional satisfiability problem and abbreviated SATISFIABILITY, SAT or B-SAT) is the problem of determining if there exists an interpretation that satisfies a given Boolean formula.
In other words, it asks whether the variables of a given Boolean formula can be consistently replaced by the values TRUE or FALSE in such a way that the formula evaluates to TRUE.
Bob Jones University (BJU) is a private evangelical university in Greenville, South Carolina.
It is known for its conservative cultural and religious positions.
The British Empire comprised the dominions, colonies, protectorates, mandates, and other territories ruled or administered by the United Kingdom and its predecessor states.
It began with the overseas possessions and trading posts established by England in the late 16th and early 17th centuries.
Batman is a 1989 superhero film based on the DC Comics character of the same name, created by Bob Kane and Bill Finger.
Directed by Tim Burton, it is the first installment of Warner Bros.' initial Batman film series.
Batman (also known as Batman: The Movie) is a 1966 American superhero film directed by Leslie H. Martinson.
Based on the television series, and the first full-length theatrical adaptation of the DC Comics character of the same name, the film stars Adam West as Batman and Burt Ward as Robin.
Batman Returns is a 1992 American superhero film directed by Tim Burton and written by Daniel Waters.
Based on the DC Comics character Batman, it is the sequel to Batman (1989) and the second installment in the 1989–1997 Batman series.
Batman & Robin is a 1997 American superhero film based on the DC Comics characters Batman and Robin by Bill Finger and Bob Kane.
It is the fourth and final installment of Warner Bros.'s initial Batman film series, a sequel to Batman Forever and the only film in the series made without the involvement of Tim Burton in any capacity.
Batman Forever is a 1995 American superhero film directed by Joel Schumacher and produced by Tim Burton, based on the DC Comics character Batman by Bob Kane and Bill Finger.
The third installment of Warner Bros.' initial Batman film series, it is a stand-alone sequel to Batman Returns starring Val Kilmer, replacing Michael Keaton as Bruce Wayne / Batman, alongside Tommy Lee Jones, Jim Carrey, Nicole Kidman, and Chris O'Donnell, while Michael Gough, and Pat Hingle reprise their roles.
Batman:
Year One is an American comic book  story arc written by Frank Miller and illustrated by David Mazzucchelli.
A bidirectional text contains two text directionalities, right-to-left (RTL) and left-to-right (LTR).
It generally involves text containing different types of alphabets, but may also refer to boustrophedon, which is changing text direction in each row.
In mathematics, Bernoulli's inequality (named after Jacob Bernoulli) is an inequality that approximates exponentiations of .
It is often employed in real analysis.
The Benjamin Franklin-class submarine''' was a group of US ballistic missile submarines that were in Navy service from the 1960s–2000s.
The class was an evolutionary development from the earlier  of fleet ballistic missile submarine.
The Bastard Operator From Hell (BOFH) is  a fictional rogue computer operator created by Simon Travaglia, who takes out his anger on users (who are "lusers" to him) and others who pester him with their computer problems, uses his expertise against his enemies and manipulates his employer.
Several people have written stories about BOFHs, but only those by Simon Travaglia are considered canonical.
Walter Brown "Brownie" McGhee (November 30, 1915 – February 16, 1996) was an American folk and Piedmont blues singer and guitarist, best known for his collaboration with the harmonica player Sonny Terry.Life and careerMcGhee was born in Knoxville, Tennessee, and grew up in Kingsport, Tennessee.
At about the age of four he contracted polio, which incapacitated his right leg.
The International Bureau of Weights and Measures (, BIPM) is an intergovernmental organisation, through which its 59 member-states act on measurement standards in four areas: chemistry, ionising radiation, physical metrology, as well as Coordinated Universal Time.
It is based in Saint-Cloud, near Paris, France.
Bayonne (;  ;  ; ) is a city in Southwestern France near the Spanish border.
It is a commune and one of two subprefectures in the Pyrénées-Atlantiques department, in the Nouvelle-Aquitaine region.
is a 1987 to 1991 cyberpunk original video animation (OVA) series produced by Youmex and animated by AIC and Artmic.
The series was planned to run for 13 episodes, but was cut short to just 8.
Black is a racialized classification of people, usually a political and skin color-based category for specific populations with a mid- to dark brown complexion.
Not all people considered "black" have dark skin; in certain countries, often in socially based systems of racial classification in the Western world, the term "black" is used to describe persons who are perceived as dark-skinned compared to other populations.
Plague is an infectious disease caused by the bacterium Yersinia pestis.
Symptoms include fever, weakness and headache.
The Baudot code () is an early character encoding for telegraphy invented by Émile Baudot in the 1870s.
It was the predecessor to the International Telegraph Alphabet
Blu Tack is a reusable putty-like pressure-sensitive adhesive produced by Bostik, commonly used to attach lightweight objects (such as posters or sheets of paper) to walls, doors or other dry surfaces.
Traditionally blue, it is also available in other colours.
Bacillus (Latin "stick") is a genus of Gram-positive, rod-shaped bacteria, a member of the phylum Bacillota, with 266 named species.
The term is also used to describe the shape (rod) of other so-shaped bacteria; and the plural Bacilli is the name of the class of bacteria to which this genus belongs.
Brasília (; ) is the federal capital of Brazil and seat of government of the Federal District.
The city is located high in the Brazilian highlands in the country's Central-West region.
The de Havilland Propellers Blue Streak was a British Intermediate-range ballistic missile (IRBM), and later the first stage of the Europa satellite launch vehicle.
Blue Streak was cancelled without entering full production.
Bakassi is a peninsula on the Gulf of Guinea.
It lies between the Cross River estuary, near the city of Calabar and the Rio del Ray estuary on the east.
A bestiary (from bestiarum vocabulum) is a compendium of beasts.
Originating in the ancient world, bestiaries were made popular in the Middle Ages in illustrated volumes that described various animals and even rocks.
"The Ballad of the Green Berets" is a patriotic song in the ballad style about the United States Army Special Forces.
It is one of the few popular songs of the Vietnam War years to cast the military in a positive light.
Baroque dance is dance of the Baroque era (roughly 1600–1750), closely linked with Baroque music, theatre, and opera.
English country dance The majority of surviving choreographies from the period are English country dances, such as those in the many editions of Playford's The Dancing Master.
The Borzoi or Russian Hunting Sighthound is a Russian breed of hunting dog of sighthound type.
It was formerly used for wolf hunting, and until 1936 was known as the Russian Wolfhound.
The Basenji () is a breed of hunting dog.
It was bred from stock that originated in central Africa.
The brit milah ( bərīṯ mīlā, ; Ashkenazi pronunciation: , "covenant of circumcision"; Yiddish pronunciation: bris ) is the ceremony of circumcision in Judaism.
According to the Book of Genesis, God commanded the biblical patriarch Abraham to be circumcised, an act to be followed by his male descendants on the eighth day of life, symbolizing the covenant between God and the Jewish people.
Business ethics (also known as corporate ethics) is a form of applied ethics or professional ethics, that examines ethical principles and moral or ethical problems that can arise in a business environment.
It applies to all aspects of business conduct and is relevant to the conduct of individuals and entire organizations.
British Standards (BS) are the standards produced by the BSI Group which is incorporated under a royal charter and which is formally designated as the national standards body (NSB) for the UK.
The BSI Group produces British Standards under the authority of the charter, which lays down as one of the BSI's objectives to:Formally, as stated in a 2002 memorandum of understanding between the BSI and the United Kingdom Government, British Standards are defined as:Products and services which BSI certifies as having met the requirements of specific standards within designated schemes are awarded the Kitemark.
A building society is a financial institution owned by its members as a mutual organization, which offers banking and related financial services, especially savings and mortgage lending.
They exist in the United Kingdom, Australia and New Zealand, and formerly in Ireland and several Commonwealth countries, including South Africa as mutual banks.
The Avro Blue Steel was a British air-launched, rocket-propelled nuclear armed standoff missile, built to arm the V bomber force.
It allowed the bomber to launch the missile against its target while still outside the range of surface-to-air missiles (SAMs).
The Branch Davidians (or the General Association of Branch Davidian Seventh-day Adventists) are an apocalyptic cult founded in 1955 by Benjamin Roden.
They regard themselves as a continuation of the General Association of Davidian Seventh-Day Adventists, established by Victor Houteff in 1935.
Burwash Hall refers to both Burwash Dining Hall and Burwash Hall proper, the second oldest of the residence buildings at Victoria University in Toronto, Canada.
Construction began in 1911 and was completed in 1913.
Benzodiazepines (BZD, BDZ, BZs), colloquially called "benzos", are a class of depressant drugs whose core chemical structure is the fusion of a benzene ring and a diazepine ring.
They are prescribed to treat conditions such as anxiety disorders, insomnia, and seizures.
The bell curve is typical of the normal distribution.
Bell curve may also refer to: Gaussian function, a specific kind of function whose graph is a bell-shaped curve The Bell Curve, a 1994 book by Richard J. Herrnstein and Charles Murray Bell curve grading, a method of evaluating scholastic performance
Body mass index (BMI) is a value derived from the mass (weight) and height of a person.
The BMI is defined as the body mass divided by the square of the body height, and is expressed in units of kg/m2, resulting from mass in kilograms (kg) and height in metres (m).
The Behistun Inscription (also Bisotun, Bisitun or Bisutun; , Old Persian: Bagastana, meaning "the place of god") is a multilingual  Achaemenid royal inscription and large rock relief on a cliff at Mount Behistun in the Kermanshah Province of Iran, near the city of Kermanshah in western Iran, established by Darius the Great ().
It was important to the decipherment of cuneiform, as it is the longest known trilingual cuneiform inscription, written in Old Persian, Elamite, and Babylonian (a variety of Akkadian).
Barry Morris Goldwater (January 2, 1909 – May 29, 1998) was an American politician and major general in the Air Force Reserve who served as a United States senator from 1953 to 1965 and 1969 to 1987, and was the Republican Party's nominee for president in 1964.
Goldwater was born in Phoenix, where he helped manage his family's department store.
The Baralong incidents were two incidents during the First World War in August and September 1915, involving the Royal Navy Q-ship  and two German U-boats.
Baralong sank , which had been preparing to attack a nearby merchant ship, the Nicosian.
The bladder (or urinary bladder) is an organ that collects urine for excretion in animals.
Bladder may also refer to:Biology Artificial urinary bladder, in humans Gallbladder, which stores bile for digestion Pig bladder, urinary bladder of a domestic pig, with many human uses Swim bladder, in bony fishes, an internal organ that helps to control buoyancy (homologous to lungs) Urinary bladder (Chinese medicine)Technology Air bladder effect, a special effect used in filmmaking Fuel bladder, which stores fuels or other industrial liquids Hydration system, sometimes known as a bladder Pneumatic bladder, an old technology with many industrial applications Waterskin, a traditional container for transporting waterGeography Bladder Lake, a lake in MinnesotaSee also
Robert Young (born 1953/1954) is a serial entrepreneur who is best known for founding Red Hat Inc., the open source software company.
He owns the franchises for Forge FC of the Canadian Premier League as well as the Hamilton Tiger-Cats of the Canadian Football League for which he serves as self-styled Caretaker of the team.
Babylon 5 is an American space opera television series created by writer and producer J. Michael Straczynski, under the Babylonian Productions label, in association with Straczynski's Synthetic Worlds Ltd. and Warner Bros.
Domestic Television.
BeOS is an operating system for personal computers first developed by Be Inc. in 1990.
It was first written to run on BeBox hardware.
A biome () is a biogeographical unit consisting of a biological community that has formed in response to the physical environment in which they are found and a shared regional climate.
Biomes may span more than one continent.
Behavior (American English) or behaviour (British English) is the range of actions and mannerisms made by individuals, organisms, systems or artificial entities in some environment.
These systems can include other systems or organisms as well as the inanimate physical environment.
The Battle of Marathon took place in 490 BC during the first Persian invasion of Greece.
It was fought between the citizens of Athens, aided by Plataea, and a Persian force commanded by Datis and Artaphernes.
The balance of trade, commercial balance, or net exports (sometimes symbolized as NX), is the difference between the monetary value of a nation's exports and imports over a certain time period.
Sometimes a distinction is made between a balance of trade for goods versus one for services.
The biosphere (from Greek βίος bíos "life" and σφαῖρα sphaira "sphere"), also known as the ecosphere (from Greek οἶκος oîkos "environment" and σφαῖρα), is the worldwide sum of all ecosystems.
It can also be termed the zone of life on Earth.
A biological membrane, biomembrane or cell membrane is a selectively permeable membrane that separates the interior of a cell from the external environment or creates intracellular compartments by serving as a boundary between one part of the cell and another.
Biological membranes, in the form of eukaryotic cell membranes, consist of a phospholipid bilayer with embedded, integral and peripheral proteins used in communication and transportation of chemicals and ions.
The Balfour Declaration of 1926, issued by the 1926 Imperial Conference of British Empire leaders in London, was named after Arthur Balfour, who was Lord President of the Council.
It declared the United Kingdom and the Dominions to be:The Inter-Imperial Relations Committee, chaired by Balfour, drew up the document preparatory to its unanimous approval by the imperial prime ministers on 15 November 1926.
The Balfour Declaration was a public statement issued by the British government in 1917 during the First World War announcing its support for the establishment of a  "national home for the Jewish people" in Palestine, then an Ottoman region with a small minority Jewish population.
The declaration was contained in a letter dated 2November 1917 from the United Kingdom's Foreign Secretary Arthur Balfour to Lord Rothschild, a leader of the British Jewish community, for transmission to the Zionist Federation of Great Britain and Ireland.
Unification or Death (, ), popularly known as the Black Hand (, ), was a secret military society formed in 1901 by officers in the Army of the Kingdom of Serbia.
It gained a reputation for its alleged involvement in the assassination of Archduke Franz Ferdinand in Sarajevo in 1914 and for the earlier assassination of the Serbian royal couple in 1903, under the aegis of Captain Dragutin Dimitrijević ( "Apis").
A board of directors (commonly referred simply as the board) is an executive committee that jointly supervises the activities of an organization, which can be either a for-profit or a nonprofit organization such as a business, nonprofit organization, or a government agency.
The powers, duties, and responsibilities of a board of directors are determined by government regulations (including the jurisdiction's corporate law) and the organization's own constitution and by-laws.
The Balkan Wars were a series of two conflicts that took place in the Balkan states in 1912 and 1913.
In the First Balkan War, the four Balkan states of Greece, Serbia, Montenegro and Bulgaria declared war upon the Ottoman Empire and defeated it, in the process stripping the Ottomans of their European provinces, leaving only Eastern Thrace under the Ottoman Empire's control.
Buffalo most commonly refers to: True buffalo or Bubalina, a subtribe of wild cattle, including most "Old World" buffalo, such as water buffalo Buffalo (bison), a genus of wild cattle, including the American buffalo Buffalo, New York, a city in the northeastern United StatesBuffalo or buffaloes may also refer to:Animals Bubalina, a subtribe of the tribe Bovini within the subfamily BovinaeAfrican buffalo or Cape Buffalo (Syncerus caffer)
Bubalus, a genus of bovines including various water buffalo speciesWild water buffalo (Bubalus arnee) Water buffalo (Bubalus bubalis) Italian Mediterranean buffalo, a breed of water buffalo Anoa Tamaraw (Bubalus mindorensis)Bubalus murrensis, an extinct species of water buffalo that occupied riverine habitats in Europe in the Pleistocene Bison, large, even-toed ungulates in the genus Bison within the subfamily BovinaeAmerican bison (Bison bison), also commonly referred to as the American buffalo or simply "buffalo" in North AmericaEur
The BeBox is a dual CPU personal computer, briefly sold by Be Inc. to run the company's own operating system, BeOS.
It has PowerPC CPUs, its I/O board has a custom "GeekPort", and the front bezel has "Blinkenlights".
Biomedical engineering (BME) or medical engineering is the application of engineering principles and design concepts to medicine and biology for healthcare purposes (e.g., diagnostic or therapeutic).
BME is also traditionally logical sciences to advance health care treatment, including diagnosis, monitoring, and therapy.
The Balkans ( ), corresponding partially with the Balkan Peninsula, is a geographical area in southeastern Europe with various geographical and historical definitions.
The region takes its name from the Balkan Mountains that stretch throughout the whole of Bulgaria.
In atomic physics, the Bohr model or Rutherford–Bohr model of the atom, presented by Niels Bohr and Ernest Rutherford in 1913, consists of a small, dense nucleus surrounded by orbiting electrons.
It is analogous to the structure of the Solar System, but with attraction provided by electrostatic force rather than gravity, and with the electron energies quantized (assuming only discrete values).
Bombay Sapphire is a brand of gin that is distilled by the Bombay Spirits Company, a subsidiary company of Bacardi, at Laverstoke Mill in the village of Laverstoke in the English county of Hampshire.
The brand was first launched in 1986 by English wine-merchant IDV.
James Robert Wills (March 6, 1905 – May 13, 1975) was an American Western swing musician, songwriter, and bandleader.
Considered by music authorities as the founder of Western swing, he was known widely as the King of Western Swing (although Spade Cooley self-promoted the moniker "King of Western Swing" from 1942 to 1969).
BadTrans is a malicious Microsoft Windows computer worm distributed by e-mail.
Because of a known vulnerability in older versions of Internet Explorer, some email programs, such as Microsoft's Outlook Express and Microsoft Outlook programs, may install and execute the worm as soon as the e-mail message is viewed.
Mehmet Barış Manço (born Tosun Yusuf Mehmet Barış Manço; 2 January 1943 – 1 February 1999), better known by his stage name Barış Manço, was a Turkish rock musician, singer, composer, actor, television producer and show host.
Beginning his musical career while attending Galatasaray High School, he was a pioneer of rock music in Turkey and one of the founders of the Anatolian rock genre.
Blitz BASIC is the programming language dialect of the first Blitz compilers, devised by New Zealand-based developer Mark Sibly.
Being derived from BASIC, Blitz syntax was designed to be easy to pick up for beginners first learning to program.
The Bliss bibliographic classification (BC) is a library classification system that was created by Henry E. Bliss (1870–1955) and published in four volumes between 1940 and 1953.
Although originally devised in the United States, it was more commonly adopted by British libraries.
Blood alcohol content (BAC), also called blood alcohol concentration or blood alcohol level, is a measurement of alcohol intoxication used for legal or medical purposes; it is expressed as mass of alcohol per volume of blood.
For example, a BAC of 0.10 (0.10% or one tenth of one percent) means that there is 0.10 g of alcohol for every 100  of blood, which is the same as 21.7 .
A barrister is a type of lawyer in common law jurisdictions.
Barristers mostly specialise in courtroom advocacy and litigation.
The Battle of Gettysburg () was a battle in the American Civil War fought  by Union and Confederate forces between July 1 and July 3, 1863, in and around Gettysburg, Pennsylvania.
In the Battle of Gettysburg, Union Major General George Meade's Army of the Potomac defeated attacks by Confederate General Robert E. Lee's Army of Northern Virginia, halting Lee's invasion of the North and forcing his retreat.
Budweiser () is an American-style pale lager, a brand of Belgian company AB InBev.
Introduced in 1876 by Carl Conrad & Co. of St. Louis, Missouri, Budweiser has become a large selling beer company in the United States.
The Bermuda Triangle, also known as the Devil's Triangle, is an urban legend focused on a loosely defined region in the western part of the North Atlantic Ocean where a number of aircraft and ships are said to have disappeared under mysterious circumstances.
The idea of the area as uniquely prone to disappearances arose in the mid-20th century, but most reputable sources dismiss the idea that there is any mystery.
A borough is an administrative division in various English-speaking countries.
In principle, the term borough designates a self-governing walled town, although in practice, official use of the term varies widely.
Bodmin () is a town and civil parish in Cornwall, England, United Kingdom.
It is situated south-west of Bodmin Moor.
Bodmin Moor () is a granite moorland in north-eastern Cornwall, England.
It is  in size, and dates from the Carboniferous period of geological history.
Berkeley ( ) is a city on the eastern shore of San Francisco Bay in northern Alameda County, California, United States.
It is named after the 18th-century Anglo-Irish bishop and philosopher George Berkeley.
Bolventor () is a hamlet on Bodmin Moor in Cornwall, England, United Kingdom.
It is situated in Altarnun civil parish between Launceston and Bodmin.
Bengal ( ; , ) is a historical geographical, ethnolinguistic and cultural term referring to a region in the eastern part of the Indian subcontinent at the apex of the Bay of Bengal.
The region of Bengal proper is divided between modern-day Bangladesh and the Indian state of West Bengal.
Isaac Newton's rotating bucket argument (also known as Newton's bucket) was designed to demonstrate that true rotational motion cannot be defined as the relative rotation of the body with respect to the immediately surrounding bodies.
It is one of five arguments from the "properties, causes, and effects" of "true motion and rest" that support his contention that, in general, true motion and rest cannot be defined as special instances of motion or rest relative to other bodies, but instead can be defined only by reference to absolute space.
The Roman Breviary (Latin: Breviarium Romanum) is a breviary of the Roman Rite in the Catholic Church.
A liturgical book, it contains public or canonical prayers, hymns, the Psalms, readings, and notations for everyday use, especially by bishops, priests, and deacons in the Divine Office (i.e., at the canonical hours, the Christians' daily prayer).
Boomer, or baby boomer, is a child born between 1946 and 1964.
Boomer may refer to:People  Boomers (Oklahoma settlers), two groups of settlers Boomer (surname) Boomer (nickname)Places  Boomer Township, Pottawattamie County, Iowa Boomer Township, Wilkes County, North Carolina Boomer, Missouri Boomer, West Virginia, a census-designated place Boomer Lake, an artificial reservoir in Stillwater, Oklahoma Boomer Island (Tasmania), AustraliaAnimals  An adult male kangaroo, nicknamed "boomer" in Australia An alternate name for the mountain beaver A colloquial name for the American red squirrel The greater prairie chicken, a type of grouse native to North America Marc Maron's catCharactersComics  Owen Mercer, the current Captain Boomerang in the DC Comics universe, nicknamed "Boomer" Rotor Walrus, a character from Sonic the Hedgehog, nicknamed "Boomer" in early issues Tabitha Smith, a Marvel Comics comic book superhero, formerly called Boomer Boomer, a canine charac
Burrhus Frederic Skinner (March 20, 1904 – August 18, 1990) was an American psychologist, behaviorist, author, inventor, and social philosopher.
Considered the father of Behaviorism, he was the Edgar Pierce Professor of Psychology at Harvard University from 1958 until his retirement in 1974.
Bill(s) may refer to:Common meanings Banknote, paper cash (especially in the United States) Bill (law), a proposed law put before a legislature Invoice, commercial document issued by a seller to a buyer Bill, a bird or animal's beakPlaces Bill, Wyoming, an unincorporated community, United States Billstown, Arkansas, an unincorporated community, United States Billville, Indiana, an unincorporated community, United StatesPeople Bill (given name)
Bill (surname) Bill (footballer, born 1978), Alessandro Faria, Togolese football forward Bill (footballer, born 1984), Rosimar Amâncio, a Brazilian football forward Bill (footballer, born 1999), Fabricio Rodrigues da Silva Ferreira, a Brazilian forwardArts, media, and entertainmentCharacters Bill (Kill Bill), a character in the Kill Bill films William “Bill“ S. Preston, Esquire, The first of the titular duo of the Bill & Ted film series A lizard in Lewis Carroll's Alice's Adventures in Wonderland A locomotive with a twin
Wolf Martin Garber (May 18, 1922 – October 17, 2019), known professionally as Bill Macy, was an American television, film and stage actor known for his role in the CBS television series Maude (1972–1978).
Early life Bill Macy was born Wolf Martin Garber on May 18, 1922, in Revere, Massachusetts, the son of Mollie (née Friedopfer; 1889–1986) and Michael Garber (1884–1974), a manufacturer.
Robert Montgomery Knight (born October 25, 1940) is an American former basketball coach.
Nicknamed "the General", Knight won 902 NCAA Division I men's college basketball games, a record at the time of his retirement, and currently fifth all-time.
Black metal is an extreme subgenre of heavy metal music.
Common traits include fast tempos, a shrieking vocal style, heavily distorted guitars played with tremolo picking, raw (lo-fi) recording, unconventional song structures, and an emphasis on atmosphere.
Blizzard Entertainment, Inc. is an American video game developer and publisher based in Irvine, California.
A subsidiary of Activision Blizzard, the company was founded in February 1991 as Silicon & Synapse, Inc. by three graduates of the University of California, Los Angeles: Michael Morhaime, Frank Pearce and Allen Adham.
Robert Bellarmine, SJ (; 4 October 1542 – 17 September 1621) was an Italian Jesuit and a cardinal of the Catholic Church.
He was canonized a saint in 1930 and named Doctor of the Church, one of only 37.
In literary criticism, a Bildungsroman (, plural Bildungsromane, ) is a literary genre that focuses on the psychological and moral growth of the protagonist from childhood to adulthood (coming of age), in which character change is important.
The term comes from the German words  ("education", alternatively "forming") and  ("novel").
A bachelor is a man who is not and has never been married.
EtymologyA bachelor is first attested as the 12th-century bacheler: a knight bachelor, a knight too young or poor to gather vassals under his own banner.
Background radiation is a measure of the level of ionizing radiation present in the environment at a particular location which is not due to deliberate introduction of radiation sources.
Background radiation originates from a variety of sources, both natural and artificial.
Lord Banquo , the Thane of Lochaber, is a semi-historical character in William Shakespeare's 1606 play Macbeth.
In the play, he is at first an ally of Macbeth (both are generals in the King's army) and they meet the Three Witches together.
The British Army is the principal land warfare force of the United Kingdom, a part of the British Armed Forces along with the Royal Navy and the Royal Air Force.
the British Army comprises 76,225 regular full-time personnel, 4,139 Gurkhas, 26,755 volunteer reserve personnel and 4,532 "other personnel", for a total of 111,651.
Bruin, (from Dutch for "brown"), is an English folk term for brown bear.
Bruin, Bruins or BRUIN may also refer to:Places Lake Bruin, ox-bow lake of the Mississippi River located in northeastern Louisiana Lake Bruin State Park Bruin, Kentucky, United States Bruin, Pennsylvania, United States Bruin's Slave Jail, building in Alexandria, VirginiaSports team nicknames and mascots Ayr Bruins, a defunct Scottish ice hockey team Bellevue University, Bellevue, Nebraska Belmont University, Nashville, Tennessee Bob Jones University, Greenville, South Carolina Boston Bruins, an American NHL hockey team UCLA Bruins, a collegiate sports team located in Los Angeles, California Chilliwack Bruins, a former Canadian major junior ice hockey team in Chilliwack, British Columbia George Fox University, Newberg, Oregon Kellogg Community College, Battle Creek, Michigan New Westminster Bruins, a former Canadian major junior ice hockey team in New Westminster, British Columbia Piedmont Inte
Bayesian probability (  or  ) is an interpretation of the concept of probability, in which, instead of frequency or propensity of some phenomenon, probability is interpreted as reasonable expectation representing a state of knowledge or as quantification of a personal belief.
The Bayesian interpretation of probability can be seen as an extension of propositional logic that enables reasoning with hypotheses; that is, with propositions whose truth or falsity is unknown.
De Benneville "Bert" Bell (February 25, 1895 – October 11, 1959) was the National Football League (NFL) commissioner from 1946 until his death in 1959.
As commissioner, he introduced competitive parity into the NFL to improve the league's commercial viability and promote its popularity.
Robert Quinlan Costas (born March 22, 1952) is an American sportscaster who is known for his long tenure with NBC Sports, from 1980 through 2019.
He has received 28 Emmy awards for his work and was the prime-time host of 12 Olympic Games from 1988 until 2016.
Bamberg (, , ; East Franconian: Bambärch) is a town in Upper Franconia district in Bavaria, Germany, on the river Regnitz close to its confluence with the river Main.
Bamberg had 79,000 inhabitants in 2022.
Charles William Mumy Jr. (; born February 1, 1954) is an American actor, writer, and musician and a figure in the science-fiction community/comic book fandom.
He came to prominence in the 1960s as a child actor whose work included television appearances on Bewitched, I Dream of Jeannie, The Twilight Zone, Alfred Hitchcock Presents, and a role in the film Dear Brigitte, followed by a three-season role as Will Robinson in the 1960s CBS sci-fi series Lost in Space.
The House of Bonaparte is a former imperial and royal European dynasty of Corsican origin.
It was founded in 1804 by Napoleon I, the son of Corsican nobleman Carlo Buonaparte and Letizia Buonaparte (née Ramolino).
The beta sheet, (β-sheet) (also β-pleated sheet) is a common motif of the regular protein secondary structure.
Beta sheets consist of beta strands (β-strands) connected laterally by at least two or three backbone hydrogen bonds, forming a generally twisted, pleated sheet.
Beryl ( ) is a mineral composed of beryllium aluminium silicate with the chemical formula Be3Al2Si6O18.
Well-known varieties of beryl include emerald and aquamarine.
Basel ( , ), also known as Basle ( ), is a city in northwestern Switzerland on the river Rhine.
Basel is Switzerland's third-most-populous city (after Zürich and Geneva), with 177,595 inhabitants within the city municipality limits.
The Black Russian is a cocktail of vodka and kahlua.
It contains 50 ml vodka and 20 ml coffee liqueur, per IBA specified ingredients.
Bunnies & Burrows (B&B) is a role-playing game (RPG) inspired by the 1972 novel Watership Down.
Published by Fantasy Games Unlimited in 1976, the game centered on intelligent rabbits.
Bundaberg Rum, colloquially known as Bundy, is a dark rum owned by Diageo.
Is produced in Bundaberg East, Queensland, Australia, by the Bundaberg Distilling Company.
Ben Nevis ( ; , ) is the highest mountain in Scotland, the United Kingdom and the British Isles.
The summit is  above sea level and is the highest land in any direction for .
Bipolar I disorder (BD-I; pronounced "type one bipolar disorder") is a type of bipolar spectrum disorder characterized by the occurrence of at least one manic episode, with or without mixed or psychotic features.
Most people also, at other times, have one or more depressive episodes.
Bacardi Limited ( , , ) is the largest privately held, family-owned spirits company in the world.
Originally known for its Bacardí brand of white rum, it now has a portfolio of more than 200 brands and labels.
The Black and Tans () were constables recruited into the Royal Irish Constabulary (RIC) as reinforcements during the Irish War of Independence.
Recruitment began in Great Britain in January 1920 and about 10,000 men enlisted during the conflict.
A Bunsen burner, named after Robert Bunsen, is a kind of ambient air gas burner used as laboratory equipment; it produces a single open gas flame, and is used for heating, sterilization, and combustion.
The gas can be natural gas (which is mainly methane) or a liquefied petroleum gas, such as propane, butane, or a mixture.
The blue whale (Balaenoptera musculus) is a marine mammal and a baleen whale.
Reaching a maximum confirmed length of  and weighing up to , it is the largest animal known ever to have existed.
The Bolsheviks (, ; from большинство, , 'majority'), led by Vladimir Lenin, were a far-left faction of the Marxist Russian Social Democratic Labour Party (RSDLP) which split with the Mensheviks at the Second Party Congress in 1903.
The Bolshevik party seized power in Russia in the October Revolution of 1917, and was later renamed the Communist Party of the Soviet Union.
The Battle of Świecino (named for the village of Świecino, near Żarnowiec Lake, northern Poland) also called the Battle of Żarnowiec or in German Die Schlacht bei Schwetz, took place on September 17, 1462 during the Thirteen Years' War.
The Polish forces, commanded by Piotr Dunin and consisting of some 2,000 mercenaries and Poles, decisively defeated the 2,700-man army of the Teutonic Knights, commanded by Fritz Raweneck and Commander of the Order Kaspar Nostitz (Nostyc).
Barney Bubbles (born Colin Fulcher; 30 July 1942 – 14 November 1983) was an English graphic artist whose work encompassed graphic design and music video direction.
Bubbles, who also sketched and painted privately, is best known for his distinctive contribution to the design practices associated with the British independent music scene of the 1970s and 1980s.
Blackridge is a community in eastern Allegheny County and is a suburb of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, United States.
This community consists of approximately 650 private homes built from 1920 to 1949.
Basic English (a backronym for British American Scientific International and Commercial English) is a controlled language based on standard English, but with a greatly simplified vocabulary and grammar.
It was created by the linguist and philosopher Charles Kay Ogden as an international auxiliary language, and as an aid for teaching English as a second language.
A brass instrument is a musical instrument that produces sound by sympathetic vibration of air in a tubular resonator in sympathy with the vibration of the player's lips.
Brass instruments are also called labrosones or labrophones, from Latin and Greek elements meaning 'lip' and 'sound'.
Blood libel or ritual murder libel (also blood accusation) is an antisemitic canard which falsely accuses Jews of murdering Christian boys in order to use their blood in the performance of religious rituals.
Echoing very old myths of secret cultic practices in many prehistoric societies, the claim, as it is leveled against Jews, was rarely attested to in antiquity.
Bagpuss is a British animated children's television series which was made by Peter Firmin and Oliver Postgate through their company Smallfilms.
The series of thirteen episodes was first broadcast from 12 February to 7 May 1974.
Naive set theory is any of several theories of sets used in the discussion of the foundations of mathematics.
Unlike axiomatic set theories, which are defined using formal logic, naive set theory is defined informally, in natural language.
Breathy voice  (also called murmured voice, whispery voice, soughing and susurration) is a phonation in which the vocal folds vibrate, as they do in normal (modal) voicing, but are adjusted to let more air escape which produces a sighing-like sound.
A simple breathy phonation,  (not actually a fricative consonant, as a literal reading of the IPA chart would suggest), can sometimes be heard as an allophone of English  between vowels, such as in the word behind, for some speakers.
In mathematics, Bézout's identity (also called Bézout's lemma), named after Étienne Bézout who proved it for polynomials, is the following theorem:
Here the greatest common divisor of  and  is taken to be .
Banacek is an American detective TV series starring George Peppard that aired on the NBC network from 1972 to 1974.
The series was part of the rotating NBC Wednesday Mystery Movie anthology.
The Blue Angels, formally named the U.S. Navy Flight Demonstration Squadron, are a flight demonstration squadron of the United States Navy.
Formed in 1946, the unit is the second oldest formal aerobatic team in the world, after the French  formed in 1931.
To be born again, or to experience the new birth, is a phrase, particularly in evangelicalism, that refers to a "spiritual rebirth", or a regeneration of the human spirit.
In contrast to one's physical birth, being "born again" is distinctly and separately caused by the operation of the Holy Spirit, and it is not caused by baptism in water.
The Rockwell B-1 Lancer is a supersonic variable-sweep wing, heavy bomber used by the United States Air Force.
It has been nicknamed the "Bone" (from "B-One").
The Book of Common Prayer (BCP) is the name given to a number of related prayer books used in the Anglican Communion and by other Christian churches historically related to Anglicanism.
The first prayer book, published in 1549 in the reign of King Edward VI of England, was a product of the English Reformation following the break with Rome.
A bokken (, , "wood", and ken, "sword") (or a bokutō ) is a Japanese wooden sword used for training in kenjutsu.
It is usually the size and shape of a katana, but is sometimes shaped like other swords, such as the wakizashi and tantō.
The Birmingham Small Arms Company Limited (BSA) was a major British industrial combine, a group of businesses manufacturing military and sporting firearms; bicycles; motorcycles; cars; buses and bodies; steel; iron castings; hand, power, and machine tools; coal cleaning and handling plants; sintered metals; and hard chrome process.
After the Second World War, BSA did not manage its business well, and a government-organised rescue operation in 1973 led to a takeover of such operations as it still owned.
Bovril is the trademarked name of a thick and salty meat extract paste, similar to a yeast extract, developed in the 1870s by John Lawson Johnston.
It is sold in a distinctive bulbous jar and as cubes and granules.
Benjamin David Santer (born June 3, 1955) is a climate researcher at Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory and former researcher at the University of East Anglia's Climatic Research Unit.
He also worked at the Max Planck Institute for Meteorology from 1987 to 1992.
In mathematics, the Bernoulli numbers  are a sequence of rational numbers which occur frequently in analysis.
The Bernoulli numbers appear in (and can be defined by) the Taylor series expansions of the tangent and hyperbolic tangent functions, in Faulhaber's formula for the sum of m-th powers of the first n positive integers, in the Euler–Maclaurin formula, and in expressions for certain values of the Riemann zeta function.
is a 1986 platform game developed and published by Taito for arcades.
It was distributed in the United States by Romstar, and in Europe by Electrocoin.
In the partnership card game contract bridge, the Blackwood convention is a bidding convention developed by Easley Blackwood in 1933 and still widely used in the modern game.
Its purpose is to enable the partnership to explore its possession of aces, kings and in some variants, the queen of trumps to judge whether a slam would be a feasible contract.
Wilfred Bailey Everett Bixby III (January 22, 1934 – November 21, 1993) was an American actor, director, producer, and frequent game-show panellist.
Bixby's career spanned more than three decades, including appearances on stage, in films, and on television series.
Boers ( ;  () are the descendants of the proto Afrikaans-speaking Free Burghers of the eastern Cape frontier in Southern Africa during the 17th, 18th, and 19th centuries.
From 1652 to 1795, the Dutch East India Company controlled Dutch Cape Colony, but the United Kingdom incorporated it into the British Empire in 1806.
The Bronze Star Medal (BSM) is a United States Armed Forces decoration awarded to members of the United States Armed Forces for either heroic achievement, heroic service, meritorious achievement, or meritorious service in a combat zone.
When the medal is awarded by the Army, Air Force, or Space Force for acts of valor in combat, the "V" device is authorized for wear on the medal.
Ballarat ( ) (Wathaurong: balla arat) is a city in the Central Highlands of Victoria, Australia.
At the 2021 census, Ballarat had a population of 111,973, making it the third largest city in Victoria.
The Battle of Abritus, also known as the Battle of Forum Terebronii, occurred near Abritus (modern Razgrad) in the Roman province of Moesia Inferior in the summer of 251.
It was fought between the Romans and a federation of Gothic and Scythian tribesmen under the Gothic king Cniva.
The Battle of Berestechko (Ukrainian: Битва під Берестечком, Polish:
Bitwa pod Beresteczkiem; 28 June — 10 July, 1651).
Bohdan Zynovii Mykhailovych Khmelnytskyi (Ruthenian: Ѕѣнові Богданъ Хмелнiцкiи; modern ; 6 August 1657) was a Ruthenian nobleman and military commander of Ukrainian Cossacks as Hetman of the Zaporozhian Host, which was then under the suzerainty of the Polish–Lithuanian Commonwealth.
He led an uprising against the Commonwealth and its magnates (1648–1654) that resulted in the creation of an independent Cossack state in Ukraine.
Benjamin William Bova (November 8, 1932November 29, 2020) was an American writer and editor.
During a writing career of 60 years, he was the author of more than 120 works of science fact and fiction, an editor of Analog Science Fiction and Fact, for which he won a Hugo Award six times, and an editorial director of Omni; he was also president of both the National Space Society and the Science Fiction Writers of America.
The , codenamed Operation Iceberg, was a battle of the Pacific War fought on the island of Okinawa by United States Army and United States Marine Corps forces against the Imperial Japanese Army.
The initial invasion of Okinawa on 1 April 1945 was the largest amphibious assault in the Pacific Theater of World War II.
There were two battles of El Alamein in World War II, both fought in 1942.
The Battles occurred in North Africa, in HIRO, in and around an area named after a railway stop called El Alamein.
The Brezhnev Doctrine was a Soviet foreign policy that proclaimed that any threat to "socialist rule" in any state of the Soviet Bloc in Central and Eastern Europe was a threat to all of them, and therefore, it justified the intervention of fellow socialist states.
It was proclaimed in order to justify the Soviet-led occupation of Czechoslovakia earlier in 1968, with the overthrow of the reformist government there.
A bain-marie (; ), also known as a water bath or double boiler, a type of heated bath, is a piece of equipment used in science, industry, and cooking to heat materials gently or to keep materials warm over a period of time.
A bain-marie is also used to melt ingredients for cooking.
Ballu tundu or ballu sardu is a traditional Sardinian folk dance which is typically danced in a closed or open circle.
The dance was described as early as 1805 by Mameli and by La Marmora in 1825.
Barbagia (;  or ) is a geographical, cultural and natural region of inner Sardinia, contained for the most part in the province of Nuoro and Ogliastra and located alongside the Gennargentu massif.
The name comes from Cicero, who described the land as inhabited by barbarians; Roman domination over this part of the island was in fact never more than nominal as a result of the Roman-Sardinian Wars.
Motor Racing Developments Ltd., commonly known as Brabham (), was a British racing car manufacturer and Formula One racing team.
Founded in 1960 by Australian driver Jack Brabham and British-Australian designer Ron Tauranac, the team won four Drivers' and two Constructors' World Championships in its 30-year Formula One history.
The Boeing B-17 'Flying Fortress' is an American four-engined heavy bomber developed in the 1930s for the United States Army Air Corps (USAAC).
Fast and high-flying for a bomber of its era, the B-17 was used primarily in the European Theater of Operations and dropped more bombs than any other aircraft during World War II.
Trieste is a Swiss-designed, Italian-built deep-diving research bathyscaphe.
In 1960, it became the first crewed vessel to reach the bottom of Challenger Deep in the Mariana Trench, the deepest point in Earth's seabed.
The Battle of Bouvines was fought on 27 July 1214 near the town of Bouvines in the County of Flanders.
It was the concluding battle of the Anglo-French War of 1213–1214.
The Battle of Actium was a naval battle fought between Octavian's maritime fleet, led by Marcus Agrippa, and the combined fleets of both Mark Antony and Cleopatra VII Philopator.
The battle took place on 2 September 31 BC in the Ionian Sea, near the former Roman colony of Actium, Greece, and was the climax of over a decade of rivalry between Octavian and Antony.
The zebrafish (Danio rerio) is a freshwater fish belonging to the minnow family (Cyprinidae) of the order Cypriniformes.
Native to India  and South Asia, it is a popular aquarium fish, frequently sold under the trade name zebra danio (and thus often called a "tropical fish" although both tropical and subtropical).
Balance may refer to:Common meanings Balance (ability) in biomechanics Balance (accounting) Balance or weighing scale Balance, as in equality (mathematics) or equilibriumArts and entertainmentFilm Balance (1983 film), a Bulgarian film Balance (1989 film), a short animated film La Balance, a 1982 French filmTelevision Balance: Television for Living Well, a Canadian television talk show "The Balance" (Roswell), an episode of the television series Roswell "The Balance", an episode of the animated series Justice LeagueMusicPerformers Balance (band), a 1980s pop-rock groupAlbums Balance (Akrobatik album), 2003 Balance (Kim-Lian album), 2004 Balance (Leo Kottke album), 1978 Balance (Joe Morris album), 2014 Balance (Swollen Members album), 1999 Balance (Ty Tabor album), 2008 Balance (Van Halen album), 1995 Balance (Armin van Buuren album), 2019
The Balance, a 2019 album by Catfish and the BottlemenSongs "Balance", a song by Axium from The Story Thus Far "
The Battle of Adwa (; ; , also spelled Adowa) was the climactic battle of the First Italo-Ethiopian War.
The Ethiopian forces defeated the Italian invading force on Sunday 1 March 1896, near the town of Adwa.
In a dynamical system, bistability means the system has two stable equilibrium states.
A bistable structure can be resting in either of two states.
Bjørn Lomborg (; born 6 January 1965) is a Danish author and the president of the think tank Copenhagen Consensus Center.
He is the former director of the Danish government's Environmental Assessment Institute (EAI) in Copenhagen.
The Banda Islands () are a volcanic group of ten small volcanic islands in the Banda Sea, about  south of Seram Island and about  east of Java, and constitute an administrative district (kecamatan) within the Central Maluku Regency in the Indonesian province of Maluku.
The islands rise out of  deep ocean and have a total land area of approximately .
The Brisbane Broncos Rugby League Football Club Ltd., commonly referred to as the Broncos, is an Australian professional rugby league football club based in Brisbane, Queensland.
Founded in April 1987, the Broncos currently compete in the National Rugby League (NRL).
The Brisbane Lions are a professional Australian rules football club based in Brisbane, Queensland that compete in the  Australian Football League (AFL), the sport's elite competition.
The Lions came into existence in 1996 when the AFL expansion club the Brisbane Bears, established in 1987, absorbed the AFL operations of one of the league's foundation clubs, Fitzroy, established in Melbourne, Victoria in 1883.
Bloody Sunday, or the Bogside Massacre, was a massacre on 30 January 1972 when British soldiers shot 26 unarmed civilians during a protest march in the Bogside area of Derry, Northern Ireland.
Fourteen people died: thirteen were killed outright, while the death of another man four months later was attributed to his injuries.
Bruno of Querfurt ( 974 – 14 February or 9/14 March 1009), also known as Brun, was a Christian missionary bishop and martyr, who was beheaded near the border of Kievan Rus and Lithuania for trying to spread Christianity.
He is also called the second "Apostle of the Prussians".
Ellas Otha Bates McDaniel (December 30, 1928 – June 2, 2008), known professionally as Bo Diddley, was an American guitarist and singer who played a key role in the transition from the blues to rock and roll.
He influenced many artists, including Buddy Holly, Elvis Presley, The Beatles, The Rolling Stones, The Animals, George Thorogood, Syd Barrett, and The Clash.
Béla Ferenc Dezső Blaskó (; October 20, 1882 – August 16, 1956), known professionally as Bela Lugosi (; ), was a Hungarian–American actor, best remembered for portraying Count Dracula in the 1931 horror classic  Dracula, Ygor in Son of Frankenstein (1939) and his roles in many other horror films from 1931 through 1956.
Lugosi began acting on the Hungarian stage in 1902.
Bride of the Monster is a 1955 American science fiction horror film, co-written, produced and directed by Edward D. Wood Jr., and starring Bela Lugosi and Tor Johnson with a supporting cast featuring Tony McCoy and Loretta King.
The film is considered to have Wood's biggest budget ($70,000).
The Berry paradox is a self-referential paradox arising from an expression like "The smallest positive integer not definable in under sixty letters" (a phrase with fifty-seven letters).
Bertrand Russell, the first to discuss the paradox in print, attributed it to G. G. Berry (1867–1928), a junior librarian at Oxford's Bodleian Library.
This is the complete list of Olympic medalists in biathlon.
Medalists in military patrol, a precursor to biathlon, are listed separately.
The first Biathlon World Championships (BWCH) was held in 1958, with individual and team contests for men.
The number of events has grown significantly over the years.
Inedia (Latin for 'fasting') or breatharianism () is the claimed ability for a person to live without consuming food, and in some cases water.
It is a pseudoscientific practice, and several adherents of these practices have died from starvation or dehydration due to not having followed security guidelines (especially forcing change too fast).
Bihar is a state in India.
Bihar may also refer to:PlacesIndia Bihar Province, former colonial province in British India Bihar Subah, a Bihar-based Mughal imperial province Bihar Sharif, headquarters of Nalanda district, Bihar, India Bihar River, a border river of Palamu district, Jharkhand, India Bihar, Unnao, a village in Uttar Pradesh, IndiaElsewhere Bihar County, a historic county of the Kingdom of Hungary Bihor County (Bihar County in Hungarian), a county of current-day Romania Bihar, the Hungarian name for Biharia Commune, Bihor County, RomaniaPeople Bihar (king), a khagan of the KhazarsSee also  Behar (disambiguation), a portion in the annual Jewish cycle of Torah reading Bihar al-Anwar, a hadith compilation by Allamah Majlisi Bihari (disambiguation)
Belfast ( ,  ; from  , meaning "mouth of the sand-bank ford") is the capital and largest city of Northern Ireland, standing on the banks of the River Lagan on the east coast.
It is the 10th-largest primary urban area in the United Kingdom and the second-largest city in the island of Ireland.
Biotite is a common group of phyllosilicate minerals within the mica group, with the approximate chemical formula .
It is primarily a solid-solution series between the iron-endmember annite,  and the magnesium-endmember phlogopite; more aluminous end-members include siderophyllite and eastonite.
Brigham Young (; June 1, 1801August 29, 1877) was an American religious leader and politician.
He was the second president of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (LDS Church), from 1847 until his death in 1877.
A Burns supper is a celebration of the life and poetry of the poet Robert Burns (25 January 175921 July 1796), the author of many Scots poems.
The suppers are normally held on or near the poet's birthday, 25 January, known as Burns Night (; ) also called Robert Burns Day or Rabbie Burns Day (or Robbie Burns Day in Canada).
William McGuire Bryson  (; born 8 December 1951) is an American–British journalist and author.
Bryson has written a number of nonfiction books on topics including travel, the English language, and science.
Big Audio Dynamite (later known as Big Audio Dynamite II and Big Audio, and often abbreviated BAD) were an English band, formed in London in 1984 by Mick Jones, former lead guitarist and co-lead vocalist of the Clash.
The band mixed various musical styles, incorporating elements of punk rock, dance music, hip hop, reggae, and funk.
Bentley Motors Limited is a British designer, manufacturer and marketer of luxury cars and SUVs.
Headquartered in Crewe, England, the company was founded by W. O. Bentley (1888–1971) in 1919 in Cricklewood, North London, and became widely known for winning the 24 Hours of Le Mans in 1924, 1927, 1928, 1929 and 1930.
A chordate ( ) is a deuterostomic animal belonging to the phylum Chordata ( ).
All chordates possess, at some point during their larval or adult stages, five distinctive physical characteristics (synapomorphies) that distinguish them from other taxa.
Charlize Theron ( ; ; born 7 August 1975) is a South African and American actress and producer.
One of the world's highest-paid actresses, she is the recipient of various accolades, including an Academy Award and a Golden Globe Award.
Chess is a board game for two players, called White and Black, each controlling an army of chess pieces, with the objective to checkmate the opponent's king.
It is sometimes called international chess or Western chess to distinguish it from related games such as  (Chinese chess) and  (Japanese chess).
Sir Charles Spencer Chaplin  (16 April 188925 December 1977) was an English comic actor, filmmaker, and composer who rose to fame in the era of silent film.
He became a worldwide icon through his screen persona, the Tramp, and is considered one of the film industry's most important figures.
The World Factbook, also known as the CIA World Factbook, is a reference resource produced by the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) with almanac-style information about the countries of the world.
The official print version is available from the Government Publishing Office.
A country is a distinct part of the world, such as a state, nation, or other political entity.
It may be a sovereign state or make up one part of a larger state.
Copenhagen (  or  ;  ) is the capital and most populous city of Denmark, with a population of around 650,000 in the municipality and 1.4 million in the urban area.
The city is on the islands of Zealand and Amager, separated from Malmö, Sweden, by the Øresund strait.
Combinatorics is an area of mathematics primarily concerned with counting, both as a means and an end in obtaining results, and certain properties of finite structures.
It is closely related to many other areas of mathematics and has many applications ranging from logic to statistical physics and from evolutionary biology to computer science.
Calculus is the mathematical study of continuous change, in the same way that geometry is the study of shape, and algebra is the study of generalizations of arithmetic operations.
It has two major branches, differential calculus and integral calculus; the former concerns instantaneous rates of change, and the slopes of curves, while the latter concerns accumulation of quantities, and areas under or between curves.
Communication is usually understood to be the transmission of information.
Its precise definition is disputed and there are disagreements about whether unintentional or failed transmissions are included and whether communication not only transmits meaning but also creates it.
Classics or classical studies is the study of classical antiquity.
In the Western world, classics traditionally refers to the study of Classical Greek and Roman literature and their related original languages, Ancient Greek and Latin.
Chemistry is the scientific study of the properties and behavior of matter.
It is a physical science under natural sciences that covers the elements that make up matter to the compounds made of atoms, molecules and ions: their composition, structure, properties, behavior and the changes they undergo during a reaction with other substances.
In cell biology, the cytoplasm describes all material within a eukaryotic cell, enclosed by the cell membrane, except for the cell nucleus.
The material inside the nucleus and contained within the nuclear membrane is termed the nucleoplasm.
Christ, used by Christians as both a name and a title, unambiguously refers to Jesus.
It is also used as a title, in the reciprocal use "Christ Jesus", meaning "the Messiah Jesus" or "Jesus the Anointed", and independently as "the Christ".
Central Europe is a geographical region of Europe between Eastern, Southern, Western and Northern Europe.
The concept of "Central Europe" emerged in Germany and Austria in the 19th century as "Mitteleuropa".
Canada has a vast geography that occupies much of the continent of North America, sharing a land border with the contiguous United States to the south and the U.S. state of Alaska to the northwest.
Canada stretches from the Atlantic Ocean in the east to the Pacific Ocean in the west; to the north lies the Arctic Ocean.
Statistics Canada conducts a country-wide census that collects demographic data every five years on the first and sixth year of each decade.
The 2021 Canadian census enumerated a total population of 36,991,981, an increase of around 5.2 percent over the 2016 figure, Between 2011 and May 2016, Canada's population grew by 1.7 million people, with immigrants accounting for two-thirds of the increase.
The politics of Canada function within a framework of  parliamentary democracy and a federal system of parliamentary government with strong democratic traditions.
Canada is a constitutional monarchy, in which the monarch is head of state.
The economy of Canada is a highly developed mixed economy, with the world's tenth-largest economy , and a nominal GDP of approximately .
Canada is one of the world's largest trading nations, with a highly globalized economy.
Present-day telecommunications in Canada include telephone, radio, television, and internet usage.
In the past, telecommunications included telegraphy available through Canadian Pacific and Canadian National.
Canada, the world's second-largest country in total area, is dedicated to having an efficient, high-capacity multimodal transportation spanning often vast distances between natural resource extraction sites, agricultural and urban areas.
Canada's transportation system includes more than  of roads, 10 major international airports, 300 smaller airports,  of functioning railway track, and more than 300 commercial ports and harbours that provide access to the Pacific, Atlantic and Arctic oceans as well as the Great Lakes and the St. Lawrence Seaway.
Relations between Canada and the United States are extraordinarily positive and extensive.
The two countries consider themselves among the "closest [of] allies".
Christianity () is an Abrahamic monotheistic religion based on the life and teachings of Jesus of Nazareth.
It is the world's largest and most widespread religion with roughly 2.4 billion followers representing one-third of the global population.
Computing is any goal-oriented activity requiring, benefiting from, or creating computing machinery.
It includes the study and experimentation of algorithmic processes, and development of both hardware and software.
A casino is a facility for certain types of gambling.
Casinos are often built near or combined with hotels, resorts, restaurants, retail shops, cruise ships, and other tourist attractions.
Khmer (; , UNGEGN:  ) is an Austroasiatic language spoken by the Khmer people, and the official and national language of Cambodia.
Khmer has been influenced considerably by Sanskrit and Pali, especially in the royal and religious registers, through Hinduism and Buddhism.
A central processing unit (CPU)—also called a central processor or main processor—is the most important processor in a given computer.
Its electronic circuitry executes instructions of a computer program, such as arithmetic, logic, controlling, and input/output (I/O) operations.
Carnivora  is an order of placental mammals that have specialized in primarily eating flesh, whose members are formally referred to as carnivorans.
The order Carnivora is the fifth largest order of mammals, comprising at least 279 species.
Colombia (, ; ), officially the Republic of Colombia, is a country  mostly in South America with insular regions in North America.
The Colombian mainland is bordered by the Caribbean Sea to the north, Venezuela to the east and northeast, Brazil to the southeast, Ecuador and Peru to the south and southwest, the Pacific Ocean to the west, and Panama to the northwest.
Citizen Kane is a 1941 American drama film directed by, produced by, and starring Orson Welles.
Welles and Herman J. Mankiewicz wrote the screenplay.
In communications and information processing, code is a system of rules to convert information—such as a letter, word, sound, image, or gesture—into another form, sometimes shortened or secret, for communication through a communication channel or storage in a storage medium.
An early example is an invention of language, which enabled a person, through speech, to communicate what they thought, saw, heard, or felt to others.
The Cheirogaleidae are the family of strepsirrhine primates containing the various dwarf and mouse lemurs.
Like all other lemurs, cheirogaleids live exclusively on the island of Madagascar.
The Callitrichidae (also called Arctopitheci or Hapalidae) are a family of New World monkeys, including marmosets, tamarins, and lion tamarins.
At times, this group of animals has been regarded as a subfamily, called the Callitrichinae, of the family Cebidae.
The Cebidae are one of the five families of New World monkeys now recognised.
Extant members are the capuchin and squirrel monkeys.
Chondrichthyes (; ) is a class of jawed fish that contains the cartilaginous fish or chondrichthyians, which all have skeletons primarily composed of cartilage.
They can be contrasted with the Osteichthyes or bony fish, which have skeletons primarily composed of bone tissue.
Carl Linnaeus (23 May 1707 – 10 January 1778), also known after ennoblement in 1761 as Carl von Linné, was a Swedish biologist and physician who formalised binomial nomenclature, the modern system of naming organisms.
He is known as the "father of modern taxonomy".
The coast, also known as the coastline or seashore, is defined as the area where land meets the ocean, or as a line that forms the boundary between the land and the coastline.
Shores are influenced by the topography of the surrounding landscape, as well as by water induced erosion, such as waves.
Catatonia is a complex neuropsychiatric behavioral syndrome that is characterized by abnormal movements, immobility, abnormal behaviors, and withdrawal.
The onset of catatonia can be acute or subtle and symptoms can wax, wane, or change during episodes.
In cryptography, a cipher (or cypher) is an algorithm for performing encryption or decryption—a series of well-defined steps that can be followed as a procedure.
An alternative, less common term is encipherment.
Country (also called country and western) is a music genre originating in the Southern and Southwestern United States.
First produced in the 1920s, country music primarily focuses on working class Americans and blue-collar American life.
The Cold War (1948–1953) is the period within the Cold War from the incapacitation of the Allied Control Council in 1948 to the conclusion of the Korean War in 1953.
The list of world leaders in these years is as follows: 1948–49: Clement Attlee (UK); Harry Truman (US); Vincent Auriol (France); Joseph Stalin (USSR); Chiang Kai-shek (Allied China) 1950–51: Clement Attlee (UK); Harry Truman (US); Vincent Auriol (France); Joseph Stalin (USSR); Mao Zedong (China) 1952–53: Winston Churchill (UK); Harry Truman (US); Vincent Auriol (France); Joseph Stalin (USSR); Mao Zedong (China)EuropeBerlin BlockadeAfter the Marshall Plan, the introduction of a new currency to Western Germany to replace the debased Reichsmark and massive electoral losses for communist parties in 1946, in June 1948, the Soviet Union cut off surface road access to Berlin.
Crony capitalism sometimes also called simply cronyism, is a pejorative term used in political discourse to describe a situation in which businesses profit from a close relationship with state power, either through an anti-competitive regulatory environment, direct government largesse, and/or corruption.
Examples given for crony capitalism include obtainment of permits, government grants, tax breaks, or other undue influence from businesses over the state's deployment of public goods, for example, mining concessions for primary commodities or contracts for public works.
This is a list of lists of universities and colleges.
Subject of study Aerospace engineering Agriculture Art schools Business Chiropractic Engineering Forestry Law Maritime studies Medicine Music Nanotechnology Osteopathy Pharmaceuticals Social WorkInstitution type Community colleges For-profit universities and colleges Land-grant universities Liberal arts universities National universities Postgraduate-only institutions Private universities Public universities Research universities Technical universities Sea-grant universities Space-grant universities State universities and colleges Unaccredited universitiesLocation Lists of universities and colleges by country List of largest universitiesReligious affiliation Assemblies of God Baptist colleges and universities in the United States Catholic universities Ecclesiastical universities Benedictine colleges and universities Jesuit institutions Opus Dei universities Pontifical universities Int
A constitution is the aggregate of fundamental principles or established precedents that constitute the legal basis of a polity, organization or other type of entity, and commonly determines how that entity is to be governed.
When these principles are written down into a single document or set of legal documents, those documents may be said to embody a written constitution; if they are encompassed in a single comprehensive document, it is said to embody a codified constitution.
In law, common law (also known as judicial precedent, judge-made law, or case law) is the body of law created by judges and similar quasi-judicial tribunals by virtue of being stated in written opinions.
The defining characteristic of common law is that it arises as precedent.
A court of appeals is generally an appellate court.
Court of Appeals may refer to:Israeli Military Court of Appeals (Italy)Court of Appeals of the PhilippinesHigh Court of Appeals of TurkeyCourt of Appeals (Vatican City)United States Courts of appealsCourt of Appeals for the Armed ForcesCourt of Appeals for Veterans ClaimsCourt of Appeals for the Federal CircuitCourt of Appeals for the District of Columbia CircuitCourt of Appeals for the First CircuitCourt of Appeals for the Second CircuitCourt of Appeals for the Third CircuitCourt of Appeals for the Fourth CircuitCourt of Appeals for the Fifth CircuitCourt of Appeals for the Sixth CircuitCourt of Appeals for the Seventh CircuitCourt of Appeals for the Eighth CircuitCourt of Appeals for the Ninth CircuitCourt of Appeals for the Tenth CircuitCourt of Appeals for the Eleventh CircuitEmergency Court of AppealsTemporary Emergency Court of Appeals (defunct)Alabama Court of Appeals (existed until 1969)Alaska Cour
Common descent is a concept in evolutionary biology applicable when one species is the ancestor of two or more species later in time.
According to modern evolutionary biology, all living beings could be descendants of a unique ancestor commonly referred to as the last universal common ancestor (LUCA) of all life on Earth.
Celtic music is a broad grouping of music genres that evolved out of the folk music traditions of the Celtic people of Northwestern Europe (the modern Celtic nations).
It refers to both orally-transmitted traditional music and recorded music and the styles vary considerably to include everything from traditional music to a wide range of hybrids.
A constellation is an area on the celestial sphere in which a group of visible stars forms a perceived pattern or outline, typically representing an animal, mythological subject, or inanimate object.
The origins of the earliest constellations likely go back to prehistory.
Character or Characters may refer to:Arts, entertainment, and mediaLiterature Character (novel), a 1936 Dutch novel by Ferdinand Bordewijk Characters (Theophrastus), a classical Greek set of character sketches attributed to TheophrastusMusic Characters (John Abercrombie album), 1977 Character (Dark Tranquillity album), 2005 Character (Julia Kent album), 2013 Character (Rachael Sage album), 2020 Characters (Stevie Wonder album), 1987Types of entity Character (arts), an agent within a work of art, including literature, drama, cinema, opera, etc.
Character sketch or character, a literary description of a character type Game character (disambiguation), various types of characters in a video game or role playing game Player character, as above but who is controlled or whose actions are directly chosen by a player Non-player character, as above but not player-controlled, frequently abbreviated as NPCOther uses in arts, entertainment, and media Character (film), a 1997
A car is a wheeled motor vehicle used for transporting passengers.Car(s), CAR(s), or The Car(s) may also refer to:Computing C.a.R. (Z.u.L.), geometry software CAR and CDR, commands in LISP computer programming Clock with Adaptive Replacement, a page replacement algorithm Computer-assisted reporting Computer-assisted reviewingEconomics Capital adequacy ratio, a ratio of a bank's capital to its risk Cost accrual ratio, an accounting formula Cumulative abnormal return Cumulative average return, a financial concept related to the time value of moneyFilm and television Cars (franchise), a Disney/Pixar film series Cars (film), a 2006 computer-animated film from Disney and Pixar The Car (1977 film), an American horror film Car, a BBC Two television ident first aired in 1993 (see BBC Two '1991–2001' idents)
The Car (1997 film), a Malayalam film "The Car" (The Assistants episode)Literature Car (magazine), a British auto-enthusiast publication The Car (novel), a novel
In computing, a printer is a peripheral machine which makes a persistent representation of graphics or text, usually on paper.
While most output is human-readable, bar code printers are an example of an expanded use for printers.
A copyright is a type of intellectual property that gives its owner the exclusive right to copy, distribute, adapt, display, and perform a creative work, usually for a limited time.
The creative work may be in a literary, artistic, educational, or musical form.
Catalan (; autonym: , ), known in the Valencian Community and Carche as Valencian (autonym: ), is a Western Romance language.
It is the official language of Andorra, and an official language of two autonomous communities in eastern Spain: Catalonia and the Balearic Islands.
STS-51-F (also known as Spacelab 2) was the 19th flight of NASA's Space Shuttle program and the eighth flight of Space Shuttle Challenger.
It launched from Kennedy Space Center, Florida, on July 29, 1985, and landed eight days later on August 6, 1985.
The Classical period was an era of classical music between roughly 1750 and 1820.
The Classical period falls between the Baroque and the Romantic periods.
Character encoding is the process of assigning numbers to graphical characters, especially the written characters of human language, allowing them to be stored, transmitted, and transformed using digital computers.
The numerical values that make up a character encoding are known as "code points" and collectively comprise a "code space", a "code page", or a "character map".
In computing and telecommunication, a control character or non-printing character (NPC) is a code point in a character set that does not represent a written character or symbol.
They are used as in-band signaling to cause effects other than the addition of a symbol to the text.
Carbon () is a chemical element with the symbol C and atomic number 6.
It is nonmetallic and tetravalent—its atom making four electrons available to form covalent chemical bonds.
Computer data storage is a technology consisting of computer components and recording media that are used to retain digital data.
It is a core function and fundamental component of computers.
A cone is a basic geometrical shape.
Cone may also refer to:MathematicsCone (category theory)
In a chemical reaction, chemical equilibrium is the state in which both the reactants and products are present in concentrations which have no further tendency to change with time, so that there is no observable change in the properties of the system.
This state results when the forward reaction proceeds at the same rate as the reverse reaction.
In mathematics, a combination is a selection of items from a set that has distinct members, such that the order of selection does not matter (unlike permutations).
For example, given three fruits, say an apple, an orange and a pear, there are three combinations of two that can be drawn from this set: an apple and a pear; an apple and an orange; or a pear and an orange.
Software is a set of computer programs and associated documentation and data.
This is in contrast to hardware, from which the system is built and which actually performs the work.
Computer programming or coding is the composition of sequences of instructions, called programs, that computers can follow to perform tasks.
It involves designing and implementing algorithms, step-by-step specifications of procedures, by writing code in one or more programming languages.
On the Consolation of Philosophy (), often titled as The Consolation of Philosophy or simply the Consolation, is a philosophical work by the Roman philosopher Boethius.
Written in 523 while he was imprisoned and awaiting execution by the Ostrogothic King Theodoric, it is often described as the last great Western work of the Classical Period.
Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon is a 2000 Mandarin-language wuxia martial arts adventure film directed by Ang Lee and written for the screen by Wang Hui-ling, James Schamus, and Tsai Kuo-jung.
The film stars Chow Yun-fat, Michelle Yeoh, Zhang Ziyi, and Chang Chen.
Charlemagne ( ) or Charles the Great (, Frankish: Karl; 2 April 747 – 28 January 814), a member of the Carolingian dynasty, was King of the Franks from 768, King of the Lombards from 774, and was crowned as the Emperor of the Romans by Pope Leo III in 800.
Charlemagne succeeded in uniting the majority of western and central Europe and was the first recognized emperor to rule from western Europe after the fall of the Western Roman Empire approximately three centuries earlier.
While Hypertext Markup Language (HTML) has been in use since 1991, HTML 4.0 from December 1997 was the first standardized version where international characters were given reasonably complete treatment.
When an HTML document includes special characters outside the range of seven-bit ASCII, two goals are worth considering: the information's integrity, and universal browser display.
A carbon nanotube (CNT) is a tube made of carbon with a diameter in the nanometer range (nanoscale).
They are one of the allotropes of carbon.
The Czech Republic, also known as Czechia, is a landlocked country in Central Europe.
Historically known as Bohemia, it is bordered by Austria to the south, Germany to the west, Poland to the northeast, and Slovakia to the southeast.
Czechoslovakia (; Czech and , Česko-Slovensko) was a landlocked state in Central Europe, created in 1918, when it declared its independence from Austria-Hungary.
In 1938, after the Munich Agreement, the Sudetenland became part of Nazi Germany, while the country lost further territories to Hungary and Poland (Carpathian Ruthenia to Hungary and Zaolzie to Poland).
Computer science is the study of computation, information, and automation.
Computer science spans theoretical disciplines (such as algorithms, theory of computation, and information theory) to applied disciplines (including the design and implementation of hardware and software).
Creationism is the religious belief that nature, and aspects such as the universe, Earth, life, and humans, originated with supernatural acts of divine creation.
In its broadest sense, creationism includes a continuum of religious views, which vary in their acceptance or rejection of scientific explanations such as evolution that describe the origin and development of natural phenomena.
Chad (; ), officially the Republic of Chad, is a landlocked country in Central Africa.
It borders Libya to the north, Sudan to the east, the Central African Republic to the south, Cameroon and Nigeria to the southwest, and Niger to the west.
Chad is one of the 47 landlocked countries in the world and is located in North Central Africa, measuring , nearly twice the size of France and slightly more than three times the size of California.
Most of its ethnically and linguistically diverse population lives in the south, with densities ranging from 54 persons per square kilometer in the Logone River basin to 0.1 persons in the northern B.E.T. (Borkou-Ennedi-Tibesti) desert region, which itself is larger than France.
The people of Chad speak more than 100 languages and divide themselves into many ethnic groups.
However, language and ethnicity are not the same.
The Politics of Chad take place in a framework of a presidential republic, whereby the President of Chad is both head of state and head of government.
Executive power is exercised by the government.
The economy of Chad suffers from the landlocked country's geographic remoteness, drought, lack of infrastructure, and political turmoil.
About 85% of the population depends on agriculture, including the herding of livestock.
Telecommunications in Chad include radio, television, fixed and mobile telephones, and the Internet.
Radio and televisionRadio stations: state-owned radio network, Radiodiffusion Nationale Tchadienne (RNT), operates national and regional stations; about 10 private radio stations; some stations rebroadcast programs from international broadcasters (2007); 2 AM, 4 FM, and 5 shortwave stations (2001).
Transport infrastructure within Chad is generally poor, especially in the north and east of the country.
River transport is limited to the south-west corner.
The Chad National Army (; , ANT) consists of the five Defence and Security Forces listed in Article 185 of the Chadian Constitution that came into effect on 4 May 2018.
These are the National Army ((including Ground Forces, and Air Force), the National Gendarmerie), the National Police, the National and Nomadic Guard (GNNT) and the Judicial Police.
The foreign relations of Chad are significantly influenced by the desire for oil revenue and investment in Chadian oil industry and support for former Chadian President Idriss Déby.
Chad is officially non-aligned but has close relations with France, the former colonial power.
A colloid is a mixture in which one substance consisting of microscopically dispersed insoluble particles is suspended throughout another substance.
Some definitions specify that the particles must be dispersed in a liquid, while others extend the definition to include substances like aerosols and gels.
Chinese may refer to: Something related to China Chinese people, people identified with China, through nationality, citizenship, and/or ethnicityHan Chinese, East Asian ethnic group native to China.
Zhonghua minzu, the supra-ethnic concept of the Chinese nation List of ethnic groups in China, people of various ethnicities in contemporary China Ethnic minorities in China, people of non-Han Chinese ethnicities in modern China Ethnic groups in Chinese history, people of various ethnicities in historical China Nationals of the People's Republic of China Nationals of the Republic of China  Overseas Chinese, Chinese people residing outside the territories of mainland China, Hong Kong, Macau, and Taiwan Sinitic languages, the major branch of the Sino-Tibetan language family Chinese language, a group of related languages spoken predominantly in China, sharing a written script (Chinese characters in traditional and simplified forms) Standard Chinese, the standard form of Mandarin Ch
"Riding shotgun" was a phrase used to describe the bodyguard who rides alongside a stagecoach driver, typically armed with a break-action shotgun, called a coach gun, to ward off bandits or hostile Native Americans.
In modern use, it refers to the practice of sitting alongside the driver in a moving vehicle.
Cooking, also known as cookery or professionally as the culinary arts, is the art, science and craft of using heat to make food more palatable, digestible, nutritious, or safe.
Cooking techniques and ingredients vary widely, from grilling food over an open fire to using electric stoves, to baking in various types of ovens, reflecting local conditions.
A card game is any game using playing cards as the primary device with which the game is played, be they traditional or game-specific.
Countless card games exist, including families of related games (such as poker).
Cross-stitch is a form of sewing and a popular form of counted-thread embroidery in which X-shaped stitches in a tiled, raster-like pattern are used to form a picture.
The stitcher counts the threads on a piece of evenweave fabric (such as linen) in each direction so that the stitches are of uniform size and appearance.
Games available in most casinos are commonly called casino games.
In a casino game, the players gamble cash or casino chips on various possible random outcomes or combinations of outcomes.
A video game or computer game is an electronic game that involves interaction with a user interface or input device (such as a joystick, controller, keyboard, or motion sensing device) to generate visual feedback from a display device, most commonly shown in a video format on a television set, computer monitor, flat-panel display or touchscreen on handheld devices, or a virtual reality headset.
Most modern video games are audiovisual, with audio complement delivered through speakers or headphones, and sometimes also with other types of sensory feedback (e.g., haptic technology that provides tactile sensations), and some video games also allow microphone and webcam inputs for in-game chatting and livestreaming.
The Cambrian Period ( ; sometimes symbolized Ꞓ) is the first geological period of the Paleozoic Era, and of the Phanerozoic Eon.
The Cambrian lasted 53.4 million years from the end of the preceding Ediacaran Period 538.8 million years ago (mya) to the beginning of the Ordovician Period  mya.
In ontology, the theory of categories concerns itself with the categories of being: the highest genera or kinds of entities according to Amie Thomasson.
To investigate the categories of being, or simply categories, is to determine the most fundamental and the broadest classes of entities.
Concrete is a composite material composed of aggregate bonded together with a fluid cement that cures over time.
Concrete is the second-most-used substance in the world after water, and is the most widely used building material.
Coitus interruptus, also known as withdrawal, pulling out or the pull-out method, is a method of birth control during penetrative sexual intercourse, whereby the penis is withdrawn from a vagina prior to ejaculation so that the ejaculate (semen) may be directed away from the vagina in an effort to avoid insemination.
This method was used by an estimated 38 million couples worldwide in 1991.
A condom is a sheath-shaped barrier device used during sexual intercourse to reduce the probability of pregnancy or a sexually transmitted infection (STI).
There are both male and female condoms.
A country code is a short alphanumeric identification code for countries and dependent areas.
Its primary use is in data processing and communications.
Cladistics (; ) is an approach to biological classification in which organisms are categorized in groups ("clades") based on hypotheses of most recent common ancestry.
The evidence for hypothesized relationships is typically shared derived characteristics (synapomorphies) that are not present in more distant groups and ancestors.
A calendar is a system of organizing days.
This is done by giving names to periods of time, typically days, weeks, months and years.
Physical cosmology is a branch of cosmology concerned with the study of cosmological models.
A cosmological model, or simply cosmology, provides a description of the largest-scale structures and dynamics of the universe and allows study of fundamental questions about its origin, structure, evolution, and ultimate fate.
In physical cosmology, cosmic inflation, cosmological inflation, or just inflation, is a theory of exponential expansion of space in the early universe.
The inflationary epoch is believed to have lasted from  seconds to between  and  seconds  after the Big Bang.
The candela ( or ; symbol: cd) is the unit of luminous intensity in the International System of Units (SI).
It measures luminous power per unit solid angle emitted by a light source in a particular direction.
Condensed matter physics is the field of physics that deals with the macroscopic and microscopic physical properties of matter, especially the solid and liquid phases which arise from electromagnetic forces between atoms.
More generally, the subject deals with condensed phases of matter: systems of many constituents with strong interactions among them.
Cultural anthropology is a branch of anthropology focused on the study of cultural variation among humans.
It is in contrast to social anthropology, which perceives cultural variation as a subset of a posited anthropological constant.
Conversion of units is the conversion between different units of measurement for the same quantity, typically through multiplicative conversion factors which change the measured quantity value without changing its effects.
Unit conversion is often easier within the metric or the SI than in others, due to the regular 10-base in all units and the prefixes that increase or decrease by 3 powers of 10 at a time.
A city is a human settlement of a notable size.
It can be defined as a permanent and densely settled place with administratively defined boundaries whose members work primarily on non-agricultural tasks.
Chervil (; Anthriscus cerefolium), sometimes called French parsley or garden chervil (to distinguish it from similar plants also called chervil), is a delicate annual herb related to parsley.
It was formerly called myrhis due to its volatile oil with an aroma similar to the resinous substance myrrh.
Chives, scientific name Allium schoenoprasum, is a species of flowering plant in the family Amaryllidaceae that produces edible leaves and flowers.
Their close relatives include the  common onions, garlic, shallot, leek, scallion, and Chinese onion.
Christopher J. Morris (born 15 June 1962) is an English comedian, radio presenter, actor, and filmmaker.
Known for his deadpan, dark humour, surrealism, and controversial subject matter, he has been praised by the British Film Institute for his "uncompromising, moralistic drive".
Colorado (, other variants) is a state in the Mountain West sub-region of the Western United States.
It encompasses most of the Southern Rocky Mountains, as well as the northeastern portion of the Colorado Plateau and the western edge of the Great Plains.
The Carboniferous ( ) is a geologic period and system of the Paleozoic that spans 60 million years from the end of the Devonian Period  million years ago (mya), to the beginning of the Permian Period,  mya.
The name Carboniferous means "coal-bearing", from the Latin  ("coal") and  ("bear, carry"), and refers to the many coal beds formed globally during that time.
The Comoros, officially the Union of the Comoros, is an archipelagic country made up of three islands in Southeastern Africa, located at the northern end of the Mozambique Channel in the Indian Ocean.
Its capital and largest city is Moroni.
The critical philosophy () movement, attributed to Immanuel Kant (1724–1804), sees the primary task of philosophy as criticism rather than justification of knowledge.
Criticism, for Kant, meant judging as to the possibilities of knowledge before advancing to knowledge itself (from the Greek kritike (techne), or "art of judgment").
China (), officially the People's Republic of China (PRC), is a country in East Asia.
It is the world's second-most-populous country, with a population exceeding 1.4 billion.
California is a state in the Western United States.
With over 38.9million residents across a total area of approximately , it is the most populous U.S. state, the third-largest U.S. state by area, and the most populated subnational entity in North America.
The Columbia River (Upper Chinook:  or ; Sahaptin: Nch’i-Wàna or Nchi wana; Sinixt dialect ) is the largest river in the Pacific Northwest region of North America.
The river forms in the Rocky Mountains of British Columbia, Canada.
Commelinales is an order of flowering plants.
It comprises five families: Commelinaceae, Haemodoraceae, Hanguanaceae, Philydraceae, and Pontederiaceae.
The Cucurbitales are an order of flowering plants, included in the rosid group of dicotyledons.
This order mostly belongs to tropical areas, with limited presence in subtropical and temperate regions.
Contra dance (also contradance, contra-dance and other variant spellings) is a form of folk dancing made up of long lines of couples.
It has mixed origins from English country dance, Scottish country dance, and French dance styles in the 17th century.
Coin collecting is the collecting of coins or other forms of minted legal tender.
Coins of interest to collectors often include those that were in circulation for only a brief time, coins with mint errors, and especially beautiful or historically significant pieces.
Crokinole ( ) is a disk-flicking dexterity board game, possibly of Canadian origin, similar to the games of pitchnut, carrom, and pichenotte, with elements of shuffleboard and curling reduced to table-top size.
Players take turns shooting discs across the circular playing surface, trying to land their discs in the higher-scoring regions of the board, particularly the recessed center hole of 20 points, while also attempting to knock opposing discs off the board, and into the 'ditch'.
Capitalism is an economic system based on the private ownership of the means of production and their operation for profit.
Central characteristics of capitalism include capital accumulation, competitive markets, price systems, private property, property rights recognition, voluntary exchange, and wage labor.
Cross ownership is a method of reinforcing business relationships by owning stock in the companies with which a given company does business.
Heavy cross ownership is referred to as circular ownership.
Cardiology () is the study of the heart.
Cardiology is a branch of medicine that deals with disorders of the heart and the cardiovascular system.
is a Japanese video game company.
It has created a number of multi-million-selling game franchises, with its most commercially successful being Resident Evil, Monster Hunter, Street Fighter, Mega Man, Devil May Cry, Dead Rising, Ace Attorney, and Marvel vs. Capcom.
The history of Cambodia, a country in mainland Southeast Asia, can be traced back to Indian civilization.
Detailed records of a political structure on the territory of what is now Cambodia first appear in Chinese annals in reference to Funan, a polity that encompassed the southernmost part of the Indochinese peninsula during the 1st to 6th centuries.
Cambodia is a country in mainland Southeast Asia.
It borders Thailand, Laos, Vietnam, the Gulf of Thailand and covers a total area of approximately .
Demographic features of the population of Cambodia include population density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status, religious affiliations and other aspects of the population.
PopulationBetween 1874 and 1921, the total population of Cambodia increased from about 946,000 to 2.4 million.
The politics of Cambodia are defined within the framework of a constitutional monarchy, in which the king serves as the head of state, and the prime minister is the head of government.
The collapse of communism set in motion events that led to the withdrawal of the Vietnamese armed forces, which had established their presence in the country since the fall of the Khmer Rouge.
The economy of Cambodia ( ) currently follows an open market system (market economy) and has seen rapid economic progress in the last decade.
Cambodia had a GDP of $28.54 billion in 2022.
Telecommunications in Cambodia include telephone, radio, television, and Internet services, which are regulated by the Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications.
Transport and posts were restored throughout most of the country in the early 1980s during the People's Republic of Kampuchea regime after being disrupted under Democratic Kampuchea (Khmer Rouge).
The system of transport in Cambodia, rudimentary at the best of times, was severely damaged in the chaos that engulfed the nation in the latter half of the 20th century.
The country's weak transport infrastructure hindered emergency relief efforts, exacerbating the logistical issues of procurement of supplies in general and their distribution.
The Cambodian government has diplomatic relations with most countries, including the United States, the United Kingdom, and France, as well as all of its Asian neighbors, including China, India, Vietnam, Laos, South Korea, and Thailand.
The government is a member of most major international organizations, including the United Nations and its specialized agencies such as the World Bank and International Monetary Fund.
Khmer architecture (), also known as Angkorian architecture (), is the architecture produced by the Khmers during the Angkor period of the Khmer Empire from approximately the later half of the 8th century CE to the first half of the 15th century CE.
The architecture of the Indian rock-cut temples, particularly in sculpture, had an influence on Southeast Asia and was widely adopted into the Indianised architecture of Cambodian (Khmer), Annamese and Javanese temples (of the Greater India).
Capricornus  is one of the constellations of the zodiac.
Its name is Latin for "horned goat" or "goat horn" or "having horns like a goat's", and it is commonly represented in the form of a sea goat: a mythical creature that is half goat, half fish.
Cameroon ( ; ), officially the Republic of Cameroon (), is a country in Central Africa.
It shares boundaries with Nigeria to the west and north, Chad to the northeast, the Central African Republic to the east, and Equatorial Guinea, Gabon and the Republic of the Congo to the south.
At the crossroads of West Africa and Central Africa, the territory of what is now Cameroon has seen human habitation since some time in the Middle Paleolithic, likely no later than 130,000 years ago.
The earliest discovered archaeological evidence of humans dates from around 30,000 years ago at Shum Laka.
At , Cameroon is the world's 53rd largest country.
It is slightly larger than the nation of Sweden and the US state of California.
The demographic profile of Cameroon is complex for a country of its population.
Cameroon comprises an estimated 250 distinct ethnic groups, which may be formed into five large regional-cultural divisions: western highlanders (Semi-Bantu or grassfielders), including the Bamileke, Bamum (or Bamoun), and many smaller Tikar groups in the Northwest (est. 38% of total population); coastal tropical forest peoples, including the Bassa, Duala (or Douala), and many smaller groups in the Southwest (12%); southern tropical forest peoples, including the Beti-Pahuin, Bulu (a subgroup of Beti-Pahuin), Fang (subgroup of Beti-Pahuin), Maka, Njem, and Baka pygmies (18%); predominantly Islamic peoples of the northern semi-arid regions (the Sahel) and central highlands, including the Fulani ( or Peuhl; ) (14%); and the "Kirdi", non-Islamic or recently Islamic peoples of the northern desert and central highlands (18%).
The politics of Cameroon takes place in a framework of a unitary presidential republic, whereby the President of Cameroon is both head of state and head of government, and of a multi-party system.
A prime ministerial position exists and is nominally head of government, implying a semi-presidential system, although de facto only serves to assist the president.
The economy of Cameroon was one of the most prosperous in Africa for a quarter of a century after independence.
The drop in commodity prices for its principal exports – petroleum, cocoa, coffee, and cotton – in the mid-1980s, combined with an overvalued currency and economic mismanagement, led to a decade-long recession.
Telecommunications in Cameroon include radio, television, fixed and mobile telephones, and the Internet.
History During German rule, It was set up in the protectorate of Kamerun the first telegraph line, the first telephone line, and the first wireless telegraph.
This article provides a breakdown of the transportation options available in Cameroon.
The options available to citizens and tourists include railways, roadways, waterways, pipelines, and airlines.
The Cameroon Armed Forces () are the military of the Republic of Cameroon.
The armed forces number 40,000 personnel in ground, air, and naval forces.
Cameroon's noncontentious, low-profile approach to foreign relations puts it squarely in the middle of other African and developing country states on major issues.
It supports the principles of non-interference in the affairs of third world countries and increased assistance to underdeveloped countries.
Cape Verde (formally, the Republic of Cabo Verde) is a group of arid Atlantic islands which are home to distinct communities of plants, birds, and reptiles.
The islands constitute the unique Cape Verde Islands dry forests ecoregion, according to the World Wildlife Fund.Location and description The Cape Verde Islands are located in the mid-Atlantic Ocean some  off the west coast of the continent of Africa.
Demographic features of the population of Cape Verde include population density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status, religious affiliations and other aspects of the population.
Cape Verde has a population of about 540,000 inhabitants who live in the islands.
Politics of Cape Verde takes place in a framework of a semi-presidential representative democratic republic, whereby the Prime Minister of Cape Verde is the head of government and the President of the Republic of Cape Verde is the head of state, and of a multi-party system.
Executive power is exercised by the president and the government.
Most transportation in Cape Verde is done by air.
There are regular flights between the major islands (Santiago, Sal and São Vicente), with less frequent flights to the other islands.
The Cape Verdean Armed Forces (), Cabo Verdean Armed Forces or FACV are the military of Cape Verde.
They include two branches, the National Guard and the Coast Guard.
Cape Verde follows a policy of nonalignment and seeks cooperative relations with all friendly states.
Angola, Brazil, the People's Republic of China, Cuba, France, Germany, Portugal, Senegal, Russia, South Korea and the United States maintain embassies in Praia.
The Cayman () Islands is a self-governing British Overseas Territory, and the largest by population.
The  territory comprises the three islands of Grand Cayman, Cayman Brac and Little Cayman, which are located south of Cuba and north-east of Honduras, between Jamaica and Mexico's Yucatán Peninsula.
The Cayman Islands are a British overseas territory located in the Caribbean that have been under various governments since their discovery by Europeans.
Christopher Columbus sighted the Cayman Islands on May 10, 1503, and named them Las Tortugas after the numerous sea turtles seen swimming in the surrounding waters.
The Cayman Islands are a British dependency and island country.
It is a three-island archipelago in the Caribbean Sea, consisting of Grand Cayman, Cayman Brac, and Little Cayman.
This is a demography of the population of the Cayman Islands including population density, ethnicity, religious affiliations and other aspects of the population.
PopulationWith its success in the tourism and financial service industries, the Cayman Islands have attracted many international businesses and citizens to relocate.
The politics of the Cayman Islands takes place within a framework of parliamentary democracy, within the confines of the Government of the Cayman Islands.
Constitutional ModernisationConstitutional Modernisation has come to the forefront of politics recently with the collapse of the now defunct Euro Bank Corporation in 2003.
The economy of the Cayman Islands, a British overseas territory located in the western Caribbean Sea, is mainly fueled by the tourism sector and by the financial services sector, together representing 50–60 percent of the country's gross domestic product (GDP).
The Cayman Islands Investment Bureau, a government agency, has been established with the mandate of promoting investment and economic development in the territory.
Communications in the Cayman IslandsTelephone Telephones – main lines in use: 37,400 (2009) Telephones – mobile cellular: 99,900 (2004)Telephone system:Domestic: Reasonably good overall telephone system with a high fixed-line teledensity.
Liberalization of telecom market in 2003; introduction of competition in the mobile-cellular market in 2004.
The transport infrastructure of the Cayman Islands consists of a public road network, two seaports, and three airports.
RoadsAs of 2000, the Cayman Islands had a total of 488 miles (785 km) of paved highway.
The foreign relations of the Cayman Islands are largely managed from the United Kingdom, as the islands remains one of 14 overseas territories under British jurisdiction and sovereignty.
However, the Government of the Cayman Islands have autonomy and often resolves important issues with foreign governments alone, without intervention from Britain.
The Central African Republic (CAR), formerly known as Ubangi-Shari, is a landlocked country in Central Africa.
It is bordered by Chad to the north, Sudan to the northeast, South Sudan to the east, the Democratic Republic of the Congo to the south, the Republic of the Congo to the southwest, and Cameroon to the west.
The  history of the Central African Republic is roughly composed of four distinct periods.
The earliest period of settlement began around 10,000 years ago when nomadic people first began to settle, farm and fish in the region.
The Central African Republic is a landlocked nation within the interior of the African continent.
It is bordered by  Cameroon, Chad, Sudan, South Sudan, the Democratic Republic of the Congo and the Republic of the Congo.
Demographic features of the population of the Central African Republic include population density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status,  religious affiliations and other aspects of the population.
There are more than 80 ethnic groups in the Central African Republic (CAR), each with its own language.
The politics of the Central African Republic formally take place in a framework of a semi-presidential republic.
In this system, the President is the head of state, with a Prime Minister as head of government.
The economy of the Central African Republic is $2.321 billion by gross domestic product as of 2019, with an estimated annual per capita income of just $805 as measured by purchasing power parity in 2019.
Sparsely populated and landlocked, the Central African Republic is overwhelmingly agrarian.
Telecommunications in the Central African Republic includes radio, television, fixed and mobile telephones, and the Internet as well as the postal system.
Persistent conflict has hampered telecommunication and media development in the Central African Republic.
Modes of transport in the Central African Republic include road, water, and air.
Most of the country is connected to the road network, but not all of it.
The Central African Armed Forces (; FACA) are the armed forces of the Central African Republic and have been barely functional since the outbreak of the civil war in 2012.
Today they are among the world's weakest armed forces, dependent on international support to provide security in the country.
President François Bozizé has said that one of his priorities is to get the support of the international community.
This has indeed been visible in his relations to donor countries and international organisations.
Chad ( ), officially the Republic of Chad, is a landlocked country at the crossroads of North and Central Africa.
It is bordered by Libya to the north, Sudan to the east, the Central African Republic to the south, Cameroon to the southwest, Nigeria to the southwest (at Lake Chad), and Niger to the west.
Chile, officially the Republic of Chile, is a country located in western South America.
It is the southernmost country in the world and the closest to Antarctica, stretching along a narrow strip of land between the Andes Mountains and the Pacific Ocean.
The territory of Chile has been populated since at least 3000 BC.
By the 16th century, Spanish conquistadors began to colonize the region of present-day Chile, and the territory was a colony between 1540 and 1818, when it gained independence from Spain.
Chile's government is a representative democratic republic, whereby the President of Chile is both head of state and head of government, and of a formal multi-party system.
Executive power is exercised by the president and by their cabinet.
The economy of Chile is a market economy and high-income economy as ranked by the World Bank.
The country is considered one of South America's most prosperous nations, leading the region in competitiveness, income per capita, globalization, economic freedom, and low perception of corruption.
The technical regulator of communications in Chile is the Ministry of Transportation and Telecommunications, through the Undersecretariat of Telecommunications (Subtel).
TelephoneHistory Telephone and telegraph services started in Chile in 1879, three years after Alexander Graham Bell, presented his patent for a telephonic system.
Transport in Chile is mostly by road.
The far south of the country is not directly connected to central Chile by road, and water transport also plays a part there.
The Chilean Armed Forces () is the unified military organization comprising the Chilean Army, Air Force, and Navy.
The President of Chile is the commander-in-chief of the military, and formulates policy through the Minister of Defence.
Since its return to democracy in 1990, Chile has been an active participant in the regional and international arena.
Chile assumed a two-year non-permanent position on the UN Security Council in January 2003 and was re-elected to the council in October 2013.
The "National Anthem of Chile" (, ), also known as "" (; ) or by its incipit "" ('How pure, Chile, is your blue sky'), was adopted in 1828.
It has a history of two lyrics and two melodies that made up three different versions.
The Territory of Christmas Island is an Australian external territory comprising the island of the same name.
It is located in the Indian Ocean around  south of Java and Sumatra and about  northwest of the closest point on the Australian mainland.
Clipperton Island ( ; ), also known as Clipperton Atoll and previously referred to as Clipperton's Rock, is an  uninhabited French coral atoll in the eastern Pacific Ocean.
The only French territory in the North Pacific, Clipperton is  from Paris, France;  from Papeete, Tahiti; and  from Acapulco, Mexico.
The Cocos (Keeling) Islands (), officially the Territory of Cocos (Keeling) Islands (; ), are an Australian external territory in the Indian Ocean, comprising a small archipelago approximately midway between Australia and Sri Lanka and relatively close to the Indonesian island of Sumatra.
The territory's dual name (official since the islands' incorporation into Australia in 1955) reflects that the islands have historically been known as either the Cocos Islands or the Keeling Islands.
Demographic features of the population of the Cocos (Keeling) Islands include population density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status, religious affiliations and other aspects of the population.
CIA World Factbook demographic statistics
A conspiracy theory is an explanation for an event or situation that asserts the existence of a conspiracy by powerful and sinister groups, often political in motivation, when other explanations are more probable.
The term generally has a negative connotation, implying that the appeal of a conspiracy theory is based in prejudice, emotional conviction, or insufficient evidence.
The Coral Sea Islands Territory is an external territory of Australia which comprises a group of small and mostly uninhabited tropical islands and reefs in the Coral Sea, north-east of Queensland, Australia.
The only inhabited island is Willis Island.
Costa Rica (, ; ; literally "Rich Coast"), officially the Republic of Costa Rica (), is a country in the Central American region of North America.
Costa Rica is bordered by Nicaragua to the north, the Caribbean Sea to the northeast, Panama to the southeast, and the Pacific Ocean to the southwest, as well as maritime border with Ecuador to the south of Cocos Island.
The first indigenous peoples of Costa Rica were hunters and gatherers, and when the Spanish conquerors arrived, Costa Rica was divided in two distinct cultural areas due to its geographical location in the Intermediate Area, between Mesoamerican and the Andean cultures, with influences of both cultures.
Christopher Columbus first dropped anchor in Costa Rica in 1502 at Isla Uvita.
Costa Rica is located on the Central American Isthmus, surrounding the point 10° north of the equator and 84° west of the prime meridian.
It has 212 km of Caribbean Sea coastline and 1,016 on the North Pacific Ocean.
This is a demographic article about Costa Rica's population, including population density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status, religious affiliations, and other aspects of the population.
According to the United Nations, Costa Rica had an estimated population of  people as of 2021.
The politics of Costa Rica take place in a framework of a presidential, representative democratic republic, with a multi-party system.
Executive power is exercised by the president and their cabinet, and the President of Costa Rica is both the head of state and head of government.
The economy of Costa Rica has been very stable for some years now,with continuing growth in the GDP (Gross Domestic Product) and moderate inflation, though with a high unemployment rate: 11.49% in 2019.
Costa Rica's economy emerged from recession in 1997 and has shown strong aggregate growth since then.
There are many modes of transport in Costa Rica but the country's infrastructure has suffered from a lack of maintenance and new investment.
There is an extensive road system of more than 30,000 kilometers, although much of it is in disrepair; this also applies to ports, railways and water delivery systems.
The Public Force of Costa Rica () is the Costa Rican national law enforcement force, which performs policing and border patrol functions.
HistoryOn 1 December 1948, President José Figueres Ferrer of Costa Rica abolished the military of Costa Rica after achieving victory in the Costa Rican Civil War that year.
Costa Rica is an active member of the international community and, in 1983, claimed it was for neutrality.
Due to certain powerful constituencies favoring its methods, it has a weight in world affairs far beyond its size.
Computational linguistics is an interdisciplinary field concerned with the computational modelling of natural language, as well as the study of appropriate computational approaches to linguistic questions.
In general, computational linguistics draws upon linguistics, computer science, artificial intelligence, mathematics, logic, philosophy, cognitive science, cognitive psychology, psycholinguistics, anthropology and neuroscience, among others.
Ivory Coast (Côte d'Ivoire) is a sub-Saharan nation in southern West Africa located at 8 00°N, 5 00°W. The country is approximately square in shape.
Its southern border is a  coastline on the Gulf of Guinea on the north Atlantic Ocean.
Demographic features of the population of Ivory Coast include population density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status, religious affiliations and other aspects of the population.
PopulationAccording to  the total population was  in , compared to only 2 630 000 in 1950.
The politics of Ivory Coast takes place in a framework of a presidential representative democratic republic, whereby the President of Ivory Coast is both head of state and head of government, and of a multi-party system.
Executive power is exercised by the President and the Government.
Ivory Coast  invested remarkably in its transport system.
Transport Infrastructures are much more developed than they are other West African countries despite a crisis that restrained their maintenance and development.
The Armed Forces of Côte d'Ivoire (; "FACI") are the armed forces of Ivory Coast.
History The Ivorian military has its roots in the colonial armed forces of French West Africa, which were headquartered in Dakar, Senegal but possessed bases in several distinct military regions.
Croatia (, ; , ), officially the Republic of Croatia (  ), is a country located at the crossroads of Central and Southern Europe.
Its coast lies entirely on the Adriatic Sea.
At the time of the Roman Empire, the area of modern Croatia comprised two Roman provinces, Pannonia and Dalmatia.
After the collapse of the Western Roman Empire in the 5th century, the area was subjugated by the Ostrogoths for 50 years, before being incorporated into the Byzantine Empire.
The geography of Croatia is defined by its location—it is described as a part of Central Europe and Southeast Europe, a part of the Balkans and Southern Europe.
Croatia's territory covers , making it the 127th largest country in the world.
The demographic characteristics of the population of Croatia are known through censuses, normally conducted in ten-year intervals and analysed by various statistical bureaus since the 1850s.
The Croatian Bureau of Statistics has performed this task since the 1990s.
The politics of Croatia are defined by a parliamentary, representative democratic republic framework, where the Prime Minister of Croatia is the head of government in a multi-party system.
Executive power is exercised by the Government and the President of Croatia.
The economy of Croatia is a high-income, service-based social market economy with the tertiary sector accounting for 70% of total gross domestic product (GDP).
Croatia has a fully integrated and globalized economy.
Transport in Croatia relies on several main modes, including transport by car, train, ship and plane.
Road transport incorporates a comprehensive network of state, county and local routes augmented by a network of highways for long-distance travelling.
The Armed Forces of the Republic of Croatia () are the military forces of Croatia.
The President is the Armed Forces Commander-in-Chief, and exercises administrative powers in times of war by giving orders to the chief of staff, while administration and defence policy execution in peacetime is carried out by the Government through the Ministry of Defence.
The Republic of Croatia is a sovereign country at the crossroads of Central Europe, Southeast Europe, and the Mediterranean that declared its independence from Yugoslavia on 25 June 1991.
Croatia is a member of the European Union (EU), United Nations (UN), the Council of Europe, NATO, the World Trade Organization (WTO), Union for the Mediterranean and a number of other international organizations.
Christopher Columbus mistakenly thought that Cuba was Cipango, the fabled country of wealth, pearls, precious stones, and spices that Marco Polo said was located approximately 1500 miles off the coast of India.
As a result, he altered his course to the southwest, and on October 28, 1492, he landed in Cuba.
The economy of Cuba is a mixed planned economy dominated by state-run enterprises.
Most of the labor force is employed by the state.
Transportation in Cuba is the system of railways, roads, airports, waterways, ports and harbours in Cuba:Railways total: 8,285 km standard gauge: 8,125 km  gauge (105 km electrified) narrow gauge: 160 km of  gauge.
Cuba built the first railway system in the Spanish empire, before the 1848 start in the Iberian peninsula.
Cuba's foreign policy has been fluid throughout history depending on world events and other variables, including relations with the United States.
Without massive Soviet subsidies and its primary trading partner, Cuba became increasingly isolated in the late 1980s and early 1990s after the fall of the USSR and the end of the Cold War, but Cuba opened up more with the rest of the world again starting in the late 1990s when they have since entered bilateral co-operation with several South American countries, most notably Venezuela and Bolivia beginning in the late 1990s, especially after the Venezuela election of Hugo Chávez in 1999, who became a staunch ally of Castro's Cuba.
Cyprus (), officially the Republic of Cyprus, is an island country located in the eastern Mediterranean Sea, south of the Anatolian Peninsula and east of the Levant.
It is geographically in Western Asia, but its cultural ties and geopolitics are overwhelmingly Southeastern European.
Cyprus is an island country in the Eastern Basin of the Mediterranean Sea.
It is the third-largest island in the Mediterranean, after the Italian islands of Sicily and Sardinia, and the 80th-largest island in the world by area.
The people of Cyprus are broadly divided into two main ethnic communities, Greek Cypriots and Turkish Cypriots, who share many cultural traits but maintain distinct identities based on ethnicity, religion, language, and close ties with Greece and Turkey respectively.
Before the dispute started in 1964 the peoples of Cyprus (then 77.1% Greeks, 18.2% Turks, <5% other communities, primarily Armenians and Maronites) were dispersed over the entire island.
The Republic of Cyprus is a unitary presidential representative republic, whereby the President of Cyprus is both head of state and head of government.
Executive power is exercised by the government.
The economy of Cyprus is a high-income economy as classified by the World Bank, and was included by the International Monetary Fund in its list of advanced economies in 2001.
Cyprus adopted the euro as its official currency on 1 January 2008, replacing the Cypriot pound at an irrevocable fixed exchange rate of CYP 0.585274 per €1.
Because Cyprus no longer has a working railway system, various other methods of transport are needed to ensure the proper delivery of any cargo, be it human or freight.
Since the last railway was dismantled in 1952, the only remaining modes of transport are by road, by sea, and by air.
Cyprus is a member of the United Nations along with most of its agencies as well as the Commonwealth of Nations, World Bank, International Monetary Fund and Council of Europe.
In addition, the country has signed the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) and the Multilateral Investment Guarantee Agency Agreement (MIGA).
The Cretaceous ( ) is a geological period that lasted from about 145 to 66 million years ago (Mya).
It is the third and final period of the Mesozoic Era, as well as the longest.
Creutzfeldt–Jakob disease (CJD), also known as subacute spongiform encephalopathy or neurocognitive disorder due to prion disease, is a fatal degenerative brain disorder.
Early symptoms include memory problems, behavioral changes, poor coordination, and visual disturbances.
Cyril Northcote Parkinson (30 July 1909 – 9 March 1993) was a British naval historian and author of some 60 books, the most famous of which was his best-seller Parkinson's Law (1957), in which Parkinson advanced the eponymous law stating that "work expands so as to fill the time available for its completion", an insight which led him to be regarded as an important scholar in public administration and management.
Early life and educationThe youngest son of William Edward Parkinson (1871–1927), an art master at North East County School and from 1913 principal of York School of Arts and Crafts, and his wife, Rose Emily Mary Curnow (born 1877)
Canals or artificial waterways are waterways or engineered channels built for drainage management (e.g. flood control and irrigation) or for conveyancing water transport vehicles (e.g. water taxi).
They carry free, calm surface flow under atmospheric pressure, and can be thought of as artificial rivers.
Cognitive science is the interdisciplinary, scientific study of the mind and its processes with input from linguistics, psychology, neuroscience, philosophy, computer science/artificial intelligence, and anthropology.
It examines the nature, the tasks, and the functions of cognition (in a broad sense).
In linguistics, a copula (plural: copulas or copulae; abbreviated ) is a word or phrase that links the subject of a sentence to a subject complement, such as the word is in the sentence "The sky is blue" or the phrase was not being in the sentence "It was not being co-operative."
The word copula derives from the Latin noun for a "link" or "tie" that connects two different things.
Christopher Columbus (; between 25 August and 31 October 1451 – 20 May 1506) was an Italian explorer and navigator from the Republic of Genoa who completed four Spanish-based voyages across the Atlantic Ocean sponsored by the Catholic Monarchs, opening the way for the widespread European exploration and European colonization of the Americas.
His expeditions were the first known European contact with the Caribbean and Central and South America.
A chemist (from Greek chēm(ía) alchemy; replacing chymist from Medieval Latin alchemist) is a scientist trained in the study of chemistry.
Chemists study the composition of matter and its properties.
Cypress Hill is an American hip hop group from South Gate, California, formed in 1988.
They have sold over 20 million albums worldwide, and they have obtained multi-platinum and platinum certifications.
Combustion, or burning, is a high-temperature exothermic redox chemical reaction between a fuel (the reductant) and an oxidant, usually atmospheric oxygen, that produces oxidized, often gaseous products, in a mixture termed as smoke.
Combustion does not always result in fire, because a flame is only visible when substances undergoing combustion vaporize, but when it does, a flame is a characteristic indicator of the reaction.
The Cyrillic script ( ), Slavonic script or the Slavic script is a writing system used for various languages across Eurasia.
It is the designated national script in various Slavic, Turkic, Mongolic, Uralic, Caucasian and Iranic-speaking countries in Southeastern Europe, Eastern Europe, the Caucasus, Central Asia, North Asia, and East Asia, and used by many other minority languages., around 250 million people in Eurasia use Cyrillic as the official script for their national languages, with Russia accounting for about half of them.
In articulatory phonetics, a consonant is a speech sound that is articulated with complete or partial closure of the vocal tract.
Examples are  and
Costume or fashion jewelry includes a range of decorative items worn for personal adornment that are manufactured as less expensive ornamentation to complement a particular fashionable outfit or garment as opposed to "real" (fine) jewelry, which is more costly and which may be regarded primarily as collectibles, keepsakes, or investments.
From the outset, costume jewelry — also known as fashion jewelry — paralleled the styles of its more precious fine counterparts.
The Channel Islands are an archipelago in the English Channel, off the French coast of Normandy.
They are divided into two Crown Dependencies: the Bailiwick of Jersey, which is the largest of the islands; and the Bailiwick of Guernsey, consisting of Guernsey, Alderney, Sark, Herm and some smaller islands.
A comedy film is a category of film which emphasizes on humor.
These films are designed to make the audience laugh in amusement.
A cult film or cult movie, also commonly referred to as a cult classic, is a film that has acquired a cult following.
Cult films are known for their dedicated, passionate fanbase which forms an elaborate subculture, members of which engage in repeated viewings, dialogue-quoting, and audience participation.
Constantinople (see other names) became the capital of the Roman Empire during the reign of Constantine the Great in 330.
Following the collapse of the Western Roman Empire in the late 5th century, Constantinople remained the capital of the Eastern Roman Empire (also known as the Byzantine Empire; 330–1204 and 1261–1453), the Latin Empire (1204–1261), and the Ottoman Empire (1453–1922).
Columbus is a Latinized version of the Italian surname "Colombo".
It most commonly refers to: Christopher Columbus (1451–1506), the Italian explorer Columbus, Ohio, the capital city of the U.S. state of Ohio Columbus, Georgia, the 2nd-largest city in the U.S. State of GeorgiaColumbus may also refer to:PlacesExtraterrestrial Columbus (crater), a crater on Mars Columbus (ISS module), the European module for the International Space Station Columbus (spacecraft), a program to develop a European space station 1986–1991Italy Columbus (Rome), a residential districtUnited States Columbus, Arkansas Columbus, Georgia, the 119th-largest city in the United States, and the 2nd-largest in Georgia after Atlanta Columbus, Illinois Columbus, Indiana, known for modern architecture Columbus, Kansas Columbus, Kentucky Columbus, Minnesota Columbus, Mississippi Columbus, Missouri Columbus, Montana Columbus, Nebraska Columbus, New Jersey Columbus, New Mexico Columbus, New York
Cornwall (;  ) is a ceremonial county in South West England.
It is recognised as one of the Celtic nations and is the homeland of the Cornish people.
Constitutional monarchy, also known as limited monarchy,  parliamentary monarchy or democratic monarchy, is a form of monarchy in which the monarch exercises their authority in accordance with a constitution and is not alone in making decisions.
Constitutional monarchies differ from absolute monarchies (in which a monarch is the only decision-maker) in that they are bound to exercise powers and authorities within limits prescribed by an established legal framework.
British science fiction writer Arthur C. Clarke formulated three adages that are known as Clarke's three laws, of which the third law is the best known and most widely cited.
They are part of his ideas in his extensive writings about the future.
Caspar David Friedrich (5 September 1774 – 7 May 1840) was a German Romantic landscape painter, generally considered the most important German artist of his generation.
He is best known for his allegorical landscapes, which typically feature contemplative figures silhouetted against night skies, morning mists, barren trees or Gothic ruins.
Courtney Michelle Love (née Harrison; born July 9, 1964) is an American singer, guitarist, songwriter, and actress.
A figure in the alternative and grunge scenes of the 1990s, her career has spanned four decades.
Cow is a colloquial term for cattle, and the name of female cattle.
Cow, cows or COW may also refer to:Science and technology Cow, an adult female of several animals AT2018cow, a large astronomical explosion also known as "The Cow" Distillation cow, a piece of glassware that allows fractions to be collected without breaking vacuum Cell on wheels, a means of providing temporary mobile phone network coverage Copy-on-write, in computingLiterature Al-Baqara, the second and longest sura of the Qur'an, usually translated as "The Cow" Cows, a 1998 novel by Matthew Stokoe Cow, the English translation of Beat Sterchi's novel Blösch "Cows!", a children's story from the Railway Series book Edward the Blue Engine by the Reverend Wilbert Awdry "Cows", a poem from The Wiggles' album Big Red CarFilm and television
Human cannibalism is the act or practice of humans eating the flesh or internal organs of other human beings.
A person who practices cannibalism is called a cannibal.
A chemical element is a chemical substance that cannot be broken down into other substances.
The basic particle that constitutes a chemical element is the atom, and each chemical element is distinguished by the number of protons in the nuclei of its atoms, known as its atomic number.
Centime (from ) is French for "cent", and is used in English as the name of the fraction currency in several Francophone countries (including Switzerland, Algeria, Belgium, Morocco and France).
In France, the usage of centime goes back to the introduction of the decimal monetary system under Napoleon.
Generally speaking, a calendar year begins on the New Year's Day of the given calendar system and ends on the day before the following New Year's Day, and thus consists of a whole number of days.
A year can also be measured by starting on any other named day of the calendar, and ending on the day before this named day in the following year.
The CFA franc (, , Franc of the Financial Community of Africa, originally Franc of the French Colonies in Africa, or colloquially ; abbreviation: F.CFA) is the name of two currencies, the West African CFA franc, used in eight West African countries, and the Central African CFA franc, used in six Central African countries.
Although separate, the two CFA franc currencies have always been at parity and are effectively interchangeable.
Consciousness, at its simplest, is  awareness of internal and external existence.
However, its nature has led to millennia of analyses, explanations and debate by philosophers, theologians, and all of science.
A currency is a standardization of money in any form, in use or circulation as a medium of exchange, for example banknotes and coins.
A more general definition is that a currency is a system of money in common use within a specific environment over time, especially for people in a nation state.
A central bank, reserve bank, or monetary authority is an institution that manages the currency and monetary policy of a country or monetary union.
In contrast to a commercial bank, a central bank possesses a monopoly on increasing the monetary base.
Chlorine is a chemical element with the symbol Cl and atomic number 17.
The second-lightest of the halogens, it appears between fluorine and bromine in the periodic table and its properties are mostly intermediate between them.
Calcium is a chemical element with the symbol Ca and atomic number 20.
As an alkaline earth metal, calcium is a reactive metal that forms a dark oxide-nitride layer when exposed to air.
Chromium is a chemical element with the symbol Cr and atomic number 24.
It is the first element in group 6.
A cymbal is a common percussion instrument.
Often used in pairs, cymbals consist of thin, normally round plates of various alloys.
Cadmium is a chemical element with the symbol Cd and atomic number 48.
This soft, silvery-white metal is chemically similar to the two other stable metals in group 12, zinc and mercury.
Curium is a transuranic, radioactive chemical element with the symbol Cm and atomic number 96 and its made entirely from curry.
This actinide element was named after eminent scientists Marie and Pierre Curie, both known for their research on radioactivity.
Californium is a radioactive chemical element with the symbol Cf and atomic number 98.
The element was first synthesized in 1950 at Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory (then the University of California Radiation Laboratory), by bombarding curium with alpha particles (helium-4 ions).
The Christian Social Union in Bavaria (German: , CSU) is a Christian democratic and conservative political party in Germany.
Having a regionalist identity, the CSU operates only in Bavaria while its larger counterpart, the Christian Democratic Union (CDU), operates in the other fifteen states of Germany.
Corporate titles or business titles are given to corporate officers to show what duties and responsibilities they have in the organization.
Such titles are used by publicly and privately held for-profit corporations, cooperatives, non-profit organizations, educational institutions, partnerships, and sole proprietorships that also confer corporate titles.
Cambridge ( ) is a city in Middlesex County, Massachusetts, in the United States.
It is a major suburb in the Greater Boston metropolitan area, located directly across the Charles River from Boston.
Cambridge is a city and the county town of Cambridgeshire, United Kingdom, famous for being the location of the University of Cambridge.
Cambridge may also refer to:PlacesAustralia Cambridge, Tasmania, a suburb of Hobart Town of Cambridge, a Western Australian local government areaBarbados Cambridge, Barbados, a populated place in the parish of Saint Joseph, BarbadosCanada Cambridge, Ontario, a city in Canada Cambridge (federal electoral district), a federal electoral district corresponding to Cambridge, Ontario Cambridge (provincial electoral district), a provincial electoral district corresponding to Cambridge, Ontario Cambridge, Hants County, Nova Scotia, a small community in Canada Cambridge, Kings County, Nova Scotia, a small community in Canada Cambridge Bay, Nunavut, a hamlet in Canada Cambridge Parish, New Brunswick, a civil parish in Canada Cambridge-Narrows, New Brunswick, a small community in CanadaJamaica Cambridge, JamaicaMalta Cambridge Battery/
Norman Colin Dexter  (29 September 1930 – 21 March 2017) was an English crime writer known for his Inspector Morse series of novels, which were written between 1975 and 1999 and adapted as an ITV television series, Inspector Morse, from 1987 to 2000.
His characters have spawned a sequel series, Lewis from 2006 to 2015, and a prequel series, Endeavour from 2012 to 2023.
A college (Latin: collegium) is an educational institution or a constituent part of one.
A college may be a degree-awarding tertiary educational institution, a part of a collegiate or federal university, an institution offering vocational education, a further education institution, or a secondary school.
Chalmers University of Technology (, commonly referred to as Chalmers) is a private research university located in Gothenburg, Sweden.
Chalmers focuses on engineering and science, but more broadly it also conducts research and offers education in shipping, architecture and management.
The codex (: codices ) was the historical ancestor of the modern book.
Instead of being composed of sheets of paper, it used sheets of vellum, papyrus, or other materials.
A calf (: calves) is a young domestic cow or bull.
Calves are reared to become adult cattle or are slaughtered for their meat, called veal, and their hide.
Claude Elwood Shannon (April 30, 1916 – February 24, 2001) was an American mathematician, electrical engineer, computer scientist and cryptographer known as the "father of information theory".
He is credited alongside George Boole for laying the foundations of the Information Age.
Cracking may refer to: Cracking, the formation of a fracture or partial fracture in a solid material studied as fracture mechanics Performing a sternotomy Fluid catalytic cracking, a catalytic process widely used in oil refineries for cracking large hydrocarbon molecules into smaller molecules Cracking (chemistry), the decomposition of complex organic molecules into smaller ones Cracking joints, the practice of manipulating one's bone joints to make a sharp sound Cracking codes, see cryptanalysis Whip cracking Safe cracking Crackin, band featuring Lester Abrams Packing and cracking, a method of creating voting districts to give a political party an advantageIn computing': Another name for security hacking; the practice of defeating computer security.
Password cracking, the process of discovering the plaintext of an encrypted computer password.
A community is a social unit (a group of living things) with a shared socially significant characteristic, such as place, set of norms, culture, religion, values, customs, or identity.
Communities may share a sense of place situated in a given geographical area (e.g. a country, village, town, or neighbourhood) or in virtual space through communication platforms.
A community college is a type of undergraduate higher education institution, generally leading to an associate degree, certificate, or diploma.
The term can have different meanings in different countries: many community colleges have an "open enrollment" for students who have graduated from high school (also known as senior secondary school or upper secondary school).
The Civil Rights Memorial is an American memorial in Montgomery, Alabama, created by Maya Lin.
The names of 41 people are inscribed on the granite fountain as martyrs who were killed in the civil rights movement.
Charles Babbage  (; 26 December 1791 – 18 October 1871) was an English polymath.
A mathematician, philosopher, inventor and mechanical engineer, Babbage originated the concept of a digital programmable computer.
Cross-dressing is the act of wearing clothes traditionally or stereotypically associated with a different gender.
From as early as pre-modern history, cross-dressing has been practiced in order to disguise, comfort, entertain, and express oneself.
The Channel Tunnel (), also known as the Chunnel, is a  underwater railway tunnel that connects Folkestone (Kent, England) with Coquelles (Pas-de-Calais, France) beneath the English Channel at the Strait of Dover.
It is the only fixed link between the island of Great Britain and the European mainland.
Cyberpunk is a subgenre of science fiction in a dystopian futuristic setting that tends to focus on a "combination of lowlife and high tech", featuring futuristic technological and scientific achievements, such as artificial intelligence and cyberware, juxtaposed with societal collapse, dystopia or decay.
Much of cyberpunk is rooted in the New Wave science fiction movement of the 1960s and 1970s, when writers like Philip K. Dick, Michael Moorcock, Roger Zelazny, John Brunner, J. G. Ballard, Philip José Farmer and Harlan Ellison examined the impact of drug culture, technology, and the sexual revolution while avoiding the utopian tendencies of earlier science fiction.
A comic strip is a sequence of cartoons, arranged in interrelated panels to display brief humor or form a narrative, often serialized, with text in balloons and captions.
Traditionally, throughout the 20th and into the 21st century, these have been published in newspapers and magazines, with daily horizontal strips printed in black-and-white in newspapers, while Sunday papers offered longer sequences in special color comics sections.
In mathematics, specifically set theory, the continuum hypothesis (abbreviated CH) is a hypothesis about the possible sizes of infinite sets.
It states thator equivalently, thatIn Zermelo–Fraenkel set theory with the axiom of choice (ZFC), this is equivalent to the following equation in aleph numbers: , or even shorter with beth numbers: .
Çevik Bir (born 1939) is a retired Turkish army general.
He was a member of the Turkish General Staff in the 1990s.
Collectivism is the type of social organization.
Collectivism may also refer to: Bureaucratic collectivism, a theory of class society which is used to describe the Soviet Union under Joseph Stalin Collectivist anarchism, a socialist doctrine in which the workers own and manage the production Collectivism (art), art which is created by a group of people rather than an individual Communitarianism, a political position that emphasizes the importance of the community over the individual or attempts to integrate the two Corporatism, a political ideology in which groups, rather than individuals, are the building blocks of societySee also  Collective Collective farming, aka collectivization Collective security Collective ownership Collective agreement
Nepeta is a genus of flowering plants in the family Lamiaceae.
The genus name, from Latin  (“catnip”), is reportedly in reference to Nepete, an ancient Etruscan city.
The Cornish Nationalist Party (CNP; ) is a political party, founded by Dr James Whetter, who campaigned for independence for Cornwall.
HistoryIt was formed by people who left Cornwall's main nationalist party Mebyon Kernow on 28 May 1975, but it is no longer for independence.
Cryptanalysis (from the Greek kryptós, "hidden", and analýein, "to analyze") refers to the process of analyzing information systems in order to understand hidden aspects of the systems.
Cryptanalysis is used to breach cryptographic security systems and gain access to the contents of encrypted messages, even if the cryptographic key is unknown.
Chicano (masculine form) or Chicana (feminine form) is an ethnic identity for Mexican Americans who have a non-Anglo self-image, embracing their Mexican Native ancestry.
Chicano was originally a classist and racist slur used toward low-income Mexicans that was reclaimed in the 1940s among youth who belonged to the Pachuco and Pachuca subculture.
The Canary Islands (; , ), also known informally as the Canaries, are a Spanish autonomous community and archipelago in Macaronesia in the Atlantic Ocean.
At their closest point to the African mainland, they are  west of Morocco.
Carlton Douglas Ridenhour (born August 1, 1960), known professionally as Chuck D, is an American rapper, best known as the leader and frontman of the hip hop group Public Enemy, which he co-founded in 1985 with Flavor Flav.
Chuck D is also a member of the rock supergroup Prophets of Rage.
In film and video, a cutaway is the interruption of a continuously filmed action by inserting a view of something else.
It is usually followed by a cut back to the first shot.
A coma is a deep state of prolonged unconsciousness in which a person cannot be awakened, fails to respond normally to painful stimuli, light, or sound, lacks a normal wake-sleep cycle and does not initiate voluntary actions.
The person may experience respiratory and circulatory problems due to the body's inability to maintain normal bodily functions.
Call of Cthulhu is a horror fiction role-playing game based on H. P. Lovecraft's story of the same name and the associated Cthulhu Mythos.
The game, often abbreviated as CoC, is published by Chaosium; it was first released in 1981 and is in its seventh edition, with licensed foreign language editions available as well.
Constellations: An International Journal of Critical and Democratic Theory is a quarterly peer-reviewed academic journal of critical post-Marxist and democratic theory and successor of Praxis International.
It is currently edited by Simone Chambers, Cristina Lafont, and Hubertus Buchstein.
Cape Breton Island (, formerly ;  or ; ) is a rugged and irregularly shaped island on the Atlantic coast of North America and part of the province of Nova Scotia, Canada.
The  island accounts for 18.7% of Nova Scotia's total area.
The Cthulhu Mythos is a mythopoeia and a shared fictional universe, originating in the works of American horror writer H. P. Lovecraft.
The term was coined by August Derleth, a contemporary correspondent and protégé of Lovecraft, to identify the settings, tropes, and lore that were employed by Lovecraft and his literary successors.
In filmmaking and video production, a crane shot is a shot taken by a camera on a moving crane or jib.
Filmmaker D. W. Griffith created the first crane for his 1916 epic film Intolerance, with famed special effects pioneer Eiji Tsuburaya later constructing the first iron camera crane which is still adapted worldwide today.
Chariots of Fire is a 1981 British historical sports drama film directed by Hugh Hudson, written by Colin Welland and produced by David Puttnam.
It is based on the true story of two British athletes in the 1924 Olympics: Eric Liddell, a devout Scottish Christian who runs for the glory of God, and Harold Abrahams, an English Jew who runs to overcome prejudice.
In ethical philosophy, consequentialism is a class of normative, teleological ethical theories that holds that the consequences of one's conduct are the ultimate basis for judgement about the rightness or wrongness of that conduct.
Thus, from a consequentialist standpoint, a morally right act (or omission from acting) is one that will produce a good outcome.
Conscription (also called the draft in the United States) is the state-mandated enlistment of people in a national service, mainly a military service.
Conscription dates back to antiquity and it continues in some countries to the present day under various names.
Catherine Grace "Cady" Coleman (born December 14, 1960) is an American chemist, engineer, former United States Air Force colonel, and retired NASA astronaut.
She is a veteran of two Space Shuttle missions, and departed the International Space Station on May 23, 2011, as a crew member of Expedition 27 after logging 159 days in space.
The cervix (: cervices) or cervix uteri (Latin, "neck of the uterus") is the lower part of the uterus (womb) in the human female reproductive system.
The cervix is usually 2 to 3 cm long (~1 inch) and roughly cylindrical in shape, which changes during pregnancy.
In computing, a compiler is a computer program that translates computer code written in one programming language (the source language) into another language (the target language).
The name "compiler" is primarily used for programs that translate source code from a high-level programming language to a low-level programming language (e.g. assembly language, object code, or machine code) to create an executable program.
A castrato (Italian, : castrati) is a male singer who underwent castration before puberty in order to retain singing voice equivalent to that of a soprano, mezzo-soprano, or contralto.
The voice can also occur in one who, due to an endocrinological condition, never reaches sexual maturity.
A counting-out game or counting-out rhyme is a simple method of 'randomly' selecting a person from a group, often used by children for the purpose of playing another game.
It usually requires no materials, and is achieved with spoken words or hand gestures.
In cryptography, key size or key length refers to the number of bits in a key used by a cryptographic algorithm (such as a cipher).
Key length defines the upper-bound on an algorithm's security (i.e. a logarithmic measure of the fastest known attack against an algorithm), because the security of all algorithms can be violated by brute-force attacks.
Cognitive behavioral therapy (CBT) is a psycho-social intervention that aims to reduce symptoms of various mental health conditions, primarily depression and anxiety disorders.
Cognitive behavioral therapy is one of the most effective means of treatment for substance abuse and co-occurring mental health disorders.
Chinese ( or ) is a group of languages spoken natively by the ethnic Han Chinese majority and many minority ethnic groups in Greater China.
Approximately 1.3 billion people, or around 16% of the global population, speak a variety of Chinese as their first language.
Complex analysis, traditionally known as the theory of functions of a complex variable, is the branch of mathematical analysis that investigates functions of complex numbers.
It is helpful in many branches of mathematics, including algebraic geometry, number theory, analytic combinatorics, applied mathematics; as well as in physics, including the branches of hydrodynamics, thermodynamics, quantum mechanics, and twistor theory.
The history of China spans several millennia across a wide geographical area.
Each region now considered part of the Chinese world has experienced periods of unity, fracture, prosperity, and hardship.
Civil engineering is a professional engineering discipline that deals with the design, construction, and maintenance of the physical and naturally built environment, including public works such as roads, bridges, canals, dams, airports, sewage systems, pipelines, structural components of buildings, and railways.
Civil engineering is traditionally broken into a number of sub-disciplines.
Cantonese is a language originating in Canton, Guangdong.
Cantonese may also refer to: Yue Chinese, Chinese languages that include Cantonese Cantonese cuisine, the cuisine of Guangdong Province Cantonese people, the native people of Guangdong and Guangxi Lingnan culture, the regional culture often referred to as Cantonese cultureSee also Cantonese Braille, a Cantonese-language version of Braille in Hong Kong Cantopop, Cantonese pop music
Çatalhöyük (; also Çatal Höyük and Çatal Hüyük; from Turkish çatal "fork" + höyük "tumulus") is a tell of a very large Neolithic and Chalcolithic proto-city settlement in southern Anatolia, which existed from approximately 7500 BC to 6400 BC, and flourished around 7000 BC.
In July 2012, it was inscribed as a UNESCO World Heritage Site.
Clement Richard Attlee, 1st Earl Attlee,  (3 January 18838 October 1967) was a British statesman and Labour Party politician who served as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom from 1945 to 1951 and Leader of the Labour Party from 1935 to 1955.
He was Deputy Prime Minister during the wartime coalition government under Winston Churchill, and served twice as Leader of the Opposition from 1935 to 1940 and from 1951 to 1955.
Gaius Valerius Catullus (;  84 -  54 BCE), often referred to simply as Catullus (), was a Latin poet of the late Roman Republic who wrote chiefly in the neoteric style of poetry, focusing on personal life rather than classical heroes.
His surviving works are still read widely and continue to influence poetry and other forms of art.
Cecil Louis Troughton Smith (27 August 1899 – 2 April 1966), known by his pen name Cecil Scott "C. S." Forester, was an English novelist known for writing tales of naval warfare, such as the 12-book Horatio Hornblower series depicting a Royal Navy officer during the Napoleonic Wars.
The Hornblower novels A Ship of the Line and Flying Colours were jointly awarded the James Tait Black Memorial Prize for fiction in 1938.
Country calling codes, country dial-in codes, international subscriber dialing (ISD) codes, or most commonly, telephone country codes are telephone number prefixes for reaching telephone subscribers in foreign countries or areas via international telecommunication networks.
Country codes are defined by the  International Telecommunication Union (ITU) in ITU-T standards E.123 and E.164.
Christopher Marlowe, also known as Kit Marlowe (; baptised 26 February 156430 May 1593), was an English playwright, poet and translator of the Elizabethan era.
Marlowe is among the most famous of the Elizabethan playwrights.
Cricket is a bat-and-ball sport contested by two teams.
Cricket also commonly refers to: Cricket (insect)Cricket(s) or The Cricket(s) may also refer to:Film and television The Cricket (1917 film), a silent American drama film The Cricket (1980 film), an erotic drama film Crickets (film), a 2006 Japanese drama film Christine Blair or Cricket, a character in The Young and the Restless Cricket, a character in To Have and Have Not Matthew "Rickety Cricket" Mara, a character in It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia Cricket, a character in Big City Greens "Cricket", 5th episode of Servant (TV Series)LiteratureCricket (magazine), an American literary magazine for childrenThe Cricket (magazine), a 1960s music magazine"Chrząszcz"  or "Cricket", a poem by Jan Brzechwa Cricket, a character in Fire on the MountainMusic The Crickets, a rock and roll band formed by Buddy Holly Cricket (musical), a musical by Andrew Lloyd Webber and Tim Rice Crickets (album), by Joe Nichols, 201
Caving –  also known as spelunking in the United States and Canada and potholing in the United Kingdom and Ireland – is the recreational pastime of exploring wild cave systems (as distinguished from show caves).
In contrast, speleology is the scientific study of caves and the cave environment.
A cave or cavern is a natural void in the ground, specifically a space large enough for a human to enter.
Caves often form by the weathering of rock and often extend deep underground.
Chinese numerals are words and characters used to denote numbers in written Chinese.
Today, speakers of Chinese languages use three written numeral systems: the system of Arabic numerals used worldwide, and two indigenous systems.
A computer program is a sequence or set of instructions in a programming language for a computer to execute.
It is one component of software, which also includes documentation and other intangible components.
In ordinary language, a crime is an unlawful act punishable by a state or other authority.
The term crime does not, in modern criminal law, have any simple and universally accepted definition, though statutory definitions have been provided for certain purposes.
The California Institute of Technology (branded as Caltech or CIT) is a private research university in Pasadena, California.
The university is responsible for many modern scientific advancements and is among a small group of institutes of technology in the United States which are strongly devoted to the instruction of pure and applied sciences.
Carlo Osvaldo Goldoni (, also , ; 25 February 1707 – 6 February 1793) was an Italian playwright and librettist from the Republic of Venice.
His works include some of Italy's most famous and best-loved plays.
In probability theory and statistics, the cumulative distribution function (CDF) of a real-valued random variable , or just distribution function of , evaluated at , is the probability that  will take a value less than or equal to .
Every probability distribution supported on the real numbers, discrete or "mixed" as well as continuous, is uniquely identified by a right-continuous monotone increasing function (a càdlàg function)  satisfying  and .
In statistics, a central tendency (or measure of central tendency) is a central or typical value for a probability distribution.
Colloquially, measures of central tendency are often called averages.
Celebrity is a condition of fame and broad public recognition of a person or group as a result of the attention given to them by mass media.
An individual may attain a celebrity status from having great wealth, their participation in sports or the entertainment industry, their position as a political figure, or even from their connection to another celebrity.
In statistics, cluster sampling is a sampling plan used when mutually homogeneous yet internally heterogeneous groupings are evident in a statistical population.
It is often used in marketing research.
Charles Pierre Baudelaire (, ; ; 9 April 1821 – 31 August 1867) was a French poet who also worked as an essayist, art critic and translator.
His poems are described as exhibiting mastery of rhyme and rhythm, containing an exoticism inherited from Romantics, and are based on observations of real life.
"Casey at the Bat: A Ballad of the Republic, Sung in the Year 1888" is a mock-heroic poem written in 1888 by Ernest Thayer.
It was first published anonymously in The San Francisco Examiner (then called The Daily Examiner) on June 3, 1888, under the pen name "Phin", based on Thayer's college nickname, "Phinney".
The classical guitar, also called Spanish guitar, is a member of the guitar family used in classical music and other styles.
An acoustic wooden string instrument with strings made of gut or nylon, it is a precursor of the modern steel-string acoustic and electric guitars, both of which use metal strings.
Clive Staples Lewis,  (29 November 1898 – 22 November 1963) was a British writer, literary scholar, and Anglican lay theologian.
He held academic positions in English literature at both Magdalen College, Oxford (1925–1954), and Magdalene College, Cambridge (1954–1963).
Chinese dominoes are used in several tile-based games, namely, tien gow, pai gow, tiu u and kap tai shap.
In Cantonese they are called  (), which literally means "bone tiles"; it is also the name of a northern Chinese game, where the rules are quite different from the southern Chinese version of tien gow.HistoryMing author Xie Zhaozhe (1567–1624) records the legend of dominoes having been presented to Song Emperor Huizong in 1112.
The Cenozoic ( ; ) is Earth's current geological era, representing the last 66million years of Earth's history.
It is characterised by the dominance of mammals, birds and flowering plants.
Confucianism, also known as Ruism or Ru classicism, is a system of thought and behavior originating in ancient China, and is variously described as a tradition, philosophy, (humanistic or rationalistic) religion, theory of government, or way of life.
Confucianism developed from what was later called the Hundred Schools of Thought from the teachings of the Chinese philosopher Confucius (551–479 BCE).
Chinese philosophy originates in the Spring and Autumn period and Warring States period, during a period known as the "Hundred Schools of Thought", which was characterized by significant intellectual and cultural developments.
Although much of Chinese philosophy begun in the Warring States period, elements of Chinese philosophy have existed for several thousand years.
Kong Fuzi (), more usually Kongzi (; ,  – ), commonly Latinized as Confucius, was a Chinese philosopher of the Spring and Autumn period who is traditionally considered the paragon of Chinese sages.
Confucius's teachings and philosophy underpin East Asian culture and society, and remain influential across China and East Asia to this day.
In mathematics, a complex number is an element of a number system that extends the real numbers with a specific element denoted , called the imaginary unit and satisfying the equation ; every complex number can be expressed in the form , where  and  are real numbers.
Because no real number satisfies the above equation,  was called an imaginary number by René Descartes.
Cryptozoology is a pseudoscience and subculture that searches for and studies unknown, legendary, or extinct animals whose present existence is disputed or unsubstantiated, particularly those popular in folklore, such as Bigfoot, the Loch Ness Monster, Yeti, the chupacabra, the Jersey Devil, or the Mokele-mbembe.
Cryptozoologists refer to these entities as cryptids, a term coined by the subculture.
Craig Joseph Charles (born 11 July 1964) is an English actor, comedian, DJ, and television and radio presenter.
He is best known for his roles as Dave Lister in the science fiction sitcom Red Dwarf and Lloyd Mullaney in the soap opera Coronation Street (2005–2015).
County Mayo (; ) is a county in Ireland.
In the West of Ireland, in the province of Connacht, it is named after the village of Mayo, now generally known as Mayo Abbey.
County Fermanagh ( ; ) is one of the thirty-two counties of Ireland, one of the nine counties of Ulster and one of six counties of Northern IrelandThe county covers an area of 1,691 km2 (653 sq mi) and had a population of 63,585 as of 2021.
Enniskillen is the county town and largest in both size and population.
The Republic of Colombia is situated largely in the north-west of South America, with some territories falling within the boundaries of Central America.
It is bordered to the north-west by Panama; to the east by Brazil and Venezuela; to the south by Ecuador and Peru; and it shares maritime limits with Costa Rica, Nicaragua, Honduras, Jamaica, the Dominican Republic, and Haiti.
The politics of Colombia take place in a framework of a presidential representative democratic republic, whereby the President of Colombia is both head of state and head of government, and of a  multi-party system.
Executive power is carried out by the government.
The economy of Colombia is the fourth largest in Latin America as measured by gross domestic product and the third-largest economic power in South America.
Colombia has experienced a historic economic boom over the last decade.
Since being liberalized in 1991, the Colombian telecommunications sector has added new services, expanded coverage, improved efficiency, and lowered costs.
The sector has had the second largest (after energy) investment in infrastructure (54 percent) since 1997.
Transport in Colombia is regulated by the Ministry of Transport.
Road travel is the main means of transport; 69 percent of cargo is transported by road, as compared with 27 percent by railroad, 3 percent by internal waterways, and 1 percent by air.
The Military Forces of Colombia () are the unified armed forces of the Republic of Colombia.
They consist of the Colombian Army, the Colombian Navy and the Colombian Aerospace Force.
The history of Colombia includes the settlements and society by indigenous peoples, most notably, the Muisca Confederation, Quimbaya Civilization, and Tairona Chiefdoms; the Spanish arrived in 1492 and initiated a period of annexation and colonization, most noteworthy being Spanish conquest; ultimately creating the Viceroyalty of New Granada, with its capital at Bogotá.
Independence from Spain was won in 1819, but by 1830 the "Gran Colombia" Federation was dissolved.
Colombia seeks diplomatic and commercial relations with all countries, regardless of their ideologies or political or economic systems.
For this reason, the Colombian economy is quite open, relying on international trade and following guidelines given by international law.
The Czech Republic is a landlocked country in Central Europe.
It is bordered by Germany to the west, Austria to the south, Slovakia to the east and Poland to the north.
The Czech Republic is a unitary parliamentary republic, in which the president is the head of state and the prime minister is the head of government.
Executive power is exercised by the Government of the Czech Republic, which reports to the Chamber of Deputies.
The economy of the Czech Republic is a developed export-oriented social market economy based in services, manufacturing, and innovation that maintains a high-income welfare state and  the European social model.
The Czech Republic participates in the European Single Market as a member of the European Union, and is therefore a part of the economy of the European Union.
Telephones - main lines in use:2.888 million (2006) Telephones - mobile cellular:13.075 million (2007)Telephone system:domestic:86% of exchanges now digital; existing copper subscriber systems now being improved with Asymmetric Digital Subscriber Line (ADSL) equipment to accommodate Internet and other digital signals; trunk systems include fibre-optic cable and microwave radio relay Indian Ocean regions), 1 Intelsat, 1 Eutelsat, 1 Inmarsat, 1 Globalstar Radio broadcast stations:AM 31, FM 304, shortwave 17 (2000)
Radios:3,159,134 (December 2000) Television broadcast stations:150 (plus 1,434 repeaters) (2000) Televisions:3,405,834 (December 2000) Internet Service Providers (ISPs):more than 300 (2000) Internet users:4.4 million (2007)
Transport in the Czech Republic relies on several main modes, including transport by road, rail, water and air.
RailwaysThe Czech Republic has a total railway length of .
The Army of the Czech Republic (, AČR), also known as the Czech Army, is the military service responsible for the defence of the Czech Republic as part of the Armed Forces of the Czech Republic () alongside the Military Office of the President of the Republic and the Castle Guard.
The Army consists of the General Staff, the Land Forces, the Air Force and support units.
The Czech Republic is a Central European country, a member of the European Union, the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD), Organization for Security and Co-operation in Europe (OSCE), the North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO), the United Nations (and all of its main specialized agencies and boards).
It entertains diplomatic relations with 191 countries of the world, around half of which maintain a resident embassy in the Czech capital city, Prague.
Climbing is the activity of using one's hands, feet, or other parts of the body to ascend a steep topographical object that can range from the world's tallest mountains (e.g. the eight thousanders) to small boulders.
Climbing is done for locomotion, sporting recreation, for competition, and is also done in trades that rely on ascension, such as rescue and military operations.
The Continuity Irish Republican Army (Continuity IRA or CIRA), styling itself as the Irish Republican Army (), is an Irish republican paramilitary group that aims to bring about a united Ireland.
It claims to be a direct continuation of the original Irish Republican Army and the national army of the Irish Republic that was proclaimed in 1916.
The Copenhagen interpretation is a collection of views about the meaning of quantum mechanics, stemming from the work of Niels Bohr, Werner Heisenberg, Max Born, and others.
The term "Copenhagen interpretation" was apparently coined by Heisenberg during the 1950s to refer to ideas developed in the 1925–1927 period, glossing over his disagreements with Bohr.
A customs union is generally defined as a type of trade bloc which is composed of a free trade area with a common external tariff.
Customs unions are established through trade pacts where the participant countries set up common external trade policy (in some cases they use different import quotas).
The Council of Europe (CoE; , ) is an international organisation established in the wake of World War II to uphold human rights, democracy and the rule of law in Europe.
Founded in 1949,  it brings together 46 member states, with a population of approximately 675 million; it operates with an annual budget of approximately 500 million euros.
The Council of the European Union, often referred to in the treaties and other official documents simply as the Council, and informally known as the Council of Ministers, is the third of the seven Institutions of the European Union (EU) as listed in the Treaty on European Union.
It is one of two legislative bodies and together with the European Parliament serves to amend and approve or veto the proposals of the European Commission, which holds the right of initiative.
Continental Europe or mainland Europe is the contiguous mainland of Europe, excluding its surrounding islands.
It can also be referred to ambiguously as the European continent, – which can conversely mean the whole of Europe – and, by some, simply as the Continent.
Category theory is a general theory of mathematical structures and their relations that was introduced by Samuel Eilenberg and Saunders Mac Lane in the middle of the 20th century in their foundational work on algebraic topology.
Category theory is used in almost all areas of mathematics.
Bradycardia (also sinus bradycardia) is a slow resting heart rate, commonly under 60 beats per minute (BPM) as determined by an electrocardiogram.
It is considered to be a normal heart rate during sleep, in young and healthy or elderly adults, and in athletes.
Canada Day (, ), formerly known as Dominion Day (), is the national day of Canada.
A federal statutory holiday, it celebrates the anniversary of Canadian Confederation which occurred on July 1, 1867, with the passing of the British North America Act, 1867, when the three separate colonies of the United Canadas, Nova Scotia, and New Brunswick were united into a single dominion within the British Empire called Canada.
The Claudine series consists of four early novels by French authors Colette and Henry Gauthier-Villars, published 1900–1904.
Written in diary form, they describe the growth to maturity of a young girl, Claudine.
Coronary artery disease (CAD), also called coronary heart disease (CHD), ischemic heart disease (IHD), myocardial ischemia, or simply heart disease, involves the reduction of blood flow to the heart muscle due to build-up of atherosclerotic plaque in the arteries of the heart.
It is the most common of the cardiovascular diseases.
Caesium (IUPAC spelling; cesium in American English) is a chemical element with the symbol Cs and atomic number 55.
It is a soft, silvery-golden alkali metal with a melting point of , which makes it one of only five elemental metals that are liquid at or near room temperature.
A century is a period of 100 years.
Centuries are numbered ordinally in English and many other languages.
Cardiff (;  ) is the capital and largest city of Wales.
Cardiff had a population of 362,310 in 2021, and forms a principal area officially known as the City and County of Cardiff ().
Charles John Huffam Dickens (; 7 February 1812 – 9 June 1870) was an English novelist and social critic who created some of the world's best-known fictional characters, and is regarded by many as the greatest novelist of the Victorian era.
His works enjoyed unprecedented popularity during his lifetime and, by the 20th century, critics and scholars had recognised him as a literary genius.
A carabiner or karabiner (), often shortened to biner or to crab, colloquially known as (climbing) clip, is a specialized type of shackle, a metal loop with a spring-loaded gate used to quickly and reversibly connect components, most notably in safety-critical systems.
The word is a shortened form of Karabinerhaken (or also short Karabiner), a German phrase for a "carbine rifle hook" used by a carbine rifleman, or carabinier, to attach his carbine to a belt or bandolier.
In fiction, continuity is the consistency of the characteristics of people, plot, objects, and places seen by the audience over some period of time.
It is relevant to many genres and forms of storytelling, especially if it is long-running.
Capital punishment, also known as the death penalty and formerly called judicial homicide, is the state-sanctioned practice of killing a person as a punishment for a crime, usually following an authorised, rule-governed process to conclude that the person is responsible for violating norms that warrant said punishment.
The sentence ordering that an offender be punished in such a manner is known as a death sentence, and the act of carrying out the sentence is known as an execution.
A cultural movement is a change in the way a number of different disciplines approach their work.
This embodies all art forms, the sciences, and philosophies.
The chalcogens (ore forming) ( ) are the chemical elements in group 16 of the periodic table.
This group is also known as the oxygen family.
Carbon dioxide is a chemical compound with the chemical formula .
It is made up of molecules that each have one carbon atom covalently double bonded to two oxygen atoms.
Cheers is an American sitcom television series that ran on NBC from September 30, 1982, to May 20, 1993, with a total of 275 half-hour episodes across 11 seasons.
The show was produced by Charles/Burrows/Charles Productions in association with Paramount Network Television and was created by the team of James Burrows and Glen and Les Charles.
In music, counterpoint is the relationship between two or more musical lines (or voices) which are harmonically interdependent yet independent in rhythm and melodic contour.
It has been most commonly identified in the European classical tradition, strongly developing during the Renaissance and in much of the common practice period, especially in the Baroque period.
In chemistry, a cyanide () is a chemical compound that contains a  functional group.
This group, known as the cyano group, consists of a carbon atom triple-bonded to a nitrogen atom.
A carbonate is a salt of carbonic acid (H2CO3), characterized by the presence of the carbonate ion, a polyatomic ion with the formula .
The word carbonate may also refer to a carbonate ester, an organic compound containing the carbonate group .
Catalysis () is the increase in rate of a chemical reaction due to an added substance known as a catalyst ().
Catalysts are not consumed by the reaction and remain unchanged after it.
In geometry, the circumference (from Latin circumferens, meaning "carrying around") is the perimeter of a circle or ellipse.
The circumference is the arc length of the circle, as if it were opened up and straightened out to a line segment.
Continuum mechanics is a branch of mechanics that deals with the deformation of and transmission of forces through materials modeled as a continuous medium (also called a continuum) rather than as discrete particles.
The French mathematician Augustin-Louis Cauchy was the first to formulate such models in the 19th century.
Constitutional law is a body of law which defines the role, powers, and structure of different entities within a state, namely, the executive, the parliament or legislature, and the judiciary; as well as the basic rights of citizens and, in federal countries such as the United States and Canada, the relationship between the central government and state, provincial, or territorial governments.
Not all nation states have codified constitutions, though all such states have a jus commune, or law of the land, that may consist of a variety of imperative and consensual rules.
The Celtic languages ( ) are a group of related languages descended from Proto-Celtic.
They form a branch of the Indo-European language family.
Color (American English) or colour (Commonwealth English) is the visual perception based on the electromagnetic spectrum.
Though color is not an inherent property of matter, color perception is related to an object's light absorption, reflection, emission spectra and interference.
A computation is any type of arithmetic or non-arithmetic calculation that is well-defined.
Common examples of computations are mathematical equations and computer algorithms.
A clown is a person who performs comedy and arts in a state of open-mindedness using physical comedy, typically while wearing distinct makeup or costuming and reversing folkway-norms.
Clowns have a varied tradition with significant variations in costume and performance.
Foster Air Force Base (1941–1945, 1952–1959) is a former United States Air Force facility in Texas, located in Victoria County, approximately  east-northeast of Victoria.
A flying training airfield during World War II, it was part of Tactical Air Command (TAC) during the early years of the Cold War as a tactical fighter and command base.
Palavela, formerly known as Palazzo delle Mostre and Palazzo a Vela is an indoor arena that is located in Turin, Italy, on the bank of the River Po.
It was designed by engineer Franco Levi and architects Annibale and Giorgio Rigotti.
"Mad About the Boy" is a popular song with words and music by actor and playwright Noël Coward.
It was introduced in the 1932 revue Words and Music by Joyce Barbour, Steffi Duna, Norah Howard and Doris Hare.
Shayne Breuer (born 10 September 1972) is a former Australian rules footballer in the Australian Football League (AFL).
He is notable for kicking Port Adelaide's first goal in the AFL.
Parantaka Chola I (Tamil:
பராந்தக சோழன்
Arundel was twice a parliamentary constituency in the Kingdom of England, the Kingdom of Great Britain, and the United Kingdom.
The first incarnation strictly comprised the town centre of Arundel and was a borough constituency in Sussex first enfranchised in 1332 and disfranchised in 1868 under the Reform Act 1867.
Luis Andrew Martinez (November 15, 1972 – May 18, 2006) was an activist who was known at the University of California, Berkeley as the Naked Guy.
Early attentionMartinez was a high school football player when he attended Monta Vista High School in Cupertino, California.
The Vancouver VooDoo were an inline hockey team based in Vancouver, British Columbia, Canada, which played in Roller Hockey International (RHI).
The VooDoo were one of the original 12 teams to join the league in 1993.
The Invisible Plane (commonly known as the Invisible Jet) is a plane appearing in DC Comics, commonly used by Wonder Woman as a mode of transport.
It was created by William Moulton Marston and first appeared in Sensation Comics #1 (January 1942).
Shopping channels (also known in British English as teleshopping) are a type of television program or specialty channel devoted to home shopping.
Their formats typically feature live presentations and demonstrations of products, hosted by on-air presenters and other spokespeople who provide a sales pitch for the product.
The Turgay ([torɣai] "Tour-GUY") (also known as Torgai, Torghay or Turgai; , Romanised: Torğai;  Romanised: Turgay) is a river in Kazakhstan.
It has a length of  and a drainage basin of .
Turgay is a Turkish given name for males.
People named Turgay include: Turgay Avcı, Turkish Cypriot politician Turgay Bahadır, Turkish-Austrian footballer Turgay Gemicibasi, Turkish footballer Turgay Semercioğlu, Turkish footballer Turgay Şeren, Turkish football managerTurgay may also refer to: Turgay (river), a river in northern Kazakhstan Turgay Depression, a structural basin in Kazakhstan Turgay Plateau, in northern Kazakhstan Turgay Oblast (Russian Empire), a former administrative divisionSee also Tugay (disambiguation
Heinrich Johann Nepomuk von Crantz (Roodt-sur-Eisch, Luxembourg, 25 November 1722 – 18 January 1799, Judenburg, Austria) was a botanist and a physician.
In 1750 he obtained his doctorate of medicine in Vienna, where he was a pupil of Gerard van Swieten (1700–1772).
KUT (90.5 FM) is a listener-supported and corporate-sponsored public radio station based in Austin, Texas.
KUT is owned and operated by faculty and staff of the University of Texas at Austin.
Dodge Cove is a small unincorporated community of fewer than 100 people, located on Digby Island, British Columbia, Canada across from the city of Prince Rupert.
In April 2015, the community had an estimated total of 29 residents.
In linguistics, a triphone is a sequence of three consecutive  phonemes.
Triphones are useful in models of natural language processing where they are used to establish the various contexts in which a phoneme can occur in a particular natural language.
Government House of Nova Scotia is the official residence of the lieutenant governor of Nova Scotia, as well as that in Halifax of the Canadian monarch.
It stands in the provincial capital at 1451 Barrington Street; unlike other provincial Government Houses in Canada, this gives Nova Scotia's royal residence a prominent urban setting, though it is still surrounded by gardens.
Harry Everett "Bud" Abell (born December 21, 1940) is a former American football linebacker in the American Football League (AFL) for the Kansas City Chiefs.
He played college football at the University of Missouri.
Susette La Flesche, later Susette LaFlesche Tibbles and also called Inshata Theumba, meaning "Bright Eyes" (c. 1854–1903), was a well-known Native American writer, lecturer, interpreter, and artist of the Omaha tribe in Nebraska.
La Flesche was a progressive who was a spokesperson for Native American rights.
The Pomme de Terre River (pronounced pohm de TEHR) is a  tributary of the Osage River in southwestern Missouri in the United States.
Via the Osage and Missouri rivers, it is part of the watershed of the Mississippi River.Pomme de terre is French for potato, a food Indians harvested in the area.
The Elizabethan Club is a social club at Yale University named for Queen Elizabeth I and her era.
Its profile and members tend toward a literary disposition, and conversation is one of the Club's chief purposes.
Raymond Lewis Abruzzese Jr. (October 27, 1937 – August 22, 2011) was an American college and professional football player.
Abruzzese was born in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania.
Holy Family High School in Broomfield, Colorado, is a Roman Catholic college-preparatory high school located in the technology corridor between Denver and Boulder.
The school is operated under the auspices of the Roman Catholic Archdiocese of Denver.HistoryHoly Family High School was established in 1922 as a parish high school.
The Deutsche Gesellschaft für Internationale Zusammenarbeit (GIZ) GmbH (English: German Development Cooperation (GIZ)), often simply shortened to GIZ, is the main German development agency.
It is headquartered in Bonn and Eschborn and provides services in the field of international development cooperation and international education work.
Kenneth Marshall Adamson (born October 12, 1938) is an American former professional football player who was a guard for the Denver Broncos of the American Football League (AFL) from 1960 through 1962.
He played college football for the Notre Dame Fighting Itish.
Sir William Mackinnon, 1st Baronet,  (13 March 1823 – 22 June 1893) was a Scottish ship-owner and businessman who built up substantial commercial interests in India and East Africa.
He established the British-India Steam Navigation Company and the Imperial British East Africa Company.
The following is a list of the highest-income ZCTAs in the United States.
ZCTAs or ZIP Code Tabulation Areas are the census equivalent of ZIP codes used for statistical purposes.
2nd Battalion, 2nd Marines (2/2) is a light infantry battalion in the United States Marine Corps based out of Marine Corps Base Camp Lejeune, North Carolina.
Also known as "The Warlords", it consists of approximately 1,300 Marines and sailors and normally falls under the command of the 2nd Marine Regiment and the 2nd Marine Division.
Benjamin James Agajanian (August 28, 1919 – February 8, 2018), nicknamed "the Toeless Wonder", was an American football player, primarily a placekicker in the National Football League (NFL), the All-America Football Conference (AAFC) and American Football League (AFL).
Early lifeBorn in Santa Ana, California, he graduated from San Pedro High School in the San Pedro community in Los Angeles.
Cola de mono or Colemono (literally, monkey's tail) is a traditional Chilean drink served around Christmas time.
It is similar to a White Russian.
A weekend warrior is someone who engages in sports or outdoor pursuits at the weekend.
Weekend warrior may also refer to:MusicWeekend Warrior (album), an album by Biz Markie in 2003Weekend Warriors (album), an album by Ted Nugent in 1978"Weekend Warrior", a song by Iron Maiden from Fear of the Dark in 1992"Weekend Warrior", a song by Ministry from Relapse in 2012"Weekend Warriors", a song by Uriah Heep from Head First in 1983"Weekend Warriors", a song by A Change Of Pace from Prepare the Masses in 2006Other mediaWeekend Warrior, a computer game developed by Pangea SoftwareWeekend Warriors (film), a 1986 comedy"Weekend Warriors", an episode of the TV series PsychWeekend Warriors, a program broadcase by HGTV CanadaWeekend Warriors MMA, a mobile game developed by MDickieOther usesA nickname for the visitors of the Defqon.1 FestivalSee also
A computer fan is any fan inside, or attached to, a computer case used for active cooling.
Fans are used to draw cooler air into the case from the outside, expel warm air from inside and move air across a heat sink to cool a particular component.
The Calgary Cannons were a minor league baseball team located in Calgary, Alberta, for 18 seasons, from 1985 until 2002.
They were a member of the AAA Pacific Coast League (PCL) and played at Foothills Stadium.
The Kolomoki Mounds is one of the largest and earliest Woodland period earthwork mound complexes in the Southeastern United States and is the largest in Georgia.
Constructed from 350CE to 600CE, the mound complex is located in southwest Georgia, in present-day Early County near the Chattahoochee River.
Sixlets are small round candy-coated, chocolate-flavored candy made by Oak Leaf Confections, a Chocolat Frey company based in Toronto, Ontario, Canada.
They are often sold in thin cellophane packages that hold them in a tube-like formation.
The  were Japanese suicide motorboats developed during World War II.
They were part of the wider Japanese Special Attack Units program.
Michael Brennan OAM (born 15 October 1975 in Toowoomba, Queensland) is a field hockey midfielder from Australia, who was a member of the team that won gold at the 2004 Summer Olympics in Athens.
Four years earlier, when Sydney hosted the Summer Games, he finished in third spot with The Kookaburras , as the men's national team is called.
The Zee Cine Award Best Actor in a Supporting Role – Female is chosen by the viewers, and the winner is announced at the actual ceremony.
The award is given in March, but the actress who wins it is awarded for her work from a movie released in the previous year from 1 January to 31 December.
The Holy Family High School is a private Catholic primary and secondary school for boys located in the suburb of East Andheri in Mumbai, in the state of Maharashtra, India.
While the school is primarily English-medium, there is also a smaller Marathi-medium section that runs in parallel from the fifth to the tenth standard.
Sarah Abitbol (born 8 June 1975) is a French former competitive pair skater.
With skating partner Stéphane Bernadis, she is the 2000 World bronze medalist, the 2000 Grand Prix Final silver medalist, a seven-time European medalist (two silver and five bronze medals), and a ten-time French national champion.
WDTW (1310 kHz) is a commercial AM radio station licensed to Dearborn, Michigan, and serving the Detroit metropolitan area.
Owned by Pedro Zamora, the station broadcasts a Spanish-language radio format branded as La Z 1310.
Mimolette is a cheese traditionally produced around the city of Lille, France.
In France it is also known as Boule de Lille after its city of origin, or vieux Hollande because it was originally inspired by the Dutch Edam cheese.
El Kala (, Latin Thinisa in Numidia) is a seaport of Algeria, in El Tarf Province, 56 miles (90 km) by rail east of Annaba and 10 miles (16 km) west of the Tunisian frontier.
It is the centre of the Algerian and Tunisian  coral fisheries and has an extensive industry in the curing of sardines.
WLLZ (106.7 MHz, Detroit's Wheels) is a commercial FM radio station licensed to Detroit, Michigan.
It is owned by iHeartMedia and it broadcasts a classic rock radio format, focusing mostly on active rock titles from the 1980s and 1990s.
Stéphane Bernadis (, born 23 February 1974) is a French former pair skater.
With skating partner Sarah Abitbol, he is the 2000 World bronze medalist, the 2000 Grand Prix Final silver medalist, a seven-time European medalist (two silver and five bronze medals), and a ten-time French national champion.
Arturo García Ortiz (born July 19, 1974) is a Mexican luchador or professional wrestler best known under the ring name Rey Bucanero.
Ortiz, as Rey Bucanero, has worked for Consejo Mundial de Lucha Libre (CMLL) since 1996.
Sulphur Springs Municipal Airport  is a city-owned, public-use airport located two nautical miles (4 km) northwest of the central business district of Sulphur Springs, a city in Hopkins County, Texas, United States.
It is included in the National Plan of Integrated Airport Systems for 2011–2015, which categorized it as a general aviation facility.
Dolon Nor (; , Doloon nuur, seven lakes; also: To-lun, Dolonnur), is a town and the county seat of Duolun County, Xilin Gol League in the Inner Mongolia Autonomous region, China.
It is of historical importance because the remnants of Shangdu, the summer capital of Kublai Khan and the following Mongol emperors of the Yuan dynasty (13th and 14th century), are located some 28 kilometers (17 miles) northwest of the modern town.
Langreo (; ) is a municipality and town in northern Spain, in Asturias.
It is the 4th largest town of Asturias with 43,000 inhabitants.
Dicrocoelium dendriticum, the lancet liver fluke, is a parasite fluke that tends to live in cattle or other grazing mammals.
History of discovery Much of what is presently known about Dicrocoelium dendriticum is the result of the work of the naturalist Wendell Krull.
Miles Poindexter (April 22, 1868September 21, 1946) was an American lawyer and politician.
As a Republican and briefly a Progressive, he served one term as a United States representative from 1909 to 1911, and two terms as a United States senator from 1911 to 1923, representing the state of Washington.
Philip Dulebohn (born September 13, 1973 in Silver Spring, Maryland) is an American pair skater.
He competed in pairs with partner Tiffany Scott, and the duo won the gold medal at the 2003 U.S. Figure Skating Championships.
The Niangua River  is a  tributary of the Osage River in the Ozarks region of southern and central Missouri in the United States.
Via the Osage and Missouri rivers it is part of the watershed of the Mississippi River.
Dogme et Rituel de la Haute Magie () is the title of Éliphas Lévi's first published treatise on ritual magic, which appeared in two volumes between 1854 (Dogme) and 1856 (Rituel).
Each volume is structured into 22 chapters, which parallel the tarot.
William Newton Byers (February 22, 1831, in Madison County, Ohio – March 25, 1903) was a founding figure of Omaha, Nebraska, serving as the first deputy surveyor of the Nebraska Territory, on the first Omaha City Council, and as a member of the first Nebraska Territorial Legislature.
He was also an early settler of Denver, Colorado, and the founder and editor of the Rocky Mountain News in Denver.
The Grotto () is a sinkhole geological formation and tourist attraction, found on the Great Ocean Road outside Port Campbell in Victoria, Australia.
Wooden steps wind down the cliff face to the bottom, providing visibility of the sea beyond a pool at low tide.
Piast the Wheelwright ( 740/741? – 861 AD; Latin:
Past Ckosisconis, Pazt filius Chosisconisu; Polish: Piast Chościskowic, Piast Kołodziej , Piast Oracz or Piast) was a semi-legendary figure in medieval Poland (9th century AD), and the presumed founder of the Piast dynasty that would rule the future Kingdom of Poland.
Hong Soon-young (30 January 1937 – 30 April 2014) was a South Korean diplomat.
He has served in several high-level posts, including as presidential aide for state affairs, Foreign Minister, and Minister of Unification, and has been ambassador to Russia (1992–1993), Germany (1994–1998), The People's Republic of China (2000–2001), Malaysia (1990–1992), and Pakistan (1984–1987).
Charles Schlueter, born in Du Quoin, Illinois, is the retired principal trumpeter of the Boston Symphony Orchestra.
Schlueter studied with William Vacchiano at the Juilliard School.
The Illawarra escarpment, or officially the Illawarra Range, is the fold-created cliffs and plateau-eroded outcrop mountain range west of the Illawarra coastal plain south of Sydney, in the state of New South Wales, Australia.
The range encloses the Illawarra region which stretches from Stanwell Park in the north to Kiama, Gerringong and the Shoalhaven River in the south.
The Lookout Mountain Incline Railway is a  inclined plane funicular railway leading to the top of Lookout Mountain from the historic St. Elmo neighborhood of Chattanooga, Tennessee.
Passengers are transported from St. Elmo's Station at the base, to Point Park at the mountain summit, which overlooks the city and the Tennessee River.
Kwangwoon University (Abbreviated to Kwangwoon, KW and KWU) is a comprehensive, coeducational and private research university in Seoul (Wolgye Dong, Nowon-gu), South Korea, offering undergraduate and graduate programs (Master and Doctor).
Chosun Radio Training Center, the predecessor of Kwangwoon University, was the first institution to teach electronic engineering studies in Korea(Chosun).
The Little Niangua River is a  tributary of the Niangua River in the Ozarks region of central Missouri in the United States.
Via the Niangua, Osage and Missouri rivers, it is part of the watershed of the Mississippi River.
Stephen John Davies (born 2 January 1969 in Parkes, NSW) is an Australian hockey player who represented his country at three successive Summer Olympic Games, winning a silver medal and two bronze medals.
In total he played for the Australia national hockey team 274 times over 10 years and was inducted into the Hockey NSW Hall of Fame in November 2009.
Patrik Antonius (born 13 December 1980) is a Finnish professional poker player, former tennis player and coach, and model from Vantaa, Finland.
He currently resides in Monte Carlo.
A smart host or smarthost is an email server via which third parties can send emails and have them forwarded on to the email recipients' email servers.
Smarthosts were originally open mail relays, but most providers now require authentication from the sender, to verify that the sender is authorised – for example, an ISP might run a smarthost for their paying customers only.
Warren Central High School (often referred to as Central or WCHS) is a 4-year high school in Bowling Green (Warren County) in the U.S. state of Kentucky.
It is one of four high schools serving the Warren County Public Schools.
Jay Jason Stacy (born 9 August 1968 in Melbourne, Victoria) is a former field hockey midfielder from Australia, who participated in four Summer Olympics for his native country, starting in 1988.
References Hockey AustraliaExternal links 1968 birthsAustralian male field hockey playersMale field hockey midfieldersAustralian field hockey coachesOlympic field hockey players for AustraliaField hockey players at the 1988 Summer OlympicsField hockey players at the 1992 Summer OlympicsField hockey players at the 1996 Summer Olympics1998 Men's Hockey World Cup playersField hockey players at the 2000 Summer OlympicsField hockey players from MelbourneLiving peopleOlympic silver medalists for AustraliaOlympic bronze medalists for AustraliaOlympic medalists in field hockeyMedalists at the 2000 Summer OlympicsMedalists at the 1996 Summer OlympicsMedalists at the 1992 Summer OlympicsCommonwealth Games medallists in field hockeyCommonwealth Games gold medallists for Australia
Sprinter (stylized as SPRINTER) is a hybrid rail (light rail with some features similar to commuter rail) service operating in the North County area of San Diego County between the cities of Escondido and Oceanside, California, United States.
The service uses the  Escondido Subdivision of the San Diego Northern Railroad.
Binchō-tan (), also called white charcoal or binchō-zumi,  is a type of charcoal traditionally used in Japanese cooking.
Its use dates to the Edo period, when, during the Genroku era, a craftsman named Bichū-ya Chōzaemon () began to produce it in Tanabe, Wakayama.
Army Day is celebrated on 15 January every year in India, in recognition of Lieutenant General Kodandera M. Cariappa's (later who became Field Marshal ) taking over as the first Commander-in-Chief of the Indian Army from General Francis Roy Bucher , the last British Commander-in-Chief of India, on 15 January 1949.
The day is celebrated in the form of parades and other military shows in the national capital New Delhi as well as in all headquarters.
H7N1 is a subtype of the species Influenza A virus (sometimes called bird flu virus).
H7N1 was first isolated in 1972, from Eurasian siskin.
H7N4 is a subtype of the species Influenza A virus (sometimes called bird flu virus).
A highly pathogenic strain of it caused a minor flu outbreak in 1997 in New South Wales, Australia in chicken.
The Communauté métropolitaine de Québec (CMQ), or Quebec Metropolitan Community, is an administrative division of the province of Quebec, comprising the metropolitan area of Quebec City and Lévis.
The CMQ is one of the two metropolitan communities of Quebec.
Alan (; ) is a village in the Şemdinli District of Hakkâri Province in southeastern Turkey.
The population of the village was 407 in 2022.
Cee-Lo Green and His Perfect Imperfections is the debut studio album by American singer-songwriter Cee Lo Green, released on April 23, 2002.
The album features guest appearances from Jahalla, Kirkland Underground, John Popper (of Blues Traveler), Joey Huffman and fellow Dungeon Family rappers Big Gipp  and Backbone.
Wijnand Ott (born 12 October 1955) is a Dutch musician.
In 1980, Ott joined Diesel as a replacement for Frank Papendrecht.
Nathan Eglington OAM (born 2 December 1980 in Murwillumbah, New South Wales) is a field hockey midfielder and striker from Australia, who was a member of the team that won the golden medal at the 2004 Summer Olympics in Athens.
He is nicknamed Eggy, and played domestic hockey for the Queensland Blades in his native country Australia, with whom he won the national title in 2003, 2004, 2006 and 2007.
H5N8 is a subtype of the influenza A virus (sometimes called bird flu) and is highly lethal to wild birds and poultry.
H5N8 is typically not associated with humans.
In Hawaiian mythology, the Nawao are a legendary people, a wild, large-sized hunting people, descended from Lua-nu'u (Beckwith 1970:321-323).
Other sources suggest that the Nawao were present in Hawaii before the Menehune who are thought to have driven them out or destroyed them.
"Smile Like You Mean It" is a song by American rock band the Killers, written by lead vocalist Brandon Flowers and bassist Mark Stoermer.
Originally released as a B-side of "Mr. Brightside" in September 2003, it is featured on their debut studio album Hot Fuss (2004).
Tuggeranong Homestead is located in the Australian Capital Territory in the area now covered by the suburb of Richardson.
It is a property of historical significance and is listed on the ACT Heritage Register.
The Minidish is the tradename used for the small-sized satellite dish used by Freesat and Sky.
The term has entered the vocabulary in the UK and Ireland as a generic term for a satellite dish, particularly small ones.
The Pop Shop was a store owned by pop artist Keith Haring.
Haring opened the first Pop Shop in New York City in 1986 (which closed in 2005) and later one in Tokyo (which closed in 1988).
Cox Field  is an airport seven miles east of Paris, in Lamar County, Texas.
It is owned by the city of Paris but is operated and maintained by J.R. Aviation, the airport's fixed-base operator (FBO).
The Milwaukee County Courthouse is a high-rise municipal building located in downtown Milwaukee, Wisconsin.
Completed in 1931, it is the third county courthouse to be built in the city and is listed on the National Register of Historic Places.
A records manager is the professional responsible for records management in an organization.
This role has evolved over time and takes many forms, with many related areas of knowledge required for professional competency.
Harry Sparnaay (14 April 1944, Amsterdam – 12 December 2017, Lloret de Mar, Girona, Spain) was a noted Dutch bass clarinetist, composer, and teacher.
BiographyHarry Sparnaay studied at the Conservatory of Amsterdam with Ru Otto.
The Plum River is a tributary of the Mississippi River, about  long, in northwestern Illinois in the United States.
It rises in Jo Daviess County and flows generally south-southwestwardly into Carroll County, where it joins the Mississippi at Savanna.
Dean Butler OAM (born 26 January 1977 in Warwick, Queensland) is a field hockey defender from Australia, who was a member of the team that won the gold medal at the 2004 Summer Olympics in Athens.
He is nicknamed Butts, and played club hockey for the Queensland Blades in his native country, with whom he won the national title in 2003.
Curt Menefee (born July 22, 1965) is an American sportscaster who hosts the Fox Network's NFL pregame show Fox NFL Sunday.
Early life and educationMenefee was born and raised in Atlanta, Georgia.
Cee-Lo Green...
Is the Soul Machine is the second studio album by Cee Lo Green, released on March 2, 2004.
"If You Want Me to Stay" is a 1973 hit single by Sly and the Family Stone, from their album Fresh.
BackgroundStone recorded the song without much input from the rest of the band; by the early 1970s, he had begun crafting most of his material by himself.
Paul Leslie Snider (April 15, 1951 – August 14, 1980) was a Canadian nightclub promoter and pimp who murdered his estranged wife, Playboy model and actress Dorothy Stratten.
Following her murder, Snider killed himself.
In statistics, (between-) study heterogeneity is a phenomenon that commonly occurs when attempting to undertake a meta-analysis.
In a simplistic scenario, studies whose results are to be combined in the meta-analysis would all be undertaken in the same way and to the same experimental protocols.
(English: Curtain, Jug and Fruit Bowl) is an oil on canvas painting created  to 1894 by French artist Paul Cézanne.
It is a formal still life composition that displays Cézanne's exploration of form, balance and symmetry in objects.
Howard David is an American sportscaster.
BiographyOver the years, David has been the radio play-by-play man for several pro sports teams including the NBA's New Jersey Nets, Milwaukee Bucks and Boston Celtics and the NFL's New York Jets and Miami Dolphins.
No Exit (also known as Fatal Combat) is a 1995 Canadian action film directed by Damian Lee and starring Jeff Wincott and Sven-Ole Thorsen as the leading hero and main villain, respectively.
It is about deadly martial arts combat, and the hero is forced into fights by evil money-men.
Troy Elder OAM (born 15 October 1977 in Bunbury, Western Australia) is a field hockey striker and midfielder from Australia, who was a member of the Men's National Team that won the golden medal at the 2004 Summer Olympics in Athens.
Four years earlier, when Sydney hosted the Olympic Games, Elder finished in third spot with The Kookaburras, as the national team is called.
Jimmie Lee Sloas is an American session musician, producer, and songwriter, who plays bass guitar.
HistoryJimmie Lee Sloas, born in Ashland, Kentucky, grew up in Fairborn, Ohio and Isonville, Kentucky.
Addison Airport  is a public airport in Addison, in Dallas County, Texas, United States,  north of downtown Dallas.
It opened in 1954 and was purchased by the town of Addison in 1976.
The Edward T. Breathitt Pennyrile Parkway was the designation for the  controlled-access highway from Henderson to Hopkinsville, Kentucky.
The parkway originally began at an interchange with the Audubon Parkway and US 41 near the city of Henderson.
Viteri is a Basque surname.
Notable people with the surname include:Pedro Viteri y Arana (born 1883), Spanish philanthropistCynthia Viteri (born 1965), Ecuadorian politician and journalistEfraín Andrade Viteri (1920–1997), Ecuadorian artistOswaldo Viteri (born 1931), Ecuadorian artist
Robert "Bob" Longfield is an American composer, arranger, conductor and educator, best known for his compositions for Concert Band and String Orchestra.
He is currently the Music Director of the Greater Miami Symphonic Band.
Flip4Mac from Telestream, Inc. was a digital media software for the macOS operating system.
It was known for being the only QuickTime component for macOS to support Windows Media Video, and was distributed by Microsoft as a substitute after they discontinued their media player for Macintosh computers.
Off the Record is the fifth studio album by the English glam rock band Sweet.
It was recorded at Audio International Studios in London between October 1976 and January 1977.
Damian Lee is a Canadian film director, writer, and producer responsible as well as notable for such films as Abraxas, Guardian of the Universe, No Exit and Ski School.
He started his own production company, Rose & Ruby Productions, in the 1980s.
Princess Shi (; personal name unknown), who might have taken the title Empress Shi () at one point, was the wife of Lü Guang (Emperor Yiwu), the founder of the Di-led Later Liang dynasty of China.
Very little is known about her.
Olympian spirits (or Olympic spirits, Olympick spirits) refers to seven (or sometimes fourteen) spirits mentioned in several Renaissance and post-Renaissance books of ritual magic/ceremonial magic, such as the Arbatel de magia veterum, The Secret Grimoire of Turiel and The Complete Book of Magic Science.
The Arbatel of Magick says of the Olympian spirits: "They are called Olympick spirits, which do inhabit in the firmament, and in the stars of the firmament: and the office of these spirits is to declare Destinies, and to administer fatal Charms, so far forth as God pleaseth to permit them.
Olearia, most commonly known as daisy-bush, is a genus of flowering plants belonging to the family Asteraceae, the largest of the flowering plant families in the world.
Olearia  are found in Australia, New Guinea and New Zealand.
The Thurniaceae are a family of flowering plants composed of two genera with four species.
The botanical name has been recognized by most taxonomists.
The Westfield Heritage Village is a heritage centre located just west of Rockton, Ontario, Canada.
The village contains over 30 historic buildings on a  site.
Beaumont Municipal Airport  is seven miles west of downtown Beaumont, in Jefferson County, Texas.
The National Plan of Integrated Airport Systems for 2017–2021 categorized it as a general aviation facility.
Yves Rocher is a French skin care, cosmetics and perfume company, founded in 1965 by French entrepreneur Yves Rocher in La Gacilly.
The company is present with over 3,000 stores,  about half of them franchised, in 88 countries on five continents and employs 13,500 personnel.
Nowhere to Run is a 1993 American action film directed by Robert Harmon.
The film stars Jean-Claude Van Damme, Rosanna Arquette, Kieran Culkin, Ted Levine, and Joss Ackland.
hit104.7 (call sign: 2ROC) is a commercial FM radio station broadcasting in Canberra, Australian Capital Territory, Australia, on a frequency of 104.7 MHz, and is part of Southern Cross Austereo's Hit Network.
hit104.7 and sister station MIX 106.3 broadcast from Crace in the Australian Capital Territory.
The Muras are an indigenous people who live in the central and eastern parts of Amazonas, Brazil, along the Amazon river from the Madeira to the Purus.
They played an important part in Brazilian history during colonial times and were known for their quiet determination and subsequent resistance to the encroaching Portuguese culture.
Gentlemen & Players is a novel by Joanne Harris first published in 2005.
A dark psychological thriller, some of the themes may be partly based on Harris' experiences as a teacher at Leeds Grammar School.
Perfect Promise, sired by Caesour out of Meretricious is a South African thoroughbred race mare who raced in Australia.
On 11 February 2006, she claimed her first Australian Group
Gokuldham is a densely populated neighborhood in Mumbai, India, close to Goregaon railway station.
It has over a hundred residential buildings from 5 to 45 floors high and forthcoming constructions are promised to be higher.
Erika Helga Ruth Böhm-Vitense (June 3, 1923 – January 21, 2017) was a German-born American astrophysicist known for her work on Cepheid variables and convection in stellar atmospheres.
Early lifeBöhm-Vitense was born Erika Helga Ruth Vitense on 3 June 1923 in Kurau, Germany.
Mudanya (also: Mudania, , ta Moudaniá [Pl.]) (the site of ancient Apamea Myrlea) is a municipality and district of Bursa Province, Turkey.
Its area is 369 km2, and its population is 108,011 (2022).
{{Infobox award| name           = Zee Cine Award for Best Actor (Popular)| image = AnupamKher5.jpg| caption = The 2023 recipient: Anupam Kher| awarded_for    = Best Performance by an Actor in a Leading Role| presenter      = Zee Entertainment Enterprises| country        = India| year           = Shah Rukh Khan,  Dil To Pagal Hai (1998) | holder         = Anupam Kher  The Kashmir Files (2023)| website        = Zee Cine Awards (from the web archive (7 Nov 2020)}}The Zee Cine Award for Best Actor – Male is chosen by the viewers of Zee Entertainment Enterprises as part of its annual award ceremony for Hindi films, to recognise a male actor who has delivered an outstanding performance in a leading role.
Following its inception in 1998, a ceremony was not held in 2009 and 2010, but resumed back in 2011.
Kunlong () is the capital town of Kunlong Township in Shan State.
its coordination is 23 25' 00" N and 98 39' 00" E.
The Orang Batin Sembilan, Orang Rimba or Anak Dalam are mobile, animist peoples who live throughout the lowland forests of southeast Sumatra.
Kubu is a Malay exonym ascribed to them.
Catharine "Katy" D. Garmany (born March 6, 1946) is an astronomer with the National Optical Astronomy Observatory.
She holds a B.S. (astrophysics), 1966 from Indiana University; and a M.A. (astrophysics), 1968, and Ph.D. (astronomy), 1971, from the University of Virginia.
In numerical linear algebra, the Gauss–Seidel method, also known as the Liebmann method or the method of successive displacement,  is an iterative method used to solve a system of linear equations.
It is named after the German mathematicians Carl Friedrich Gauss and Philipp Ludwig von Seidel, and is similar to the Jacobi method.
Indolamines are a family of neurotransmitters that share a common molecular structure (namely, indolamine).
Indolamines are a classification of monoamine neurotransmitter, along with catecholamines and ethylamine derivatives.
Stephen Mowlam OAM (born 22 December 1976 in Victoria) is a field hockey goalkeeper from Australia, who was a member of the team that won the golden medal at the 2004 Summer Olympics in Athens by beating title holders The Netherlands in the final.
He made his debut earlier that year during the Sultan Azlan Shah Cup in Kuala Lumpur, in the match against South Korea on 10 January.
Mallu Adil Shah, of the Adil Shahi dynasty, was the king of the Bijapur Sultanate of modern-day southern India.
He ruled for a short period in 1534, before being deposed and blinded.
Marine Fighter Attack Squadron 142 (VMFA-142) was an aviation unit of the United States Marine Corps Reserve that was active from 1942 to 2008.
At the time of its inactivation, the squadron was based at Naval Air Station Atlanta, Georgia and fell under the command of Marine Aircraft Group 42 (MAG-42), 4th Marine Aircraft Wing (4th MAW).
Luis Enrique Sam Colop or Sam-Colop (born in Cantel, 1955, died July 15, 2011) was a Guatemalan/Native American linguist,lawyer, poet, writer, newspaper columnist, promoter of the K'iche' language, and social activist.
Early lifeHe was born in Cantel, Guatemala in 1955.
Bolt is the codenamed assigned to multiple fictional characters appearing in American comic books pbulished DC Comics.
These characters, although unrelated, share the commonality of adopting the codename "Bolt" for their respective roles within the DC Universe.
The Zee Cine Award Best Actor in a Supporting Role- Male is chosen by a jury organized by Zee Entertainment Enterprises, and the winner is announced only at the ceremony.
Actors Abhishek Bachchan and Anil Kapoor have won the awards thrice while Saif Ali Khan has won the award twice.
In geometry, a truncated 5-cell is a uniform 4-polytope (4-dimensional uniform polytope) formed as the truncation of the regular 5-cell.
There are two degrees of truncations, including a bitruncation.
Mark Christopher Hickman OAM (born 22 August 1973 in Darwin, Northern Territory) is a field hockey goalkeeper from Australia.
He was a part of the team that won the gold medal at the 2004 Summer Olympics in Athens, Greece.
Amy J. Barger (born January 18, 1971) is an American astronomer and Henrietta Leavitt Professor of Astronomy at the University of Wisconsin–Madison.
She is considered a pioneer in combining data from multiple telescopes to monitor multiple wavelengths and in discovering distant galaxies and supermassive black holes, which are outside of the visible spectrum.
Nathan Smith (January 8, 1770December 6, 1835) was a United States senator from Connecticut.
BiographyNathan Smith was born in Woodbury, Connecticut, son of Richard and Annis (Hurd) Smith; brother of Nathaniel Smith and uncle of Truman Smith.
The Government District is an area in south-central downtown Dallas, Texas (USA).
It lies south of the Main Street District, southeast of the West End Historic District, north of the Convention Center District, west of the Farmers Market District, and east of the Reunion District.
Art Good is an American radio personality who helped make smooth jazz popular during the 1980s through his program JazzTrax.
Before becoming a disk jockey, he contemplated becoming a minister.
Flock of Dodos: The Evolution-Intelligent Design Circus is a documentary film by American marine biologist and filmmaker Randy Olson.
It highlights the debate between proponents of the concept of intelligent design and the scientific evidence and consensus that supports evolution, as well as the potential consequences of science rejection.
The Convention Center District is an area in southern downtown Dallas, Texas (USA).
It lies south of the Government District, north of the Cedars, west of the Farmers Market District, and east of the Reunion District.
Charles Edward Rhodes Bruce (C.E.R. Bruce)  (19 Apr 1902 in Shettleston – 30 Dec 1979) was a Scottish electrical engineer and amateur astrophysicist.
Education and careerBruce was the son of a tailor.
Jim Cummins may refer to:Jim Cummins (photographer) (born 1944), American photographerJim Cummins (reporter) (1945–2007), American television reporterJim Cummins (ice hockey) (born 1970), professional ice hockey playerJim Cummins (professor), instructor at the University of TorontoSee alsoJames Cummins (disambiguation)
James Cummings (disambiguation)Jim Cummings (born 1952), American voice actor and singer
The City Center District is an area in north-central downtown Dallas, Texas (USA).
It lies south of the Arts District, north of the Main Street District, northwest of Deep Ellum, southwest of Bryan Place and east of the West End Historic District.
Karl Cortlandt Schuyler (April 3, 1877July 31, 1933) was an American attorney and politician from Colorado.
A Republican, he was most notable for his service as a United States senator from 1932 to 1933.
Denny Zeitlin (born April 10, 1938) is an American jazz pianist, composer, and clinical professor of psychiatry at University of California, San Francisco.
Since 1963, he has recorded more than 100 compositions and was a first-place winner in the DownBeat International Jazz Critics' Poll in 1965 and 1974.
The LVI Legislature of the Congress of Mexico met from 1994 to 1997.
Members of the LVI Legislature Dip.
Jazztrax, formally known as the Jazztrax Showcase of the Absolute Newest, is a weekly countdown of America's Top 20 Smooth Jazz singles by Art Good.
The show was founded in 1985 by Good in San Diego and is currently broadcast out of the San Fernando Valley, the heart of smooth jazz.
Neil Mitchell AO (born 21 November 1951) is an Australian former newspaper and magazine journalist, radio presenter and television personality, best known for his long-stint on Melbourne AM talk-back station 3AW.
Early careerThe son of a school teacher, Mitchell entered journalism aged 17, straight after completing high school.
Puckapunyal (more formally the Puckapunyal Military Area, but also known as the Puckapunyal Camp or Puckapunyal Army Base, and colloquially as "Pucka") is an Australian Army training facility and base 10 km west of Seymour, in central Victoria, south-eastern Australia.
DescriptionPuckapunyal is a small restricted-access town inhabited mainly by about 280 families of the Australian Defence Force community, with an associated area of about 400 km2 of bushland and former pasture used for field training exercises.
Hermann III (c.994/995 - April 1, 1012) was a member of the Conradine dynasty.
He was Duke of Swabia from 1003 until 1012.
Thomas Albert Roberts (born October 5, 1972) is an American television journalist who served as a news anchor for MSNBC, a cable-news channel.
He ended his seven-year stint anchoring MSNBC Live, the daytime news platform of NBC News, on weekends from 5-7pm ET.
Charles Winfield Waterman (November 2, 1861August 27, 1932) was a Colorado attorney and politician.
He is most notable for his service as a United States senator from Colorado.
Mirvac is an Australian property group with operations across property investment, development, and retail services.
HistoryMirvac was founded in 1972 by Bob Hamilton and Henry Pollack.
Malayikkuthu (Malayikuthu, Malayikkuth) is a dance ritual performed by the people of Malayi sect in Kerala, South India.
Devakanni and Narada are two characters that comprise Malayikkuthu.
The Sporting Shooters' Association of Australia (SSAA) is a federated non-government organisation established in 1948 as a representative body to promote shooting sports and protect the legal rights and interests of firearm owners in Australia.
the SSAA has a membership of around 210,000.
Najas, the water-nymphs or naiads, is a genus of aquatic plants.
It is cosmopolitan in distribution, first described for modern science by Linnaeus in 1753.
Matthew Wells OAM (born 2 May 1978 in Hobart, Tasmania) is a field hockey defender from Australia, who was a member of the team that won the gold medal at the 2004 Summer Olympics in Athens by beating title holders The Netherlands in the final.
Four years earlier, when Sydney hosted the Summer Games, he finished in third spot with The Kookaburras, as the Men's National Team is called.
is a Japanese jazz pianist, composer and writer.
His piano style is influenced by free jazz, modal jazz and soul jazz.
is a Japanese actor, comedian, singer, and director from Kanazawa-ku, Yokohama, Kanagawa Prefecture, affiliated with From First Production.
He is married to idol singer and actress Midori Kinouchi.
The Spooners of Porthmadog refers to the Spooner family of Porthmadog, North Wales who made important contributions to the development of narrow gauge railways both locally and throughout the world.
James Spooner, together with his sons James Swinton and Charles Easton and other members of their family, constructed and managed the Ffestiniog Railway for over fifty years.
Esther Sandoval (28 December 1925 – 6 February 2006) was a Puerto Rican actress and a pioneer in Puerto Rico's television.
Early yearsSandoval was born Esther María González in Ponce where she received her primary and secondary education.
The  Explorer Newspaper is a weekly newspaper in Tucson, Arizona, United States.
Its coverage area includes the towns of Oro Valley and Marana and the communities of Catalina Foothills, Casas Adobes, Catalina, SaddleBrooke, Tortolita, Oracle, along with neighborhoods in the City of Tucson and Pima County.
The Chew Valley is an affluent area in North Somerset, England, named after the River Chew, which rises at Chewton Mendip, and joins the River Avon at Keynsham.
Technically, the area of the valley is bounded by the water catchment area of the Chew and its tributaries; however, the name Chew Valley is often used less formally to cover other nearby areas, for example, Blagdon Lake and its environs, which by a stricter definition are part of the Yeo Valley.
John Albert Carroll (July 30, 1901 – August 31, 1983) was an American attorney and politician who served as a Democratic United States Representative and United States Senator from Colorado.
He also served as a special assistant to President Harry Truman.
Ronald Dale Prince (born September 18, 1969) is an American football coach.
He served as the head football coach at Kansas State University from 2006 to 2008 and Howard University in 2019, compiling a career college football head coaching record of 18–28.
Hrehory Chodkiewicz (, ;  – 9 November 1572) was a Ruthenian noble and military officer of the Grand Duchy of Lithuania.
He was a son of Aleksander, brother of Hieronim and Yurii, and uncle of Jan Hieronimowicz Chodkiewicz.
Thomas James Chilton (born 15 March 1985) is a British racing driver who currently drives for Bristol Street Motors with EXCELR8 in the British Touring Car Championship.
He has spent most of his career competing in touring car racing, and his younger brother, Max, is also a racing driver.
Anicuns is a city and municipality in central Goiás state, Brazil.
GeographysAnicuns is located in the Anicuns Microregion, which includes 13 cities with a population of 103276 inhabitants in a total area of 5483.10 km2.
Elijah Boardman (March 7, 1760 – August 18, 1823) was an American politician who served as a senator from Connecticut.
Born to a noted and politically connected Connecticut family, he served in the Connecticut militia before becoming a noted merchant and businessman.
The LVII Legislature of the Congress of Mexico met from 1997 to 2000.
It was the first session in 68 years where the Institutional Revolutionary Party (PRI) did not hold an absolute majority over opposition parties in the Chamber of Deputies.
The 2005-2006 season in Danish 2nd Division was divided in two groups.
The two winners, Næstved BK and Aarhus Fremad, promoted to the 2006–07 Danish 1st Division, together with the winner of a promotion game, Thisted FC, between the two runners-up.
In numerical linear algebra, the Jacobi method (a.k.a.
the Jacobi iteration method) is an iterative algorithm for determining the solutions of a strictly diagonally dominant system of linear equations.
A motorcycle taxi, or cart bike or bike taxi, is a licensed form of transport in some countries.
The taxi typically carries one passenger, who "rides pillion" behind the motorcycle operator.
Craig Victory (born 3 February 1980 in Adelaide, South Australia) is a field hockey striker from Australia who played 102 international games for the Australia men's national field hockey team, the Kookaburras.
He is a Commonwealth Games, World Cup and Champions Trophy Gold Medalist and was an Olympic Bronze Medalist with the Australia men's national field hockey team the Kookaburras at the 2000 in Sydney.
The 16th Street Baptist Church is a Baptist church in Birmingham, Alabama, United States.
In 1963, the church was bombed by Ku Klux Klan members.
Rebatching, or hand milling, is a soapmaking technique used by hobbyists and artisan soapmakers.
The commercial equivalent is French milling.
Wing Commander IV: The Price of Freedom is the fourth main game in the Wing Commander science fiction space combat simulator video game series, produced by Origin Systems and released by Electronic Arts for the PC in 1996 and the Sony PlayStation in 1997 (the game was also released on the North American PlayStation Network Store in 2009).
The first game set after the end of the Terran-Kilrathi War, Wing Commander IV depicts a galaxy in the midst of a chaotic transition, with human civilians, Kilrathi survivors and former soldiers on both sides attempting to restabilize their lives.
Prayagraj Airport , formerly known as Allahabad Airport, is the  domestic airport serving the city of Prayagraj, Uttar Pradesh, India.
Located in the Bamrauli suburb of the city, it is one of the oldest airports in India.
Fiona Leggate (born 28 May 1980) is a British auto racing driver.
Early careerLeggate had been interested in motorsport since her childhood, influenced by her father Malcolm Leggate who had a 19-year career in saloon car racing.
George Johnstone (1730 – 24 May 1787) was a Royal Navy officer who saw service during the War of the Austrian Succession, the Seven Years' War and the American War of Independence, rising to the rank of post-captain and serving for a time as commodore of a British naval squadron.
In a multifaceted career he was also a member of parliament, a director of the East India Company, a member of the Carlisle Peace Commission and the first Governor of West Florida from 1763 until 1767.
Michael John York (born 16 October 1967 in Tamworth, NSW) is a former field hockey defender from Australia, who participated in four Summer Olympics for his native country, starting in 1988.
From 1992 on, at each appearance the skilled veteran won a medal.
Olandis C. Gary (born May 18, 1975) is a former American football running back who played for the Denver Broncos from 1999 to 2002 and the Detroit Lions from 2003 to 2004.
He was drafted in the fourth round of the 1999 NFL Draft.
The Standards Department was a department of the English Board of Trade having the custody of the imperial standards of weights and measures.
HistoryAs far back as can be traced, the standard weights and measures, the primary instruments for determining the justness of all other weights and measures used in the United Kingdom, were kept at the Exchequer, and the duties relating to these standards were imposed upon the chamberlains of the Exchequer.
Syed Akbar Hussain, popularly known as Akbar Allahabadi (16 November 1846 – 9 September 1921) was an Indian Urdu poet in the genre of satire.
The most popular of Akbar's verse poked fun at the cultural dilemma posed by the onslaught of Western British culture.
Serra do Bussaco ( ) is a mountain range in Portugal, formerly included in the province of Beira Litoral.
The highest point in the range is the Cruz Alta at 549 m (1801 feet), which has views over the Serra da Estrela, the Mondego River valley and the Atlantic Ocean.
Paul Morris (born November 2, 1959) is an American musician best known as a keyboardist in Ritchie Blackmore's Rainbow.
He played keyboards on the Stranger in Us All album and co-wrote the song "Black Masquerade".
Thomas Leabhart (born 1944) is an American corporeal mime and corporeal mime teacher.
Leabhart studied at the Ecole de Mime Etienne Decroux, Paris under the instruction of master mime and teacher Etienne Decroux from 1968 to 1972.
Jane Feather (born Jane Robotham 1945 in Cairo, Egypt) is a popular British–American writer of historical romance novels.
In 1984 she wrote five contemporary romances under the pseudonym Claudia Bishop.
Indexing Service (originally called Index Server) was a Windows service that maintained an index of most of the files on a computer to improve searching performance on PCs and corporate computer networks.
It updated indexes without user intervention.
England is divided by a number of different regional schemes for various purposes.
Since the creation of the Government Office Regions in 1994 and their adoption for statistical purposes in 1999, some historical regional schemes have become obsolete.
Church of the Transfiguration or Holy Transfiguration Church may refer to any of the following:Albania  Holy Transfiguration Church, Gjirokastër Church of the Holy Transfiguration, Herebel, Dibër CountyBelarus  Transfiguration Church, Navahrudak, Grodno Region (Roman Catholic) Transfiguration Church, Polotsk, Vitebsk RegionCroatia  Church of the Transfiguration of the Lord, Trpinja, Vukovar-Srijem County (Serbian Orthodox)
Estonia  The Obinitsa Church of Transfiguration of Our Lord, Meremäe ParishHungary  Transfiguration Church, Szentendre, Pest County (Serbian Orthodox)Lithuania  Holy Transfiguration Church, Kėdainiai, Kaunas CountyItaly  Trasfigurazione di Nostro Signore Gesù Cristo, RomeIsrael  Catholic Church of the Transfiguration on Mount Tabor Orthodox Church of the Transfiguration on Mount TaborMalta  Church of the Transfiguration, QrendiMoldova  Transfiguration Church, ChișinăuPalestine  Church of Transfiguration, RamallahRomania Transfigu
John Ulysses Mobley (born October 10, 1973) is a former American football linebacker who played eight seasons for the Denver Broncos from 1996 through 2003 in the National Football League (NFL).
He is the cousin of former NBA player Cuttino Mobley.
Barry John Dancer (born 27 August 1952 in Brisbane, Queensland) is a former Australian field hockey player and coach of Australian men's national field hockey team.
As a player he competed in 48 international matches for Australia between 1973 and 1979.
In number theory, a polite number is a positive integer that can be written as the sum of two or more consecutive positive integers.
A positive integer which is not polite is called impolite.
Verreaux's eagle-owl (Ketupa lactea), also commonly known as the milky eagle owl or giant eagle owl, is a member of the family Strigidae.
This species is widespread in sub-Saharan Africa.
Leslie Ann Sykes (born June 27, 1965) is an American television news anchor, journalist and reporter.
Sykes is the morning and midday co-anchor of the "Eyewitness News" at KABC-TV, ABC's owned and operated television station in Los Angeles.
The Bonhoeffer family is a German family that, though originating in the city of Nijmegen, has been documented in the city of Schwäbisch Hall from 1513 onwards.
Among the family's most notable members are Dietrich Bonhoeffer and Klaus Bonhoeffer, both executed in the last days of World War II by Adolf Hitler's government for their different resistance activities against the Nazi régime.
Gold-containing drugs are pharmaceuticals that contain gold.
Sometimes these species are referred to as "gold salts".
Roderrick Justin "Rod" Ferrell (born March 28, 1980) is an American murderer and cult leader.
He was a member of a loose-knit gang of teenagers from Murray, Kentucky, known as the "Vampire Clan".
Gladys Bronwyn Stern or GB Stern (17 June 1890 – 20 September 1973), born Gladys Bertha Stern in London, England, wrote many novels, short stories, plays, memoirs, biographies and literary criticism.
The National Portrait Gallery, London holds four portraits of her.
New Mexico Junior College (NMJC) is a public junior college in unincorporated Lea County, New Mexico, near Hobbs.
History and campusNew Mexico Junior College first opened in the fall of 1966.
Sheshatshiu () is an Innu federal reserve and designated place in the Canadian province of Newfoundland and Labrador.
The reserve is approximately  north of Happy Valley-Goose Bay.
Marie-Theres Nadig (born 8 March 1954) is a retired Swiss alpine skier.
BiographyAged 17, she won gold medals in the downhill and giant slalom events at the 1972 Winter Olympics.
Terence ("Terry") Arthur Walsh (born 20 November 1953) is a field hockey coach and a former player who played as a striker for Australia.
He represented Australia in two Olympic Games, winning a silver medal at the 1976 Games in Montreal.
Real Stories Of The Highway Patrol is a half-hour syndicated television series which ran in the United States for six seasons from March 22, 1993 to June 29, 1998, Started in the UK, it's produced by Mark Massari Productions and ITV2 on 2004-2009, Granada and VCI, later 2 Entertain in VHS and DVD releases, and STV Productions in 2010-2016.
series 1 premiered on November 15, 2004, series 2 premiered on September 8, 2008, series 3 premiered on January 11, 2010, series 4 premiered in January 14, 2013, series 5 premiered in February 9, 2015 and series 6 premiered in May 30, 2016.
Little Easton is a village and civil parish in Essex, England.
The village is situated approximately  east from the town of Bishop's Stortford, and  north-west from the county town of Chelmsford.
Annie Haslam (born 8 June 1947) is an English vocalist, songwriter and painter.
She is best known as the lead singer of progressive rock band Renaissance since 1971, and for her long and diverse solo singing career.
4 Little Girls is a 1997 American historical documentary film about the murder of four African-American girls (Addie May Collins, Carol Denise McNair, Cynthia Wesley, Carole Rosamond Robertson) in the 16th Street Baptist Church bombing in Birmingham, Alabama on September 15, 1963.
The film was directed by Spike Lee and nominated for an Academy Award for Best Documentary.
Broomfield  is a village in the Maidstone District of Kent, England, and forms part of the civil parish of Broomfield and Kingswood.
It lies  to the east of Maidstone.
The Sabancı family is one of the wealthiest families in Turkey according to the Forbes billionaires list of 2016, with an estimated fortune ranging between $20–30 billion.
The family's main business entity was founded by Hacı Ömer Sabancı in the 1930s.
MTSS may refer to:Organisations Ministerio de Trabajo y Seguridad Social, the Uruguayan ministry of labour and social security Ministry of Labour, Solidarity and Social Security (Ministério do Trabalho, Solidariedade e Segurança Social) Military Training and Survival School, of the Irish Air Corps Stock symbol of MTS (network provider) at the Moscow ExchangeOther uses Medial tibial stress syndrome, known also as tibial periostitis or shin splints, a common injury affecting athletes   Manuscript tracking systems (MTSs); See iThenticate Multiteam system (MTSs)
See also MTSS1 (Metastasis suppressor protein 1), a protein MTS (disambiguation)
Adam David Commens (born 6 May 1976) is the brother of Scott Commens, is an Australian field hockey coach and former player.
He was born in Wagga Wagga, New South Wales.
Sempra is a North American public utility holding company based in San Diego, California.
The company is one of the largest utility holding companies in the United States with nearly 40 million consumers.
Middle Park is a residential south-western suburb in the Centenary Suburbs in the City of Brisbane, Queensland, Australia.
In the , Middle Park had a population of 3,955 people.
Wrestling Society X (WSX) is a short-lived American professional wrestling promotion and professional wrestling-based television series created in 2006 by Big Vision Entertainment.
The weekly television series formerly aired on MTV, MTV2, MTV Tr3s, and over a dozen other MTV outlets throughout the world.
Damon Laurance Diletti (born 1 May 1971 in Perth, Western Australia) is a former field hockey goalkeeper from Australia, who competed in three consequentive Summer Olympics for his native country, starting in 1992.
At each appearance the electrician won a medal.
King Soopers is an American supermarket chain located in the Rocky Mountains of the United States.
It started as its own brand, and is now a subsidiary of Kroger.
Quah Chow-cheung (Chinese: 柯昭璋, 8 June 1913  in Penang – 1965 in Hong Kong) was the Colony Commissioner of The Scout Association of Hong Kong from 1950 to 1953, succeeding Victor Halward.
He was the first Chinese Colony Commissioner in Hong Kong Scouting.
WADL (channel 38) is a television station licensed to Mount Clemens, Michigan, United States, serving the Detroit area as an affiliate of MyNetworkTV.
Locally owned by the Adell Broadcasting Corporation, the station maintains studios and transmitter facilities on Adell Drive in Clinton Township.
Christian H. Godefroy (25 October 1948 - 17 November 2012) was a French author of self-improvement books.
Godefroy's books included Mind Dynamics, How to write a letter that sells, Time management System, Expressive learning system and Infopreneur.
The Speaker of the Dewan Rakyat () is the highest-ranking presiding officer of the Dewan Rakyat, the lower house of the Parliament of Malaysia.
They are responsible for convening sessions of the Dewan Rakyat, organising debates, and examining the admissibility of petitions, bills, and amendments.
Hoplobatrachus is a genus of frogs in the family Dicroglossidae.
This genus is found in both Sub-Saharan Africa and southern and southeastern Asia.
Pharmaciens Sans Frontières Comité International (PSFCI) is the largest humanitarian association in the world specialized in the pharmaceutical sector.
Founded in 1985 to retrieve unused drugs from chemists for use in developing countries, PSFCI extended its objectives to help developing countries set up a locally adapted health care system.
Bathurst is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Paul Toole of the  Nationals.
Westlake is a south-western suburb in the City of Brisbane, Queensland, Australia.
In the , Westlake had a population of 4,368 people.
Lachlan George Dreher (born 11 April 1967 in Melbourne, Victoria) is a former field hockey goalkeeper from Australia, who competed in three consecutive Summer Olympics for his native country, starting in 1992.
References Profile on Hockey AustraliaExternal links 1967 birthsAustralian male field hockey playersMale field hockey goalkeepersOlympic field hockey players for AustraliaField hockey players at the 1992 Summer OlympicsField hockey players at the 1996 Summer OlympicsField hockey players at the 2000 Summer Olympics1998 Men's Hockey World Cup players2002
Indirana is a genus of frogs in the family Ranixalidae.
These frogs are endemic to the Western Ghats of India.
Training raptors (birds of prey) is a complex undertaking.
Books containing advice by experienced falconers are still rudimentary at best.
Bega is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Michael Holland of the Labor Party.
Blue Mountains is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Trish Doyle of the Labor Party.
Burrinjuck was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales from 1950 to 2015.
The 2004 redistribution of electoral districts estimated that the electoral district would have 47,688 electors on 29 April 2007.
Camden is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales in Sydney's south-west.
It is currently represented by Sally Quinnell of the  party, who achieved a 13% swing in the 2023 election.
Campbelltown is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly of the Australian state of New South Wales in Sydney's South-west.
It includes the suburbs of Airds, Ambarvale, Blair Athol, Blairmount, Bradbury, Campbelltown, Claymore, Eagle Vale, Englorie Park, Gilead, Glen Alpine, Kentlyn, Leumeah, Menangle Park, Rosemeadow, Ruse, St Helens Park, Wedderburn and Woodbine.
Canterbury is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales, currently represented by Sophie Cotsis of the Labor Party.
Canterbury includes the suburbs of Belmore, Campsie, Canterbury, Clemton Park, Earlwood, Lakemba, Undercliffe, and parts of Beverly Hills, Kingsgrove, Roselands, and Wiley Park.
Ingerana is a genus of frogs in family Dicroglossidae.
These frogs are distributed in southeastern Asia, from Nepal, northeastern India, and southwestern China to Indochina, Borneo, and the Philippines.
Cessnock is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales in the rural fringe of the Hunter.
It is represented by Clayton Barr of the Labor Party.
Charlestown is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It has been represented by Jodie Harrison of the Labor Party since the Charlestown by-election on 25 October 2014.
Clarence is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It includes all of the Clarence Valley Council including Grafton, Maclean, Yamba, Illuka, Junction Hill, Ulmarra, Coutts Crossing and Glenreagh, as well as all of the Richmond Valley Council including Casino, Coraki, Woodburn, Evans Head and Tatham.HistoryClarence was created in 1859, replacing the New South Wales part of Clarence and Darling Downs.
Coffs Harbour is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
Since 2019 it has been represented by Gurmesh Singh of the National Party.
Coogee is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales located south-east of Sydney CBD.
It is represented by Marjorie O'Neill of the Australian Labor Party.
Cronulla is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Mark Speakman of the Liberal Party.
Davidson is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Matt Cross of the Liberal Party.
Drummoyne is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is currently represented by Stephanie Di Pasqua since the 2023 New South Wales state election.
East Hills is a state electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the state of New South Wales, Australia.
It is represented by  member Kylie Wilkinson.
Epping is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by former Premier Dominic Perrottet of the Liberal Party.
Jason Paul Duff (born 27 October 1972 in Melbourne, Victoria) is a former field hockey defender from Australia, who was a member of the team that won the bronze medal at the 2000 Summer Olympics in Sydney.
Early life Duff attended St. Leo the Great primary school in Altona North and attended high school at St. Paul's College in Altona North, Victoria.
Fairfield is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly of the Australian state of New South Wales in Sydney's West.
Fairfield has historically been one of the safest  seats in New South Wales and is considered a part of Labor's heartland in Western Sydney.
Limnonectes is a genus of fork-tongued frogs of about 75 known species, but new ones are still being described occasionally.
They are collectively known as fanged frogs because they tend to have unusually large teeth, which are small or absent in other frogs.
This is a non-exhaustive list of symphony orchestras in Europe.
For orchestras from other continents, see List of symphony orchestras.
Georges River was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales from 1930 to 2007.
It was replaced by Oatley.
Gosford is an electoral district of the New South Wales Legislative Assembly in Australia.
The electorate covers the western parts of the City of Gosford, including central Gosford and Woy Woy.
Granville is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales in Sydney's West.
It is currently represented by Julia Finn of the Labor Party.
Hawkesbury is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Robyn Preston of the Liberal Party.
Heathcote is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It was established in 1971 abolished in 1991 and re-established in 1999.
Captain Gorur Ramaswamy Iyengar Gopinath (born 13 November 1951) is an Indian entrepreneur, the founder of Air Deccan, a retired Captain of the Indian Army, an author and a politician.
Early life Gopinath was born in Gorur, Hassan, in a Tamil iyengar family and was brought up in small village in Gorur in the Hassan district of Karnataka State.
Heffron is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales located primarily in Sydney's Inner Southern Region.
It is named after Robert Heffron, a former Labor premier of New South Wales.
Meristogenys is a genus of true frogs from Borneo.
Its tadpoles are adapted to fast-flowing mountain streams and easily recognizable by their divided upper lip with ribs on the outside.
Electoral district of Hornsby is an electoral district of the New South Wales Legislative Assembly in Australia.
Hornsby is one of two post-1927 electorates to have never been held by the  party and always by the Liberals, a predecessor party to the Liberals, or an independent, the other such district being Vaucluse.
Illawarra was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It was located in the Illawarra area and originally created in 1859, replacing East Camden.
Keira is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is currently represented by Ryan Park of the Labor Party.
The General Education Board was a private organization which was used primarily to support higher education and medical schools in the United States, and to help rural white and black schools in the South, as well as modernize farming practices in the South.
It helped eradicate hookworm and created the county agent system in American agriculture, linking research as state agricultural experiment stations with actual practices in the field.
Kiama is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is currently represented by Gareth Ward.
Kogarah is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
The electorate is located in St George.
Ku-ring-gai was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
The electorate covers the suburbs and parts of the suburbs of Gordon, Hornsby, Killara, Lindfield, Normanhurst, North Turramurra, North Wahroonga, Pymble, South Turramurra, Thornleigh, Turramurra, Wahroonga, Waitara, Warrawee and West Pymble.
Lachlan was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
During the first two Parliaments (1856–1859), there was an electorate in the same area called Lachlan and Lower Darling, named after the Lachlan and Darling Rivers.
Lake Macquarie is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in Greater Newcastle, Hunter Region of the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by the independent Greg Piper.
Lakemba was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales, located in the South-Western suburbs of Sydney.
It has been held by the Labor Party since its creation in 1927.
Micrixalus (commonly known as dancing frogs, tropical frogs, and torrent frogs) is a genus of frogs from that are endemic to the Western Ghats in India.
They are monotypic within the family Micrixalidae.
Lane Cove is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Anthony Roberts of the Liberal Party.
Lismore is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Janelle Saffin of the Labor Party.
Liverpool is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly of the Australian state of New South Wales in Sydney's West.
It is currently represented by Charishma Kaliyanda of the Labor Party.
Londonderry is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Prue Car of the Labor Party.
Macquarie Fields is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales, located in the outer south-western suburbs of Sydney.
It is currently represented by Anoulack Chanthivong of the Labor Party.
Frank Norman (9 June 1930 – 23 December 1980) was a British novelist and playwright.
His reputation rests on his first memoir Bang to Rights (1958) and his musical play Fings Ain't Wot They Used T'Be (1960), but much of the remainder of his work remains fresh and readable.
Betzdorf () is a town and municipality in northern Rhineland-Palatinate, Germany.
Betzdorf is part of the district of Altenkirchen.
Maitland is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
The district encompasses most of the City of Maitland.HistoryMaitland was created in 1904, replacing East Maitland and West Maitland.
Manly is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales, and covers a large portion of the Northern Beaches Council local government area.
Created in 1927, although it has historically tended to be a -leaning seat, Manly has had a history of independent local members.
Maroubra is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales located south-east of Sydney CBD.
It is currently represented by Michael Daley, former leader of the Labor Party,Maroubra includes the suburbs of Banksmeadow, Botany, Chifley, Daceyville, Eastgardens, Hillsdale, Kingsford, La Perouse, Little Bay, Malabar, Maroubra, Maroubra Junction, Matraville, Pagewood, Phillip Bay, Port Botany and parts of Eastlakes.
Menai was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales from 1999 to 2015.
It was most recently represented by Melanie Gibbons of the Liberal Party.
Miranda is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Eleni Petinos of the Liberal Party.
Stephen Harris Holt (born 1974 in Darwin, Northern Territory) is a former field hockey defender and midfielder from Australia, who was a member of the team that won the bronze medal at the 2000 Summer Olympics in Sydney.
He was nicknamed Shaggy by his teammates.
Nannophrys is a genus of frogs endemic to Sri Lanka.
It used to be placed in the large frog family Ranidae but a phylogenetic study was undertaken using DNA sequences and it is now included in the family Dicroglossidae.
Monaro, also known as Maneroo (1856–1858), Monara (1858–1879) and Manaro (1894–1904) is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is currently represented by Steve Whan of the Labor party since the 2023 New South Wales state election.
Mulgoa was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
Mulgoa includes the suburbs of Abbotsbury, Austral, Badgerys Creek, Cecil Hills, Cecil Park, Eastern Creek, Elizabeth Hills, Erskine Park, Glenmore Park, Horsley Park, Kemps Creek, Luddenham, Middleton Grange, Mount Vernon, Mulgoa, Orchard Hills, Regentville, St Clair, Wallacia and West Hoxton.
Murray-Darling is a former electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It included Urana Shire, Jerilderie Shire, Berrigan Shire, Murray Shire, Conargo Shire, Deniliquin Council, Wakool Shire, Hay Shire, Balranald Shire, Wentworth Shire, part of Carrathool Shire (including Goolgowi and Merriwagga), Central Darling Shire, the City of Broken Hill and the Unincorporated Far West.HistoryMurray-Darling was created in 1999 from a merger of the Electoral district of Broken Hill and part of the Electoral district of Murray.
Wyong is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
The district is a 640.55 km² urban and semi-rural electorate on the Central Coast.
Wollongong is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Paul Scully of the Labor Party.
Willoughby is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It has been represented by Tim James of the Liberal Party since 12 February 2022.
Wentworthville was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales, first created in 1962.
The seat was absorbed into surrounding electorates in a redistribution prior to the 1991 election and recreated in the redistribution prior to the 1999 election.
The Electoral district of Wakehurst is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It covers a significant part of Sydney's Northern Beaches as well as parts of the Forest District.
Wagga Wagga is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
The district has been held by  MP Joe McGirr since the September 2018 by-election.
Vaucluse is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales, located east of Sydney CBD.
The electorate gets its name from the suburb of Vaucluse in Sydney's Eastern Suburbs.
Wihtburh (also Withburga or Withburge; died 743) was an East Anglian saint, princess and abbess.
According to tradition, she was the youngest daughter of Anna, king of the East Angles, but Virginia Blanton has suggested that the royal connection was probably a fabrication.
Pain (typeset as PAIN) is a musical project from Sweden that mixes heavy metal with influences from electronic music and techno.
The project started out as a hobby project for frontman Peter Tägtgren, whose idea was to fuse heavy metal with 1980s-inspired electro-industrial and techno influences.
Upper Hunter is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
The seat is currently held by Dave Layzell for the National Party after he was elected at a by-election to replace Michael Johnsen.
Nanorana is a genus of dicroglossid frogs.
They are found in Asia, from the Himalayan region of northern Pakistan and northern India, Nepal, and western China east to montane southern China and southeast to Myanmar, Thailand, Laos, and northern Vietnam.
Tweed is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Geoff Provest of The Nationals.
The Entrance is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly located on the Central Coast of New South Wales, Australia.
The Entrance represents the towns and suburbs of Bateau Bay, Berkeley Vale, Blue Bay, Fountaindale, Glenning Valley, Kangy Angy, Killarney Vale, Lisarow, Long Jetty, Mount Elliot, Niagara Park, Ourimbah, Shelly Beach, Somersby, The Entrance, The Entrance North, Toowoon Bay, Tuggerah, Tumbi Umbi and Wyoming.Members for The EntranceElection resultsReferencesThe Entrance1988 establishments in AustraliaThe EntranceCentral Coast (New South Wales)
Tamworth is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by the Honourable Kevin Anderson MP of the National Party.
Swansea is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Hunter and Central Coast regions of the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Yasmin Catley of the Labor Party.
Southern Highlands was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales from 1988 to 2007, named after the Southern Highlands.
It was replaced by a recreated Goulburn electorate.
Niederentzen () is a commune in the Haut-Rhin department in Grand Est in north-eastern France.
GeographyThe village of Niederentzen was established between the Vosges and the Rhine on the left bank of the Ill, at an altitude of 205 meters.
South Coast is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It incorporates almost all of the City of Shoalhaven to the south of the Shoalhaven River, notably Nowra, Ulladulla and Milton.
Smithfield was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales from 1988 to 2015.
It was abolished in 2015 and largely replaced by Prospect.
Ryde is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It includes the suburbs and localities of Denistone, Denistone East, Denistone West, Macquarie Park, Marsfield, Meadowbank, Melrose Park, Ryde, North Ryde, West Ryde; and parts of Eastwood and Epping.
Rockdale is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
Suburbs within the electoral district include Arncliffe, Banksia, Bardwell Park, Bardwell Valley, Beverley Park, Bexley, Bexley North, Brighton-Le-Sands, Dolls Point, Earlwood, Kogarah, Kogarah Bay, New South Wales, Kyeemagh, Monterey, Ramsgate, Ramsgate Beach, Rockdale, Sandrigham, Sans Souci, Turella and Wolli Creek.
Port Stephens is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Kate Washington of the Labor Party.
Port Macquarie is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is represented by Leslie Williams of the Liberal Party.
Port Jackson was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It was created at the 1991 election, largely from the electorates of Balmain and McKell, and was abolished at the 2007 election being substantially replaced by the recreated electorates of Balmain and Sydney following a redistribution of electoral boundaries completed during 2004.
Penrith is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales since 1973.
It is represented by Karen McKeown of the Labor Party.
Peats was an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales from 1973 to 2007.
It was replaced by Gosford for the 2007 state election.
Orange is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is a regional electorate that covers four local government areas in their entirety: the City of Orange, Cabonne Council, Parkes Shire and Forbes Shire.
Northern Tablelands is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It is currently held by Adam Marshall representing the National Party, following a by-election triggered by the resignation of independent member Richard Torbay.
North Shore is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales, located on Sydney's lower North Shore.
It is currently held by  MP Felicity Wilson.
Occidozyga is a genus of frogs in the family Dicroglossidae found in southeastern Asia between eastern India, southern China, and Java.
They sometimes go under the common name Java frogs or floating frogs.
Newcastle is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales named after and including Newcastle.
It is represented since the 2014 Newcastle by-election by Tim Crakanthorp of the Australian Labor Party.
James "Jimmy" Andrew Elmer (born 8 May 1971 in Melbourne, Victoria) is a former field hockey striker from Australia, who was a member of the team that won the bronze medal at the 2000 Summer Olympics in SydneyHe was nicknamed Jimmy by his teammates.
Elmer made his senior debut for The Kookaburras in 1993.
Myall Lakes is an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales.
It was represented by Stephen Bromhead of The Nationals until his death in 2023.
Murrumbidgee is a former electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales, named after the Murrumbidgee River.
HistoryUntil its abolition, Murrumbidgee and Parramatta were the only electorates to have existed continuously since the first Legislative Assembly election in 1856, although before 1913 it was called The Murrumbidgee.
The Battle of Westbroek was a battle that occurred on 26 December 1481 between the armies of the prince-bishopric of Utrecht and the county of Holland.
It was one of the last battles of the Hook and Cod wars.
Brighton Tonderai Watambwa (born 9 June 1977) is a Zimbabwean cricketer who in 2014 captained the Belgium national cricket team.
A right-arm fast-medium bowler, Watambwa played six Tests for Zimbabwe between April 2001 and March 2002, taking 14 wickets.
Paa may refer to: Nanorana, a genus of frogs formerly referred to as Paa Paa (film), a 2009 Bollywood film  Paa (given name)
See also  PAA (disambiguation)
Olatunde Olateju Olaolorun "O-T" Fagbenle  (Yoruba: Ọlátúndé Ọlátẹ́jú Ọláọlọ́run Fágbénlé; born 22 January 1981) is an English actor, writer, and director.
He has appeared in several films, stage, and television productions.
Paul Charles Gaudoin (born 12 August 1975 in Perth, Western Australia) is an Australian former field hockey defender and midfielder, who was a member of the team that won the bronze medal at the 2000 Summer Olympics in Sydney.
Four years earlier, he won his first bronze medal at the Olympics.
The Northern Ireland flags issue is one that divides the population along sectarian lines.
Depending on political allegiance, people identify with differing flags and symbols, some of which have, or have had, official status in Northern Ireland.
Stomio (, ) is a village and a community of the Agia municipality.
Before the 2011 local government reform it was the seat of the municipality of Evrymenes.
The R10000, code-named "T5", is a RISC microprocessor implementation of the MIPS IV instruction set architecture (ISA) developed by MIPS Technologies, Inc. (MTI), then a division of Silicon Graphics, Inc. (SGI).
The chief designers are Chris Rowen and Kenneth C. Yeager.
The R3000 is a 32-bit RISC microprocessor chipset developed by MIPS Computer Systems that implemented the MIPS I instruction set architecture (ISA).
Introduced in June 1988, it was the second MIPS implementation, succeeding the R2000 as the flagship MIPS microprocessor.
The R4000 is a microprocessor developed by MIPS Computer Systems that implements the MIPS III instruction set architecture (ISA).
Officially announced on 1 October 1991, it was one of the first 64-bit microprocessors and the first MIPS III implementation.
The R5000 is a 64-bit, bi-endian, superscalar, in-order execution 2-issue design microprocessor, that implements the MIPS IV instruction set architecture (ISA) developed by Quantum Effect Design (QED) in 1996.
The project was funded by MIPS Technologies, Inc (MTI), also the licensor.
Daniel Sproule (born 25 January 1974 in Melbourne, Victoria) is a former field hockey defender from Australia who cannot find the wiki for the life of him, who was a member of the team that won the bronze medal at the 2000 Summer Olympics in Sydney.
Four years earlier, when Atlanta, Georgia hosted the Games, he won his first bronze medal at the Olympics.
The R8000 is a microprocessor chipset developed by MIPS Technologies, Inc. (MTI), Toshiba, and Weitek.
It was the first implementation of the MIPS IV instruction set architecture.
Shahreza (, also Romanized as Shahrezā and Shahriza; formerly Komsheh, then Qomsheh (Persian: ), also Romanized as Kowmsheh, and Qowmsheh) is a city in the Central District of Shahreza County, Isfahan province, Iran, and serves as both capital of the county and of the district.
Shahreza was selected as the national city of pottery in Iran in 2015.
Fovant is a village and civil parish in southwest Wiltshire, England, lying about  west of Salisbury on the A30 Salisbury-Shaftesbury road, on the south side of the Nadder valley.
History
Al Garhoud Bridge (in Arabic: جسر القرهود) is one of three road bridges over Dubai Creek, and one of five crossings, in Dubai, United Arab Emirates.
Al Garhoud Bridge forms the eastern end of the road toll (called Salik) that went into effect on 1 July 2007.
The Alaska Aces were a professional basketball team in the Philippine Basketball Association since 1986 under the ownership of Alaska Milk Corporation (AMC) and the owner of 14 PBA championships, tied with the Magnolia Hotshots for the third-most titles overall.
They are one of the most popular teams in the league and the Philippines.
Özdemir Sabancı (May 15, 1941 – January 9, 1996) was a Turkish businessman and a second generation member of the Sabancı family.
BiographyHe was born in Adana, Turkey.
was an airport in Nishi Ward, located  southwest of Hiroshima City, Japan.
HistoryHiroshima's first airport, , opened on a nearby island in Naka-ku, Hiroshima in 1940.
The Class 112 and Class 113 DMUs used the standard Cravens body used on Class 105s but had a single Rolls-Royce C8NFLH engine rated at  per car, all of which formed into 'power twins' – two car sets with both vehicles powered.
There were two batches built, the first 50 vehicles (25 sets) had standard mechanical transmission via a gearbox and were allocated the Class 112.
Hexachlorobenzene, or perchlorobenzene, is an organochloride with the molecular formula C6Cl6.
It is a fungicide formerly used as a seed treatment, especially on wheat to control the fungal disease bunt.
Rebirth is the second album by the Swedish industrial metal project Pain.
It was released in 1999 via the Swedish label Stockholm Records.
Kandathil Mammen Mammen Mappillai (28 November 1922 – 3 March 2003) was an Indian businessman, industrialist and founder of MRF.
He graduated from Madras Christian College.
In sociology, the social disorganization theory is a theory developed by the Chicago School, related to ecological theories.
The theory directly links crime rates to neighbourhood ecological characteristics; a core principle of social disorganization theory that states location matters.
Vălenii de Munte () is a town in Prahova County, southern Romania (the historical region of Muntenia), with a population of 12,044 as of 2021.
It lies In the Teleajen river valley,  north of the county seat of Ploiești.
In Christian tradition the churching of women, also known as thanksgiving for the birth or adoption of a child, is the ceremony wherein a blessing is given to mothers after recovery from childbirth.
The ceremony includes thanksgiving for the woman's survival of childbirth, and is performed even when the child is stillborn, or has died unbaptized.
Mirex is an organochloride that was commercialized as an insecticide and later banned because of its impact on the environment.
This white crystalline odorless solid is a derivative of cyclopentadiene.
Enrique Moya (born 1958 in Caracas, Venezuela) is a Venezuelan poet, fiction writer, literary translator, essayist and critic of music and literature.
He has published work in diverse literary genres in newspapers and magazines of Latin America, the United States and Europe.
Robert A. Wilson was an American gynecologist who is known for writing the best-selling 1966 book Feminine Forever.
He is also known for his organization the Wilson Research Foundation (WRA).
Drăgănești-Olt () is a town in Olt County, Muntenia, Romania.
The first document mentioning it is from 1526.
Franciscus Ronaldus ("Ronald") Maria Jansen (born 30 December 1963 in Sint-Michielsgestel) is a former field hockey goalkeeper from the Netherlands, who twice won the gold medal at the Summer Olympics.
He played a total number of 183 international matches for his native country, and made his debut on 23 June 1987 at the 1987 Men's Hockey Champions Trophy in a match against Argentina.
Walter Hamilton Dickson (January 4, 1806 – July 30, 1885) was a lawyer and political figure in Canada West.
He was a Conservative member of the Senate of Canada from 1867 to 1884.
Mohammad Akram Hussain Khan (; born 1 November 1968) is a former Bangladeshi cricketer.
A hard hitting middle order batsman, Akram played first-class cricket for Chittagong Division.
For the Working Class Man is the second studio album by former Cold Chisel frontman Jimmy Barnes, released in December 1985.
The album consists of five original tracks and seven remixed tracks that had previously been released on Barnes' 1984 debut album Bodyswerve.
The British Rail Class 115 diesel multiple units were 41 high-density sets which operated the outer-suburban services from Marylebone usually to destinations such as High Wycombe, Aylesbury and Banbury which are on the Chiltern Main Line and Great Central Main Line (now the London to Aylesbury Line).
Sometimes, these sets used to operate 8- or 12-car-long expresses to Nottingham Victoria in the final years of the GCML.
Rovinari () is a town in Gorj County, Oltenia, Romania.
A large coal burning electric power plant it is located near the town.
Nothing Remains the Same is the third studio album by the Swedish industrial metal project Pain.
It was released in 2002 via the Swedish label Stockholm Records and features the singles "Shut Your Mouth" (reached No. 14 on the Swedish single charts) and "Just Hate Me" (No. 47).
Clorgiline (INN), or clorgyline (BAN), is a monoamine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI) structurally related to pargyline which is described as an antidepressant.
Specifically, it is an irreversible and selective inhibitor of monoamine oxidase A (MAO-A).
Can't Buy Me Love is a 1987 American teen romantic comedy film directed by Steve Rash, starring Patrick Dempsey and Amanda Peterson in a story about a nerd at a high school in Tucson, Arizona, who gives a cheerleader $1,000 to pretend to be his girlfriend for a month.
The film takes its title from a Beatles song of the same title.
Monoamine oxidase A, also known as MAO-A, is an enzyme (E.C. 1.4.3.4) that in humans is encoded by the MAOA gene.
This gene is one of two neighboring gene family members that encode mitochondrial enzymes which catalyze the oxidative deamination of amines, such as dopamine, norepinephrine, and serotonin.
Videle () is a town in Teleorman County, Muntenia, Romania, with a population of 10,107 in 2021.
It was upgraded to town status in 1968 by incorporation of a few villages nearby.
Interflora is a flower delivery network, associated with over 58,000 affiliated flower shops in over 140 countries.
It is a subsidiary of Teleflora, a subsidiary of The Wonderful Company.
The Toyota Aurion (XV40)  is the original series of the Toyota Aurion, a mid-size car produced by Toyota in Australia and parts of Asia.
Designated "XV40", Toyota manufactured the first generation Aurion between 2006 and 2012 until it was fully replaced by the XV50 series.
Dancing with the Dead is the fourth studio album by the Swedish industrial metal project Pain.
It was released in March 2005 via Stockholm Records and managed to reach No. 3 on the Swedish album charts, higher than any Pain album to date.
Frank Jan Anton Leistra (born 1 April 1960 in Delft) is a former field hockey goalkeeper from the Netherlands, who was a member of the Dutch team that won the bronze medal at the 1988 Summer Olympics in Seoul.
Leistra played a total number of 159 international matches for his native country, and made his debut on 1 June 1985 in a friendly match against Scotland.
Esa Holopainen (born 1 October 1972) is a Finnish musician, currently the main songwriter, occasional lyricist, founding member and lead guitarist of the Finnish heavy metal band Amorphis.
He is one out the two longest standing members of the band (the other being Tomi Koivusaari) and one of the four original members in the band (the others being Jan Rechberger, Tomi Koivusaari and Olli-Pekka Laine).
ProFlowers is a flower retailer in the United States.
It is an e-commerce company that sells products shipped from growers, suppliers and its own distribution facilities to consumers.
Great Oakley is a village and civil parish in the Tendring district of Essex, England.
It is a long, narrow parish lying on the top of a low (25 m) ridge south of Ramsey Creek which drains northeast towards Harwich.
Boldești-Scăeni (), often spelled Boldești-Scăieni, is a town in Prahova County, southern Romania.
Located about  north of Ploiești, it is an important oil-extraction center.
Tony Stewart (born 1971) is an American auto racing driver.
Tony Stewart may also refer to: A. T. Q. Stewart (1929–2010), Northern Irish author and historian, best known as Tony Stewart Tony Stewart (American football) (born 1979), professional football player for the Oakland Raiders Tony Stewart (Australian racing driver), Australian racing driver who participated in the 1973 Singapore Grand Prix Tony Stewart (politician) (born 1956), Australian politician Tony Stewart (Canadian football) (born 1968),
Pavaratty is a census town in Thrissur district in the Indian state of Kerala.
Pavaratty is situated in the coastal area of Chavakkad taluk in Thrissur District.
1-800-Flowers.com, Inc. is a floral and foods gift retailer and distribution company in the United States.
The company's focus, except for Mother's Day and Valentine's Day, is on gift baskets.
Mehrab Hossain (; born 22 September 1978) is a Bangladeshi cricketer who played in 9 Test matches and 18 One Day Internationals from 1998 to 2003.
He became the first Bangladeshi cricketer to score a century in ODIs when he scored 101 against Zimbabwe at Bangabandhu National Stadium at Dhaka in 1999.
The Lone Ranger is the first solo album by British singer Suggs, singer in second wave ska band Madness.
It was released in 1995 (see 1995 in music).
Stereomud was an American nu metal band from New York City and Georgia.
They were active from years 1999 to 2003 before breaking up, releasing two albums—Perfect Self and Every Given Moment.
Bolintin-Vale () is a town in Giurgiu County, Muntenia, Romania with a population of 12,806 .
The town administers three villages: Crivina, Malu Spart, and Suseni.
Pierre-Alexandre Monsigny ( – ) was a French composer and a member of the French Académie des Beaux-Arts (1813).
He is considered alongside André Grétry and François-André Danican Philidor to have been the founder of a new musical genre, the opéra comique, laying a path for other French composers such as François-Adrien Boieldieu, Daniel-François-Esprit Auber, Charles Gounod, Georges Bizet, and Jules Massenet in this genre.
Marabunta is a fully distributed software application for anonymous P2P.
The main goal is the fight against internet censorship and assuring the freedom of speech.
Live Is Overrated is a live album the by Swedish industrial metal project Pain.
It was released in 2005 via the Metal Mind label.
The Sound Factory was a nightclub first located 532 West 27th Street and then 618 West 46th Street in New York City's Manhattan.
The Sound Factory was an integral venue during a peak period of house music in New York.
Titu () is a town in Dâmbovița County, Muntenia, Romania, with a population of 9,658 .
LocationThe town in located in the southern part of the county, in the center of the Wallachian Plain.
Romanian Cosmonautics and Aeronautics Association (), also known as ARCAspace, is an aerospace company based in Râmnicu Vâlcea, Romania.
It builds rockets, high-altitude balloons, and unmanned aerial vehicles.
Early Bronze Age stone wrist-guards are found across Europe from around 2400-1900 BC and are closely associated with the Beaker culture and Unetice culture.
In the past they have been variously known as stone bracers, stone arm-guards and armlets, although "stone wrist-guard" is currently the favoured terminology; and it is no longer thought that they were functional archer's bracers.
Maryam Heydarzadeh (; born November 20, 1977) is a contemporary Iranian poet, lyricist, singer and painter.
Heydarzadeh is blind.
Bikash Ranjan Das () is a Bangladeshi cricketer, who played in one Test match for the country in year 2000.
Das was born on July 14, 1982, in Dhaka.
Shahriar Hossain () is a Bangladeshi cricketer who played in three Test matches from 2000 to 2004.
He was also one of the members of the 1999 World Cup Team.
Operation Sail refers to a series of sailing events held to celebrate special occasions and features sailing vessels from around the world.
Each event is coordinated by Operation Sail, Inc., a non-profit organization established in 1961 by U.S. President John F. Kennedy, and must be approved by the United States Congress.
The British Rail Class 119 DMUs were used throughout the Western Region and on services in the Midlands sourced by Tyseley Depot.
Built by the Gloucester Railway Carriage & Wagon Co. Ltd, the body design was based on the Swindon Cross-Country sets, but with a Derby cab.
The HQ-7 (; NATO reporting name: CH-SA-4) is a short-range surface-to-air missile (SAM) from the People's Republic of China.
It was developed by the Changfeng Electromechanical Technology Design Institute from the French R-440 Crotale SAM.
Manjural Islam (sometimes spelled Monjural Islam, born 7 November 1979) is a Bangladeshi cricketer who played in 17 Test matches and 34 One Day Internationals from 1999 to 2004.
He is a left-arm seam bowler.
Mohammad Sharif () (born 12 December  1985 in Narayanganj, Dhaka) is a Bangladeshi cricketer.
He is a right-handed player.
REC or Rec is a shortening of recording, the process of capturing data onto a storage medium.
REC may also refer to:Educational institutes Regional Engineering College, colleges of engineering and technology education in India Rajalakshmi Engineering College (), Thandalam, Chennai, IndiaOrganizations Railway Executive Committee, in Britain REC Limited, an infrastructure finance company in India Reformed Episcopal Church, an Anglican church in the United States and Canada Regional Economic Communities, in Africa Regional electricity companies, the fourteen companies created when the electricity market in the UK was privatised Renewable Energy Corporation, a solar power company with headquarters in Norway REC Silicon (no) Research Ethics Committee, a type of ethics committee Rock Eisteddfod Challenge, an Australian abstinence program Rural Electrification CorporationTelevision, film, and fiction Rec (film series), a Spanish horror film series Rec (film), the first fi
Society of Soul was a five-member R&B group that consisted of the members of Organized Noize (Sleepy Brown, Rico Wade and Ray Murray) as well as Espraronza and Big Rube.
DiscographyAlbums Brainchild (1995)Singles "Pushin'""Embrace"ReferencesExternal linksSouthern hip hop groupsDungeon Family membersArista Records artists
T-V-H (Thailand-Vietnam-Hong Kong) is a submarine telecommunications cable system in the South China Sea linking Thailand, Vietnam and Hong Kong.
It has landing points in:Si Racha, Chonburi Province, ThailandVũng Tàu, Bà Rịa–Vũng Tàu province, VietnamDeep Water Bay, Southern District, Hong KongIt has a transmission capacity of 565 Mbit/s and a total cable length of .
Valea lui Mihai (; ) is a town in Bihor County, Crișana, Romania.
GeographyThe town is located at the northern tip of Bihor County, around  north-east of the county seat, Oradea, on the border with Hungary.
Enamul Haque Moni (; born 27 February 1966), also known as Enamul Haq Moni, is a former Bangladeshi cricketer who played in 10 Tests and 29 ODIs from 1990 to 2003.
After retiring from competitive cricket he became an umpire, and made his first appearance in an ODI between Bangladesh and Zimbabwe on 3 December 2006.
Fahim Muntasir Rahman (born 1 November 1980) is a former Bangladeshi cricketer who played in three Test matches and three One Day Internationals from 2001 to 2002.
1980 birthsLiving peopleBangladesh Test cricketersBangladesh One Day International cricketersBangladeshi cricketersDhaka Division cricketersKhulna Division cricketersPeople from MymensinghSportspeople from Mymensingh Division
The Allahverdi Khan Bridge (), popularly known as Si-o-se-pol (), is the largest of the eleven historical bridges on the Zayanderud, the largest river of the Iranian Plateau, in Isfahan, Iran.
The bridge was built in the early 17th century to serve as both a bridge and a dam.
Brainchild is the only studio album by American group Society of Soul, composed of the production team Organized Noize, singer Esparonza Brown and poet Big Rube.
It was released on LaFace Records in 1995.
Negrești () is a town in Vaslui County, located in the eastern part of Western Moldavia, a traditional region of Romania.
It has a population of around 8,000.
Plopeni () is a town in Prahova County, Muntenia, Romania, with a population of 6,709 as of 2021.
ClimatePlopeni has a humid continental climate (Cfb in the Köppen climate classification).
The Central Provinces was a province of British India.
It comprised British conquests from the Mughals and Marathas in central India, and covered parts of present-day Madhya Pradesh, Chhattisgarh and Maharashtra states.
"Flame Trees" is a song by Australian pub rock band Cold Chisel from their 1984 album Twentieth Century.
One of their best known songs, it was written by drummer Steve Prestwich and keyboardist Don Walker.
Mohammad Alamgir Kabir (born 10 January 1981) is capai nawab gonj Bangladeshi cricketer who played in three Test matches from 2002 to 2004.
He was the first Bangladeshi Test cricketer to have made a pair on test debut.
Stuart Langridge (also known as 'Aq' or 'Zippy' ) is a podcaster, developer and author.
He became a member of the Web Standards Project's DOM Scripting Task Force, an invited expert on the W3C HTML Working Group and is an acknowledged commentator on W3C Document Object Model and JavaScript techniques.
"Unwashed and Somewhat Slightly Dazed" is a song by English musician David Bowie, released on his 1969 album David Bowie.
It was one of the first songs produced by Tony Visconti.
In mathematics, the Cartan–Dieudonné theorem, named after Élie Cartan and Jean Dieudonné, establishes that every orthogonal transformation in an n-dimensional symmetric bilinear space can be described as the composition of at most n reflections.
The notion of a symmetric bilinear space is a generalization of Euclidean space whose structure is defined by a symmetric bilinear form (which need not be positive definite, so is not necessarily an inner product – for instance, a pseudo-Euclidean space is also a symmetric bilinear space).
Târgu Cărbunești is a town in Gorj County, Oltenia, Romania with a population of 7,616 (as of 2021).
It lies in the south-eastern part of the county and administers ten villages: Blahnița de Jos, Cărbunești-Sat, Cojani, Crețești, Curteana, Floreșteni, Măceșu, Pojogeni, Rogojeni, and Ștefănești.
Gary Willis (born 28 March 1957) is an American bassist and composer known foremost as the co-founder (with Scott Henderson) of the jazz fusion band Tribal Tech.
Aside from his work in Tribal Tech, Willis has worked with numerous other jazz musicians including Wayne Shorter, Dennis Chambers, and Allan Holdsworth.
The German Society for Racial Hygiene () was a German eugenic organization founded on 22 June 1905 by the physician Alfred Ploetz in Berlin.
Its goal was "for society to return to a healthy and blooming, strong and beautiful life" as Ploetz put it.
Elisabeth "Eli" Maragall Verge (born 25 November 1970 in Barcelona, Spain) is a former field hockey player from Spain.
She was a member of the Women's National Team that won the gold medal at the 1992 Summer Olympics on home soil (Barcelona).
Njunis is a mountain in the interior of southern Troms og Finnmark county, Norway.
The mountain lies in Målselv Municipality.
A jackhammer is a percussive drill.
Jackhammer may also refer to: Jackhammer, a vertical suplex powerslam Jackhammer (comics), a Marvel Comics villain Joliet JackHammers, a professional baseball team based in Joliet, Illinois MTX Jackhammer, a  subwoofer Pancor Jackhammer, an automatic-shotgun designJack Hammer may refer to: "Jack" Hammer, a character in the Rescue Heroes line Jack Hammer, a professional wrestler from  United States Wrestling Association "Jack Hammer", a song by the Odds from their album Bedbugs Jack Hammer (songwriter) (1925–2016), pseudonym for songwriter and singer Earl Burroughs Jack Hammer (South African band)
María ("Masa")
Ángeles Rodríguez Suárez (born 12 April 1957 in Gijón, Asturias) is a former field hockey player from Spain, who was a member of the Women's National Team that won the gold medal at the 1992 Summer Olympics on home soil (Barcelona).
Rebellion is a German heavy metal band.
It was formed in 2001 when guitarist Uwe Lulis left Grave Digger in 2000, taking ex-Grave Digger bassist Tomi Göttlich with him.
David Edward Price (May 11, 1826 – August 22, 1883) was a Quebec businessman and political figure.
He was a Conservative member of the Senate of Canada from 1867 to 1883.
María Victoria "Mariví" González Laguillo (born 27 February 1961 in Ciudad de México, Distrito Federal) is a former field hockey player from Spain.
She was born in Mexico.
Lizard Lick is an unincorporated community in Wake County, North Carolina, United States.
The community is located at the crossroads of Lizard Lick Road and NC 97.
Talha Jubair () (born 10 December 1985) is a Bangladeshi cricketer.
He played in seven Test matches and six One Day Internationals from 2002 to 2004.
PKP class Ok22 is a class of ordinary passenger (O) 4-6-0 (k) steam locomotive designed in 1922 forPolskie Koleje Państwowe (Polish State Railways, PKP).
It was the first locomotive designed in Poland after World War I, so the design work was done jointly with Hanomag, based on the Prussian P 8 (PKP class Ok1)HistoryIntroductionThe first five engines were built in Germany by Hanomag in 1923.
Călimănești, often known as Călimănești-Căciulata, is a town in Vâlcea County, southern Romania.
It is situated in the historical region of Oltenia and the northern part of the county, on the traditional route connecting the region to Transylvania, and at the southern end of the Olt River valley crossing the Southern Carpathians.
Mistley is a village and civil parish in the Tendring district of northeast Essex, England.
It is around 11 miles northeast of Colchester and is east of, and almost contiguous with, Manningtree.
The Three Pyramids Club is the second solo studio album by British singer Suggs known from second wave ska band Madness.
It was released in 1998 and reached no. 82 on the UK album chart in its lone week on the chart.
Maider Tellería Goñi (born July 14, 1973 in San Sebastián) is a former Spanish field hockey player.
She was a member of the gold medal-winning Women's National Team at the 1992 Summer Olympics in Barcelona.
Mohammad Rafikul Islam Khan (born 7 November 1977, in Rajshahi), generally known as Rafikul Khan, is a Bangladeshi cricketer who played a Test and ODI match for Bangladesh in 2002.
He plays domestic first-class cricket for Rajshahi Division.
Mohammad Anwar Hossain (born 10 December 1983) is a Bangladeshi cricketer who played in one Test match and one One Day International in 2002.
References1983 birthsLiving peopleBangladesh Test cricketersBangladesh One Day International cricketersBangladeshi cricketersDhaka Division cricketersDhaka Metropolis cricketersWicket-keepersCricketers from Dhaka
María Isabel Martínez de Murguía Embarba (born 16 October 1967 in Madrid) is a former field hockey player from Spain.
She was a member of the Women's National Team that surprisingly won the gold medal at the 1992 Summer Olympics on home soil (Barcelona)ReferencesExternal links  1967 birthsLiving peopleSpanish female field hockey playersFemale field hockey goalkeepersOlympic field hockey players for SpainField hockey players at the 1992 Summer OlympicsOlympic gold medalists for SpainField hockey players from MadridOlympic medalists in field hockeyMedalists at the 1992 Summer Olympics20th-century Spanish women
Mohammad Salim (, born 15 October 1981) is a Bangladeshi cricketer who played in two Test matches and one One Day International in 2003.
He was born at Khulna.
Mohammad Anwar Hossain (; born 31 December 1981) is a Bangladeshi cricketer who has played in three Test matches and one One Day International since 2003.
In the course of his short Test career he took over the record for the most runs conceded by a bowler (307) without taking a wicket.
Mercedes Coghen Alberdingk-Thijm (born August 2, 1962 in Madrid) is a former field hockey player from Spain, who captained the Women's National Team that won the golden medal at the 1992 Summer Olympics on home soil (Barcelona).
She was a member of the committee of the Madrid 2012 bid and chair of the Madrid 2016 bid to host Summer Olympic Games.
Two Cops () is a 1993 South Korean action/comedy film directed by Kang Woo-suk.
It stars Ahn Sung-ki and Park Joong-hoon as a pair of police detectives with different outlooks who end up working on a case together.
Nagore Gabellanes Marieta (born 25 January 1973 in San Sebastián, Guipúzcoa) is a former field hockey player from Spain.
She was a member of the Women's National Team that surprisingly won the golden medal at the 1992 Summer Olympics on home soil (Barcelona).
The 2005–06 Cupa României was the 68th season of the annual Romanian football knockout tournament.
The winners of the competition qualified for the first qualifying round of the 2006–07 UEFA Cup.
Natalia Dorado Gómez (born February 25, 1967 in Madrid) is a former field hockey player from Spain.
She was a member of the Women's National Team that surprisingly won the golden medal at the 1992 Summer Olympics on home soil (Barcelona).
The term swing refers to the extent of change in voter support, typically from one election or opinion poll to another, expressed as a positive or negative percentage point.
For the Australian House of Representatives and the lower houses of the parliaments of all the states and territories except Tasmania and the ACT, Australia employs preferential voting in single-member constituencies.
Sultan Mahmud Al-Muktafi Billah Shah ibni Almarhum Sultan Ismail Nasiruddin Shah  (29 April 1930 – 14 May 1998) was the 17th Sultan of Terengganu from 21 September 1979 to 14 May 1998.
LifeSultan Mahmud was born on 29 April 1930 in Kuala Terengganu.
Nuria Olivé Vancells (born 20 August 1968 in Barcelona, Catalonia) is a former field hockey player from Spain.
She was a member of the Women's National Team that won the gold medal at the 1992 Summer Olympics on home soil (Barcelona).
Silvia Manrique Pérez (born 6 March 1973 in Llodio, Álava) is a former field hockey player from Spain, who was a member of the Women's National Team that won the gold medal at the 1992 Summer Olympics on home soil (Barcelona).
She also competed in the 1996 Summer Olympics in Atlanta, Georgia, where Spain finished in 8th and last position.
Courtney Gains (born August 22, 1965) is an American character actor best known for his portrayal of Malachai in the 1984 horror movie Children of the Corn.
CareerGains achieved success during the 1980s with a variety of roles in films such as Children of the Corn, Hardbodies, Lust in the Dust, Back to the Future, Can't Buy Me Love, Secret Admirer, Colors, The 'Burbs, and Memphis Belle.
Ariel Prieto (born October 22, 1969) is a Cuban former professional baseball pitcher.
He played in Major League Baseball (MLB) from 1995 to 2001 for the Oakland Athletics and Tampa Bay Devil Rays.
The Sail @
Marina Bay is a waterfront lifestyle condominium located in the Marina Bay area in Singapore.
Sonia Barrio Gutiérrez (born 13 December 1969 in Madrid) is a former field hockey player from Spain, who was a member of the Women's National Team that surprisingly won the golden medal at the 1992 Summer Olympics in Barcelona.
Barrio also competed in the 1996 Summer Olympics in Atlanta, Georgia, where Spain finished in 8th and last position.
Teresa Motos Izeta (born 29 December 1963 in Guipúzcoa) is a former field hockey player from Spain.
She was a member of the Women's National Team that won the gold medal at the 1992 Summer Olympics on home soil (Barcelona).
Scarva ( meaning "shallow place, rough ford") is a small village and townland in County Down, Northern Ireland.
It is at the boundary with County Armagh, which is marked by the Newry Canal.
Virginia Ramírez Merino (born 22 May 1964 in Madrid) is a former field hockey player from Spain.
She was a member of the Women's National Team that won the gold medal at the 1992 Summer Olympics on home soil (Barcelona).
Matei Alexe Călinescu  (June 15, 1934 – June 24, 2009) was a Romanian literary critic and professor of comparative literature at Indiana University, in Bloomington, Indiana.
BiographyCălinescu was born in Bucharest, Romania, the son of Radu Călinescu, an engineer, and Dora Călinescu (née Vulcănescu), a homemaker.
Mwape Miti (born 24 May 1973) is a Zambian former professional footballer who played as a striker.
He has played 246 matches and scored 109 goals for his team Odense Boldklub, having joined them in the summer of 1997 from Power Dynamos.
The Michael Kelly Guitar Company is a US musical instrument company founded in 1999 and based in Clearwater, Florida.
Michael Kelly imports high quality instruments manufactured to their specifications (mainly from South Korea).
Shakespeare's Macbeth – A Tragedy in Steel is a 2002 concept album by German heavy metal band Rebellion, based on the story of William Shakespeare's play Macbeth.
The album has many spoken passages.
Woronora Dam is a locality split between City of Wollongong, City of Campbelltown, and Sutherland Shire in New South Wales, Australia.
In the , Woronora Dam had a population of 3 people.
Andrew Tembo (born 19 August 1971) is a former Zambian football midfielder.
Tembo previously played 284 matches and scored 15 goals for Odense BK, having joined them in the summer of 1997 from Olympique Marseille, where he had a short spell.
Strange Cargo 2 is the third album by electronic instrumentalist William Orbit.
It was released in 1990.
The Royal College of General Practitioners (RCGP) is the professional body for general (medical) practitioners (GPs/Family Physicians/Primary Care Physicians) in the United Kingdom.
The RCGP represents and supports GPs on key issues including licensing, education, training, research and clinical standards.
In chemistry, mechanically interlocked molecular architectures (MIMAs) are molecules that are connected as a consequence of their topology.
This connection of molecules is analogous to keys on a keychain loop.
Pierre-Alexis "Pitre" Tremblay (December 27, 1827 – January 4, 1879) was a surveyor and Quebec political figure.
He was a Liberal Member of Parliament from 1867 to 1875 and 1878 to 1879.
Christian Frei (born 1959 in Schönenwerd, Solothurn) is a Swiss filmmaker and film producer.
He is mostly known for his films War Photographer (2001), The Giant Buddhas (2005) and Space Tourists (2009).
Strange Cargo III is the fourth album by electronic instrumentalist William Orbit.
It is the third in a series of similarly titled albums: Strange Cargo, Strange Cargo II and Strange Cargo Hinterland.
The Campbell albatross (Thalassarche impavida) or Campbell mollymawk, is a medium-sized mollymawk in the albatross family.
It breeds only on Campbell Island and the associated islet of Jeanette Marie, in a small New Zealand island group in the South Pacific.
Hinterland is the fifth studio album by electronic instrumentalist William Orbit, which released under the alias Strange Cargo.
It is the fourth in a series of similarly themed albums: Strange Cargo, Strange Cargo II, and Strange Cargo III.
Seaforde is a small village in County Down, Northern Ireland.
It is within the townland of Naghan, one mile (1.6 km) north of Clough on the main Ballynahinch to Newcastle road.
Cape of Good Hope (GB) (好望角, foaled 1998) is a British thoroughbred racehorse based in Hong Kong.
Sired by Inchinor to dam Cape Merino, the chestnut gelding was trained by David Oughton.
The Men's 20 kilometre individual biathlon  competition at the 2006 Winter Olympics in Turin, Italy was held on 11 February, at Cesana San Sicario.
The individual race consisted of five laps around a four kilometre loop with four stops at the shooting range.
Shishunaga (IAST: Śiśunāga, or Shusunaga) ( – 395 BCE) was the founder of the Shishunaga dynasty of the Magadha Empire in the present day northern India.
Initially, he was an amatya (official) of the Magadha empire under the Haryanka dynasty.
Born a Rebel is an album by German heavy metal band Rebellion, released in 2003.
Track listing"Born a Rebel" (Lulis, Göttlich) – 4:02"Adrenalin" (Lulis, Göttlich) – 3:39"One for All" (Lulis, Göttlich) – 5:09"World Is War" (Lulis, Göttlich) – 4:40"Dragons Fly" (Lulis, Eilen, Göttlich) – 3:57"Queen of Spades" (Lulis, Göttlich) – 5:23"Iron Flames" (Lulis, Eilen, Göttlich) – 6:13"Through the Fire" (Lulis, Göttlich, Seifert) – 5:34"Devil's Child" (Lulis, Göttlich, Seifert) – 5:38"Meet Your Demon" (Lulis, Black, Göttlich) – 3:34"Power of Evil" (Lulis, Göttlich) – 5:10Credits Michael Seifert — vocals Uwe Lulis — guitars Björn Eilen — guitars Tomi Göttlich — bass Randy Black — drums2003 albumsConcept albumsRebellion (band) albumsDrakkar Entertainment albums
Now That's What I Call Music!
is the name given to several different series of various-artists compilation albums.
NPC (North Pacific Cable) is a submarine telecommunications cable system in the North Pacific Ocean linking the United States and Japan.
It has landing points in:Miura, Kanagawa Prefecture, JapanPacific City, Tillamook County, Oregon, United StatesSeward, Kenai Peninsula Borough, Alaska, United States (branch @ 420 Mbit/s)
Gilbert Ralph Clements  (11 September 1928 – 27 November 2012) was a Canadian politician and the 25th Lieutenant Governor of Prince Edward Island from 1995 to 2001.
Born in Victoria Cross, Prince Edward Island, he was first elected to the Legislative Assembly of Prince Edward Island in 1970 representing 4th Kings.
Gabriel Jaime Barrabas Gómez Jaramillo (born 8 December 1959) is a retired Colombian footballer who played as a central midfielder.
Club careerDuring his career, Gómez played mainly for hometown side Atlético Nacional, representing the club in eight professional seasons, in two different spells, and helping the team to three first division titles.
Wayne Carew is a Canadian businessman and former politician in the province of Prince Edward Island.
A resident of Stanley Bridge, Carew was elected by acclamation as leader of the Prince Edward Island Liberal Party, then the Official Opposition in the Legislative Assembly of Prince Edward Island, in 1999 following the resignation of Keith Milligan.
Seahill is a village on the northern coast of County Down, Northern Ireland.
It is within the townland of Ballyrobert, with Holywood to the west and Helen's Bay and Crawfordsburn to the east.
Icelandair Group hf. is an Icelandic travel industry corporation, the owner and holding company of the airline Icelandair and several other travel industry companies in Iceland.
The group's headquarters are at Reykjavík Airport in Reykjavík.
Count Ricardo is an Australian Thoroughbred racehorse gelding who is best known as a bargain purchase from an auction sale.
He was foaled on 18 August 2001 and bred by  M Ralston,  L J Theodore of Victoria.
Luis Fernando Herrera Arango (born June 12, 1962) is a retired football defender.
He was capped 61 times and scored 1 international goal for Colombia between 1987 and 1996.
Akif Pirinçci (; born 20 October 1959) is a Turkish-born German writer who is best known internationally for his novel Felidae.
After a highly controversial speech for the Pegida movement in 2015, he was cancelled and delisted by his publishers, Amazon and most booksellers in Germany.
Dhruva (ruled 780–793 CE) was one of the most notable rulers of the Rashtrakuta Empire.
He ascended the throne after replacing his elder brother Govinda II.
Carlos Chagas Filho (September 10, 1910 – February 16, 2000) was a Brazilian physician, biologist and scientist active in the field of neuroscience.
He was internationally renowned for his investigations on the neural mechanisms underlying the phenomenon of electrogenesis by the electroplaques of electric fishes.
Lazonby is a village and civil parish in the Lower Eden Valley of Cumbria; it is located about  north-north-east of Penrith and 24 miles (38 km) south of the Scottish Borders.
The total population of the ward of Lazonby, which also includes the nearby villages of North Dykes, Great Salkeld and Salkeld Dykes, was 1,425 at the time of the 2001 UK Census; this figure included 1,011 people between the ages of 16 and 74, of whom 675 were in employment.
Alexis Antonio Mendoza Barrina (born November 8, 1961) is a retired Colombian footballer and current manager.
He was the assistant manager of Honduras national football team during the 2010 FIFA World Cup and of the Ecuador national football team during the 2014 FIFA World Cup.
Geoffrey William Humpage (born 24 April 1954) is a former England cricketer who played in three One Day Internationals in 1981.
Humpage played in county cricket as a hard-hitting middle-order batsman and wicketkeeper for Warwickshire from 1974 to 1990.
Robert Rantoul Jr. (August 13, 1805August 7, 1852) was an American lawyer and politician from Massachusetts.
Rantoul was a member of the Massachusetts House of Representatives (1835–1839), the commission to revise the laws of Massachusetts, and the Massachusetts Board of Education (1837–1842).
Wílmer Cabrera Linares (born September 15, 1967) is a Colombian former football defender and current head coach of Rio Grande Valley FC Toros in the USL Championship.
He previously coached for Chivas USA and Houston Dynamo, as well as the United States men's national under-17 soccer team.
James Derek Love (born 22 April 1955) is a former English first-class cricketer, who played in three One Day Internationals for England in 1981.
He played in 247 first-class cricket matches for Yorkshire from 1975 to 1989, as well as representing the Marylebone Cricket Club (MCC), Lincolnshire, the Minor Counties and Scotland.Life and careerLove was tipped for stardom but like the player he most resembled, John Hampshire his Yorkshire teammate, he never quite fulfilled his potential on the national stage.
Sebastian Sailer (12 February 1714 in Weißenhorn – 7 March 1777 in Obermarchtal), born Johann Valentin Sailer, was a German Premonstratensian Baroque preacher and writer.
He is especially known for his comedies written in Swabian German.
Dream Dancing is a 1978 album by Ella Fitzgerald.
Twelve of the tracks on this album were recorded in June 1972 and originally released on Fitzgerald's 1972 Atlantic album, Ella Loves Cole.
The leader of the Opposition in Prince Edward Island is a title traditionally held by the leader of the largest party not in government in the Legislative Assembly of Prince Edward Island.
This list is incompletePolitics of Prince Edward IslandPrince Edward Island politics-related listsPrince Edward Island
Victor Mordechai Goldschmidt (10 February 1853 in Mainz – 8 May 1933 in Salzburg) was a German mineralogist, natural philosopher, and art collector.
Life Born 1853 in Mainz, Goldschmidt attended the Bergakademie Freiberg in Saxony and graduated in engineering in 1874.
Harihara I, also called Hakka and Vira Harihara I, was the founder of the Vijayanagara Empire, which he ruled from 1336 to 1356 CE.
He and his successors formed the Sangama dynasty, the first of four dynasties to rule the empire.
Wilson Enrique Pérez Pérez (born August 9, 1967) is a retired Colombian football defender who was capped 47 times and scored 3 international goals for the Colombia national team between 1989 and 1997, including three matches at the 1994 World Cup.
Pérez started his professional playing career in 1985 with Atletico Junior, then was transferred to America de Cali where he was part of the successful team that won several championships.
Outside TV (formerly RSN Television) is a sports-oriented cable and satellite television network based on Outside magazine.
The network features programming related to various outdoor activities and the lives of those who engage in them.
Dartmouth East is a provincial electoral district in Nova Scotia, Canada, that elects one member of the Nova Scotia House of Assembly.
The riding is located in the community of Dartmouth, in the urban area of Halifax.
Oreochromis is a large genus of oreochromine cichlids, fishes endemic to Africa and the Middle East.
A few species from this genus have been introduced far outside their native range and are important in aquaculture.
Sarotherodon is a genus of oreochromine cichlids that are native to the northern half of Africa (south as far as the Congo River basin), with a single species, S. galilaeus, also ranging into the Levant.
A couple of species from this genus have been introduced far outside their native range, and are important in aquaculture (S. galilaeus and to a lesser degree S. melanotheron).
Fieni is a town in Dâmbovița County, Muntenia, Romania, on the Ialomița River, having a population of 6,378 as of 2021.
It administers two villages, Berevoești and Costești.
Dartmouth North is a provincial electoral district in Dartmouth, Nova Scotia, Canada, that elects one member of the Nova Scotia House of Assembly.
The district was created, under the name Dartmouth City North, in 1966 when Halifax County Dartmouth was divided into two electoral districts.
John Clifford, 9th Baron Clifford, 9th Lord of Skipton (8 April 1435 – 28 March 1461) was a Lancastrian military leader during the Wars of the Roses in England.
The Clifford family was one of the most prominent families among the northern English nobility of the fifteenth century, and by the marriages of his sisters, John Clifford had links to some very important families of the time, including the earls of Devon.
Shrigley  is a small village in County Down, Northern Ireland about a mile north-west of Killyleagh.
It is named after Pott Shrigley in Cheshire.
Kristina Šmigun-Vähi (born 23 February 1977) is a former Estonian female cross-country skier and politician.
She is the most successful Estonian female cross-country skier with two Olympic gold medals.
Digby—Annapolis is a provincial electoral district in  Nova Scotia, Canada which existed between 1993 and 2013 and since 2021.
It elects one member of the Nova Scotia House of Assembly.
Carlos Mario Hoyos Jaramillo (born February 28, 1962) is a football manager and retired football defender who was capped 24 times for Colombia between 1985 and 1990.
He was an unused substitute for the 1990 World Cup.
Hubert Jacob Paul Schoemaker (March 23, 1950 – January 1, 2006) was a Dutch biotechnologist.
He was a co-founder and the president of one of America's first biotechnology companies, Centocor, which was founded in 1979 for the commercialising of monoclonal antibodies.
José Fernando Santa Robledo (born September 12, 1970) is a retired football defender who played at international level for Colombia.
He played two matches at the 1998 FIFA World Cup, and his club at that time was Atlético Nacional.
James Steward Davis (born October 11, 1890 — disappeared on April 15, 1929) was an American lawyer and political activist in Baltimore, Maryland.
During the 1920s, Davis worked as a highly respected trial lawyer as well as a campaign organizer for W. Ashbie Hawkins, Al Smith, Herbert O'Conor and the Democratic Party in Maryland.
Shelburne is a provincial electoral district in Nova Scotia, Canada which existed between 1867 and 2013 and since 2021.
Since 2021 and between 1933 and 2013 it has elected one member to the Nova Scotia House of Assembly; from 1867 to 1933 it elected two members.
Melbourne Alexander Gass (December 21, 1938 – December 11, 2018) was a Canadian businessman and politician who served for 9 years as the Member of Parliament for Malpeque.
He served for two years as the leader of the Progressive Conservative Party of Prince Edward Island from 1988 to 1990, before leaving public life.
Timberlea—Prospect is a provincial electoral district in  Nova Scotia, Canada, that elects one member of the Nova Scotia House of Assembly.
Its Member of the Legislative Assembly (MLA) since 2013 has been Iain Rankin of the Nova Scotia Liberal Party.
Patricia Janet Mella ( MacDougal; born August 29, 1943) is a Canadian politician and former teacher.
Mella was Prince Edward Island Progressive Conservative Party (PC) leader from 1990 to 1996 and an elected member of the Legislative Assembly of Prince Edward Island from 1993 to 2003.
Colombia competed in the Summer Olympic Games for the first time at the 1932 Summer Olympics in Los Angeles, United States.
Two people traveled to represent Colombia, musician Emirto de Lima and marathon runner Jorge Perry.
John Davies, FLSW (25 April 1938 – 16 February 2015) was  a Welsh historian, and a television and radio broadcaster.
He attended university at Cardiff and Cambridge and taught Welsh at Aberystwyth.
John Evans, Baron Evans of Parkside (19 October 1930, Belfast – 5 March 2016, London) was a British politician who was a Labour Party Member of Parliament (MP).
A former shipyard worker and trade unionist, he served as a member of Hebburn urban district council from 1962 until 1974 (of which he was chairman from 1973 to 1974) and South Tyneside council from 1973 to 1974.
Ballylongford (historically Bealalongford, from ) is a village near Listowel in northern County Kerry, Ireland.
Geography
The history of the Socialist Workers Party begins with the formation of the Socialist Review Group in 1950, followed by the creation of the International Socialists in 1962 and continues through to the present day with the formation of the Socialist Workers Party in 1977.
OriginsThe SWP's origins lie in the Revolutionary Communist Party (RCP), which Tony Cliff joined on his arrival from the territory of Palestine where he had been the central leader of that region's small section of the Fourth International (FI).
Count Carl Gustaf Mannerheim (10 August 1797 – 9 October 1854) was a Finnish entomologist and governor of the Viipuri province in the Grand Duchy of Finland.
CareerFrom 1819 he served as the secretary to the Finnish Minister Secretary of State in Saint Petersburg.
The Kalmykian Cavalry Corps (; also known as: , , , Dr. Doll Kalmyk Formation (Dr. Doll was an alias of )) was a unit of about 5,000 ethnic Kalmyk volunteers who chose to join the German Army in 1942 rather than remain in Kalmykia as German forces retreated before the Red Army.
Stalin subsequently declared the Kalmyk population as a whole to be German collaborators in 1943 and ordered mass deportations to Siberia suffering great loss of life.
A carriel is a small leather satchel from Colombia.
They are similar in appearance to a saddlebag but worn over the shoulder, usually by men.
Paul Clinton (1953 – January 30, 2006) was an American film critic.
He served as CNN.com film critic for 20 years.
Maten al-Sahel (), also known as Maten Arnouk (), is a village in Tartus Governorate, northwestern SyriaOriginally named for the prominent Arnouk family land owners, the Syrian government renamed the village Maten al-Sahel, "Coast".
This village is located 280 km north-west of Damascus, near the Mediterranean coast.
The British North Borneo dollar was the currency of British North Borneo from 1882 to 1953.
It was subdivided into 100 cents.
The Reno-Sparks Convention Center is a convention center in the western United States, located in Reno, Nevada.
Opened  in 1965 as Centennial Coliseum, it hosted the Big Sky Conference basketball tournament  and also hosts boxing matches.
The Juno clump is a probable main-belt asteroid family that share similar orbital elements to 3 Juno.
3 Juno is a large asteroid with a mean diameter of about 235 km, but the remaining bodies are all small.
Bayat is a town of Afyonkarahisar Province in the Aegean region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Bayat District.
Gideon Alfred Rodan (June 14, 1934 – January 1, 2006) was a Romanian-born American biochemist and Doctor of Medicine.
Formative yearsRodan was born in Bucharest, Romania on June 14, 1934.
Başmakçı is a town of Afyonkarahisar Province in the Aegean region of Turkey, closer to Denizli than to the city of Afyon itself.
It is the seat of Başmakçı District.
Çay is a town of Afyonkarahisar Province in the Aegean region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Çay District.
Çobanlar (, Anabora) is a town of Afyonkarahisar Province in the Aegean region of Turkey.
It lies in a plain 25 km east of the city of Afyon.
Dazkırı is a town of Afyonkarahisar Province in the Aegean region of Turkey, 140 km from the city of Afyon on the road to Denizli.
It is the seat of Dazkırı District.
Hocalar is a town of Afyonkarahisar Province in the Aegean region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Hocalar District.
İhsaniye is a town of Afyonkarahisar Province in the Aegean region of Turkey.
It is the seat of İhsaniye District.
The Theosophical Society of New York was a theosophical organization, that separated in 1899 from the Theosophical Society in America.
It is not to be confused with "The New York Theosophical Society" founded in 1875, which is today a lodge of the American section of the Theosophical Society Adyar.
Albert Finch (16 May 1926 – 23 January 2003) was a British boxer from Croydon in South London, who was active from 1945 to 1958.
He fought as both a middleweight and light-heavyweight, becoming British middleweight champion in 1950.
İscehisar is a town of Afyonkarahisar Province in the Aegean region of Turkey, on the road between the city of Afyon and Ankara.
It is the seat of İscehisar District.
Mark David Frankel (13 June 1962 – 24 September 1996) was a British actor, known for his leading roles in the British film Leon the Pig Farmer and the American TV series Kindred: The Embraced.
Early life Frankel was born on 13 June 1962 in London, where he was raised.
Kızılören is a rural town of Afyonkarahisar Province, Turkey, 26 km from the towns of Sandıklı and Dinar, near the road to Ankara.
It is the seat of Kızılören District.
Sergei Aleksandrovich Buturlin (); 22 September 1872 in Montreux – 22 January 1938 in Moscow was a Russian ornithologist.
He was a pioneer in Russia of the study of the diversity of species and described more than 200 new species of bird.
Sinanpaşa (or Sincanlı) is a town of Afyonkarahisar Province, Turkey on a plain surrounded by pine-covered mountains, 33 km from the city of Afyon on the road to Uşak and İzmir.
It is the seat of Sinanpaşa District.
Sultandağı is a town of Afyonkarahisar Province in the Aegean region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Sultandağı District.
Şuhut (Ottoman Turkish شهود Şuhūd; formerly Ancient Greek Σύνναδα Synnada) is a town in Afyonkarahisar Province in the Aegean region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Şuhut District.
Buturlin, feminine: Buturlina () is a Russian surname of a Russian noble .
Notable people with this surname include: Alexander Buturlin (1694–1767), a Russian general Anna Artemevna Buturlina (1777–1854), Russian artist and noblewoman Alexander Buturlin (ice hockey) (born 1981), a Russian ice hockey player Dmitry Petrovich Buturlin (writer) (1790–1849), a Russian statesman and writer Elizabeth Divov born countess Buturlina (1762–1813), Russian courtier  Sergei Aleksandrovich Buturlin (1872–1938), a Russian ornithologist Vasili Buturlin (? – 1656), a Russian boyar and voyevodaRussian-language surnames
Enez is a town in Edirne Province, in East Thrace, Turkey.
The ancient name of the town was Ainos (), Latinised as Aenus.
Meriç is a town in Edirne Province, Turkey.
It is the seat of Meriç District.
Alucra is a town in Giresun Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey,  from the city of Giresun.
It is the seat of Alucra District.
Bulancak (Georgian: ბულანჩაკი) is a town in Giresun Province on the Black Sea coast of Turkey, near the city of Giresun.
Its former name is Terastios.
Kateřina Neumannová () (born 15 February 1973) is a Czech retired cross-country skier.
She won an Olympic gold medal in the 2006 Winter Olympics, in the 30 km freestyle event.
Çamoluk is a town in Giresun Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Çamoluk District.
Pieter van der Moere, also known as Brother Pedro de Gante or Pedro de Mura (c. 1480 – 1572) was a Franciscan missionary in sixteenth century Mexico.
Born in Geraardsbergen in present-day Belgium, he was of Flemish descent.
Çanakçı is a town in Giresun Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Çanakçı District.
Dereli is a town in Giresun Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Dereli District.
Doğankent is a town in Giresun Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Doğankent District.
Jagna Kinga Marczułajtis-Walczak (born 15 December 1978 in Zakopane) is a Polish politician and former snowboarder who competed in parallel slalom and parallel giant slalom.
Since November 2011, she has been a member of the Polish Sejm.Marczułajtis' best finishes in the World Cup in parallel slalom are two 1st places: in January 2006 in Nendaz and in January 2004 in Bad Gastein.
Espiye is a town in Giresun Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Espiye District.
PC-1 (Pacific Crossing 1) is a submarine telecommunications cable system in the North Pacific Ocean linking the United States to Japan.
It has landing points in:Shima, Mie Prefecture, JapanAjigaura, Hitachinaka, Ibaraki Prefecture, JapanHarbour Pointe, Snohomish County, Washington, United StatesGrover Beach, San Luis Obispo County, California, United StatesIt has a design transmission capacity of 640 Gbit/s, with 180 Gbit/s lit (as of February 2006), and a total cable length of 20,890 km.
Eynesil is a town in Giresun Province on the Black Sea coast of Turkey, east of the city of Giresun, towards Trabzon.
It is the seat of Eynesil District.
Görele is a town in Giresun Province on the Black Sea coast of eastern Turkey.
It is the seat of Görele District.
Güce is a town in Giresun Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Güce District.
Keşap is a town in Giresun Province on the Black Sea coast of Turkey just to the east of the city of Giresun.
It is the seat of Keşap District.
Piraziz is a town in Giresun Province on the Black Sea coast of Turkey.
It is the seat of Piraziz District.
Tirebolu (from the Greek word "Τρίπολις" meaning "three cities", named as such by its ancient Greek founders), is a town in Giresun Province, Turkey.
It is the seat of Tirebolu District.
Yağlıdere is a town in Giresun Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Yağlıdere District.
Staincross was a Wapentake (Hundred), which is an administrative division (or ancient district), in the historic county of the West Riding of Yorkshire.
It consisted of seven parishes, and included the towns of Barnsley and PenistoneHistoryStaincross was named after the village of Staincross and also included the parishes of Cawthorne, Darton, Felkirk, Hemsworth, High Hoyland, Penistone, Royston, Silkstone (including Barnsley) and Tankersley and parts of Darfield.
A swing-piston engine is a type of internal combustion engine in which the pistons move in a circular motion inside a ring-shaped "cylinder", moving closer and further from each other to provide compression and expansion.
Generally two sets of pistons are used, geared to move in a fixed relationship as they rotate around the cylinder.
The Farris Center is a 6,000-seat multi-purpose arena in Conway, Arkansas.
It was built in 1972.
The mylohyoid line is a bony ridge on the internal surface of the mandible.
It runs posterosuperiorly.
The William George Agency for Children's Services (formerly the George Junior Republic) is a non-profit residential treatment center for adolescent boys and girls in Freeville, New York, United States.
History William Reuben George founded a junior republic whose economic, civic, and social conditions reproduced those of the United States, and whose citizenship is vested in young people, especially those who were neglected or wayward.
This is a partial list of artificial objects left on extraterrestrial surfaces.
Artificial objects on VenusArtificial objects on the MoonArtificial objects on MarsArtificial objects on other extraterrestrial bodiesEstimated total masses of objectsGallerySee also Sample return mission and Moon rock List of archaeological sites beyond national boundaries List of artificial objects leaving the Solar System List of landings on extraterrestrial bodies Deliberate crash landings on extraterrestrial bodiesReferencesSpaceflightSpace listsExtra-terrestrial
Cool for August was a rock band consisting of notable Canadian singer-songwriter Shad Hills on guitar, Andrew Shives on bass, Gordon Vaughn on vocals, Trevor Kustiak on guitar, and Shane Hills on drums who was then replaced by Larry Voss in the spring of 2000.
They made their television debut on Late Night with Conan O'Brien with their hit song "Trials".
Charles Frédéric Dubois (28 May 1804 – 12 November 1867) was a Belgian naturalist.
He was the author of Planches colorées des oiseaux de l’Europe ("Color plates of the birds of Europe") and Catalogue systématique des Lépidoptères de la Belgique ("Systematic catalog of the Lepidoptera of Belgium"), which was completed by his son, Alphonse Joseph Charles Dubois (1839–1921), after his death.
Fadwa Tuqan (, also transliterated as Fadwa Tuqan, , ; 1917 – 12 December 2003), was a Palestinian poet known for her representations of resistance to Israeli occupation in contemporary Arab poetry.
Sometimes, she is referred to as the "Poet of Palestine".
A want, is something that is desired.
Want or The Want may also refer to:Arts, entertainment and mediaMusic  Want (3OH!3 album), 2008 Want (Rufus Wainwright album), 2005 Want (EP), by Lee Tae-min, 2019 "Want" (Natalie Imbruglia song), 2009 "Want!"
The Edgley EA-7 Optica is a British light aircraft designed for low-speed observation work, and intended as a low-cost alternative to helicopters.
The Optica has a loiter speed of 130 km/h (70 kn; 81 mph) and a stall speed of 108 km/h (58 kn; 67 mph).
Gibara () is a town and municipality of the Province of Holguín in the Republic of Cuba.
Gibara is the fourth largest town by population and the ninth by area in Holguín.
"Cygnet Committee" is a song written by David Bowie and recorded in 1969 for his second eponymous album (released in the U.S. as Man of Words, Man of Music and re-released in 1972 as Space Oddity).
At over 9 minutes this ambitious progressive folk rock song was Bowie's longest studio recording until the opening/title track of 1976's Station to Station.
Skyrack was a wapentake of the West Riding of Yorkshire, England.
It was split into upper and lower divisions and centred in Headingley, Leeds.
Dioon edule, the chestnut dioon, is a cycad native to Mexico, also known as palma de la virgen.
Cycads are among the oldest seed plants and even pre-date the dinosaurs.
Hassa is a municipality and district of Hatay Province, Turkey.
Its area is 520 km2, and its population is 56,675 (2022).
Kırıkhan is a municipality and district of Hatay Province, Turkey.
Its area is 715 km2, and its population is 121,028 (2022).
Kumlu is a municipality and district of Hatay Province, Turkey.
Its area is 193 km2, and its population is 13,333 (2022).
Reyhanlı (; , ar-Rayḥānīyah) is a municipality and district of Hatay Province, Turkey.
Its area is 367 km2, and its population is 108,092 (2022).
In Rataj's taxonomy Echinodorus ovalis is in Section Cordifolii, Subgenus Echinodorus.
It is related to Echinodorus cordifolius and listed by some authorities and importers as a synonym of that species, e.g. E. cordifolius 'ovalis'.
Grishk (; ), also spelled Gereshk, is the new name of Zamindawar which is named after the invasion the region by Nader Afshar army and given to Ghilji tribe in 18th century.
Grishk a town in Grishk District of Helmand province, geographically located along the Helmand River in Afghanistan, some  northwest of Kandahar, at  altitude.
Kurucaşile is a town in Bartın Province in the Black Sea Region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Kurucaşile District.
Ulus is a town in Bartın Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
The town continues the ancient Greek colony of Olous (Ωλους).
Balya is a municipality and district of Balıkesir Province, Turkey.
Its area is 797 km2, and its population is 12,451 (2022).
Glass cloth is a textile material woven from glass fiber yarn.
Home and gardenGlass cloth was originally developed to be used in greenhouse paneling, allowing sunlight's ultraviolet rays to be filtered out, while still allowing visible light through to plants.
Bigadiç is a municipality and district of Balıkesir Province, Turkey.
Its area is 1,108 km2, and its population is 48,917 (2022).
Burhaniye is a municipality and district of Balıkesir Province, Turkey.
Its area is 420 km2, and its population is 64,283 (2022).
Dursunbey, formerly Balat, is a municipality and district of Balıkesir Province, Turkey.
Its area is 1,719 km2, and its population is 33,333 (2022).
Wanna is a village and a municipality in the integrated municipality of Land Hadeln, Lower Saxony, Germany.
Wanna belongs to the Land of Hadeln, first an exclave of the younger Duchy of Saxony and after its de facto dynastic partition in 1296 of the Duchy of Saxe-Lauenburg, established de jure in 1260.
Sion Mills is a village to the south of Strabane in County Tyrone, Northern Ireland, on the River Mourne.
In the 2001 Census it had a population of 2,050 people.
Gömeç is a municipality and district of Balıkesir Province, Turkey.
Its area is 171 km2, and its population is 16,880 (2022).
Havran is a municipality and district of Balıkesir Province, Turkey.
Its area is 565 km2, and its population is 28,058 (2022).
Fabiola Campomanes Rojas (born 30 July 1972) is a Mexican actress.
BiographyCampomanes enrolled at the Centro de Educación Artística (CEA) run by Televisa.
İvrindi is a municipality and district of Balıkesir Province, Turkey.
Its area is 818 km2, and its population is 31,512 (2022).
Kepsut is a municipality and district of Balıkesir Province, Turkey.
Its area is 889 km2, and its population is 21,825 (2022).
Manyas is a municipality and district of Balıkesir Province, Turkey.
Its area is 634 km2, and its population is 18,066 (2022).
Mickey's Racing Adventure is a racing video game developed by Rare and published by Nintendo for the Game Boy Color in 1999.
It was followed by Mickey's Speedway USA in 2001.
Marmara is a municipality and district of Balıkesir Province, Turkey.
Its area is 134 km2, and its population is 10,601 (2022).
Savaştepe is a municipality and district of Balıkesir Province, Turkey.
Its area is 427 km2, and its population is 16,765 (2022).
Mickey's Speedway USA is a Disney racing game for the Nintendo 64 and Game Boy Color, developed by Rareware and published by Nintendo under license from Disney Interactive.
It is styled after other kart racers such as Mario Kart 64 and Diddy Kong Racing, and features characters from the Mickey Mouse universe racing across the United States.
Nannorrhops ritchiana, the Mazari palm, is the sole species in the genus Nannorrhops in the palm family Arecaceae.
DistributionIt is native to southwestern Asia, in the historical region of Balochistan, from the southeast of the Arabian Peninsula east through Iran and Afghanistan to Pakistan, growing at altitudes of up to 1,600 m.DescriptionIt is a shrub-like clumping palm, with several stems growing from a single base.
Osgoldcross was a wapentake of the West Riding of Yorkshire, England.
It included the parishes of Adlingfleet, Badsworth, Burghwallis, Campsall, Castleford, Darrington, Kellington, South Kirkby, Owston, Pontefract, Whitgift, Womersley, Ferry Fryston and parts of Featherstone, Snaith and Wragby.
Sean Slater is a fictional character from the BBC soap opera EastEnders, played by Robert Kazinsky, who made his first appearance on 22 August 2006.
Sean's existence was revealed on 9 December 2005 when his sister Stacey Slater (Lacey Turner) returns to Walford after their mother, Jean (Gillian Wright), attempts suicide.
A granule is a large particle or grain.
It can refer to: Granule (cell biology), any of several submicroscopic structures, some with explicable origins, others noted only as cell type-specific features of unknown function Azurophilic granule, a structure characteristic of the azurophil eukaryotic cell type Chromaffin granule, a structure characteristic of the chromophil eukaryotic cell type. Astrophysics and geology:
Fittja is a part of Botkyrka Municipality and the name of the Stockholm metro station in the area.
It was settled during the 1970s and consists mostly of rental apartments.
Disney's Magical Mirror Starring Mickey Mouse is a point-and-click adventure video game developed by Nintendo and Capcom and published by Nintendo for the GameCube and licensed from Disney.
GameplayThe game uses a simple point-and-click mechanic, similar to Pac-Man 2: The New Adventures, which involves using a cursor to guide Mickey Mouse to various locations.
Och may refer to: Och (spirit)
The ISO 639-3 language code for Old Chinese 6-oxocamphor hydrolase, an enzyme Och, alternative spelling of Uch, a city in Bahawalpur District, Pakistan John R. Oishei Children's Hospital, Buffalo, New York, United States Outram Community Hospital, a community hospital in Singapore
Agbrigg and Morley was a wapentake of the West Riding of Yorkshire, England.
The main purpose of the wapentake was the administration of justice by a local court.
Disney's Magical Quest is a Disney platform game trilogy released by Capcom.
The games star Mickey Mouse and (depending on the game version) either Minnie Mouse or Donald Duck, who must defeat Pete.
Arima Haruzumi (有馬 晴純, 1483 – March 19, 1566) was a Japanese feudal lord in the Sengoku period.
Biography Initially known as Arima Sadazumi, he held the title of Shuri-dayu and a position in the shobanshu, the private guard of the Shogun.
Aparecida do Rio Doce is a municipality in southwest Goiás state, Brazil.
GeographyThe municipality of Aparecida do Rio Doce belongs to the Sudoeste de Goiás Microregion and is 208 km.
Ekadashi () is the eleventh lunar day (tithi) of the waxing (Shukla Pakṣa) and waning (Kṛṣṇa Pakṣa) lunar cycles in a Vedic calendar month.
Ekadashi is popularly observed within Vaishnavism and Shaivism, two major paths within Sanatan Dharma.
The dollar was the currency of the Raj of Sarawak from 1858 to 1953.
It was subdivided into 100 cents.
John Alexander Mackie (23 February 1903 – June 1984) was an Irish footballer who played as a right-back for various clubs, including Arsenal and Portsmouth in the English Football League.
CareerBorn in Monkstown, County Antrim, Mackie started out at Monkstown and Forth River in Belfast, before being spotted by Arsenal in 1922.
Pooh's Heffalump Halloween Movie (also known as Pooh's Heffalump Halloween: The Movie) is a 2005 American direct-to-video animated fantasy adventure comedy film produced by Walt Disney Pictures and DisneyToon Studios, featuring the characters from Winnie the Pooh franchise
and it was the sequel to Pooh's Heffalump Movie.
Barkston Ash was a wapentake of the West Riding of Yorkshire, named after the meeting-place at the village of Barkston.
It included the parishes of Birkin, Bramham cum Oglethorpe, Brayton, Drax, Kirk Fenton, Ledsham, Monk Fryston, Saxton with Scarthingwell and Sherburn-in-Elmet and parts of Brotherton, Kirkby Wharfe, Ryther, Snaith and Tadcaster.
Fruängen (Wife Meadow) is a district of the Hägersten-Liljeholmen borough in Söderort, the southern suburban part of Stockholm.
It was built in the early 1950s.
Arto Kalevi Härkönen (born 31 January 1959, in Helsinki) is a retired Finnish javelin thrower.
He won the gold medal at the 1984 Summer Olympics, with a throw of 86.76 metres.
Tolfa is a town and comune of the Metropolitan City of Rome, in the Lazio region of central Italy; it lies to the ENE of Civitavecchia by road.
It is the main center in the Monti della Tolfa, an extinct volcanic group between Civitavecchia and the Lake of Bracciano.HistoryA town of medieval origin in the orbit of Viterbo, it was assumed into the Papal States and granted first to the Capocci family, and then to the Roman nobles Ludovico and Pietro Frangipani who walled the community.
Jalan Seremban-Kuala Pilah or Federal Route 51 is the main federal road in Negeri Sembilan, Malaysia, connecting Seremban to Kuala Pilah.
It is a relatively busy road in Negeri Sembilan.
Olle Adolphson (2 May 1934, in Stockholm – 10 March 2004, in Stockholm) was a Swedish writer, singer and songwriter.
He released a range of books (Aubade, Foliá), LPs (En stol på Tegnér, etc.) and CDs (Älskar inte jag dig då, Mässa på svenska språket, etc.).
Lauria is a town and comune of the province of Potenza, in Basilicata, southern Italy, situated near the borders of Calabria.
It is a walled, medieval town on the steep side of a hill, with another portion  of municipal territory in the plain below.
Lonely Runs Both Ways is the twelfth album by bluegrass music group Alison Krauss & Union Station, released November 23, 2004.
The album won the band three Grammy Awards in 2006, including Best Country Performance By a Duo or Group with Vocal for the song "Restless", Best Country Instrumental Performance for "Unionhouse Branch", and Best Country Album.
The Indian yellow-nosed albatross (Thalassarche carteri) is a member of the albatross family, and is the smallest of the mollymawks.
In 2004, BirdLife International split this species from the Atlantic yellow-nosed albatross; however Clements has not split it yet, and the SACC has not either, but recognises the need for a proposal.
Jalan Bukit Fraser 1 or Jalan Gap-Bukit Fraser, Federal Route 56, is a federal road in Fraser's Hill, both in Selangor and Pahang state, Malaysia.
Unlike most federal roads in Malaysia, Jalan Bukit Fraser is a single-lane federal road, which direction was used to be reversed hourly before the newer Jalan Bukit Fraser 2 route 148 was completed in 2001 for downhill traffic.
The Vata pagan uprising () was a Hungarian rebellion which, in 1046, brought about the overthrow of King Peter Urseolo, the martyrdom of Bishop Gerard of Csanád and the reinstatement of the Árpád dynasty on the Hungarian throne.
Background Christianity had been introduced in Hungary by the King Stephen I of Hungary.
Frederick (Noel) Wilse Bateson (1901 – 1978) was an English literary scholar and critic.
LifeBateson was born in Cheshire, and educated at Charterhouse and at Trinity College, Oxford, where he took a BA in English (second class), and then the B.Litt., which he completed in 1927.
This article is about the particular significance of the year 1999 to Wales and its people.
IncumbentsFirst Secretary - Alun Michael (from 12 May)Secretary of State for WalesAlun Michael (until 28 July)Paul MurphyArchbishop of WalesAlwyn Rice Jones, Bishop of St Asaph (retired)Rowan Williams, Bishop of Monmouth (elected)Archdruid of the National Eisteddfod of WalesDafydd Rowlands (outgoing)Meirion Evans (incoming)EventsJanuaryProtesting farmers blockade the north Wales headquarters of supermarket chain Iceland.
Lovere (Bergamasque: ) is a town and comune in the province of Bergamo, in Lombardy, northern Italy, at the northwest end of Lake Iseo.
The houses in the city have overhanging wooden roofs, typical of Switzerland, combined with the heavy stone arcades of Italy.
The HeS 30 (HeS - Heinkel Strahltriebwerke) was an early jet engine, originally designed by Adolf Müller at Junkers, but eventually built and tested at Heinkel.
It was possibly the best of the "Class I" engines, a class that included the more famous BMW 003 and Junkers Jumo 004.
Claro was a wapentake of the West Riding of Yorkshire, England.
It was split into two divisions.
Stewartstown is a village in Northern Ireland, close to the western shore of Lough Neagh, about  from Cookstown,  from Coalisland and  from Dungannon.
Established by Scottish Planters early in the 17th century, its population peaked before the Great Famine of the 1840s at over 1000.
The pharyngeal raphe is a raphe that serves as the origin and insertion for several of the pharyngeal constrictors (thyropharyngeal part of the inferior pharyngeal constrictor muscle, middle pharyngeal constrictor muscle, superior pharyngeal constrictor muscle).
Two sides of the pharyngeal wall are joined posteriorly in the midline by the raphe.
Loreto College is a Roman Catholic sixth form college in Hulme, Manchester, England, based on the educational philosophy of Mary Ward, a 16th-century nun, who founded the Institute of the Blessed Virgin Mary, the congregation of religious sisters who started the college in 1851.
Awards and achievements Loreto College was rated as "Outstanding in every respect" Ofsted 2010.
Francavilla Fontana (Francavillese:  ) is a town and comune (municipality) in the province of Brindisi and region of Apulia, in southern Italy.
It is also called the town of the "Imperiali", after the Imperiali, a family of feudal lords who ruled the town from the end of 16th century until the 18th century.
Michael J. Koenen (born July 13, 1982) is a former American football punter.
He was signed by the Atlanta Falcons as an undrafted free agent in 2005.
Kochanoor is a village in the Thrissur district of Kerala, South India, India.
It is situated near the village of Vadakkekad.
Reuven Feuerstein (; August 21, 1921 – April 29, 2014) was a Romanian-born Israeli clinical, developmental, and cognitive psychologist, known for his theory of intelligence which states “it is not ‘fixed’, but rather modifiable”.
Feuerstein is recognized for his work in developing the theories and applied systems of structural cognitive modifiability, mediated learning experience, cognitive map, deficient cognitive functions, learning propensity assessment device, instrumental enrichment programs, and shaping modifying environments.
The Theosophical Society in America (Hargrove branch) was an organization that developed from the Theosophical Society in America.
In 1895 a division occurred between the Theosophical Society Adyar and the Theosophical Society Pasadena, leading William Quan Judge to form a separate organization distinct from the organization based in Adyar, headed by Annie Besant.
Noli (;  ) is a coast comune of Liguria, Italy, in the Province of Savona, it is about  southwest of Genoa by rail, about  above sea-level.
The origin of the name may come from Neapolis, meaning "new city" in Greek.
Disney's Beauty and the Beast: A Board Game Adventure is a Disney Beauty and the Beast boardgame adventure for the Game Boy Color.
GameplayReception IGN gave the game a rating of 6.0 out of 10.
The World Series of Darts was a professional darts tournament held from 19 to 21 May 2006 at the Mohegan Sun Casino, in Uncasville, Connecticut.
It was the first and only edition of the competition, which was established by the Professional Darts Corporation (PDC) to capitalise on the potentially large North American market.
Salome Clausen is a Swiss pop music artist, best known for winning the 2005 second series of the music-based reality television show MusicStars.
Whilst part of MusicStars, Clausen topped the singles chart twice, and be part of three album releases (all of which made the Swiss album top 20).
Ralph Daniel Willard (born March 28, 1946) is an American former basketball coach.
He served as the head men's basketball coach at Western Kentucky University from 1990 to 1994, the University of Pittsburgh from 1994 to 1999, and the College of the Holy Cross from 1999 to 2009, compiling a career college basketball coaching record of 336–241.
Baesweiler () is a municipality in the district of Aachen, North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
Geography Baesweiler is located approximately 20 km north-east of Aachen.
is a three dimensional shoot 'em up developed by Polyphony Digital and Cyberhead for the PlayStation.
It was released in 1999 throughout Japan, North America, and Europe by Sony Computer Entertainment.
Paul C. Evans (born January 31, 1945) is a former American head coach of men's college basketball.
Paul Evans was noted for running a "power offense" with emphasis on distributing the ball through centers and power forwards.
Roetgen () is a municipality in the district of Aachen, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
Geography Roetgen is located approximately 16 km (10 mi) south-east of Aachen, near the border with Belgium.
Strathfoyle (from ) is a village in County Londonderry, Northern Ireland It is about  north east of Derry.
It was newly built in different phases between the late 1950s and the early 1960s, with many new recent additions to the village, including Westlake, Butler's Wharf and Old Fort.
The Theosophical Society Point Loma was based at the Theosophical community of Lomaland in the Point Loma district of San Diego, California from 1900 to 1942, and the international headquarters of a branch of the Theosophical Society from 1900 to 1942.
It moved to Covina in Los Angeles County in 1942 and was the branch's international headquarters to 1945, when it moved to Pasadena, California and became the Theosophical Society Pasadena, the branch's current international headquarters.
Leroy P. Chipman (April 24, 1939 – August 10, 1997) was an American basketball coach.
Chipman was the head coach at Hartwick.
Simmerath is a municipality in the district of Aachen, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 20 km south-east of Aachen, near the border to Belgium.
Glue Gun (briefly known as Glü Gun) is an American punk rock band that formed in Los Angeles in 1991 by The Grim's Bob Oedy, who is the lead singer and only constant member as of the band's reunion.
To date, the band has released two full-length studio albums.
Tim Grgurich (born June 10, 1942) is an American basketball coach.
Grgurich served as the head coach at his alma mater, the University of Pittsburgh, for 5 seasons in the mid to late 1970s.
Charles G. "Buzz" Ridl (June 27, 1920 – April 28, 1995) was an American college head coach of men's basketball born in the Pittsburgh suburb of Irwin, Pennsylvania.
He was the long-time coach at Westminster College in Pennsylvania, until 1968 when he was tapped for Division I by the Pittsburgh Panthers.
"Wild Eyed Boy from Freecloud" is a song written by David Bowie, first recorded in June 1969 and released as a B-side to his single "Space Oddity".
Bowie then rerecorded the song for his second eponymous album (released in the U.S. as Man of Words, Man of Music by Mercury and reissued by RCA in 1972 as Space Oddity).
A noise barrier (also called a soundwall, noise wall, sound berm, sound barrier, or acoustical barrier) is an exterior structure designed to protect inhabitants of sensitive land use areas from noise pollution.
Noise barriers are the most effective method of mitigating roadway, railway, and industrial noise sources – other than cessation of the source activity or use of source controls.
Robert Timmons (November 23, 1912 – April 29, 2004) was head coach of the University of Pittsburgh's men's basketball team, the Pittsburgh Panthers, from 1957 to 1968.
Timmons' win–loss record at Pittsburgh was 174–189 (.479).
Ahaus (; Westphalian: Ausen) is a town in the district of Borken in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located near the border with the Netherlands, lying some 20 km south-east of Enschede and 15 km south from Gronau.
Pagan Occult Distribution System Network (PODSnet) was a neopagan/occult computer network of Pagan Sysops and Sysops carrying Pagan/Magickal/Occult oriented echoes operating on an international basis, with FIDO Nodes in  Australia, Canada, Germany, the U.K., and across the USA.
PODSnet grew rapidly, and at its height, was the largest privately distributed network of Pagans, Occultists, and other people of an esoteric bent on this planet.
The Canadian Geophysical Union (French: Union géophysique canadienne) (CGU) began as a society dedicated to the scientific study of the solid earth and has evolved into one that is concerned with all aspects of the physical study of Earth and its space environment, including the Sun and solar system.
To express this broader vision of the geophysical sciences, the Union has adopted a sectional structure that allows individual sections to function as semi-autonomous entities.
In human genetics, the Atlantic modal haplotype (AMH) or haplotype 15 is a Y chromosome haplotype of Y-STR microsatellite variations, associated with the Haplogroup R1b.
It was discovered prior to many of the SNPs now used to identify subclades of R1b and references to it can be found in some of the older literature.
"Behind the Sun" is a song by the Red Hot Chili Peppers from their 1987 album, The Uplift Mofo Party Plan although was not released as a single until 1992 when it was used to promote the band's What Hits!?
compilation album.
Cahir Healy (2 December 1877 – 8 February 1970) was an Irish politician.
BackgroundBorn in Mountcharles in County Donegal, Ireland he became a journalist working on various local papers.
The A-91 is a bullpup assault rifle developed during the 1990s by KBP Instrument Design Bureau in Tula, Soviet Union as an offspring of the 9A-91 firearm family.
DesignThe A-91 retains the simple gas-operated, rotating bolt action and a trigger unit design from the 9A-91, it features a bullpup polymer housing, with an integral 40 mm single-shot grenade launcher mounted under the barrel.
Gescher is a municipality in the district of Borken, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located near the border with the Netherlands.
Killer Condom () is a 1996 comedy horror film directed by  from a screenplay he co-wrote with Ralf König, based on the comic books Kondom des Grauens and Bis auf die Knochen (Down to the Bones) by König.
It was distributed in the United States by Troma Entertainment, which promoted the film at the Cannes Film Festival with the help of "a six-foot-long fanged condom".
In human anatomy, the facial skeleton of the skull the external surface of the mandible is marked in the median line by a faint ridge, indicating the mandibular symphysis (Latin: symphysis menti) or line of junction where the two lateral halves of the mandible typically fuse at an early period of life (1-2 years).
It is not a true symphysis as there is no cartilage between the two sides of the mandible.
The Best of Judas Priest: Living After Midnight is a compilation album of Judas Priest's hits, dating from their 1978 album Killing Machine (Hell Bent for Leather in the United States) through Painkiller (1990).
This album was released in 1997.
"Jungle Man" is a song by the American rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers from their 1985 album, Freaky Styley.
It was released as the album's first single, however failed to chart.
Brentry is a suburb of north Bristol, England, between Henbury and Southmead which is spread along the southern edge of the Filton to Avonmouth railway line.
DescriptionThe boundaries of Brentry are not well defined.
Langwathby is a village and civil parish in northern Cumbria, and in the historic English county of Cumberland, about  north east of Penrith on the A686 road.
The village lies on the east bank of the River Eden.
Gronau (; officially Gronau (Westf.), is a town in the district of Borken in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located near the border with the Netherlands, approx.
Giulio Aristide Sartorio (11 February 1860 – 3 October 1932) was an Italian painter and film director from Rome.
BiographyHaving attended the Rome Institute of Fine Arts, Sartorio presented a Symbolist work at the 1883 International Exposition of Rome.
In number theory, Li's criterion is a particular statement about the positivity of a certain sequence that is equivalent to the Riemann hypothesis.
The criterion is named after Xian-Jin Li, who presented it in 1997.
The Millennium Commission, a United Kingdom public body, was set up to celebrate the turn of the millennium.
It used funding raised through the UK National Lottery to assist communities in marking the close of the second millennium and celebrating the start of the third.
Tickford is an automobile engineering and testing business in Newport Pagnell, Buckinghamshire, known for tuning and such products as the 140 mph Tickford Turbo Capri.
Under the name Salmons & Sons and their Tickford products the firm has an almost two century-long history of coachbuilding.
100% Arabica (1997) is a French comedy movie, directed by , starring Khaled, and Cheb Mami.
Cast Khaled Cheb MamiExternal links  French comedy films1997 films1997 comedy filmsFrench independent films1997 independent filmsFilms about Islam1990s French-language films1990s French films
Kevin Stadler (born February 5, 1980) is an American professional golfer who plays on the PGA Tour and formerly on the European Tour.
Early lifeStadler, the son of former Masters champion and 13-time PGA Tour winner Craig Stadler (known affectionately by pros and fans as The Walrus)  and Susan Barrett, was born in Reno, Nevada.
Blue Arrow Limited is a United Kingdom based employment and recruitment agency that places individual jobseekers in temporary and/or permanent catering, driving industrial and office roles across the hospitality, manufacturing, public service, retail, support services and transport sectors.
The head office is in Luton, Bedfordshire.
Isselburg () is a town in the district of Borken, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located on the river Issel, near the border of the Netherlands, and approximately 10 km west of Bocholt.
Thomas Henry Tibbles (May 22, 1840 – May 14, 1928) was an abolitionist, author, journalist, Indians’ rights activist, and politician who was born in Ohio and lived in various other places in the United States, especially Nebraska.
Tibbles played an important role in the trial of Standing Bear, a legal battle which led to the liberation of the Ponca tribe from the Indian territory in Oklahoma in the year 1879.
The Mineralogical Society of America (MSA) is a scientific membership organization.
MSA was founded in 1919 for the advancement of mineralogy, crystallography, geochemistry, and petrology, and promotion of their uses in other sciences, industry, and the arts.
Diabolical Fullmoon Mysticism is the debut studio album by Norwegian black metal band Immortal.
It was released on 1 July 1992 through Osmose Productions.
Holding Hands, Feeding Ducks is the first full-length album released by twee pop group the Brunettes.
It was released in 2002 as a joint release between Lil' Chief Records and EMI New Zealand.
Rhede () is a municipality in the district of Borken in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located near the border with the Netherlands, approximately  east of Bocholt.
The North Shore Channel is a drainage canal built between 1907 and 1910 to flush the sewage-filled North Branch of the Chicago River down the Chicago Sanitary and Ship Canal.
The sewage carrying duty has been largely taken over by the Chicago Deep Tunnel, but there are still occasional discharges due to heavy rains.
Pen Park Hole is a large cavern situated underground, at the edge of Filton Golf Course.
The cavern was discovered accidentally in the 17th century and the first descent was made by Captain Sturmy in 1669.
By Royal Command  is the fifth novel in the Young Bond series depicting Ian Fleming's superspy James Bond as a teenager in the 1930s.
The novel, written by Charlie Higson, takes place in 1934 and see James at the age of fourteen.
Manulife Place is a highrise office building and shopping mall in Edmonton, Alberta, Canada.
It was completed in 1983 and designed by Clifford Lawrie Bolton Ritchie Architects.
What We Do Is Secret is a novel by Thorn Kief Hillsbery, published by Villard in 2005.
What We Do Is Secret takes place in Los Angeles in 1981, six months after the death of Darby Crash (lead singer of the Germs).
Heek is a municipality in the district of Borken, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located near the border with the Netherlands, approx.
Israeli wine is produced by hundreds of wineries, ranging in size from small boutique enterprises to large companies producing over ten million bottles per year.
Wine has been produced in the Land of Israel since biblical times.
Guilty Bystander is a 1950 American crime drama directed by Joseph Lerner, and starring Zachary Scott and Faye Emerson.
The film was shot on location entirely in New York City.
Pure Holocaust is the second album by Norwegian black metal band Immortal.
It was released on November 1, 1993, on Osmose Productions.
Robert Nathan Mathis (born February 26, 1981) is an American former professional football player who spent his entire 14-year career as a defensive end and linebacker with the Indianapolis Colts of the National Football League (NFL).
He played college football for the Alabama A&M Bulldogs and was selected by the Colts in the fifth round of the 2003 NFL Draft.
Paul Anthony Linwood (born 24 October 1983) is an English former professional footballer who played as a central defender.
He has previously played professionally in the Football League for Tranmere Rovers, Wrexham, Chester City and Grimsby Town and in the Cymru Premier for Connah's Quay Nomads.
The Strays of York is a collective name for four areas of open land, comprising in all over , within the City of York.
Their individual names are Bootham Stray, Micklegate Stray (which includes the Knavesmire and Hob Moor), Monk Stray and Walmgate Stray.
Ambitle is a volcanic island which, together with Babase, another volcanic island, is one of the two Feni Islands in the Bismarck Archipelago.
The island is located within the Papua New Guinea's New Ireland Province, to the east of the island of New Ireland.
Heiden is a municipality in the district of Borken in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 5 km east of Borken.
America is a monthly Catholic magazine published by the Jesuits of the United States and headquartered in midtown Manhattan.
It contains news and opinion about Catholicism and how it relates to American politics and cultural life.
The red-crowned amazon (Amazona viridigenalis), also known as the red-crowned parrot, green-cheeked amazon or Mexican red-headed parrot, is an endangered amazon parrot native to northeastern Mexico and possibly southern Texas in the United States.
A 1994 study estimated wild populations of between 2,000 and 4,300 mature individuals; the IUCN Red List considers it a globally endangered species with a decreasing population.
The Catholic Church in Afghanistan is part of the worldwide Catholic Church.
Prior to August 2021, there were very few Catholics in this overwhelmingly Muslim country—just over 200 attend Mass in its only chapel—and freedom of religion has been difficult to obtain in recent times, especially under the new Taliban-led Afghan government.
Clair-obscur () is a 2000 album by Françoise Hardy, released in France in May 2000 on LP and CD, Virgin France S.A. (7243 8 492031 9) and (7243 8 492032 6).
Track listing "Puisque vous partez en voyage" (Mireille, Jean Nohain) duet with Jacques Dutronc "Tous mes souvenirs me tuent (Tears)" (Stéphane Grappelli, Django Reinhardt, F. Hardy)
Dino Seremet (born 16 August 1980) is a retired Slovenian footballer.
CareerSeremet also spent loan spells at Tranmere Rovers and Doncaster Rovers, while contracted to Luton Town
Legden (; Westphalian: Ledden) is a municipality in the district of Borken, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located between Ahaus and Coesfeld.
Cuba Cola is a cola-flavoured soft drink produced in Sweden, bottled by Saturnus AB.
It was introduced to the market in the summer of 1953 soon after cola drinks had become legal in Sweden, beating Coca-Cola by three months in Sweden.
The United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland competed as Great Britain at the 1964 Winter Olympics in Innsbruck, Austria.
British luger Kazimierz Kay-Skrzypecki was killed on the Olympic course two weeks before the games.
Banaz is a town in Uşak Province in the inner Aegean region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Banaz District.
Welsh Americans () are an American ethnic group whose ancestry originates wholly or partly in Wales, United Kingdom.
In the 2008 U.S. Census community survey, an estimated 1.98 million Americans had Welsh ancestry, 0.6% of the total U.S. population.
Karahallı is a town in Uşak Province in the inner Aegean region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Karahallı District.
Sivaslı, formerly known as Sebaste () is a town in Uşak Province in the inner Aegean region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Sivaslı District.
Ulubey, formerly Göbek, is a town in Uşak Province in the inner Aegean Region of  Turkey.
It is the seat of Ulubey District.
Raesfeld () is a municipality in the district of Borken in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 10 km south of Borken and 30 km east of the Dutch border.
Weetabix is a breakfast cereal produced by Weetabix Limited in the United Kingdom.
It comes in the form of palm-sized (approx.
Resisting arrest, or simply resisting, is an illegal act of a suspected criminal either fleeing, threatening, assaulting, or providing a fake ID to a police officer during arrest.
In most cases, the person responsible for resisting arrest is criminally charged or taken to court.
Başçiftlik is a town in Tokat Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Başçiftlik District.
Erbaa is a town in Tokat Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Erbaa District.
Staincliffe, also known as Staincliff, was a wapentake of the West Riding of Yorkshire, England.
The wapentake was named from a place called Staincliffe, now lost, in Bank Newton, not to be confused with Staincliffe near Dewsbury.
Pazar is a town in Tokat Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Pazar District.
Sulusaray or Çiftlik, in Antiquity and the early Middle Ages known as Sebastopolis () or Heracleopolis (), is a town in Tokat Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Sulusaray District.
The Bristol 400 is a luxury car produced by the Bristol Aeroplane Company of Great Britain, its first.
After World War II in 1947, BAC decided to diversify and formed a car division, which would later be the Bristol Cars company in its own right.
Turhal is a city in Tokat Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Turhal District.
Reken is a municipality in the district of Borken, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 15 km east of Borken.
Yeşilyurt is a town in Tokat Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Yeşilyurt District.
Robert Culp Stalnaker (born 1940) is an American philosopher who is Laurance S. Rockefeller Professor Emeritus of Philosophy at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.
He is a Fellow of the American Academy of Arts and Sciences and a Corresponding Fellow of the British Academy.
Andrew W. Marlowe (sometimes Andrew Marlowe) is an American screenwriter.
Marlowe is best known for being the creator of, a executive producer of, and a writer on Castle, a crime mystery and comedy-drama TV show, that ran on ABC from 2009 to 2016, starring Nathan Fillion in the eponymous role.
Ardeşen (Laz and Georgian: არტაშენი/Art'asheni or არდაშენი/Ardasheni; Armenian: Արտաշեն/Artashen) is a town in Rize Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey,  along the coast road from the city of Rize.
It is the seat of Ardeşen District.
Çamlıhemşin, formerly Vice, ( Vija  or ვიჯე Vije ;  Vija ) is a small town in Rize Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey.
It is the seat of Çamlıhemşin District.
Samuel Edward Thomas Baldock (born 15 March 1989) is an English former professional footballer who last played as a striker for Oxford United.
He also played for Milton Keynes Dons, West Ham United, Bristol City, Brighton & Hove Albion, Reading, Derby County and made two appearances for England U20.
A national Internet registry (or NIR) is an organization under the umbrella of a regional Internet registry with the task of coordinating IP address allocations and other Internet resource management functions at a national level within a country or economic unit.
NIRs operate primarily in the Asia Pacific region, under the authority of APNIC, the regional Internet registry for that region.
Derepazarı is a town in Rize Province on the Black Sea coast of Turkey between the cities of Rize and Trabzon, 8 km west of the city of Rize.
It is the seat of Derepazarı District.
Güneysu is a town in Rize Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey, inland from the city of Rize.
It is the seat of Güneysu District.
İyidere is a town in Rize Province on the Black Sea coast of north-eastern Turkey, 14 km from the city of Rize.
It is the seat of İyidere District.
Schöppingen is a municipality in the district of Borken in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately  south-west of Steinfurt.
Chelwood is a small village and civil parish in Somerset, England, and is in the affluent Chew Valley in the Bath and North East Somerset council area, about  from Bristol and Bath.
The parish, which includes the hamlets of West Chelwood and Breach, has a population of 148.
Pazar (Laz and Georgian: ათინა, Atina; ) is a town in Rize Province in the Black Sea region of Turkey, 37 km east of the city of Rize.
It is the seat of Pazar District.
Gamalost (also Gammelost, Gammalost) is a traditional Norwegian   cheese.
HistoryGamalost, which translates as old cheese, was once a staple of the Norwegian diet.
Südlohn is a municipality in the district of Borken in the northwestern part of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located right at the border with the Netherlands, approx.
Battles in the North is the third studio album by Norwegian black metal band Immortal.
It was released on May 15, 1995 through Osmose Productions.
Bozdoğan is a municipality and district of Aydın Province, Turkey.
Its area is 859 km2, and its population is 32,607 (2022).
Çine is a municipality and district of Aydın Province, Turkey.
Its area is 820 km2, and its population is 48,466 (2022).
İncirliova is a municipality and district of Aydın Province, Turkey.
Its area is 188 km2, and its population is 55,848 (2022).
Karacasu is a municipality and district of Aydın Province, Turkey.
Its area is 727 km2, and its population is 17,620 (2022).
Karpuzlu is a municipality and district of Aydın Province, Turkey.
Its area is 286 km2, and its population is 10,590 (2022).
Koçarlı is a municipality and district of Aydın Province, Turkey.
Its area is 455 km2, and its population is 21,832 (2022).
Köşk is a municipality and district of Aydın Province, Turkey.
Its area is 187 km2, and its population is 28,235 (2022).
Kuyucak is a municipality and district of Aydın Province, Turkey.
Its area is 544 km2, and its population is 26,111 (2022).
Red yeast rice (), red rice koji (べにこうじ, lit.
'red koji'), red fermented rice, red kojic rice, red koji rice, anka, or angkak, is a bright reddish purple fermented rice, which acquires its color from being cultivated with the mold Monascus purpureus.
West Harptree is a small village and civil parish in the Chew Valley, Somerset within the unitary district of Bath and North East Somerset.
The parish has a population of 439.
Bluna is an orange soft drink produced by the German Mineralbrunnen Überkingen-Teinach AG, the same company, which produces the better-known Afri-Cola, since 1994.
In 1952, the company F. Blumhoffer Nachfolger GmbH started to produce Bluna.
Kalkar ( is a municipality in the district of Kleve, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located near the Rhine, approx.
Tom Sayers (15 or 25 May 18268 November 1865) was an English bare-knuckle prize fighter.
There were no formal weight divisions at the time, and although Sayers was only five feet eight inches tall and never weighed much more than 150 pounds, he frequently fought much bigger men.
Bartter syndrome (BS) is a rare inherited disease characterised by a defect in the thick ascending limb of the loop of Henle, which results in low potassium levels (hypokalemia), increased blood pH (alkalosis), and normal to low blood pressure.
There are two types of Bartter syndrome: neonatal and classic.
Perthshire was a Scottish county constituency of the House of Commons of the Parliament of Great Britain from 1708 to 1801 and of the Parliament of the United Kingdom from 1801 until 1885, representing a seat for one Member of Parliament (MP).
CreationThe British parliamentary constituency was created in 1708 following the Acts of Union, 1707 and replaced the former Parliament of Scotland shire constituency of Perthshire.
The Ice Harvest is the debut novel of Scott Phillips.
The story, set in 1979, was published to wide acclaim in 2000.
Major Thomas "Robin" Valerian Dixon, 3rd Baron Glentoran,  (born 21 April 1935), is a former British bobsledder and Northern Irish politician, known as Robin Dixon.
He is a former Conservative Party Shadow Minister for the Olympics.
New York State Route 210 (NY 210) is a state highway in Orange County, New York, in the United States.
It runs north from the New Jersey state line—where it continues south as Passaic County Route 511 (CR 511)—along the west shore of Greenwood Lake to the eponymous village of Greenwood Lake, where it ends at a junction with NY 17A.
Rees is a town in the district of Kleve in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located on the right bank of the Rhine, approximately 20 km east of Kleve.
Dazhou () is a prefecture-level city in the northeast corner of Sichuan province, China, bordering Shaanxi to the north and Chongqing to the east and south.
As of 2020 census, Dazhou was home to 5,385,422 inhabitants whom 1,850,869 lived in the built-up (or metro) area made of 2 urban districts.
Straelen (; Low Rhenish: Strale) is a municipality in the district of Cleves, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located near the border with the Netherlands, approx.
Tadeo Gomez was a worker at Fender Musical Instrument Manufacturing Company in Fullerton, California in the 1950s.
He has become famous amongst players and collectors of electric guitars for the high quality of his work and his habit of signing his name or initials on the guitars he helped to craft.
The Mill at Sonning is a theatre and restaurant (or dinner theater), converted from a circa-1800 flour mill on earlier foundations, on an island in the River Thames at Sonning Eye in the English county of Berkshire.
The river divides into three, with the mill race forming the middle branch, spanned by one of the Sonning Backwater Bridges just downstream of the mill.
Evandro Serafim Lobo Chagas (August 10, 1905 – November 8, 1940) the eldest son of Carlos Chagas (1879-1934), noted physician and scientist who discovered Chagas disease, and brother of Carlos Chagas Filho (1910-2000), also a noted physician and scientist who was president of the Pontifical Academy of Sciences.
In 1926 Evandro Chagas got diploma from the Faculty of Medicine of Rio de Janeiro and made residence at Hospital São Francisco de Assis and at Hospital Oswaldo Cruz.
Bedburg-Hau is a municipality in the district of Kleve in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 5 km south-east of Kleve.
In Canada, a party whip is the member of a political party in the House of Commons of Canada, the Senate of Canada or a provincial legislative assembly charged with ensuring party discipline among members of that party's caucus.
The whip is also responsible for assigning offices and scheduling speakers from his or her party for various bills, motions and other proceedings in the legislature.
Washington is a closed "L" station on the CTA's Red Line.
It was a subway station in the State Street Subway located at 128 North State Street in the Loop.HistoryStructure
Issum is a municipality in the district of Kleve, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately  east of Geldern.
William Brace (23 September 1865 – 12 October 1947) was a Welsh trade unionist and Liberal and Labour politician.
Early life and careerBorn in Risca, in the coal-mining district of Monmouthshire, he was one of six children of Thomas and Anne Brace.
Kerken with the towns of Aldekerk, Eyll, Nieukerk and Stenden, is a municipality in the district of Kleve in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located near the border with the Netherlands, approx.
Gemeinlebarn is an Austrian village in the community of Traismauer in the district of Sankt Pölten-Land, Lower Austria.
Its population is about 1000 inhabitants.
The Heavy Tank M6 was an American heavy tank designed during World War II.
The tank was produced in small numbers and never saw combat.
Kranenburg is a town and municipality in the district of Cleves in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located near the border with the Netherlands,  south-east of Nijmegen and  west of Cleves.
A cigarette tax stamp is any adhesive stamp, metered stamp, heat transfer stamp, or other form or evidence of payment of a cigarette tax.
A cigarette tax stamp is a specific example of a revenue stamp.
Newspapers in Kuwait are published in English, French and Urdu, in addition to Arabic.
the publishing reach the peak at 2009 there were 14 Arabic dailies, three English dailies and a dozens weekly newspapers in Kuwait.
Auxiliary Power's Demolition Derby and Figure 8 Race is a PC demolition derby and figure 8 racing game.
The game was developed by John C. Ardussi with the help of real demolition derby drivers and officials.
William Hugh Albright (October 20, 1944 – September 17, 1998) was an American composer, pianist and organist.
Biography Albright was born in Gary, Indiana, and began learning the piano at the age of five, and attended the Juilliard Preparatory Department (1959–62), the Eastman School of Music (1962–63) and the University of Michigan (1962–70), where he studied composition with Ross Lee Finney and George Rochberg, and organ with Marilyn Mason.
Rheurdt () is a municipality in the district of Cleves, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately  west of Moers.
PKP class OKl27 is a class of ordinary passenger (O) tank (K) 2-6-2 (l) steam locomotives designed in 1927 for Polskie Koleje Państwowe (Polish State Railways, PKP).
It was the first completely Polish construction.
Music from Macbeth is a 1972 album by the Third Ear Band.
It consists of the soundtrack from Roman Polanski's 1971 film Macbeth, an adaptation  of Shakespeare's The Tragedy of Macbeth.
"Timescape" is the 151st episode of the American science fiction television series Star Trek: The Next Generation, and the 25th episode of the sixth season.
Set in the 24th century, the series follows the adventures of the Starfleet crew of the Federation starship Enterprise-D.In this episode, Captain Picard, Counselor Troi, Chief Engineer La Forge and Lt. Commander Data must save the Enterprise, which they find frozen in an explosion of time, taking weapons fire from an also-frozen Romulan Warbird.
The Physiological Society, founded in 1876, is a learned society for physiologists in the United Kingdom.
HistoryThe Physiological Society was founded in 1876 as a dining society "for mutual benefit and protection" by a group of 19 physiologists, led by John Burdon Sanderson and Michael Foster, as a result of the 1875 Royal Commission on Vivisection and the subsequent 1876 Cruelty to Animals Act.
The American Student Government Association (ASGA) was founded in 2001 as a professional association for collegiate student governments and student government associations across the United States.
History ASGA was founded by Oxendine Publishing, Inc., which published Student Leader magazine, books, and web sites on student leadership.
Below is a list of newspapers in the Netherlands.
Newspapers in the Netherlands are issued every day, with the exception of Sunday and some general holidays.
The coat of arms of the Turks and Caicos Islands consists of a gold-coloured escutcheon (shield) charged with a conch shell, lobster and a cactus, supported by two flamingos, and topped with a pelican in the crest.
Adopted three years after the islands became a Crown colony, it has been the coat of arms of the Turks and Caicos Islands since 1965.
Riaumont  (literally meaning "royal mountain") is located on the hill of Riaumont, in the commune of Liévin, in the Pas-de-Calais département in northern France, in the former province of Artois.
It refers to a Benedictine monastic community, a children's residential village, and a Scout group.
FC Triesen is a Liechtensteiner football club that plays in Triesen.
It is one of the seven official teams in the nation, and it plays in the Swiss Football League in 3.
Fussball Club Triesenberg is a Liechtensteiner amateur football team that plays in Triesenberg, Liechtenstein.
It is one of the seven official teams in the nation.
Billerbeck (Westphalian: Billerbiëk) is a municipality in the district of Coesfeld in North Rhine-Westphalia in Germany.
GeographyNeighbor towns/citiesBillerbeck has boundaries to Rosendahl, Laer, Altenberge, Havixbeck, Nottuln and Coesfeld.
FC Schaan is a Liechtensteiner professional football team that plays in Schaan.
The reserve team is called FC Azzurri Schaan.
The Signature at MGM Grand is a condo-hotel at the MGM Grand resort in Paradise, Nevada, near the Las Vegas Strip.
It consists of three towers, each 38 stories in height, with a total of 1,728 units.
FC Ruggell is a Liechtensteiner amateur football (soccer) team that plays in Ruggell.
They currently play in the Swiss Football League, in 2.
Renfrewshire was a county constituency of the House of Commons of the Parliament of Great Britain from 1708 until 1801 and of the Parliament of the United Kingdom from 1801 to 1885.
CreationThe British parliamentary constituency was created in 1708 following the Acts of Union, 1707 and replaced the former Parliament of Scotland shire constituency of Renfrewshire.
Preobrazhenskoye Cemetery (, lit.
Transfiguration Cemetery) is a cemetery in the eastern part of Moscow long associated with Old Believers.
Alone (, meaning "Alone") is a Soviet film released in 1931.
It was written and directed by Grigori Kozintsev and Leonid Trauberg.
Jacob Nielsen (died about 1309) was count of Northern Halland and a great-grandson of Valdemar II of Denmark.
His father (Niels Nielsen) and grandfather (Niels Valdemarsen) had both held Halland as a county before him.
George Henry Roberts (27 July 1868 – 25 April 1928) was a Labour Party politician who switched parties twice.
BiographyHe was born on 27 July 1868.
USV Eschen/Mauren is a Liechtensteiner football club from Eschen and Mauren.
They play at the Sportpark Eschen-Mauren, which used to be the national football stadium, until the Rheinpark Stadion in Vaduz was built.
Sir Nicholas John Shackleton  (23 June 1937 – 24 January 2006) was an English geologist and paleoclimatologist who specialised in the Quaternary Period.
He was the son of the distinguished field geologist Robert Millner Shackleton and great-nephew of the explorer Ernest Shackleton.
The French Horn at Sonning is a hotel and restaurant on the banks of the River Thames next to the Sonning Backwater Bridges, at Sonning Eye, Oxfordshire, England.
The hotel includes a number of riverside cottages that are now used as rooms for hotel clients.
Michael Shackleford, (May 23, 1965 in Pasadena, California, United States), also known as "The Wizard of Odds" (a title taken from Donald Angelini), is an American mathematician and an actuary.
He is best known for his professional analysis of the mathematics of the casino games.
Glenealy is one of the few roads or streets without a suffix in Hong Kong.
Located in the Mid-Levels on the Hong Kong Island, Hong Kong, it starts from Ice House Street and goes uphill to Hong Kong Zoological and Botanical Gardens, across Robinson Road and ends at Hornsey Road and Conduit Road.
In mathematics, a -system (or pi-system) on a set  is a collection  of certain subsets of  such that  is non-empty.
If  then That is,  is a non-empty family of subsets of  that is closed under non-empty finite intersections.
FC Balzers is a Liechtensteiner football team based in Balzers.
They currently compete in the  Swiss 1.
Lüdinghausen (Westphalian: Lünkhusen or Lünksel) is a town in district of Coesfeld in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located on the Dortmund-Ems Canal, approx.
Pariyaram is a Grama Panchayat consisting of two  villages viz.
Pariyaram census town and Kuttiyeri village.
USS Gerald R. Ford (CVN-78) is an aircraft carrier for the United States Navy and the lead ship of her class.
The ship is named after the 38th President of the United States, Gerald Ford, whose World War II naval service included combat duty aboard the light aircraft carrier  in the Pacific Theater.
Gulf Coast High School is a public high school located in North Naples, Florida about  from Naples, Florida.
The school opened in August 1998 and is part of the District School Board of Collier County.
Mathias Erik Tjärnqvist (born April 15, 1979, in Umeå, Sweden) is a former professional ice hockey forward.
His older brother, Daniel Tjärnqvist, was a defenceman for Djurgårdens IF.
Fereydun (, , ; New Persian: , Fereydūn/Farīdūn) is an Iranian mythical king and hero from the Pishdadian dynasty.
He is known as an emblem of victory, justice, and generosity in Persian literature.
USS John F. Kennedy (CVN-79) is the second  built for the United States Navy.
The ship  was launched on 29 October 2019, and christened on 7 December 2019.
Toxicodendron rydbergii, the western poison ivy or northern poison oak, is a species of Toxicodendron in the cashew family native to North America.
Description Unlike Toxicodendron radicans (eastern poison ivy), which often appears as a trailing or climbing vine, Toxicodendron rydbergii is a shrub that can grow to 1 m (3 ft) tall, rarely up to 3 m (10 ft).
Refunding occurs when an entity that has issued callable bonds calls those debt securities from the debt holders with the express purpose of reissuing new debt at a lower coupon rate.
In essence, the issue of new, lower-interest debt allows the company to prematurely refund the older, higher-interest debt.
Ernest Cosmos Quigley (March 22, 1880 – December 10, 1960) was a Canadian-born American sports official who became notable both as a basketball referee and as an umpire in Major League Baseball.
He also worked as an American football coach and official.
Government Medical College Kannur, Pariyaram, or Pariyaram Medical College, was established in March 1993 at Pariyaram in Kannur district, Kerala state, South India.
It was the first medical college to be established under the cooperative sector in India and was then called Academy of Medical Sciences (ACME).
Samuel William Koster (December 29, 1919 – January 23, 2006) was a career officer in the United States Army.
He attained the rank of major general, and was most notable for his service as commander of the Americal Division and Superintendent of the United States Military Academy.
Fire from Heaven is a 1969 historical novel by Mary Renault about the childhood and youth of Alexander the Great.
It reportedly was a major inspiration for the Oliver Stone film Alexander.
Wave in Head is a one-man German synthpop music project, which was founded in 1993 in Magdeburg, Germany.
His name is Michael Pohl.
Pandanaceae is a family of flowering plants native to the tropics and subtropics of the Old World, from West Africa through the Pacific.
It contains 982 known species in five genera, of which the type genus, Pandanus, is the most important, with species like Pandanus amaryllifolius and karuka (Pandanus julianettii) being important sources of food.
The cream wave (Scopula floslactata) is a moth of the family Geometridae.
The species was first described by Adrian Hardy Haworth in 1809.
Renfrew West and Inverclyde was a constituency of the House of Commons of the Parliament of the United Kingdom from 1983 to 1997.
The constituency was created out of, and merged back into, the West Renfrewshire constituency.
Ascheberg () is a municipality in the district of Coesfeld in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
The neighbouring cities, towns and municipalities of Ascheberg are (clockwise, starting in the North) the city Münster, the town Drensteinfurt (District Warendorf), the city Hamm, the town Werne (District Unna, the municipalities Nordkirchen and Senden (both District Coesfeld)Born in Ascheberg  Franz Falke (1909-1994), politician Wolfgang Sandhowe (born 1953 in Ascheberg), soccer player, today football coachTwin cities  BuggianoReferencesMunicipalities in North Rhine-WestphaliaCoesfeld (district)
Zacharias Heinesen (born 1936 in Tórshavn) is a Faroese painter.
He is the son of the writer and artist William Heinesen.
The chakravala method () is a cyclic algorithm to solve indeterminate quadratic equations, including Pell's equation.
It is commonly attributed to Bhāskara II, (c. 1114 – 1185 CE) although some attribute it to Jayadeva (c.  950 ~ 1000 CE).
Havixbeck (Westphalian: Havkesbierk or Havkesbieck) is a municipality situated on the north-east edge of the Baumberge in the district of Coesfeld, in northern North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 15 km west of Münster.
The Great House at Sonning (formerly the White Hart public house) is a hotel and restaurant with a riverside garden on the River Thames near Sonning Bridge at Sonning, Berkshire, England.
It is possible for patrons to moor along the towpath running past the hotel on the river.
Third Ear Band was the second album by the Third Ear Band, released in 1970.
It consists of four improvised pieces, "Air", "Earth", "Fire", and "Water", and is therefore sometimes known as "Elements".
Stephen Walsh (26 August 1859 – 16 March 1929) was a British miner, trade unionist and Labour Party politician.
BackgroundBorn in Liverpool, Walsh became an orphan at a very young age.
Human rights in Islam may refer to: Human Rights in Islam (book), a 1976 book by
Sayyid Abul
Toxicodendron pubescens (syn.
Rhus pubescens), commonly known as Atlantic poison oak, is an upright shrub that can grow to 1 metre (3 feet) tall.
Rosendahl is a municipality in the district of Coesfeld in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately  north-west of Coesfeld.
Simon Langton Grammar School for Boys (also known as The Langton Grammar School for Boys and simply referred to as The Langton) is an 11–18 foundation grammar school for boys and mixed sixth form in Canterbury, Kent, England.
It was established in 1881.
Anona is a place in Jipijapa, Manabí Province, Ecuador, South America.
ReferencesPopulated places in Manabí Province
Clan Davidson is a Highland Scottish clan and a member of the Chattan Confederation.
HistoryOriginsThere are several versions of Clan Davidson's origins.
Varberg Fortress () is a former fortification in Varberg, Halland County, Sweden, which currently serves as a museum.
HistoryVarberg Fortress was built in 1287-1300 by Count Jacob Nielsen as protection against Eric VI of Denmark, who had declared him an outlaw after the murder of his father King Eric V of Denmark.
Nasrollah Abdollahi (, born 2 September 1951 in Tehran, Iran) is an Iranian football coach and former player.
Playing careerClub careerAbdollahi played for Guard F.C. before he changed to Taj SC.
Senden is a municipality in the district of Coesfeld, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
GeographyGeographic locationThe municipality of Senden is situated in the east of the district of Coesfeld, approx.
Walter Welford (May 21, 1868 – June 28, 1952) was inaugurated as the 20th Governor of North Dakota on February 2, 1935, after Thomas H. Moodie was removed from office after it was determined he was ineligible to hold the office.
He served until 1937, having lost the 1936 race to former governor William Langer.
Hassan Nazari (, born August 19, 1956, in Abadan, Iran) is a retired Iranian footballer.
He usually played as a defender.
MacFormat is the UK's biggest computer magazine aimed at Macintosh users.
It published 13 issues per year.
The North American blizzard of 2006 was a nor'easter that began on the evening of February 11, 2006.
It dumped heavy snow across the Mid-Atlantic and New England states, from Virginia to Maine through the early evening of February 12, and ended in Atlantic Canada on February 13.
Shanqella (Amharic: ሻንቅላ šanqəlla sometimes spelled Shankella, Shangella, Shánkala, Shankalla or Shangalla) is an exonym for a number of ethnic groups that today reside primarily in the westernmost part of Ethiopia near South Sudan (especially the Benishangul-Gumuz Region), but are known to have also inhabited more northerly areas until the late nineteenth century.
A pejorative, the term was traditionally used by the local Afro-Asiatic-speaking populations to refer in general terms to darker-skinned ethnic groups, particularly to those from communities speaking Nilo-Saharan languages of Western Ethiopia.
Henrik Hellstenius (born 28 April 1963) is a Norwegian composer and musicologist.
Born in Bærum, Norway, Hellstenius studied musicology at the University of Oslo and composition with Lasse Thoresen, Olav Anton Thommessen and Bjørn Kruse  at the Norwegian Academy of Music in Oslo.
Elmer Dessens Jusaino [deh-SENZ] (born January 13, 1971) is a  Mexican former professional baseball pitcher in Major League Baseball (MLB).
Personal lifeElmer Dessens was born on January 13, 1971, in Hermosillo, Mexico.
Vélizy-Villacoublay () is a commune in the Yvelines department in the Île-de-France in north-central France.
It is located in the south-western suburbs of Paris  from the center and  east of Versailles.
Thomas Hilliard Moodie (May 26, 1878 – March 3, 1948) was an American politician who was born in Winona, Minnesota.
After he was inaugurated Governor of North Dakota in January 1935, it was revealed that he had not officially been a resident of the state for the mandatory five years, and he was removed from office in February 1935 having served less than a month.
Kothammuriyattom is a village folk art form of northern Kerala, India.
It is in fact Godavariyattom.
Heimbach is a town in the district of Düren of the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located on the river Rur, in the Eifel hills, approx.
Charadupinnikali (Malayalam: ചരടുപിന്നിക്കളി - literally 'string dance') or Urikkali is a dance form practiced in South Kerala and by ex-pat communities in other countries.
The play is performed holding the cords hung at the place of performance.
GTE Midwest, Inc. was a GTE operating company formed in 1993 upon the split off of some GTE local telephone operations from GTE North.
GTE Midwest served Missouri, Iowa, Nebraska, and Minnesota, and included the former operations of Contel in Iowa and Missouri.HistoryIn 1995, GTE Midwest's Minnesota operations were transferred to Contel of Minnesota, Inc. Contel of Minnesota had always been a separate company from GTE Midwest.
Linnich is a town in the district of Düren in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located on the River Rur (Roer river), approx.
Arthur Gustave Sorlie (April 26, 1874 – August 28, 1928) was an American businessman and politician who served as the 14th Governor of North Dakota from 1925 until his death in 1928 at the age of 54.
BiographySorlie was born in Albert Lea, Minnesota and resided in Grand Forks, North Dakota.
Lotusblüthen (1893-1900) and New Lotusblüten (1908-1913 (1914/15)) was a theosophical magazine published by Franz Hartmann.
It was the second theosophical magazine in Germany and Austria after Wilhelm Hübbe-Schleidens Die Sphinx.
The American Watchmakers-Clockmakers Institute (AWCI) is a not-for-profit trade association based in the United States that is dedicated to the advancement of the modern watch industry, from which it receives a significant portion of its funding.
While the AWCI is an American organization, it also has members throughout the world.
The Commonwealth Labour Party (CWLP) was a minor political party in Northern Ireland.
The party was founded in 1942 by Harry Midgley, former leader of the Northern Ireland Labour Party (NILP), in order to pursue his brand of labour unionism.
Glashaus is a German band consisting of lead singer Cassandra Steen, songwriter and rapper Moses Pelham, and producer Martin Haas.
The trio is best known for their mixture of R&B, soul and pop music with lyrics in German language.
Kate Clifford Larson is an American historian and Harriet Tubman scholar.
Her 2003 biography of Harriet Tubman, Bound for the Promised Land was one of the first non-juvenile Tubman biographies published in six decades.
Gregory A. Kasavin (; born August 21, 1977) is an American writer and designer for Supergiant Games, and the former site director and executive editor at the gaming website GameSpot for over 10 years.
Early life and educationKasavin attended University of California, Berkeley.
A windfall tax is a higher tax rate on profits that ensue from a sudden windfall gain to a particular company or industry.
There have been windfall taxes in various countries across the world, including Australia, Italy, and Mongolia.
Magnus Hovdal Moan (born 26 August 1983) is a retired Norwegian Nordic combined skier who has competed since 2002 until 2019.
BackgroundMagnus moved from Lillehammer when he was two years old and has lived in Trondheim ever since.
Trisakti University (Usakti, Trisakti) is Indonesia's largest private university located in Jakarta, Indonesia.
Trisakti University, is the only private university in Indonesia which was established by the Government of the Republic of Indonesia.
Nideggen () is a town in the district of Düren in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located on the river Rur, in the Eifel hills, approx.
The WSKG Public Telecommunications Council, Inc. (WSKG, Inc.) is a non-profit public broadcasting organization serving Central, Western, and the Southern Tier of New York State, and Northeast Pennsylvania, with offices based in Vestal (near Binghamton).
WSKG, Inc. owns and operates the following stations: WSKG-TV, a PBS member station operating on virtual channel 46, digital 31; repeated in digital on WSKA-DT channel 30 in Corning, New York WSKG-FM, an NPR member station, 89.3 FM, featuring news and public affairs, plus classical music WSQX-FM, an NPR member station, 91.5 FM, featuring news and public affairs from NPR, Pacifica, and other sources, plus jazz music.
The Belgian Fourth Division A was one of the four leagues at the fourth level of the Belgian football league system, the others being the Belgian Fourth Division B, C and D.
This division existed from the 1952-53 to 2015-16 seasons and was played every year with 16 clubs in each league.
Boies is both a surname and a given name.
Notable people with the name include:SurnameDavid Boies (born 1941), lawyer and Chairman of Boies, Schiller & FlexnerHorace Boies (1827–1923), served as Governor of Iowa from 1890 to 1894Jean-Christophe Boies, Canadian musicianJean-Sébastien Boies, Canadian musicianMary Boies, American lawyer and businesswomanWilliam Dayton Boies (1857–1932), former Republican congressman for IowaGiven nameBoies Penrose (1860–1921), American lawyer and Republican politician from Philadelphia, PennsylvaniaJeremiah Smith Boies De Veber (1830–1908), Canadian politician and businessmanSee alsoBoies, Schiller & Flexner, American law firm founded by David Boies and Jonathan Schiller in 1997BoieBoyce (disambiguation)
The Belgian Fourth Division B was one of the four leagues at the fourth level of the Belgian football league system, the other ones being the Belgian Fourth Division A, C and D.
This division existed from the 1952–53 to 2015–16 seasons and was played every year with 16 clubs in each league.
The Belgian Third Division C was one of the four leagues at the fourth level of the Belgian football league system, the other ones being the Belgian Fourth Division A, B and D.
This division existed from the 1952-53 to 2015-16 seasons and was played every year with 16 clubs in each league.
Sergio Chiamparino (born 1 September 1948) is an Italian politician.
He was the mayor of Turin from 2001 to 2011, and the president of Piedmont from 2014 to 2019.
Woodlawn School is a private independent school in Mooresville, North Carolina in Iredell County, north of Davidson, North Carolina.
Founded in 2002, it has 209 students in grades Pre-K through 12.
The Belgian Fourth Division D () was one of the four leagues at the fourth level of the Belgian football league system, the other ones being the Belgian Fourth Division A, B and C.
This division existed from the 1952–53 to 2015–16 seasons and was played every year with 16 clubs in each league.
Brigadier General John Thomas Corley (August 4, 1914 – April 16, 1977) was a career United States Army officer who served with distinction in World War II.
He was also noted for his contributions to army training.
Human Rights in Islam is a 1976 book written by
Sayyid Abul
Aldenhoven () is a municipality in the district of Düren in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 5 km south-west of Jülich, 5 km north of Eschweiler and 20 km north-east of Aachen.
The West Fork of the Little Sioux River is a river in the northwestern Iowa, United States.
It is a tributary to the Little Sioux River through the Garretson Outlet Ditch within the Missouri River floodplain which it enters at .
AAAL (Akademi Angkatan Laut) - Indonesian Naval AcademyAAU (Akademi Angkatan Udara) - Indonesian Air Force AcademyABK (anak buah kapal) - ship's crewABRI (Angkatan Bersenjata Republik Indonesia) - Military of Indonesia (New Order Era)Akmil (Akademi Militer) - Indonesian Military AcademyAlutsista (Alat Utama Sistem Senjata Tentara Nasional Indonesia) - Indonesian National Armed Forces Armaments and Munitions AMD (ABRI Masuk Desa) -
A social responsibility program by Indonesian army (ABRI), such as providing free medical service, repairing/building roads and public utilities.
Economic System which described by Quran..Economic system of Quran (Islam)..
Abu Hayyan SaeedThe economic system described in Al-Quran e Kareem is very clear.
Hürtgenwald is a municipality in the district of Düren in the federal state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located in the Eifel hills, approx.
Crodowaldo Pavan (; December 1, 1919 – April 3, 2009) was a Brazilian biologist and geneticist, and a scientific leader in Brazil.
Early lifePavan was born to a family of second-generation immigrants from Italy in 1919, in the city of Campinas, São Paulo state, Brazil.
The Lyngen Alps () are a mountain range in northeastern Troms og Finnmark county in Norway, east of the city of Tromsø.
The mountain range runs through the municipalities of Lyngen, Balsfjord, and Storfjord.
Numbers is an American television series produced by brothers Ridley and Tony Scott.
It premiered on CBS on Sunday, January 23, 2005 at 10:00 pm with its pilot episode then moved to its Friday slot five days later.
Dakota North is a fictional comic book character who has appeared in various series published by Marvel Comics.
Created by writer Martha Thomases and artist Tony Salmons, North was originally the star of her own short-lived 1986 series and later a part of the supporting casts of Cage, Daredevil and Captain Marvel.
The Rights of Minorities in the Islamic State () is a book written by Sayyid Abul Ala Maududi, published in Lahore, Pakistan in 1954.
In it Maududi references the millet system and its organization along communal lines as a possible way the Islamic state would deal with minority rights according to the sharia concept of dhimma.
System of Government Under the Holy Prophet is a book written by Sayyid Abul Ala Maududi.
ReferencesBooks by
Islamic Law and its Introduction in Pakistan is a book written by
Sayyid Abul
Qadiani Problem is a book written by Sayyid Abul Ala Maududi.
It was first published in 1953.
Towards Understanding Islam is a book written by
Sayyid Abul
Allahabad Fort is a fort built by the Mughal emperor Akbar at Prayagraj in 1583.
The fort stands on the banks of the Yamuna, near its confluence with the Ganges.
The freedom of movement for workers is a policy chapter of the acquis communautaire of the European Union.
The free movement of workers means that nationals of any member state of the European Union can take up an employment in another member state on the same conditions as the nationals of that particular member state.
Ozoir-la-Ferrière () is a commune in the Seine-et-Marne department in the Île-de-France region in north-central France.
It is located in the urban area of Paris  east-southeast from the center.
Wilmer and the Dukes (originally Wilmer Alexander Junior and the Dukes) were a United States R&B band in upstate New York in the 1960s.
Though they produced only a handful of singles and one album, they performed regularly, and had a dedicated following.
Jessie Harlan Lincoln (November 6, 1875 – January 4, 1948) was the second daughter of Robert Todd Lincoln, the granddaughter of Abraham Lincoln, and the mother of Mary Lincoln Beckwith and Robert Todd Lincoln Beckwith.
Early lifeJessie Harlan Lincoln was born on November 6, 1875, in Chicago to Mary and Robert Todd Lincoln.
The Jawahar Planetarium is located in the city of Prayagraj in Uttar Pradesh, India.
It was built in 1979 and is situated beside Anand Bhavan the former residence of the Nehru-Gandhi family and now a museum.
Dieter Hoeneß (born 7 January 1953) is a German former professional football player and executive.
A forward in his playing career, Hoeneß was mainly associated with Bayern Munich.
Joseph Juneau () (born January 5, 1968) is a Canadian former professional hockey player and engineer, born in Pont-Rouge, Quebec.
He played  in the National Hockey League for the Boston Bruins, Washington Capitals, Buffalo Sabres, Ottawa Senators, Phoenix Coyotes and the Montreal Canadiens.
Ramez Naam is an American technologist and science fiction writer.
He is best known as the author of the Nexus Trilogy.
Uwe Kreisel is a writer and textbook author in the fields of linguistics, ESL, and cross-cultural topics.
Bibliography  1992: English One.  1993:
Vikas Khanna (born 14 November 1971) is an Indian chef, restaurateur, cookbook writer, filmmaker and humanitarian.
He is one of the judges of MasterChef India since its beginning .
Inden is a municipality in the district of Düren in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located on the river Inde, approx.
is a 1932 black-and-white Japanese silent comedy film directed by Yasujirō Ozu.
It was the first of six Ozu films to win the Kinema Junpo Award for Best Film of the Year.
Northwest Fiber, LLC, doing business as Ziply Fiber, is an American telecommunications company based in Kirkland, Washington.
Ziply is a subsidiary of WaveDivision Capital, a private investment company, which is also Kirkland-based.
Kreuzau is a municipality in the district of Düren in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located on the river Rur, approx.
Solitude is a state of personal isolation from others.
Solitude may also refer to:Music Solitude Aeturnus, formerly Solitude, an American metal bandAlbums Solitude (Billie Holiday album) or the title cover of the Duke Ellington song (see below), 1956 Solitude (King Midas Sound album), 2019 Solitude (The The album) or the title song, 1993 Solitude (EP), by Tori Kelly, 2020 Solitude, by Frank Duval, 1991 Solitude, by Gunmetal Grey Solitude, by Kosheen, 2013 Solitude, by Morris Albert, 1981Songs "(In My) Solitude", composed by Duke Ellington, 1934 "Solitude" (Candlemass song), 1986 "Solitude", by Black Sabbath from Master of Reality, 1971 "Solitude", by Days of the New from Days of the New, 1997 "Solitude", by Jerry Cantrell from Degradation Trip Volumes 1 & 2, 2002 "Solitude", by Joe Satriani from Black Swans and Wormhole Wizards, 2010 "Solitude", by Gothminister from Anima Inferna, 2011 "Solitude", by Northlane from Discoveries, 2011 "Solitude", by M83 from Junk
Sonny King (April 1, 1922 – February 3, 2006) was an American lounge singer of Italian descent.
He was born as Luigi Antonio Schiavone on April 1, 1922, in Brooklyn, New York.
Langerwehe is a municipality in the district of Düren in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 10 km west of Düren.
Andy Miah (; born in Norwich, Norfolk) is an English bioethicist, academic and journalist.
His work often focuses on technology and posthumanism.
Merzenich is a municipality in the district of Düren in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 4 km north-east of Düren.
Castle Rising is a village and civil parish in the English county of Norfolk.
The village is situated some  north-east of the town of King's Lynn and  west of the city of Norwich.
Abraham Lincoln (May 13, 1744 –  May 19, 1786) was the paternal grandfather of the 16th U.S. president, Abraham Lincoln.
Lincoln was a military captain during the American Revolution, and a pioneer settler of Kentucky.
Niederzier is a municipality in the district of Düren in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 10 km north of Düren, and 10 km south-east of Jülich.
Nörvenich is a municipality in the district of Düren in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located about  east of Düren.
A seqlock (short for sequence lock) is a special locking mechanism used in Linux for supporting fast writes of shared variables between two parallel operating system routines.
The semantics stabilized as of version 2.5.59, and they are present in the 2.6.x stable kernel series.
Jason Kemper Sears (23 January 1968 – 31 January 2006) was an American punk rock vocalist from Santa Barbara, California, best known for his work with Rich Kids on LSD (RKL), from 1982 to their first breakup in 1990 and again from 1993 to 2006.
He was also a nationally ranked snowboarder at one time and sponsored by Barfoot snowboarding team.
H.E.A.R. is a non-profit organization dedicated to preventing hearing loss, mainly from loud rock music.
The acronym stands for Hearing Education and Awareness for Rockers.
Titz is a municipality in the district of Düren in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately  north-east of Jülich and  south of Mönchengladbach.
External counterpulsation  therapy (ECP) is a procedure that may be performed on individuals with angina, heart failure, or cardiomyopathy.
Medical usesThe FDA approved the CardiAssistTM ECP system for the treatment of angina, acute myocardial infarction and cardiogenic shock under a 510(k) submission in 1980 Since then, additional ECP devices have been cleared by the FDA for use in treating stable or unstable angina pectoris, acute myocardial infarction, cardiogenic shock, and congestive heart failure.
The Tempest (Russian: Буря Burya), Symphonic Fantasia after Shakespeare, Op. 18, is a symphonic poem in F minor by Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky composed in 1873.
It was premiered in December 1873, conducted by Nikolai Rubinstein.
Frontier Southwest Incorporated is a Frontier Communications operating company in Texas.
At its peak, Frontier Southwest served Arkansas, Oklahoma, Texas, and New Mexico.
The Kentucky Bourbon Festival is a weeklong activity consisting of more than thirty events in Bardstown, Kentucky, United States, dedicated to celebrating the history and art of distilling bourbon whiskey.
The organizers of the festival promote the strong association between bourbon and the city of Bardstown, and have trademarked the phrase "Bourbon Capital of the World" to apply specifically to Bardstown.
Vettweiß (alternative spelling: Vettweiss) is a municipality in the district of Düren in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 10 km south-east of Düren.
Wilson Henry Irvine (28 February 1869 – 1936) was a master American Impressionist landscape painter.
Although most closely associated with the Old Lyme, Connecticut art colony headed by Florence Griswold, Irvine spent his early career near Chicago, a product of the School of the Art Institute of Chicago.
Alfred Morris, Baron Morris of Manchester,  (23 March 1928 – 12 August 2012) was a British Labour Co-operative politician and disability rights campaigner.
Political careerMorris served as Member of Parliament for Manchester Wythenshawe from 1964 until 1997, having previously unsuccessfully fought the, then, safe Conservative seat of Liverpool Garston in 1951 and the Wythenshawe seat in 1959.
Karapet Chobanyan (; born 25 February 1927 in Karzakh, Akhalkalaki, Georgia and died on 15 October 1978) was an Armenian scientist and engineer who discovered the phenomenon of Low-Stress in mechanics and developed a new method of welding.
BiographyKarapet Chobanyan was born on February, 1927, as the first child of Armenuhi and Sirakan Chobanyan.
Eid prayers, also referred to as Salat al-Eid (), are holy holiday prayers in the Islamic tradition.
The literal translation of the word "Eid" in Arabic is "festival" or "feast" and is a time when Muslims congregate with family and the larger Muslim community to celebrate.
The Bangalore Cantonment (1806–1881) was a military cantonment of the British Raj based in the Indian city of Bangalore.
The cantonment covered an area of , extending from the Residency on the west to Binnamangala on the east and from the Tanneries on Tannery Road in the north to AGRAM (Army Group Royal Artillery Maidan - Maidan meaning Ground) in the south.
Moshiri is a surname.
Notable people with the surname include: Farhad Moshiri (born 1955), a British-Iranian businessman Farhad Moshiri (artist) (born 1963), an Iranian artist Farnoosh Moshiri, an Iranian novelist, playwright, and librettist Fereydoon Moshiri (1926–2000), an Iranian poet Mahshid Moshiri, an Iranian novelist and lexicographer.
In compilers, live variable analysis (or simply liveness analysis) is a classic data-flow analysis to calculate the variables that are live at each point in the program.
A variable is live at some point if it holds a value that may be needed in the future, or equivalently if its value may be read before the next time the variable is written to.
Verizon South, Inc. is a Verizon operating company providing local telephone services to portions of Virginia and North Carolina in the United States.
HistoryVerizon South was originally established in 1947 as The Bluefield Telephone Corporation, providing telephone service to communities in Virginia including its namesake Bluefield.
Bongo District is one of the fifteen districts in Upper East Region, Ghana.
Originally created as an ordinary district assembly in 1988; which was established by Legislative Instrument (L.I.) 1446.
Deglobalization or deglobalisation is the process of diminishing interdependence and integration between certain units around the world, typically nation-states.
It is widely used to describe the periods of history when economic trade and investment between countries decline.
Albertus Magnus College is a private Roman Catholic university in New Haven, Connecticut.
It was founded in 1925 by the Dominican Sisters of St. Mary of the Springs (now Dominican Sisters of Peace).
A toxin is a naturally occurring organic poison produced by the metabolic activities of living cells or organisms.
Toxin may also refer to:Naturally occurring non-organic toxicants such as arsenic.
Norman Ernest Partridge (10 August 1900–10
March 1982) was an English cricketer who played for Cambridge University and Warwickshire.
This is a list of rank insignia used by the Islamic Revolutionary Guard Corps (IRGC) in Iran.
Rank insignia chartOfficersEnlistedSee alsoReferences.
Plutonium-238 (238Pu or Pu-238) is a radioactive isotope of plutonium that has a half-life of 87.7 years.
Plutonium-238 is a very powerful alpha emitter; as alpha particles are easily blocked, this makes the plutonium-238 isotope suitable for usage in radioisotope thermoelectric generators (RTGs) and radioisotope heater units.
The women's 3000 m speed skating competition at the 2006 Winter Olympics in Turin, Italy, was held on 12 February, the second day of competition at the Olympics.
RecordsPrior to this competition, the existing world and Olympic records were as follows.
Rebelde was a Mexican comic book series, published by now defunct Ka-Boom!
Estudio, based on the telenovela of the same title.
Georgios Samaras (, ; born 21 February 1985) is a Greek former professional footballer who played as a striker.
Samaras started his career at OFI Crete, before moving on to Eredivisie side Heerenveen in 2001.
Wetter is a surname.
Notable people with the surname include:Ernst Wetter (1877–1963), Swiss politicianFabian Wetter (born 1989), German footballerFriedrich Wetter (born 1928), German cardinal archbishop of Munich and FreisingHarry Wetter (1882–1934), Welsh international rugby union playerHerbert Wetter (1891–1966), Norwegian Olympic swimmer in Swimming at the 1912 Summer Olympics – Men's 1500 metre freestyleJack Wetter (1887–1967), Welsh international rugby union playerPaul Alan Wetter, American medical doctorSee alsoBerend von Wetter-Rosenthal (1874–1940), Baltic-German politicianWetter (disambiguation)German-language surnamesSurnames from nicknames
Ka-Boom was an Italian children's programming block.
It was aimed at children between the ages of 8 and 14.
Harry Thomas Burn Sr. (November 12, 1895 – February 19, 1977) was a Republican member of the Tennessee General Assembly for McMinn County, Tennessee.
Burn became the youngest member of the state legislature when he was elected at the age of twenty-two.
The Sorrows are a rock band formed in 1963 in Coventry, Warwickshire, England, by Pip Whitcher, and were part of the British beat boom of the 1960s.
They were a fixture in the English mod scene and are sometimes referred to as freakbeat.
MLS Cup 1997 was the second edition of the MLS Cup, the post-season championship match of Major League Soccer (MLS) in the United States.
It was played on October 26, 1997, between D.C. United and the Colorado Rapids to determine the champion of the 1997 season.
Fort Douglas (initially called Camp Douglas) was established in October 1862, during the American Civil War, as a small military garrison about three miles east of Salt Lake City, Utah.
Its purpose was to protect the overland mail route and telegraph lines along the Central Overland Route.
Barnas Sears (November 19, 1802 – July 6, 1880) was an American educational theorist and Baptist theologian.
BiographySears graduated from Brown University in 1825 and from Newton Theological Institution in 1827.
The 2009 World Games () the eighth edition of the World Games, were an international multi-sport event held in Kaohsiung, Taiwan (under the name Chinese Taipei) from 16 July 2009 to 26 July 2009.
The games featured sports that are not contested in the Olympic Games.
Richard Howell (October 25, 1754April 28, 1802) was the third governor of New Jersey from 1794 to 1801.
Early life and military career
Villeparisis () is a commune in the Seine-et-Marne department in the Île-de-France region in north-central France.
It is located in the north-eastern suburbs of Paris  from the centre.
HNoMS Ørnen was a Royal Norwegian Navy corvette.
Ørnen was commissioned 3 June 1833 and her first commander was capitaine Christian A. Bendz.
The different kinds of bows one could encounter at an Eastern Orthodox service are shown in the drawing below.
Strict rules exist as to which type of a bow should be used at any particular time.
The Mini is a small economy car made by the British Motor Corporation (BMC) and its successors from 1959 to 2000.
Mini may also refer to:AutomobileMini (marque), an English automotive marque, subsidiary of German carmaker BMW, successor of the original MiniInnocenti Mini, an Italian version of the original Mini produced by Leyland InnocentiMini Hatch, a Mini model built by BMW from 2001 to presentMini Moke, a vehicle similar to a beach buggy, based on the Mini carPeople Mini (singer), Japanese model and singer Mini Jakobsen, former Norwegian footballer Vuyisile Mini (1920–1964), South African anti-apartheid activist Anthony Minichiello, Australian rugby league playerFictional characters Mini Yaemori, a character in Manga and Anime series Rent-a-girlfriend Mini McGuinness, a character in SkinsOther uses Mini (EP), an EP by The Wedding Present Mini (1995 film), a Malayalam film Mini (2022 film), a Bengali film Mini (frog), a genus endemic to Madagascar Miniature m
Bernward (c. 960 – 20 November 1022) was the thirteenth Bishop of Hildesheim from 993 until his death in 1022.
LifeBernward came from a Saxon noble family.
Andrus Veerpalu (born 8 February 1971) is a retired Estonian cross-country skier.
He is Estonia's most successful Winter Olympian, having won the gold medal in men's 15 km classical in 2002 and 2006, and silver in men's 50 km classical in 2002.
Super Bowl XLVII was an American football game between the American Football Conference (AFC) champion Baltimore Ravens and the National Football Conference (NFC) champion San Francisco 49ers to decide the National Football League (NFL) champion for the 2012 season.
The Ravens defeated the 49ers by the score of 34–31, handing the 49ers their first Super Bowl loss in their franchise history.
132P/Helin–Roman–Alu, also known as Helin-Roman-Alu 2, is a periodic comet in the Solar System.
ReferencesExternal links  132P/Helin-Roman-Alu 2 – Seiichi Yoshida @ aerith.net 132P at Kronk's CometographyPeriodic comets0132132P132PComets in 201419891026
Studio 360 was an American weekly public radio program about the arts and culture hosted by novelist Kurt Andersen and produced by Public Radio Exchange (PRX) and Slate in New York City.
The program's stated goal was to "Get inside the creative mind" and used arts and culture as a lens to understand the world.
Civil Liberty is a fundraising organisation for "UK nationalists", that was run by members of the far-right British National Party (BNP) and British Democratic Party (BDP).
It has been described as a front organisation.
The Nancy Reagan defense is a tactic in corporate finance used to counter a takeover or merger bidder who has made a formal bid to shareholders to buy their shares.
When the board of directors of the target company meets to consider the bid, they "just say no."
Brough Castle is a ruined castle in the village of Brough, Cumbria, England.
The castle was built by William Rufus around 1092 within the old Roman fort of Verterae to protect a key route through the Pennine Mountains.
Irene Karlijn (Ireen) Wüst (; born 1 April 1986) is a Dutch former long track speed skater of German ancestry.
Wüst became the most successful speed skating Olympian ever by achieving at least one gold medal in each of five consecutive Winter Olympic appearances.
Kim St-Pierre (born December 14, 1978 in Châteauguay, Quebec) is a Canadian ice hockey player.
She is a three-time Olympic gold medallist and five-time IIHF world champion.
MLS Cup 2005 was the 10th edition of the MLS Cup, the championship match of Major League Soccer (MLS).
The soccer match took place on November 13, 2005, at Pizza Hut Park in Frisco, Texas, near Dallas, and was contested between the New England Revolution and the Los Angeles Galaxy.
Beehive was a Vietnam war era anti-personnel round packed with metal flechettes fired from an artillery gun most popularly deployed during that conflict.
It is also known as flechette rounds or their official designation, antipersonnel-tracer (APERS-T).
Southill, Weymouth is a modern suburb of Weymouth, Dorset, England, and lies about 2 miles (3 km) north of the town centre.
It was developed on the western shore of Radipole Lake in several phases from the 1960s onwards.
A secular resonance is a type of orbital resonance between two bodies with synchronized precessional frequencies.
In celestial mechanics, secular refers to the long-term motion of a system, and resonance is periods or frequencies being a simple numerical ratio of small integers.
The BRD Trilogy () consists of three films directed by Rainer Werner Fassbinder:
The Marriage of Maria Braun (1979), Lola (1981) and Veronika Voss (1982).
Reverend Lal Behari Day (also Dey, 18 December 1824 – 28 October 1892) was an Bengali writer and journalist, who converted to Christianity, and became a Christian missionary himself.
BiographyLal Behari Dey was born on 18 December 1824 to a Bengali Suvarna Banik caste family at Sonapalasi near Bardhaman.
Horse-ripping, or horse slashing, is an animal cruelty phenomenon involving serious injuries in horses, often involving mutilation of their genitalia and slashing of the flank or neck.
It has not been established, however, how often these injuries are caused by human cruelty.
Juniper, also known as Brother Juniper () (died 1258), called "the renowned jester of the Lord", was one of the original followers of Francis of Assisi.
Not much is known about Juniper before he joined the friars.
The Berkeley Heights Public Schools are a comprehensive community public school district serving students in pre-Kindergarten through twelfth grade from Berkeley Heights in Union County, New Jersey.
As of the 2020–21 school year, the district, comprised of six schools, had an enrollment of 2,499 students and 230.2 classroom teachers (on an FTE basis), for a student–teacher ratio of 10.9:1.
Stumptown Coffee Roasters is a coffee roaster and retailer based in Portland, Oregon, United States.
The chain's flagship café and roastery opened in 1999.
Brotherly love may refer to:General Philia, a Greek word for love Brotherly love (philosophy)
The New Commandment of Jesus The Second greatest commandment: "Love thy neighbor as thyself"Television  Brotherly Love (1995 TV series), an American television series Brotherly Love (1999 TV series), a British television series"Brotherly Love" (The Cleveland Show), an episode of The Cleveland Show"Brotherly Love", episode of The Golden Girls"Brotherly Love", three-episode story arc of the British television programme Cracker"Brotherly Love", episode of In the Heat of the NightMusic "Brotherly Love" (Moe Bandy song), first recorded by Moe Bandy and later as a duet between Keith Whitley and Earl Thomas ConleyBrotherly Love, an album by Dean Dillon and Gary Stewart, or its title track "Brotherly Love", a song written by John Farrar and recorded by Olivia Newton-John on her album Music Makes My Day "Brotherly Love", a song recorded by Billy Dean in his album Young Man "Brother
136P/Mueller, also known as Mueller 3, is a periodic comet in the Solar System.
ReferencesExternal links  Orbital simulation from JPL (Java) / Horizons Ephemeris 136P/Mueller 3 – Seiichi Yoshida @ aerith.net 136P at Kronk's CometographyPeriodic comets0136136PComets in 2007Comets in 201619900924
Baird's Manual of American College Fraternities was a compendium of fraternities and sororities in the United States and Canada, published between 1879 and 1991.
One modern writer notes, "Baird's Manual of American College Fraternities, was, in essence, the Bible of the Greek letter system.
The Transitional National Assembly of the Democratic Republic of the Congo (French:
Assemblée nationale de transition de la République démocratique du Congo) was an appointed body consisting of representatives of the different parties to the peace agreement that ended the Second Congo War.
2009 in sports describes the world events in sport.
Alpine skiing Alpine World Ski Championships 2009 held at Val d'Isère, Savoy, FranceAmerican football Super Bowl XLIII – the Pittsburgh Steelers (AFC) won 27–23 over the Arizona Cardinals (NFC)Location: Raymond James StadiumAttendance: 70,774MVP: Santonio Holmes, WR (Pittsburgh) BCS National Championship Game at Orange Bowl (2008 season): The Florida Gators won 24-14 over the Oklahoma Sooners in front of a record crowd of 78,468 to win the BCS National Championship September 20 – The Dallas Cowboys play their first game in the new Cowboys Stadium against the New York Giants and lose 31–33.
Dagmar bumpers (also known as "bullet bumpers") is a slang term for chrome conical-shaped bumper guards that began to appear on the front bumper/grille assemblies of certain American automobiles following World War II.
They reached their peak in the mid-1950s.
Mechernich (, ) is a town in the district of Euskirchen in the south of the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located in the "Naturpark Nordeifel" in the Eifel hills, approx.
Prime STH were a Swedish alternative rock quartet from Stockholm, Sweden.
The band, which included vocalist Noa Modén, guitarist Martin Påhlsson, bassist Jesper Eksjoo, and drummer Kasper Lindgren, was formed while the members were teenagers.
Stephen Norton (22 December 1951), also known by the nickname of "Knocker", is an English former professional rugby league footballer who played in the 1970s and 1980s, and coached in the 1990s.
He played at representative level for Great Britain, England and Yorkshire, and at club level for Fryston ARLFC, Castleford (Heritage № 531), Hull F.C. and Wakefield Trinity (Heritage № 1008), as a  or , and coached at club level for Barrow.
The following is a list of common non-native pronunciations that English speakers make when trying to speak foreign languages.
Many of these are due to transfer of phonological rules from English to the new language as well as differences in grammar and syntax that they encounter.
Le Mée-sur-Seine (, literally Le Mée on Seine) is a commune in the Seine-et-Marne department in the Île-de-France region in north-central France, next to Melun.
It is located in the south-eastern suburbs of Paris  from the center.
In broadcasting, a channel or frequency channel is a designated radio frequency (or, equivalently, wavelength), assigned by a competent frequency assignment authority for the operation of a particular radio station, television station or television channel.
See alsoFrequency allocation, ITU RR, article 1.17Frequency assignment, ITU RR, article 1.18Broadcast lawTelevision channel frequenciesReferences  International Telecommunication Union (ITU)Broadcasting
Vlierzele is a village on the Molenbeek, in the Denderstreek, at the edge of the Flemish Ardennes, the hilly southern part of East Flanders, Belgium.
It belongs to the municipality of Sint-Lievens-Houtem.
Charline Labonté (born October 15, 1982) is a Canadian former professional ice hockey player.
Labonté played professionally for the Montreal Stars/Les Canadiennes de Montreal of the Canadian Women's Hockey League.
is a novel by Japanese writer Yasunari Kawabata, serialized between 1949 and 1954, and first published as a standalone book in 1954 by Chikuma Shobō, Tokyo.
PlotShingo Ogata, a 62-year-old businessman living in Kamakura and working in Tokyo, is close to retirement.
Sugar glass (also called candy glass, edible glass, and breakaway glass) is a brittle transparent form of sugar that looks like glass.
It can be formed into a sheet that looks like flat glass or an object, such as a bottle or drinking glass.
Nicholas Joseph Swarbrick (14 November 1898 – 2 February 2006) was, at age 107, the final surviving English merchant sailor of the First World War at the time of his death.
He was born in Grimsargh, near Preston in Lancashire, where his father was a farmer.
On 19 October 1987, a train on the Heart of Wales line derailed and fell into the River Towy due to the partial collapse of the Glanrhyd Bridge near Llandeilo, Carmarthenshire.
Four people died as a result of the tragedy; the driver and three of the passengers drowned.
Blankenheim is a municipality in the district of Euskirchen in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
GeographyBlankenheim is located in the Eifel hills, approximately  south-west of Euskirchen.
H6N2 is an avian influenza virus with two forms: one has a low and the other a high pathogenicity.
It can cause a serious problem for poultry, and also infects ducks as well.
Gillian Ferrari (born June 23, 1980 in Thornhill, Ontario) is a Canadian women's ice hockey player.
She was inducted into the Brampton Sports Hall of Fame in 2006.
"Pies Descalzos, Sueños Blancos" (English: Bare Feet, White Dreams) is the third single from Shakira's third studio album Pies Descalzos (1996).
Written and composed by her, "Pies Descalzos, Sueños Blancos" talks about all the rules that the human race has invented since Adam and Eve ate the forbidden fruit.
Choseley is a tiny hamlet and civil parish in the English county of Norfolk.
It is situated between the villages of Titchwell and Docking and about  from each.
Mangowal Gharbi (), or West Mangowal in English, is a town and Union Council headquarters in Gujrat District in Punjab province, Pakistan.
This town is famous for rice and flour mills, Outclass Marriage Halls as Akbar Marriage Hall Mangowal.
The Legislative Assembly of Lower Canada was the lower house of the bicameral structure of provincial government in Lower Canada until 1838.
The legislative assembly was created by the Constitutional Act of 1791.
Payton's Place is an album by the jazz trumpet player Nicholas Payton, released in 1998.
Track listingAll songs compositions by Nicholas Payton, except as indicated.
Derrick Clifton Harriott OD (born 10 February 1942) is a Jamaican singer and record producer.
He was a member of the Jiving Juniors with Herman Sang before embarking on a solo career.
Lords of Madness is an official supplement for the 3.5 edition of the Dungeons & Dragons fantasy roleplaying game.
ContentsThe book includes new content for aberrations including new aberration monsters and monsters related to them, and information on how to hunt aberrations.
Zolof the Rock & Roll Destroyer is the eponymous debut album by pop rock band
Zolof the Rock & Roll Destroyer.
The Legislative Council of Lower Canada was the upper house of the bicameral structure of provincial government in Lower Canada until 1838.
The upper house consisted of appointed councillors who voted on bills passed up by the Legislative Assembly of Lower Canada.
West High School (commonly West, West High, or WHS) is a public high school located in Sioux City, Iowa with an enrollment of approximately 1,404 students.
The school is a part of the Sioux City School District and is one of three public high schools in Sioux City.
Edward C. Lawson was an African American civil rights activist, who was the respondent in the case of Kolender v. Lawson, , in which the United States Supreme Court ruled that a California statute authorizing a police officer to arrest a person for refusing to present identification was unconstitutionally vague.
Personal lifeAside from his landmark supreme court case, very few biographical details are known about Lawson, a man described by the Los Angeles Times as "mysterious, even secretive".
C. Malcolm Parry (born c. 1938) is a Welsh architect, professor emeritus, and TV/radio broadcaster.
Early lifeParry was born in Blaenavon, left school at the age of 15 and trained as a Mining Surveyor.
Barbara W. Leyden (18 December 1949 – 4 February 2006) was an American palynologist and paleoecologist.
Leyden earned her Ph.D. from Indiana University in 1982.
Jalopy Go Far is the second release from the pop rock band, Zolof the Rock & Roll Destroyer.
Several tracks appeared on the self-titled debut, but were re-recorded for this release.
Alex "Izzy" Izykowski (born January 26, 1984) is an American short track speed skater.
He competed in the 2006 Winter Olympics of Turin in the 1500m, and was also part of the bronze medal winning 5000m relay.
Gillian Mary Apps (born November 2, 1983) is a women's ice hockey player.
Apps was a member of the Canadian National Hockey Team that won back to back Gold Medals in three consecutive Olympic Games.
The  (EOI) () are a nation-wide network of publicly funded language schools in Spain that are found in most substantial towns.
They are dedicated to the specialized teaching of modern languages, not just Spanish as a second or foreign language but any modern language for which there is a significant demand.
Clenchwarton is a village, civil parish and electoral ward in the English county of Norfolk.
It is located about  west of the River Great Ouse, about   from the town of King's Lynn on the east side of the river.
The Doug Mitchell Thunderbird Sports Centre (formerly UBC Winter Sports Centre, also known as UBC Thunderbird Arena) is a LEED Silver certified indoor arena in Greater Vancouver, on the campus of the University of British Columbia.
Located in the University Endowment Lands, it is just outside the city limits of Vancouver, British Columbia.
By the end of 2006 there were about 15 hybrid vehicles from various car makers available in the U.S.
By May 2007 Toyota sold its first million hybrids and had sold a total of two million hybrids at the end of August 2009.
Thomas Christian Weller (born 4 November 1980) is a German former professional footballer who plays as a left midfielder or left-back for FC Romanshorn.
Career Weller joined FC St. Gallen on 24 October 2007.
Dammarie-lès-Lys (; officially Dammarie-les-Lys) is a commune in the south-eastern suburbs of Paris, France.
It is located in the Seine-et-Marne department in the Île-de-France region  from the center of Paris.
{{Infobox webcomic| | title = Arbit Choudhury| image = | caption =
A comic strip portraying Arbit Choudhury| author = Shubham Choudhury and Hemantkumar Jain| url = | status = | began = 2004| ended =| genre = Business school, Coming of age| ratings =}}Arbit Choudhury is a coming of age webcomic run in the format of a comic strip from India.
Dahlem is a municipality in the district of Euskirchen.
It has the lowest population density and population of all municipalities of in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
Anthony Lefroy (1800 – 12 January 1890) was an Irish Conservative Party MP in the United Kingdom Parliament.
He was born in Dublin, the eldest son of politician and jurist Thomas Langlois Lefroy, was educated at Trinity College and studied law at the King's Inns (1820) and Lincoln's Inn (1822).
Regret is a negative conscious and emotional reaction to personal past acts and behaviors.
Regret or Regrets may also refer to:Music  Regret (album), an album by Japanese music production unit I've Sound Regrets (EP), an EP by Cesium137 "Regret" (New Order song), 1993 "Regret" (LeToya Luckett song), 2009 "Regret" (Mai Hoshimura song), 2008 "Regret" (The Gazette song), 2006 "Regret", a song from Fiona Apple's album The Idler Wheel... "Regret", a song from St. Vincent's self-titled album "Regret" (Everything Everything song), 2015 "Regrets" (Mylène Farmer and Jean-Louis Murat song), 1991 "Regrets" (James Brown song), 1980 "Regrets", a song from Jay-Z's debut album Reasonable Doubt "Regrets", a song from Ben Folds Five's album The Unauthorized Biography of Reinhold Messner "Regrets", a song from the Eurythmics' album Touch "Regrets", a song from Reks' album Straight, No ChaserOther uses  Regret, Tennessee, a former unincorporated community in the United States Regre
Vysokopetrovsky Monastery (), also translated as High Monastery of St. Peter, is a Russian Orthodox monastery in the Bely Gorod area of Moscow, commanding a hill whence Petrovka Street descends towards the Kremlin.
The monastery is believed to have been founded around the 1320s by Saint Peter of Moscow, the first Russian metropolitan to have his see in Moscow.
Aporé is a municipality in southwest Goiás state, Brazil.
The municipality is a large producer of cattle.
Sugar Hill Records was an American record label specializing in hip hop music that was founded in 1979 by husband and wife Joe and Sylvia Robinson with Milton Malden and funding from Tony Riviera and Morris Levy, the owner of Roulette Records.
HistoryJoe Robinson had parlayed a music publishing company that he established years before in New York into Red Robin, Fury, Fire, Enjoy, All Platinum, Stang, Vibration, and Turbo Records before establishing the Sugar Hill label.
Congham is a village and civil parish in the English county of Norfolk.
It is situated some  east of the town of King's Lynn and  west of the city of Norwich.
Hellenthal is a municipality in the district of Euskirchen in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located in the Eifel hills, near the border with Belgium, approx.
A Streetcar Named Desire is an opera composed by André Previn in 1995 with a libretto by Philip Littell.
It is based on the play of the same name by Tennessee Williams.
Graham Media Group (formerly Post-Newsweek Stations) is the television broadcasting subsidiary of the Graham Holdings Company.
It is now headquartered in Detroit, co-locating with its local NBC affiliate WDIV-TV, after spending 10 years in Chicago.
The Buffalo is a wheeled mine resistant ambush protected (MRAP) armored military vehicle built by Force Protection, Inc., a division of General Dynamics.
It is the largest vehicle in Force Protection's line-up, followed by the Cougar MRAP and the Ocelot light protected patrol vehicle (LPPV).
Sugar Hill Records is an American bluegrass and Americana record label.
It was founded in Durham, North Carolina in 1978 by Barry Poss and David Freeman, the owner of County Records and Rebel Records.
USS George W. Ingram (DE-62/APD-43) was a  in service with the United States Navy from 1943 to 1947.
In 1967, she was transferred to Taiwan, serving as Kang Shan until being scrapped in 1979.
The Edmonton Expo Centre, formerly the Northlands AgriCom and also known as the Edmonton Exposition and Conference Centre is a multi-purpose convention centre in Edmonton, Alberta, Canada.
Operated by Explore Edmonton on behalf of the City of Edmonton, it is located in Edmonton's Montrose neighbourhood, across the street from the now-closed Northlands Coliseum.
Below is a list of newspapers published in Afghanistan.
NewspapersSee alsoCommunications in AfghanistanMedia of AfghanistanExternal linksAfghanistan newspapers List of Afghan newspapers and online news sites in EnglishNewspapers List of AfghanistanNewspaper map worldwideKārawān in DigitalCommons@UNOReferences Afghantistan Newspapers
The compositions of Ludwig van Beethoven in the key of C minor carry special significance for many listeners.
His works in this key have been said to be powerful and emotive, evoking dark and stormy sentiments.
Wakeijuku (和敬塾), literally meaning "a place to seek harmony and respect", is an all-male dormitory located in the Mejirodai neighborhood in the Bunkyō ward of Tokyo, Japan.
Established in 1955 by Kisaku Mayekawa, philanthropist and founder of Mayekawa Manufacturing Company, Wakeijuku has been the home of students of Japanese universities for more than sixty years, including nearby Waseda University.
Liang Tsai-Ping (, born Gaoyang County (), Hebei, China, February 23, 1910 or 1911; died Taipei, Taiwan, June 28, 2000) was a master of the guzheng, a Chinese traditional zither.
He is considered one of the 20th century's most important players and scholars of the instrument.
Kall is a municipality in the district of Euskirchen in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located in the Eifel hills, approximatively 20 km south-west of Euskirchen.
The first newspaper was published in Austria in 1605.
Until 1940 there were 16 newspapers in Vienna, Austria, but six of them were shut down, leaving ten.
AlityPC is a Hong Kong technology company that designs and develops technology products for the home.
Their products include digital photo frames and high-tech lifestyle gadgets.
The first local newspaper in Bahrain was Al Bahrayn which was published between 1939 and 1944.
Bahrain's Information Affairs Authority reported that the number of newspapers in 1999 was four which were published in Arabic and English languages.
Great Salkeld is a small village and civil parish in the Eden District of Cumbria, England, a few miles to the north east of Penrith and bordering the River Eden.
At the 2001 census the parish had a population of 445, decreasing to 412 at the 2011 Census.
Flight controllers are personnel who aid space flight by working in such Mission Control Centers as NASA's Mission Control Center or ESA's European Space Operations Centre.
Flight controllers work at computer consoles and use telemetry to monitor various technical aspects of a space mission in real-time.
is a Japanese manga artist.
She is best known for the manga, High School Girls which was adapted to an anime called Girl's High.
Grand-Hornu is an old industrial coal mining complex and company town (cité ouvrière) in Hornu (Boussu), near Mons, in Belgium.
It was built by Henri De Gorge between 1810 and 1830.
Peggy March (born Margaret Annemarie Battavio, March 8, 1948) is an American pop singer.
In the United States, she is primarily known for her 1963 million-selling song "I Will Follow Him".
Below is a list of newspapers published in Bulgaria.0-9168 Chasa24 Chasa (left-wing)7 Dni SportAABV
AgrovestnikArh i Art borsaAtakaAvto Moto SvyatAvto trudB
Barrow Gurney Reservoirs () (also known as Barrow Gurney Tanks or Barrow Tanks) are three artificial reservoirs for drinking water near the village of Barrow Gurney, which lies southwest of Bristol, England.
They are known by their numbers rather than names.
The Markusbierg tunnels are a pair of parallel tunnels, which form the most easterly section of the A13 motorway through Luxembourg, near the town of Schengen.
The tunnels are 1575 metres in length, and descend easterly, towards the German border at a 5% gradient.
HNoMS Ellida was a Royal Norwegian Navy corvette first commissioned 16 May 1849.
Cordt Holtermann Valeur was her first commander.
The Outside Chance of Maximilian Glick is a 1988 Canadian film based on the novel by Morley Torgov.
The film was shot in Winnipeg and Beausejour, Manitoba.
Jeff Alulis, better known by his stage name Jeff Penalty, is a writer, filmmaker, and musician, known mainly for his documentary work and his position as a former lead singer of Dead Kennedys.
Early life Penalty was born and raised in Broomall, Pennsylvania.
Arachnophobia is the state of being afraid of spiders.
Other uses include:Arachnophobia (film), a 1990 American comedy-horror film starring Jeff DanielsArachnophobia (video game)Arachnophobiac, an album by Michael Schenker Group, 2003Araknofobia, a 1990s electronic music group
John Rae (1845 – 1915) was a Scottish journalist and biographer.
The long-time editor of The Contemporary Review, and contributor to The British Quarterly Review, he became famous for his 1895 biography of Adam Smith, Life of Adam Smith, which replaced the Biographical Memoir of Adam Smith of 1811, by Dugald Stewart, as the standard Smith reference.
MV Kenilworth is a historic passenger ferry built in 1936 as MV Hotspur II.
She was used on the Hythe Ferry service across Southampton Water until 1978, and then on the Kilcreggan ferry on the Firth of Clyde until 2007.
Terence William Harvey 'Terry' Cox (born 13 March 1937, in High Wycombe, Buckinghamshire) played drums in the British folk rock bands The Pentangle, Duffy's Nucleus and Humblebums.
He also drummed with several other artists, most notably David Bowie and Elton John.
A foreign agent is any person or entity actively carrying out the interests of a foreign principal while located in another host country, generally outside the protections offered to those working in their official capacity for a diplomatic mission.
Foreign agents may be citizens of the host country.
On Red Hand Day or the International Day against the Use of Child Soldiers, February 12 each year since 2002, pleas are made to political leaders and events are staged around the world to draw attention to child soldiers: children under the age of 18 who participate in military organizations of all kinds.
Red Hand Day aims to call for action to stop this practice, and support children affected by it.
Nettersheim is a municipality in the district of Euskirchen in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located in the Eifel hills, approx.
Thomas Salem Bocock (May 18, 1815 – August 5, 1891) was a Confederate politician and lawyer from Virginia.
After serving as an antebellum United States Congressman, he was the speaker of the Confederate States House of Representatives during most of the American Civil War.
John Rae (1 June 1796, Footdee, Aberdeen – 12 July 1872, Staten Island, NY), was a Scottish/Canadian economist.
LifeRae was one of six children to merchant shipbuilder John Rae and Margaret Cuthbert.
Crimplesham is a village and civil parish in the English county of Norfolk.
It is situated  east of the small town of Downham Market,  south of the larger town of King's Lynn, and  west of the city of Norwich.
Bennett Bean (born March 25, 1941) is an American ceramic artist.
Although commonly described as a studio potter, some would characterize him as a sculptor and painter who works primarily in studio pottery.
Kenneth Skinner Jr. is a jazz pianist, head of the group Ken Skinner and the jazzmongers!.
Ken Skinner and the jazzmongers!
Herblay-sur-Seine (,  "Herblay-on-Seine"; before 2018: Herblay) is a commune in the Val-d'Oise department in the Île-de-France region in Northern France.
It is located  from the centre of Paris, in its northwestern outer suburbs, on the departmental border with Yvelines.
Every borough has its own president.
La Cité  January 1, 2002 - January 1, 2006:
Weilerswist () is a municipality in the district of Euskirchen in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located in the Eifel hills, approximately 10 kilometers north of Euskirchen, and 20 kilometers south-west of Cologne.
Skambankt (Beaten to a pulp or beaten up) was a Norwegian hard rock band from Klepp, just south of Stavanger, formed in 1994.
They played their last concert on November 4, 2022, at the DNB Arena in Stavanger.
Hunsonby is a village and civil parish in the Eden district of Cumbria, England,  north east of Penrith.
The parish is located  south east of the city of Carlisle.
Smithville is an unincorporated community and census-designated place (CDP) located within Galloway Township, in Atlantic County, in the U.S. state of New Jersey, that was established as part of the 2010 United States Census.
Smithville is located  north of and inland from Atlantic City.
In 1995 there were eight national newspapers in the Czech Republic and their total circulation was about 1.8 million copies.
The number of daily newspapers was 96 in 2004.
The Symphony No. 70 in D major, Hoboken 1/70, was written by Joseph Haydn to mark the start of construction of a new opera house on the Eszterháza estate.
It was premiered on December 18, 1779—one of the few Haydn symphonies where the exact premiere date is known.
John Brendan Kelly Sr. (October 4, 1889 – June 20, 1960) was an American triple Olympic champion, the first in the sport of rowing.
The Philadelphia-based Kelly also was a multimillionaire in the bricklaying and construction industry.
Sunset is a 1988 American crime mystery western film written and directed by Blake Edwards and starring Bruce Willis as Western actor Tom Mix, who teams up with lawman Wyatt Earp, portrayed for the second time in a theatrical film by James Garner.
Based on an unpublished novel by Rod Amateau, the plot has Earp and Mix solve a murder in Hollywood in 1929.
Neuroimmunology is a field combining neuroscience, the study of the nervous system, and immunology, the study of the immune system.
Neuroimmunologists seek to better understand the interactions of these two complex systems during development, homeostasis, and response to injuries.
The behavioral approach to systems theory and control theory was initiated in the late-1970s by J. C. Willems as a result of resolving inconsistencies present in classical approaches based on state-space, transfer function, and convolution representations.
This approach is also motivated by the aim of obtaining a general framework for system analysis and control that respects the underlying physics.
The Intermediate dispute was a major split in Scottish football which lasted from 1925 to 1931 and concerned the compensation that Junior clubs received when one of their players moved to a Senior football league side.
Although largely confined to the West of Scotland, the dispute involved many of the best Junior clubs in the country, setting them in direct conflict with both the Scottish Football Association (SFA) and their own organisation, the Scottish Junior Football Association (SJFA).
Zhang Shijie () was a  Chinese admiral, military general, and politician during the Mongol invasion of China.
Zhang was born to a prosperous family in present-day Hebei (part of the Liao empire, then Jin empire).
This is a list of members of Parliament (MPs) elected at the 1895 general election, held over several days from 13 July to 7 August 1895.
By-elections189522 August:
Audio Karate is an American rock band from Rosemead, California.
HistoryAudio Karate signed to Kung Fu Records in fall 2001.
Cheshire County Council was the county council of Cheshire.
Founded on 1 April 1889, it was officially dissolved on 31 March 2009, when it and its districts were superseded by two unitary authorities; Cheshire West and Chester and Cheshire East.
Band of Gold is a British television crime drama series, written and created by Kay Mellor, first broadcast on ITV on 12 March 1995.
Produced by Granada Television, the series revolves around the lives of a group of prostitutes who live and work in Bradford's red-light district.
P.A. (short for Parental Advisory) was a Southern hip hop trio, part of the Atlanta-based Dungeon Family.
The group composed of rappers/producers James "Mello" Hollins, Kawan "K.P." Prather and Maurice "Big Reese" Sinclair.
Borgholzhausen is a town in the district of Gütersloh in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located in the Teutoburg Forest, approx.
See Here, Private Hargrove (1942) is a book by Marion Hargrove, about his experiences in U.S. Army basic training.
OriginThe author, a North Carolina native, was a correspondent for The Charlotte News prior to World War II.
Isaac Chapman Bates (January 23, 1779March 16, 1845) was an American politician from Massachusetts.
He was born in Granville, Massachusetts, and graduated from Yale College in 1802.
Luis Caballero is a comedian and writer of Puerto Rican descent, who lived in New York City for most of his life.
After performing stand-up in comedy clubs for several years, he teamed up with filmmaker Ben Model to adapt his comedy material into a film.
Straight
No Chase is the second studio album by the Dungeon Family associates P.A., released 1998 via DreamWorks Records.
Joseph Kemp Toole (May 12, 1851 – March 11, 1929) was a Democratic politician from Montana.
He served as the first and fourth Governor of Montana.
Robert Alexander Frazier (born 1951 in Ayer, Massachusetts) is an American writer of speculative poetry and fiction, as well as an impressionist painter on Nantucket Island.
Background His mother, Barbara Brown Frazier, was an oil painter, educated by Emil Gruppe (1896–1978) and Dimitri Romanovsky (Russian/American, 1887–1971) for portraiture.
Electric Circus is a Canadian television program.
Electric Circus may also refer to: Electric Circus (album), by the rapper Common Electric Circus (nightclub), a nightclub in Manhattan Electric Circus, Manchester, a punk rock venue in 1970s "Electric Circus", a song by Thee Michelle Gun Elephant "Electric Circus", a song by Bad Suns from the 2022 album Apocalypse Whenever Electric Circus, an entertainment segment running on BBC children's Saturday morning show Live & KickingSee also Inside the Electric Circus, a 1986 album by W.A.S.P.
Bae Yong-Kyun (; born 1951) is a South Korean film director, painter, and professor.
He is best known for his 1989 film Why Has Bodhi-Dharma Left for the East?
Harsewinkel () is a town in Gütersloh District in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It lies on the river Ems, some 15 km north-west of Gütersloh.
My Life, Your Entertainment is the third and final studio album by P.A., released in 2000.
Jim Crow, T.I., 8Ball, Goodie Mob, N.O.R.E., Pimp C, and YoungBloodZ make guest appearances on the album.
Let Love In is the eighth studio album by American rock band the Goo Goo Dolls, released in 2006.
The album peaked at #9 on the US Billboard 200, selling around 83,000 copies in its first week.
Postman Pat is a British stop-motion animated television series first produced by Woodland Animations.
The series follows the adventures of Pat Clifton, a postman who works for Royal Mail postal service in the fictional village of Greendale (inspired by the real valley of Longsleddale in Cumbria).
John Joseph Cavanaugh III (born August 1, 1945) is an American politician and lawyer from Nebraska.
Early life and education Born in Omaha, Nebraska, he graduated from Creighton Preparatory School in 1963, from Regis College in Denver, Colorado in 1967 and from Creighton University School of Law in 1972,.
Harnoncourt-Unverzagt is the name of an old Austrian noble family, which came to Austria from the Duchy of Lorraine, but originated from Luxembourg.
History Counts d'Harnoncourt intermarried with Unverzagt family in the 18th century when Joseph Ludwig Matthias de la Fontaine, Count of Harnoncourt (1736–1816) married Countess Maria Leopoldine Unverzagt (1754–1835), who was the last of her line.
John Minsheu (or Minshew) (1560–1627) was an English linguist and lexicographer.
BiographyHe was born and died in London.
Rheda-Wiedenbrück (; Westphalian: Raie-Wienbrügge) is a city in the district of Gütersloh, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
Geography
Belle Haven Consultants was a for-profit organization founded in 1997 by former Heritage Foundation president Edwin Feulner and Heritage Foundation Asia policy expert Ken Sheffer.
Feulner's wife, Linda Feulner, later took her husband's place as a partner until 2001, when she became a paid senior adviser in the firm.
Wonderama is a children's television program that originally appeared on the Metromedia-owned stations from 1955 to 1977.
The show was revived from 1980 to 1987, and again in 2016.
The Jamshed Bhabha Theatre is a 1109-seater theatre inaugurated on 24 November 1999 within The National Centre for the Performing Arts premises in Mumbai, India.
It has hosted & staged Indian epics and classical concerts to western operas and ballets.
Rietberg () is a town in the district of Gütersloh in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 10 km south of Gütersloh and 25 km north-west of Paderborn in the region Ostwestfalen-Lippe.
John Edward Erickson (March 14, 1863May 25, 1946) was an American politician of the Democratic Party from Montana.
He served as the eighth Governor of Montana and as a United States senator.
Kenneth Joel Rothman (October 11, 1935 – April 26, 2019) was an American lawyer and politician from Missouri.
He served as the 41st Lieutenant Governor of Missouri from 1981 to 1985.
General elections were held in Rhodesia on 30 July 1974.
They saw the Rhodesian Front of Ian Smith re-elected, once more winning every one of the 50 seats elected by white voters.
Christian Gauss (1878 – 1951) was a literary critic and professor of literature.
BiographyGauss was born in Ann Arbor, Michigan.
The US Standard Light Rail Vehicle (SLRV) was a light rail vehicle (LRV) built by Boeing Vertol in the 1970s.
The Urban Mass Transportation Administration (UMTA) of the United States Department of Transportation (USDOT) promoted it as a standardized vehicle for U.S. cities.
The Joint Committee on Standards for Educational Evaluation  is an American/Canadian based Standards Developer Organization (SDO).
The Joint Committee, created in 1975, represents a coalition of major professional associations formed in 1975 to develop evaluation standards and improve the quality of standardized evaluation.
Nathaniel Silsbee (January 14, 1773July 14, 1850) was a ship master, merchant and American politician from Salem, Massachusetts.
Early career Silsbee was the eldest child of Capt. Nathaniel and Sarah (Becket) Silsbee.
Allen Scott Miller (born 1968) is an American Southern rock and alternative country singer, songwriter, and guitarist.
BiographyMiller grew up on a farm in Swoope, Virginia.
Schloß Holte-Stukenbrock is a city in the district of Gütersloh in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located near the Eggegebirge, approx.
In computer architecture, shared graphics memory refers to a design where the graphics chip does not have its own dedicated memory, and instead shares the main system RAM with the CPU and other components.
This design is used with many integrated graphics solutions to reduce the cost and complexity of the motherboard design, as no additional memory chips are required on the board.
Deer Island or Inishmore () is located in County Clare, Ireland.
LocationAccording to Clare County Library, Deer Island, or Innismore, is situated near the western bank of the River Fergus about a quarter of a mile from the village of Ballynacally.
The Battle of Carbisdale (also known as Invercarron) took place close to the village of Culrain, Sutherland, Scotland on 27 April 1650 and was part of the Wars of the Three Kingdoms.
It was fought by the Royalist leader James Graham, 1st Marquess of Montrose, against the Scottish Government of the time, dominated by Archibald Campbell, 1st Marquess of Argyll and a grouping of radical Covenanters, known as the Kirk Party.
Versmold (; ) is a town in Gütersloh District in the German state of North Rhine-Westphalia.
It is located some 30 km west of Bielefeld.
Arthur Heinrich Ludwig Zarden (27 April 1885 in Hamburg – 18 January 1944 in Berlin) was a leading personality in German tax legislation and for a short time State Secretary in the Reich Finance Ministry.
Career Not much is known about Zarden's childhood or youth.
The Electric Circus was a nightclub located at 19-25 St. Marks Place between Second and Third Avenues  in the East Village neighborhood of Manhattan, New York City, from 1967 to August 1971.
The club was created by Jerry Brandt, Stanton J. Freeman and their partners and designed by Chermayeff & Geismar.
Joseph Moore Dixon (July 31, 1867May 22, 1934) was an American Republican politician from Montana.
He served as a Representative, Senator, and the seventh Governor of Montana.
William Brown (birth name unknown) was a Black woman who joined the Royal Navy in the early nineteenth century.
It is undisputed that she was a sailor of HMS Queen Charlotte, but historians have reached varying conclusions about her service record.
Conservative Friends of Israel (CFI) is a British parliamentary group affiliated to the Conservative Party, which is dedicated to strengthening business, cultural and political ties between the United Kingdom and Israel, as well as between the British Conservative Party and the Israeli right-wing Likud party.
It was founded in 1974 by Michael Fidler, the Conservative MP for Bury and Radcliffe.
Werther is an opera by Jules Massenet.
Werther may also refer to:PlacesWerther, North Rhine-Westphalia, a town in western GermanyWerther, Thuringia, a municipality in eastern GermanyPeople with the surnameGustav Werther (1815–1869), German chemistHeinrich Wilhelm von Werther (1772–1859), Prussian diplomat and politicianArtsThe Sorrows of Young Werther, a novel by Johann Wolfgang von Goethe that the opera Werther is loosely based onWerther (1986 film), a Spanish film based on the novelWerther (1927 film), a Czech filmOthersWerther's Original, a toffee-and-cream candy The New Werther, by the statistician Karl Pearson
Liberal Democrat Friends of Israel (LDFI) is an associated organisation whose stated objective is to 'maximise support for the State of Israel within the British Liberal Democrat Party', and to 'promote policies which lead to peace and security for Israel within a Middle East peace settlement'.
The President of Liberal Democrat Friends of Israel is Baron Palmer.
Etoys is a child-friendly computer environment and object-oriented prototype-based programming language for use in education.
Etoys is a media-rich authoring environment with a scripted object model for many different objects that runs on different platforms and is free and open source.
Werther is a town in the district of Gütersloh in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located near the Teutoburg Forest, approximately 10 km (6 miles) north-west of Bielefeld.
The Canada Eastern Railway, originally known as the Northern and Western Railway, was a railway line operating in New Brunswick, Canada, running from Loggieville (now part of Miramichi), to Devon (opposite Fredericton).
The line linked various communities along the Nashwaak and Southwest Miramichi River valleys.
The neuroimmune system is a system of structures and processes involving the biochemical and electrophysiological interactions between the nervous system and immune system which protect neurons from pathogens.
It serves to protect neurons against disease by maintaining selectively permeable barriers (e.g., the blood–brain barrier and blood–cerebrospinal fluid barrier), mediating neuroinflammation and wound healing in damaged neurons, and mobilizing host defenses against pathogens.
The Tata Theatre is a 1010-seat premier staging facility for music, dance and drama at The National Centre for the Performing Arts complex in the city of Mumbai, India.
It is India’s first theatre designed and built keeping in mind the unique acoustic and visual requirements for the staging of Indian music, dance and related art forms, and was constructed by Larsen & Toubro Limited.
The Agora Theatre and Ballroom (commonly known as the Cleveland Agora, or simply, the Agora) is a music venue located in Cleveland, Ohio, founded by Henry "Hank" LoConti Sr.
The Agora name was used by two other Cleveland venues in succession, the latter of which was damaged by fire in 1984.
Michito Sakaki (born 19 May 1983) is an Australian rules football player from Japan.
Michito has achieved recognition as currently being one of the best and most successful players to learn and play the game outside of Australia, being named in the World Team 3 times, captaining Japan, playing pre-season matches with the Essendon Football Club and playing semi-professionally in Australia.
Lewis Adams (October 27, 1842 – April 30, 1905) was an African-American former slave in Macon County, Alabama, who is best remembered for his work in helping found the school in 1881 in Tuskegee, Alabama which grew to become the normal school that with its first principal, Booker T Washington, grew to become Tuskegee University.
Little is known of Adams' early life.
Herzebrock-Clarholz is a town in the district of Gütersloh in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located approximately 10 km west of Gütersloh.
The Amateur Emigrant (in full: The Amateur Emigrant from the Clyde to Sandy Hook) is Robert Louis Stevenson's travel memoir of his journey from Scotland to California in 1879-1880.
It is not a complete account, covering the first third, by ship from Europe to New York City.
Brownwood Regional Airport  is six miles north of Brownwood, in Brown County, Texas.
The National Plan of Integrated Airport Systems for 2011–2015 categorized it as a general aviation facility.
Matthiessen is a Danish-Norwegian patronymic surname meaning "son of Mathies" (equivalent of the Biblical Μαθθαιος, cf.
English Matthew).
The Forgotten Heroes are a fictional superhero team in the DC Comics universe.
The group is composed of originally unrelated superheroes introduced in DC publications in the 1940s, 1950s and 1960s.
Louis Henri Boussenard (4 October 1847, Escrennes, Loiret – 11 September 1910 in Orléans) was a French author of adventure novels, dubbed "the French Rider Haggard" during his lifetime, but known better presently in Eastern Europe than in Francophone countries.
As a measure of his popularity, 40 volumes of his collected works were published in Imperial Russia during 1911.
Glassonby is a small village and civil parish in the Eden Valley of Cumbria, England, about  south south east of Kirkoswald.
At the 2001 census the parish had a population of 314, decreasing marginally to 308 at the 2011 Census.
A sickness bag (also known as a sick sack, airsick bag, airsickness bag, emesis bag, sick bag, barf bag, vomit bag, disposal bag, waste bag, doggie bag or motion sickness bag) is a small bag commonly provided to passengers on board airplanes and boats to collect and contain vomit in the event of motion sickness.
History The plastic-lined airsickness bag was created by inventor Gilmore Schjeldahl for Northwest Orient Airlines in 1949.
Deuil-la-Barre () is a commune in the northern suburbs of Paris, France.
It is in the Department of Val-d'Oise and the arrondissement of Sarcelles.
The Zee Cine Award Best Film is chosen via the public of India.
The winners are announced in March.
Little India is the largest circulated Indian American publication in the United States.
The magazine was established in 1991 by its founding editor and publisher, Achal Mehra, a professor at Albright College in Reading, Pennsylvania.
Thomas Wallace Knox (June 26, 1835 - January 6, 1896) was a journalist, author, and world traveler, known primarily for his work as a New York Herald correspondent during the American Civil War.
As an author, Knox wrote over 45 books, including a popular series of travel adventure books for boys.
Jolon (; Spanish: Jolón; Salinan: Xolon) is a small unincorporated village in southern Monterey County, California.
Jolon is located on the San Antonio River Valley, west of Salinas Valley and is entirely surrounded by  Fort Hunter Liggett.
Paulo Evaristo Arns OFM (; 14 September 1921 – 14 December 2016) was a Brazilian prelate of the Catholic Church, who was made a cardinal and the Archbishop of São Paulo by Pope Paul VI, and later became cardinal protopriest.
His ministry began with a twenty-year academic career, but when charged with responsibility for the Sao Paulo Archdiocese he proved a relentless opponent of Brazil's military dictatorship and its use of torture as well as an advocate for the poor and a vocal defender of liberation theology.
The Satu Mare Swabians or Sathmar Swabians (German: Sathmarer Schwaben) are a German ethnic group in the Satu Mare () region of Romania.
Romanian Germans, they are one of the various Danube Swabian () subgroups that are actually Swabian in heritage, and their dialect, Sathmar Swabian, is similar to the other varieties of the Swabian German dialect.
Our Hearts Were Young and Gay is a book by actress Cornelia Otis Skinner and journalist Emily Kimbrough, published in 1942.
The book presents a description of their European tour in the 1920s, when they were fresh out of college from Bryn Mawr.
Santa Margarita (Spanish for "St. Margaret") is a town and  census-designated place located in San Luis Obispo County, California.
It was founded in 1889 near Cuesta Peak and San Luis Obispo along State Route 58.
The Winchester City Mill is a restored water mill situated on the River Itchen in the centre of the ancient English city of Winchester.
The mill is owned by the National Trust and is a Grade II* listed building.
Leamy Acoustic Art Inc. is Canada's only full-time bell foundry and specializes in smaller bells designed for fine art collections and personal use.
The foundry produces only one-off, untuned bells using the lost-wax process.
New Country (; Nor Yerkir) was a political party in Armenia.
It was created by Artashes Tumanyan, Chief of staff to former President Robert Kocharyan.
Santa Ysabel (Spanish for "St. Elizabeth"; Kumeyaay: Ellykwanan), is an unincorporated community in the Santa Ysabel Valley of eastern San Diego County, in southern California.
HistoryThe 1818 Santa Ysabel Asistencia is located here, a Spanish mission asistencia (sub-mission) of Mission San Diego de Alcalá.
Sydney Walter Hoar (28 November 1895 – May 1967) was an English footballer.
Hoar was born in Leagrave, Luton, Bedfordshire, and joined local side Luton Town as a fifteen-year-old in 1911.
Langenberg () is a municipality in the district of Gütersloh in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located in the Teutoburg Forest, approx.
Chicken Soup with Barley is a 1956 play by British playwright Arnold Wesker.
It is the first of the 'Wesker trilogy' – being followed by Roots and I'm Talking About Jerusalem – and was first performed on stage in 1958 at the Belgrade Theatre in Coventry, transferring later that year to the Royal Court Theatre in London.
Keld (or Keilde) is a hamlet in the English county of Cumbria.
It lies within the civil parish of Shap.
Kyiv, historically situated on the right bank of the Dnieper River, now covers both banks of the river whose width, as it flows through the city, reaches several hundred metres.
Additionally, several tributaries join the Dnieper inside or just north or south of the historic city.
Margaret Blake Kelly (born September 17, 1935) is an American former politician and accountant from Missouri.
Kelly served as the State Auditor of Missouri from 1984 to 1999.
The Spanish admiral Isidro de Atondo y Antillón (baptized 3 December 1639) is best known for his role in unsuccessful attempts to establish colonies on the Baja California peninsula in 1683–1685.
Atondo was born in Valtierra, in the Navarra region of Spain, to noble parents.
TopTen is an Estonian record label which has started the career of a number of successful Baltic chart acts, including the internationally successful girl group Vanilla Ninja, which enjoyed chat success in a number of countries across Europe, especially in Estonia, Germany and Austria, and are currently the label's most successful act.
See alsoLists of record labelsReferencesExternal links Estonian record labelsPop record labels
Prince Amedeo of Savoy-Aosta, 5th Duke of Aosta (Amedeo Umberto Costantino Giorgio Paolo Elena Maria Fiorenzo Zvonimir di Savoia; 27 September 1943 – 1 June 2021) was a claimant to the headship of the House of Savoy, the family which ruled Italy from 1861 to 1946.
Until 7 July 2006, Amedeo was styled Duke of Aosta; on that date he declared himself Duke of Savoy, a title that was disputed between him and his third cousin, Vittorio Emanuele, Prince of Naples, only son of King Umberto II of Italy.
Steinhagen is a municipality in the district of Gütersloh in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is located on the south slope of the Teutoburg Forest, approx.
Appointment with Death is a 1988 American mystery film and sequel produced and directed by Michael Winner.
Made by Golan-Globus Productions, the film is an adaptation of the 1938 Agatha Christie novel Appointment with Death featuring the detective Hercule Poirot.
Peter Jackson Hoagland (November 17, 1941 – October 30, 2007) was an American politician from the U.S. state of Nebraska.
A member of the Democratic Party, Hoagland represented Nebraska's 2nd congressional district in the U.S. House of Representatives from 1989 to 1995.
The metopes of the Parthenon are the surviving set of what were originally 92 square carved plaques of Pentelic marble originally located above the columns of the Parthenon peristyle on the Acropolis of Athens.
If they were made by several artists, the master builder was certainly Phidias.
Verl () is a town in the district of Gütersloh in the state of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is approximately 15 km south of Bielefeld and 10 km east of Gütersloh.
Hemorrhagic gastroenteritis (HGE) is a disease of dogs characterized by sudden vomiting and bloody diarrhea.
The symptoms are usually severe, and HGE can be fatal if not treated.
is a fictional character in the manga xxxHolic, which was created by the artist group Clamp.
Yuko is a witch who owns a shop where people come to have their wishes granted, and most of her jobs involve dealing with supernatural beings.
USS Ira Jeffery (DE-63/APD-44), a  of the United States Navy, was named in honor of Ensign Ira Weil Jeffery (1918–1941) who was killed in action during the Japanese attack on the Hawaiian Islands while serving aboard the battleship .
Ira Jeffery was laid down as Jeffery on 13 February 1943 by Bethlehem-Hingham Shipyard, Inc., Hingham, Massachusetts; launched on 15 May 1943; sponsored by Mrs. D. C. Jeffery, mother of Ensign Jeffery, renamed Ira Jeffery on 29 July 1943; and commissioned on 15 August 1943.
The Don Coleman Coliseum is an indoor arena operated by the Spring Branch Independent School District and located in Houston, Texas, United States.
Completed in 1974 at a cost of $1.3 million, the facility seats 5,000 for events that have included high school sports, a visit by Gerald Ford in 1976, and the 1984 Trans-America Athletic Conference men's basketball tournament.
José María de Echeandía (?–1871) was twice Mexican governor of Alta California from 1825 to 1831 and again from 1832 to 1833.
He was the only governor of California that lived in San Diego.
Manzanares Park (in Spanish: Parque del Manzanares) is a large, 650 Ha. park in the south of Madrid, Spain.
It follows the Manzanares River, backbone of the park, for fifteen km between the Casa de Campo and the town of Getafe.
Harry Milner Whittington (March 3, 1927 – February 4, 2023) was an American lawyer, real estate investor, and political figure.
He received international media attention following an incident on February 11, 2006, when he was accidentally shot in the face, neck, and torso by then-United States vice president Dick Cheney while hunting quail with two women on a ranch in Kenedy County, Texas, near Corpus Christi.
The Harbour Group, LLC is a Washington D.C. lobbying and public relations firm.
HistoryHarbour Group was founded in 2001 by former Clinton administration senior advisor for policy and communications Joel Johnson, who left in 2005 to join the Glover Park Group, and Richard Marcus, who continued to lead it .
The Texan Santa Fe Expedition was a commercial and military expedition to secure the Republic of Texas's claims to parts of Northern New Mexico for Texas in 1841.
The expedition was unofficially initiated by the then-President of Texas, Mirabeau B. Lamar, in an attempt to gain control over the lucrative Santa Fe Trail and with the ulterior motive to acquire parts of New Mexico for the Texas Republic.
Hyperolius argus, known under common names Argus reed frog, Argus sedge frog, and Boror reed frog (and many others) is a hyperolid frog found in the eastern coastal plain of Africa from southern Somalia through Kenya, Tanzania, Mozambique, Malawi, Zimbabwe to KwaZulu-Natal in eastern South Africa.
DescriptionHyperolius argus is sexually dichromatic: adult males are usually green, and females usually reddish-brown with large white spots.
Hüseyin Rahmi Gürpınar (August 17, 1864 – March 8, 1944) was a Turkish writer, civil servant, and politician.
BiographyBorn in Istanbul, Gürpınar was the son of a family close to the Ottoman court.
Solo Star is the debut studio album by American singer Solange, released by Columbia Records and Music World on December 26, 2002 in Japan and January 21, 2003 in the United States.
It debuted and peaked at number forty-nine on the U.S. Billboard 200 and number twenty-three on the Top R&B/Hip-Hop Albums in early February 2003.
Doriot is a French surname, and may refer to: Auguste Doriot racing motorist, finished third in the world's first motor race Paris–Rouen 1894 Doriot Anthony Dwyer (1922–2020), American flautist.
Georges Doriot (1899–1987), one of the first American venture capitalists.
Angelina County Airport  is a county-owned, public-use airport in Angelina County, Texas, United States.
The airport is located seven nautical miles (13 km) southwest of the central business district of Lufkin, Texas.Facilities and aircraft Angelina County Airport covers an area of  at an elevation of 296 feet (90 m) above mean sea level.
Duppy is a word of African origin commonly used in various Caribbean Islands, including The Bahamas, Barbados and Jamaica, meaning ghost or spirit.
The word is sometimes spelled duffy.
The Alawi Sheikhdom ( ), or Alawi ( ) — was a Sheikhdom located in the Aden region of southwestern Yemen.
Its capital was Al Qasha.
Charles Curtis is a performer and composer of a wide variety of music, with particular emphasis on the avant-garde.
Curtis is most strongly associated with minimalism, modern classical, and so-called "downtown music.
The number of newspapers in Albania was nearly 92 in 2001 and 98 in 2002.
Below is a list of newspapers in Albania.
‘Aqrabi ( ), or the Aqrabi Sheikhdom ( ), was a state in the British Aden Protectorate, the Federation of Arab Emirates of the South, and its successor, the Federation of South Arabia.
Its capital was Bir Ahmad.
Dreaming in Color is the fifth studio album by Christian pop group Jump5, released on Sparrow Records on September 21, 2004.
It is the first release from the group as a quartet after the departure of Libby Hodges.
Trent Vanegas (born 12 July 1974) is an American blogger from Michigan who is best known for his celebrity gossip blog, Pink is the New Blog (PITNB for short), which he launched in 2004.
Early life and educationVanegas is originally from the Detroit, Michigan area.
Haushabi or Hawshabi ( al-Ḥawshabī or  al-Ḥawāshab), or the Haushabi Sultanate ( Salṭanat al-Ḥawāshab), was a state in the British Aden Protectorate.
Its capital was Musaymir.
The Patriotic Traitors: A History of Collaboration in German-Occupied Europe, 1940–45 is a 1972 book by David Littlejohn.
It is a history of the Europeans who took part in collaborationism with Nazi Germany.
Rudi Cerne (born 26 September 1958) is a German TV presenter and former figure skater.
He is the 1984 European silver medalist and a two-time West German national champion.
The Very Best of Jump5 is a greatest hits compilation album by Christian pop group Jump5.
It includes nine previous releases, including "Beauty and the Beast" which had previously only appeared on the first Disneymania album.
The Knight is the name of three fictional comic book superheroes who are properties of DC Comics.
Percival Sheldrake debuted as the Knight in Batman #62 (December 1950), and was created by Bill Finger and Dick Sprang.
Tractate Temurah (, literally: "exchange") is a tractate of the Mishnah, Tosefta, and Babylonian Talmud, which is part of the Order of Kodashim.
Its main subject is the Biblical prohibition (Leviticus 27:10) against attempting to switch the sanctity of an animal that has been sanctified for the Temple in Jerusalem with another non-sanctified animal.
Jim Dymock (born 4 April 1972) is a professional rugby league coach who is the assistant coach of the Manly Sea Eagles in the National Rugby League (NRL) and a former professional rugby league footballer who played in the 1990s and 2000s.
A Tonga and Australia international, and New South Wales State of Origin representative  or , he played club football for Sydney's Western Suburbs Magpies, Canterbury-Bankstown Bulldogs and the Parramatta Eels, finishing his career in the Super League for the London Broncos.
Isiro (pronounced ) is the capital of Haut-Uele Province in the northeastern part of the Democratic Republic of the Congo.
It lies between the equatorial forest and the savannah and its main resource is coffee.
Gemena is the capital city of Sud-Ubangi Province in the  Democratic Republic of the Congo.
It has a population of 350,511 (2017).
The 1985–86 season was the 106th season of competitive football in England.
Timeline 5 July 1985:
The urban agglomeration of Quebec City () is an urban agglomeration in Quebec.
It may also be referred to as the urban agglomeration of the city of Québec.
There are two national and 10 state/territory daily newspapers, 35 regional dailies and 470 other regional and suburban newspapers in Australia.
Each state and territory has one or two dominant daily newspapers which focus upon the major national news while also containing news of importance for the state that it is sold in.
Thomas Creighton was a prospector who found mineral deposits in Saskatchewan.
With his partners Jack and Dan Mosher, Creighton discovered gold on the west side of Amisk Lake in 1913.
Subeihi or Subayhi ( ), or the Subeihi Sultanate (  or  ), was the westernmost state in the western Aden Protectorate.
It was one of the original "Nine Cantons" that signed protection agreements with Great Britain in the late 19th century.
Didier Lestrade (born 22 February 1958), is a French author, magazine publisher, AIDS and LGBT rights advocate.
Biography Didier Lestrade was born in Médéa, French Algeria.
Lymphangiectasia, also known as "lymphangiectasis", is a pathologic dilation of lymph vessels.
When it occurs in the intestines of dogs, and more rarely humans, it causes a disease known as "intestinal lymphangiectasia".
A skeleton key (also known as a passkey) is a type of master key in which the serrated edge has been removed in such a way that it can open numerous locks, most commonly the warded lock.
The term derives from the fact that the key has been reduced to its essential parts.
Skakavac (lit.
"grasshopper") is a waterfall in Bosnia and Herzegovina.
Darien High School is the single public high school serving the town of Darien, Connecticut, in the United States.
Background In 2014, Darien High School had the highest SAT scores in the state.
Truchas is a census-designated place in Rio Arriba County, New Mexico, United States.
Located along the scenic High Road to Taos, it is halfway between Santa Fe in the south, and Taos to the north.
Chris Thorburn (born June 3, 1983) is a Canadian former professional ice hockey right winger.
He played over 800 games in the National Hockey League (NHL).
Audhali (  or  ), or the Audhali Sultanate ( ), was a state in the British Aden Protectorate.
It was a founding member of the Federation of Arab Emirates of the South in 1959 and its successor, the Federation of South Arabia, in 1963.
Transilien () is the brand name given to the commuter rail network serving Île-de-France, the region surrounding and including the city of Paris.
The network consists of eight lines: H, J, K, L, N, P, R, and U, each operated by SNCF, the state-owned French railway company.
The  Coso artifact is an object claimed by its discoverers to be a spark plug encased in a geode.
Discovered on February 13, 1961, by Wallace Lane, Virginia Maxey and Mike Mikesell while they were prospecting for geodes near the town of Olancha, California, it has long been claimed as an example of an out-of-place artifact.
The Six Mile Run Reservoir Site, part of the Delaware and Raritan Canal State Park, is located in Franklin Township, Somerset County, New Jersey, United States.
It is adjacent to the Delaware and Raritan Canal.
Parry People Movers Ltd. (PPM) is a British company (founded by John Parry, who died 17 February 2023) manufacturing lightweight trams and railcars that use flywheel energy storage (FES) to store energy for traction, allowing electric systems to operate without overhead wires or third rails, and railcars fuelled by small gas, diesel or hydrogen engines.
On 29 November 2022, The Registrar of Companies (UK) gave notice that Parry People Movers Ltd. would be struck off the Companies Register and dissolved unless "cause is shown to the contrary" though this was suspended on 7 December 2022.
Sanguinarine is a polycyclic quaternary alkaloid.
It is extracted from some plants, including the bloodroot plant, from whose scientific name, Sanguinaria canadensis, its name is derived; the Mexican prickly poppy (Argemone mexicana); Chelidonium majus; and Macleaya cordata.
Indigenous peoples of Colombia, are the ethnic groups who have inhabited Colombia since before the European colonization, in the early 16th century.
According to the last census, they comprise 4.4% of the country's population, belonging to 115 different tribes.
Words, Words, Words is a one-act play written by David Ives for his collection of six one-act plays, All in the Timing.
The play is about Kafka, Milton, and Swift, three intelligent chimpanzees who are put in a cage together under the experimenting eye of a never seen Dr. Rosenbaum, a scientist testing the hypothesis that three apes hitting keys at random on typewriters for an infinite amount of time will almost surely produce Shakespeare's play Hamlet (a variation on the infinite monkey theorem).
USCGC Bertholf (WMSL-750) is the first  maritime security cutter of the United States Coast Guard.
She is named for Commodore Ellsworth P. Bertholf, fourth commandant of both the Revenue Cutter Service and Coast Guard.
Phosphatidylserine (abbreviated Ptd-L-Ser or PS) is a phospholipid and is a component of the cell membrane.
It plays a key role in cell cycle signaling, specifically in relation to apoptosis.
Dathina ( ), the Dathina Sheikhdom ( ), or sometimes the Dathina Confederation, was a state in the British Aden Protectorate, the Federation of Arab Emirates of the South, and its successor, the Federation of South Arabia.
Its capital was Mudiyah.
The 2006 ICC Under-19 Cricket World Cup was played in Sri Lanka from 2 to 15 February 2006.
It was the sixth edition of the Under-19 Cricket World Cup.
Nadapuram is a census town and a special grade Panchayath located in Kozhikode District of Kerala, coming under Nadapuram assembly constituency.
It is in North Malabar region of Kerala, India; spread over an area of 20.44 km2AwardsNadapuram won the best panchayat award of Kozhikode district seven consecutive years under the leadership of president, Sooppy Narikkatteri.
Julius of Brunswick-Lüneburg (also known as Julius of Braunschweig; 29 June 1528 – 3 May 1589), a member of the House of Welf, was Duke of Brunswick-Lüneburg and ruling Prince of Brunswick-Wolfenbüttel from 1568 until his death.
From 1584, he also ruled over the Principality of Calenberg.
The Giant of Thunder Mountain is a 1991 drama film starring Richard Kiel (The Spy Who Loved Me) and Noley Thornton (Beverley Hills, 90210).
Bart the Bear also appeared in the movie.
Stephen Vanderburgh Harkness (November 18, 1818 – March 6, 1888) was an American businessman based in Cleveland, Ohio.
He invested as a silent partner with John D. Rockefeller, Sr. in the founding of Standard Oil and served as a director of Standard Oil until his death.
Deluge is a 1933 American apocalyptic science fiction film, directed by Felix E. Feist, and released by RKO Radio Pictures.
The film is very loosely based on the 1928 novel of the same name by S. Fowler Wright, with the setting changed from the United Kingdom to the United States.
GWR 4073 Class No. 7029
Clun Castle is a 4-6-0 steam locomotive built at Swindon Works in May 1950 to a design by Charles Collett for operation on the Western Region of British Railways.
The 1984–85 season was the 105th season of competitive football in England.
The season saw Everton build on their FA Cup success of the previous season by winning their first league title for 15 years and their first European silverware in the form of the European Cup Winners' Cup.
Shaib or Sha‘ib ( ), or the Sheikhdom of Shaib ( ), was a state in the Aden Protectorate, South Arabia.
The area is now part of the Republic of Yemen.
Dauphin Lake is located in western Manitoba near the city of Dauphin, Manitoba.
The lake covers an area of  and has a drainage basin of about .
Loser is a children’s novel by Jerry Spinelli, first published in 2002 by Joanna Cotler, an imprint of Harper Collins Books.
It portrays the growth of Zinkoff, who is considered "stupid" by his classmates due to his clumsiness, poor performance in school and athletics, and sometimes, clueless enthusiasm.
Evolutionary developmental psychology (EDP) is a research paradigm that applies the basic principles of evolution by natural selection, to understand the development of human behavior and cognition.
It involves the study of both the genetic and environmental mechanisms that underlie the development of social and cognitive competencies, as well as the epigenetic (gene-environment interactions) processes that adapt these competencies to local conditions.
The Puerto Rican spindalis (Spindalis portoricensis) is a bird endemic to the island of Puerto Rico, where it is commonly known as reina mora.
The species is widely distributed throughout the island and is an important part of the Puerto Rican ecosystem because of its help in seed dispersal and plant reproduction.
America Must Be Destroyed is American heavy metal band Gwar’s third album, released in 1992 as their second album on Metal Blade Records.
The album’s lyrical content was inspired by controversy over obscenity charges against the band and an incident in Charlotte, North Carolina in which frontman Dave Brockie’s prosthetic penile attachment, "The Cuttlefish of Cthulhu", was confiscated by police officers.
Donal Graeme is a fictional character in the Childe Cycle of science fiction novels by Gordon R. Dickson.
Although he only appears as a major character in one of the novels, Dorsai!, he is transformed into the character Hal Mayne who is important in the later parts of the series.
CHRISTUS Spohn Hospital Corpus Christi - Memorial (formerly known as Corpus Christi Memorial Hospital) was a 465-bed hospital in Corpus Christi, Texas that was part of the CHRISTUS Spohn Health System, operated by CHRISTUS Health.
It ceased all operations in September 2022, and was demolished in April 2023.
The Plastic Constellations was an indie rock band based in Minneapolis, Minnesota.
The band consisted of guitarists/vocalists Aaron Mader and Jeff Allen, bassist Jordan Roske, and drummer Matt Scharenbroich.
Chremonides (), son of Eteokles of Aithalidai, was an Athenian 3rd century BC statesman and general.
He issued the Decree of Chremonides in 268 BC, creating an alliance between Sparta, Athens, and Ptolemy II, the Macedonian King of Egypt.
Lower Aulaqi ( ), or the Lower Aulaqi Sultanate ( ), was a state in the Aden Protectorate, the Federation of Arab Emirates of the South, and its successor, the Federation of South Arabia.
Its capital was Ahwar.
Sunshine is sunlight, the electromagnetic radiation emitted by the Sun, especially in the visible wavelengths.
Sunshine may also refer to:PeopleNickname  Ronnie "Sunshine" Bass (born 1955), American football player Sunshine Logroño (born 1951), Puerto Rican actor Sunshine Parker (1927–1999), American actor "Sunshine" Sonny Payne (1925–2018), American radio presenter Valerie French (wrestling) (born 1962), American professional wrestling valet, better known as SunshineGiven name  Sunshine Anderson (born 1974), American singer Sunshine Cruz (born 1977), Filipina actress and singer Sunshine Dizon (born 1983), Filipina actressSurname  Caroline Sunshine (born 1995), American actress Gary Sunshine, American playwright Louise Sunshine (born 1940), American real estate businesswoman Ken Sunshine (born 1948), American public relations consultant Marion Sunshine (1894–1963), American actress & songwriter Monty Sunshine (1928–2010), English clarinetist Souriya Sunshine (bo
The Democratic Forum of Germans in Romania (, DFDR; , FDGR; in short  or ) is a political party (legally recognized as an association of public utility according to the governmental decision HG 599 as per 4 June 2008) organised on ethnic criteria representing the interests of the German minority in Romania.
Initially, the FDGR/DFDR was a cultural association representing the culture of the German community in Romania, but it subsequently became a moderately successful local political party (especially amongst Romanian voters as well), most notably in parts of Transylvania (central Romania) and Banat (south-western Romania).
Zhang Sixun (, fl.
10th century) was a Chinese astronomer and mechanical engineer from Bazhong, Sichuan during the early Song dynasty (960–1279 AD).
The World of Warcraft Trading Card Game (WoW TCG) is an out-of-print collectible card game based on Blizzard Entertainment's MMORPG, World of Warcraft.
The game was announced by Upper Deck Entertainment on August 18, 2005 and released on October 25, 2006.
Mohyal Brahmins are an Indian sub-caste of Saraswat Brahmins from the Punjab region.
Prior to the Partition of India, Mohyal Brahmins lived primarily in the Potohar and Hazara regions of Northern Punjab and North-West Frontier Province (Rawalpindi, Chakwal, Jhelum, Sargodha, Campbellpur, Haripur, Abbottabad and Murree) and in the Pahari regions of Jammu and Kashmir (Pulandari, Mirpur, Kotli, Alibeg, Bhimber, Poonch, Rawlakote, Jammu, Bagh and Rajouri).
The 1983–84 season was the 104th season of competitive football in England.
Diary of the season 6 June 1983:
Epitadeus was an early 4th-century BC Spartan ephor, who strengthened conservative class distinctions by allowing gifts of land to independent citizens (Spartiates).
This 4th century rhetra allowed the Spartiatai to dispose of their private land at will rather than by conventional hereditary descent.
The Upper Aulaqi Sheikhdom ( ) was a state in the British Aden Protectorate, the Federation of Arab Emirates of the South, and its successor, the Federation of South Arabia.
Its capital was Sa'id.
Las Trampas or just Trampas (Spanish: "traps"), is a small unincorporated town in Taos County, New Mexico.
Founded in 1751, its center retains the original early Spanish colonial defensive layout from that time, as well as the 18th-century San José de Gracia Church, one of the finest surviving examples of Spanish Colonial church architecture in the United States.
The Passfield White Paper, issued October 20, 1930, by colonial secretary Lord Passfield (Sidney Webb), was a formal statement of British policy in Palestine, which previously had been set by the Churchill White Paper of 1922.
The new statement resulted from the Hope-Simpson Commission's investigation into the deeper causes of the 1929 Palestine riots, that initially started over access to the Western Wall.
Rona is situated beside the river Gelgia, the village consists of three parts, the old lower village (Rona), the upper village (Ruegna) and the new lower village (Rieven).
There is a church in the upper village and two pubs/restaurants in the old lower village.
The Stop the War Committee was an anti-war organisation that opposed the Second Boer War.
It was formed by William Thomas Stead in 1899.
Fresh Radio was a local radio station broadcasting to the Yorkshire Dales in northern England on two medium wave (AM) frequencies and three FM frequencies.
It was also heard online via the Fresh Radio website.
Shane Cullinan is a composer, arranger and lyricist whose work ranges from compositions for TV and film to orchestral dramas and opera.
Life and careerCullinan has worked independently as a composer and arranger since graduating from Nottingham Trent University.
The Strange World of Planet X (a.k.a.  Cosmic Monsters in the United States) is an independently made 1958 British science fiction horror film, produced by George Maynard and John Bash, directed by Gilbert Gunn, that stars Forrest Tucker and Gaby André.
The film was distributed in the UK in February, 1958 by Eros Films.
Suzanne Haik Terrell (born July 8, 1954) is the first and only Republican woman elected to statewide office in Louisiana.
A practicing attorney, Terrell was the state's final commissioner of elections, a position which she held from 2000 to 2004.
Jean-Talon Market is a farmer's market in Montreal, Quebec, Canada.
Located in the Little Italy district, the market is bordered by Jean-Talon Street to the north, Mozart Ave.
The Upper Aulaqi Sultanate ( ) was a state in the British Aden Protectorate and the Federation of South Arabia.
Its capital was Nisab.
Macrozamia moorei is a cycad in the family Zamiaceae, native to Queensland (Australia).
The species was described by Ferdinand von Mueller in 1881, naming it after Charles Moore (1820–1905), director of the Royal Botanic Gardens, Sydney.DescriptionMacrozamia moorei is the tallest-growing species of Macrozamia, growing to  tall with a trunk 50–80 cm diameter.
The 1982–83 season was the 103rd season of competitive football in England.
Diary of the season11 August 1982:
Tvååker is the second largest locality situated in Varberg Municipality, Halland County, Sweden, with 2,534 inhabitants in 2010.
It is located about 15 km south-east of Varberg.
Richard Joseph Pearson (born May 2, 1938) is a Canadian archaeologist.
He grew up in Toronto and Oakville, Ontario, and graduated with a bachelor's degree at the University of Toronto in 1960.
In Mexican politics and labor, a charro or líder charro ("charro leader") is a government-appointed union boss.
Dynamics Mexico has a long tradition of government control and cooptation of unions and their leaders.
Peter W. Travis an emeritus professor of English and Creative Writing at Dartmouth College.
Travis received a BA from Bates College, an MA from Trinity College, and a Ph.D. from the University of Chicago.
Wahidi ( ) was a sultanate in South Arabia, now part of Yemen.
It lay along the Gulf of Aden and bordered Bayḥān to the north, the Upper and Lower ʿAwlaqī sultanates to the west and the Quʿayṭī sultanate in the east.
Vernon Joseph Baker (December 17, 1919 – July 13, 2010) was a United States Army first lieutenant who was an infantry company platoon leader during World War II and a paratrooper during the Korean War.
In 1997, he was awarded the Medal of Honor, the nation's highest military decoration for valor, for his actions on April 5–6, 1945, near Viareggio, Italy.
is a 1995 vertical-scrolling shooter arcade game developed by Cave and published by Atlus in Japan.
Players assume the role of a recruit selected to take part on a secret military program by assaulting enemy strongholds in order to become member of the "DonPachi Squadron".
Russell Shaw Higgs (born 12 May 1960) is a British artist and political activist.
BiographyChildhood Higgs was born in Oswestry 1960.
Wahidi Balhaf ( ), or the Wahidi Sultanate of Balhaf in Hadhramaut (), was one of several Wahidi states in the British Aden Protectorate.
It was previously part of the Federation of Arab Emirates of the South, and then of its successor, the Federation of South Arabia when it was known simply as Wahidi.
The Pascua Yaqui Tribe of Arizona is a federally recognized tribe of Yaqui Native Americans in the state of Arizona.
Descended from the Yaqui people whose original homelands include the Yaqui River valley in western Sonora, Mexico and southern Arizona, the Pascua Yaqui Tribe sought refuge from the United States government in mass during the Mexican Revolution (1910–1920).
Aramesh Dustdar (24 May 1931 – 27 October 2021) was an Iranian philosopher, writer, scholar, and philosophy lecturer at Tehran University.
Dustdar received a Ph.D. degree in philosophy from the University of Bonn.
The spruce carpet (Thera britannica) is a moth in the family Geometridae.
The species was first described by Alfred Jefferis Turner in 1925.
Lethargy was an American technical death metal and mathcore band formed in Rochester, New York by vocalist Erik Burke, drummer Brann Dailor, and bassist Adam Routier.
They would create their first demo titled Lost in This Existence in 1993.
Newspapers in Israel are mostly in Hebrew, but there are also newspapers catering to Arabic speakers, and newspapers catering to immigrants speaking a variety of languages, such as Russian, English and French.
In 2022, a TGI survey indicated that Israel Hayom, distributed for free, is Israel's most read newspaper, with a 31% weekday readership exposure, followed by Yedioth Ahronoth, with 23.9%, Haaretz with 4.7%, and Maariv with 3.5%.
Elizabeth Clarke Wolstenholme-Elmy (died 12 March 1918) was a life-long campaigner and organiser, significant in the history of women's suffrage in the United Kingdom.
She wrote essays and some poetry, using the pseudonyms E and Ignota.
Opposition to the Second Boer War occurred both within and outside of the British Empire.
Among the British public, there was initially much support for the war, though it declined considerably as the conflict dragged on.
Wahidi Bir Ali ( ), or the Wahidi Sultanate of Bir Ali   ( ), was one of several Wahidi states in the British Aden Protectorate and the Protectorate of South Arabia.
Its capital was Bi'r `Ali on the Gulf of Aden coast.
Wahidi Habban ( ), or the Wahidi Sultanate of Habban in Hadhramaut ( ), was one of several Wahidi states in the British Aden Protectorate.
Its capital was Habban.
Piz Platta is the highest peak in the Oberhalbstein Alps.
It is 3392 metres high (Source: Landeskarte der Schweiz no.1256 - 1991), and is notable for its similarity in shape to the Matterhorn.
The 1981–82 season was the 102nd season of competitive football in England.
It was also the first season that the three-points-for-a-win system was introduced.
Mighty Machines is a Canadian educational children's television series that teaches about machines and how they work.
The show premiered in 1994 airing 39 episodes over three seasons until 2008.
Alpine skiing has been contested at every Winter Olympics since 1936, when a combined event was held in Garmisch-Partenkirchen, Germany.
From 1948 to 1980, the Winter Olympics also served as the World Championships in Olympic years, with separate competitions held in even-numbered non-Olympic years.
At Vance is a neoclassical/power metal band formed in Germany.
They were formed by vocalist Oliver Hartmann (ex-Centers) and guitarist Olaf Lenk (ex-Velvet Viper) in 1998.
Manitou Dawn is a fictional superhero character in the DC Comics universe.
Dawn and her late husband Manitou Raven were from the Obsidian Age of Atlantis and were part of the Apache Tribe.
Universal Poplab was a Swedish synth-pop band founded in January 2002 by vocalist Christer Lundberg and producer Paul Lachenardière.
The band's two members have very different backgrounds: Christer is an old-school synth-pop fan, influenced by acts like Soft Cell and Yazoo, Paul is a classically trained musician with roots in jazz, electronica, trance and techno.
William Alfred Carroll Hughes (1877 – 1940) was an American bishop in The Methodist Church, elected in 1940.
He was the first bishop elected by the then Central Jurisdiction of the Church.
A dopamine agonist (DA) is a compound that activates dopamine receptors.
There are two families of dopamine receptors, D2-like and D1-like, and they are all G protein-coupled receptors.
Clynnog Fawr, often simply called "Clynnog", is a village and community on the north coast of Llŷn Peninsula in Gwynedd, north-west Wales.
It is in the historic county of Caernarfonshire.
It's Hard to Write with a Little Hand is the only album by Rochester, New York, mathcore band Lethargy, released in 1996.
The final track, "Humorless," is a remix of "Humor Me".
Salvatore Amitrano (born 3 December 1975 in Castellammare di Stabia, Province of Naples) is an Italian rower.
Amitrano was a member of the Italian men's lightweight rowing team that won a bronze medal at the 2004 Summer Olympics in Athens.
7027 Thornbury Castle was built in August 1949.
Its first shed allocation was Plymouth Laira.
Armin Zöggeler OMRI (born 4 January 1974) is a retired Italian luger and double Olympic champion.
He is one of the most successful men in the sport, nicknamed Il Cannibale ("The Cannibal"), for his notable series of victories, or The Iceblood Champion, for his always cold, rational approach to the races.
James (Jim) Zalesky (born January 15, 1961) is an American college wrestling coach and is currently the head coach of the University of Jamestown.
He was A former head wrestling coach for the Oregon State Beavers.
Bouzareah or Bouzaréah () is a suburb of Algiers, Algeria.
It had a population of 69,200 people in 1998 and an altitude of over 300 meters AMSL.
Mārtiņš Rubenis (born 26 September 1978) is a retired Latvian luger who competed between 1998 and 2014.
He won the bronze medal at the men's singles event at the 2006 Winter Olympics in Turin, becoming the first Latvian (i.e. representing Republic of Latvia, as opposed to the Soviet Union) to win a medal at the Winter Olympics and the only one fr
One Last Dance is a 2003 American-Canadian romantic drama film about three dancers in New York City.
The film was directed and written by Lisa Niemi, wife of actor Patrick Swayze.
The 1980–81 season was the 101st season of competitive football in England.
Diary of the season 9 August 1980:
Pilger (2016 population: ) is a village in the Canadian province of Saskatchewan within the Rural Municipality of Three Lakes No. 400 and Census Division No. 15.
It is approximately  northeast of the City of Saskatoon.
Mid Staffordshire was a parliamentary constituency in the United Kingdom from 1983 until 1997.
It covered a swathe of territory across the centre of Staffordshire, stretching from Lichfield and Rugeley in the south to Stone in the north.
Petrolheads is a BBC television panel game presented by Neil Morrissey, with team captains Richard Hammond and Chris Barrie.
The show pitted motoring wits against each other and included car stunts shot on location.
The Bangladesh Under-19 cricket team represents the nation of Bangladesh in cricket at Under-19 level.
The team has won one Under-19 World Cups.
Qutaibi ( ) or the Qutaibi Sheikhdom ( ) was a polity in the western Aden Protectorate.
It was a dependency of the Emirate of Dhala and is now part of the Republic of Yemen.
The Mercury 13 were thirteen American women who took part in a privately funded program run by William Randolph Lovelace II aiming to test and screen women for spaceflight.
The participants—First Lady Astronaut Trainees (or FLATs) as Jerrie Cobb called them—successfully underwent the same physiological screening tests as had the astronauts selected by NASA on April 9, 1959, for Project Mercury.
The New Zealand Under-19 cricket team have been playing official Under-19 test matches since 1986.
Former captains of the team include Stephen Fleming, Craig McMillan, Chris Cairns, Brendon McCullum, and Ross Taylor New Zealand's coach for the 2020 Under-19 Cricket World Cup is Paul Wiseman.
The following is the list of episodes from the American prime time television soap opera Falcon Crest, which aired for nine seasons on CBS from December 4, 1981 to May 17, 1990.
Series overviewEpisodesSeason 1 (1981–82)Season 2 (1982–83){{Episode table |background=#E38181 |overall=5 |season=5 |title=17 |director=14 |writer=29 |airdate=14 |prodcode=16 |episodes={{Episode list|EpisodeNumber=21|EpisodeNumber2=3|Title=Troubled Waters|DirectedBy=Harry Harris|WrittenBy=Stephen Black & Henry Stern|OriginalAirDate= |ProdCode=203|ShortSummary=Richard Channing aggressively seeks to buy the Agretti land.
Griffon Aerospace is an aerospace company located in Madison, Alabama with additional offices located in Fort Bliss, TX.
Griffon designs, develops, and operates aerospace systems including manned and unmanned aircraft, UAV ground support systems, and advanced composite structures.
General Sir Archibald James Murray,  (23 April 1860 – 21 January 1945) was a British Army officer who served in the Second Boer War and the First World War.
He was Chief of Staff to the British Expeditionary Force (BEF) in August 1914 but appears to have suffered a physical breakdown in the retreat from Mons, and was required to step down from that position in January 1915.
The Uganda Under-19 cricket team represents the nation of Uganda in under-19 cricket at international level.
Uganda has qualified for the Under-19 Cricket World Cup on three occasions—in 2004, 2006 and 2022.
A bantam, in British Army usage, was a soldier of below the army's minimum regulation height of .
During the First World War, the British Army raised battalions in which the normal minimum height requirement for recruits was reduced from  to .
The Australian Under-19 cricket team have been playing official Under-19 test matches since 1978.
Former captains include Stuart Law, Damien Martyn, Brad Haddin, Nathan Hauritz and Cameron White who have all gone on to play international cricket for Australia.
Na Castelloza (fl.
early 13th century) was a noblewoman and trobairitz from Auvergne.
The West Indies under-19 cricket team represents the countries of Cricket West Indies in international under-19 cricket.
The West Indies is one of only five teams to participate in every edition of the Under-19 Cricket World Cup, along with England, India, Pakistan and Sri Lanka.
The South African Under-19 cricket team have been playing official Under-19 test matches since 1995.
International players to have represented the team include Wayne Parnell, Neil McKenzie, AB de Villiers, Mark Boucher, Makhaya Ntini, Kagiso Rabada, Andile Phehlukwayo and  Aiden Markram.
The United States national under-19 cricket team represents the United States in international under-19 cricket.
The team is coached by Asif Mujtaba and is captained by Rishi Ramesh.
The Indian Under-19 cricket team represents the nation of India in cricket at Under-19 level.
The team has won five Under-19 World Cups and has the best win percentage in ODIs (77%) among all Under-19 national teams.
The Sri Lankan Under-19 cricket team is the cricket team that represents Sri Lanka in International Under-19 Cricket.
It consists of school-aged cricketers.
The Namibia national under-19 cricket team represents Namibia in under-19 international cricket.
Namibia has won the ICC Africa Under-19 Championships a record number of times.
The Scotland Under-19 cricket team represents the nation of Scotland in Under-19 cricket at international level.
Scotland has qualified for the Under-19 Cricket World Cup on eight occasions, the third-most of European countries behind England and Ireland.
This is a list of newspapers and news websites published in Montenegro.
List of publicationsNews websites  Cafe del Montenegro (CdM), Montenegrin in the Latin alphabet  Portal Analitika, Montenegrin in the Latin alphabet The Montenegro Times, first English newspaper.
Caerphilly Castle is a member of the GWR 4073 Class built in 1923.
In serviceThe lead locomotive of its class, after a brief period of running-in service, between April and October 1924, the locomotive was exhibited at the British Empire Exhibition, which was held at Wembley Park, Wembley, north-west London.
The Zimbabwe national under-19 cricket team represents Zimbabwe in under-19 international cricketZimbabwe has qualified for the Under-19 Cricket World Cup on every occasion since 1998, by virtue of being a full member of the International Cricket Council (ICC).
The coach of the team for the 2022 Under-19 Cricket World Cup is Prosper Utseya, and the team captain is Emmanuel BawaHistoryZimbabwe has made the second round of the Under-19 World Cup on three occasions – in South Africa 1998, Bangladesh 2004 and Sri Lanka 2006.
The Wellesley College Senate bus is a shuttle bus service that connects Wellesley College to the Massachusetts Institute of Technology and Harvard University.
History Until November 1966, transportation at Wellesley consisted of a shuttle to the Woodland MBTA Green Line stop in the nearby city of Newton.
The England Under-19 cricket team have been playing official Under-19 Test matches since 1974.
Prior to 1991/92 they were known as England Young Cricketers.
Discography '93–'99 is a career-spanning compilation of tracks by Lethargy, a Rochester, New York-based mathcore band.
Track listingDisc oneSubtle (3:29)Stitch (3:43)
The Ireland national under-19 cricket team represents All-Ireland in under-19 international cricket.
Ireland has qualified for the Under-19 Cricket World Cup on eight occasions, most recently in 2018.
Radfan or the Radfan Hills is a region of the Republic of Yemen.
In the 1960s, the area was part of a British protectorate of Dhala (a member of the Federation of South Arabia) and was the site of intense fighting during the Aden Emergency.
Červené Dřevo () is a hamlet in Chudenín in Klatovy District in the Plzeň Region of the Czech Republic.
GeographyČervené Dřevo is located about  southwest of Klatovy, about 1 km east of the border with Germany.
Harry Whittington (February 4, 1915 – June 11, 1989) was an American mystery novelist and one of the pioneers of the paperback novel.
Born in Ocala, Florida, he worked in government jobs before becoming a writer.
The West End is a neighborhood of Boston, Massachusetts, bounded generally by Cambridge Street to the south, the Charles River to the west and northwest, North Washington Street on the north and northeast, and New Sudbury Street on the east.
Beacon Hill is to the south, North Point is across the Charles River to the north, Kendall Square is across the Charles River to the west, and the North End is to the east.
Aragarças is a municipality in southwest Goiás state, Brazil.
LocationAragarças is the most important town in the Aragarças Microregion.
The men's downhill of the 2006 Winter Olympics was held at Sestriere, Italy, on Sunday, 12 February.
The men's downhill competition is the marquee outdoor event of the Winter Olympics, and is the first alpine event on the schedule.
The Army Bureau of Current Affairs (ABCA) was an organisation within the British Army during World War II to promote discussion among soldiers about current events, citizenship, and post-war reconstruction.
In August 1940, Lord Croft, Under-Secretary of State for War, had sought the advice of Dr Tom Jones – renowned for his commitment to adult education – about supplying 'mental stimulant' to troops.
Alan Woodward (7 September 1946 – 21 May 2015) was a professional footballer who played in the position of outside right for Sheffield United over a 16-year period between 1962 and 1978.
Woodward or Woody as he was nicknamed, will be best remembered for his powerful shots.
Frontier North, Inc. is a local telephone operating company owned by Frontier Communications.
HistoryFrontier North was founded as Contel North, Inc., incorporated in Wisconsin in 1992.
The 1979–80 season was the 100th season of competitive football in England.
Diary of the season11 August 1979:
Hakkasan is a Chinese restaurant first opened in Fitzrovia in London, England but has since expanded to many cities worldwide.
The restaurant was founded in 2001 by Alan Yau, who was also behind the Wagamama Japanese restaurants and later the Yauatcha restaurant, also in London.
Isabella Freedman Jewish Retreat Center is a project of Hazon that sits on 400 acres of forest and meadows in the foothills of the southern Berkshires in Litchfield County, Connecticut.
Isabella Freedman hosts organizational retreats, Jewish spiritual and environmental events, and private Jewish celebrations including weddings and B'nai Mitzvah.
The Popsicle EP is the first EP and third major release by the "spunk rock" band
Zolof the Rock & Roll Destroyer.
Tang Zhen (, 1630–1704), born Tang Dadao (唐大陶), courtesy name Zhuwan (铸万), was a Chinese philosopher and educator born in Dazhou during the late Ming and early Qing dynasties.
His given name was Dahao, but later he changed his given name to Zhen and his courtesy name to Puyuan (圃園).
Emília Vášáryová, Doctor Artis Dramaticae (hon.)
(; born 18 May 1942) is a Slovak stage and screen actress, whom Variety and other publications refer to as the "First Lady of Slovak Theater".
The National Organization of Social Security Claimants' Representatives (NOSSCR), established in 1979, is an association of more than 4,000 attorneys, non-attorney representatives, and paralegals who represent Social Security Disability Insurance and Supplemental Security Income claimants.
The organization provides continuing education and training for persons who represent claimants for disability benefits.
Union of Cinema Production Workers () was an autonomous (non-"charro"-led) Mexican trade union.
It was formed in 1944 after splitting off from the CTM-affiliated Union of Cinema Industry Workers (Sindicato de Trabajadores de la Industria Cinematográfica, (STIC)).
Huntingtons are a punk band from Baltimore, Maryland which formed in 1993 in the Maryland and Delaware area by Cliff Powell (a.k.a.
Cliffy Huntington), Mike Holt (a.k.a. Mikey Huntington) and Mike Pierce (a.k.a. Mikee Huntington).
John Robert Cherry III (October 11, 1948 – May 8, 2022) was an American film director and screenwriter, most notable for creating the character of Ernest P. Worrell, played by Jim Varney.
CareerA native of Nashville, Tennessee, Cherry attended the Ringling School of Art and Design in Sarasota, Florida.
John Stanley Marshall (28 August 1941 – 16 September 2023) was an English drummer and founding member of the jazz rock band Nucleus.
From 1972 to 1978, he was the drummer for Soft Machine, replacing Phil Howard when he joined.
Ratu Sairusi Nagagavoka (1920–2014) was a Fijian chief and political leader from Ba Province.
He held the traditional title of  Momo na Tui Ba (Tai Ko BULU) , commonly abbreviated to Tui Ba Bulu, and as such was one of two paramount chiefs in the Ba district of Ba Province.
Jeremiah Hacker (1801 – August 27, 1895) was a missionary, reformer, vegetarian, and journalist who wrote and published The Pleasure Boat and The Chariot of Wisdom and Love in Portland, Maine from 1845 to 1866.
BiographyBorn in Brunswick, Maine to a large Quaker family, Hacker moved to Portland as a young adult.
AKA is a 2002 drama film, the first by director and writer Duncan Roy.
The film is set in the late 1970s in Britain and deals with the story of Dean, an 18-year-old boy who assumes another identity in order to enter high society.
Derrick Williams (born July 6, 1986) is a former American football wide receiver.
He was selected by the Detroit Lions with the 18th pick of the 3rd round of the 2009 NFL Draft.
The Quebec City Area (or Région de Québec in French) is the metropolitan area surrounding Quebec City, in the Canadian province of Quebec.
It consists of two administrative regions: Capitale-Nationale and Chaudière-Appalaches.
In a Windows network, NT (New Technology) LAN Manager (NTLM) is a suite of Microsoft security protocols intended to provide authentication, integrity, and confidentiality to users.
NTLM is the successor to the authentication protocol in Microsoft LAN Manager (LANMAN), an older Microsoft product.
Jón Helgason (June 30, 1899 - January 19, 1986) was an Icelandic philologist and poet.
He was head of the Danish Árni Magnússon Institute for Icelandic Studies from 1927 to 1972 and professor of Icelandic studies at the University of Copenhagen from 1929 to 1969.
A student leader is any student who takes on the responsibility of spreading knowledge through inspiration, tutoring, campaigns etc.
A student leader strives to change the world by starting with their own community.
Kudai are a Chilean pop rock band from Santiago, Chile, formed in early 2000.
The group is composed of Pablo Holman, Bábara Sepúlveda, Tomás Manzi, and Nicole Natalino, who left the group in 2006 citing personal reasons, and was replaced by Ecuadorian Gabriela Villalba for three years.
The 1978–79 season was the 99th season of competitive football in England.
Diary of the season12 August 1978:
High School Rock is the fourth studio album by American rock band the Huntingtons, released in 1998 on Tooth & Nail Records, the band's first for the label.
A remastered version was released in 2009, available as a digital download.
The Sullivan Athletic Center is an athletic facility on the campus of DePaul University in Chicago, Illinois.
The facility houses McGrath-Phillips Arena, a 3,000-seat multi-purpose arena.
The Hour of Slack is a one-hour radio program produced by the Church of the SubGenius centering on the King of Slack, J. R. "Bob" Dobbs.
Reverend Ivan Stang presents his own commentary, along with recorded material from all SubGenius radio and stage shows, bands, ranters, media barrage collage artists, and selections from the indie audio underground created by various SubGenii and others.
The Awful Green Things from Outer Space (AGTFOS) is a two-player space combat board game developed and illustrated by Tom Wham.
Publication historyTSRThe Awful Green Things from Outer Space was first published as an insert in the July 1979 edition of [[Dragon (magazine)|Dragon magazine]] (Issue #28).
The University of Oriente (UDO), founded in 1958, is one of the most important national (Federal) universities in Venezuela and the main autonomous university institution dedicated to teaching, research and development in Eastern Venezuela, which has an approximate area of 365,878 km², 40% of the entire surface of Venezuela.
With the commitment to train university professionals for the industries where the world's largest accumulation of heavy and extra-heavy oil, gas, coltan, uranium, coal, gold, diamonds, bauxite and underlying rare earths are found in the Guiana Shield or, the oldest geological formation on earth.
Sarojini Pillay is a Fijian academic of Indian descent.
In the second week of February 2006, Pillay, a former Registrar of the University of the South Pacific (USP), was appointed as the first Registrar of the newly founded University of Fiji, scheduled to take up her duties on 13 March.
Macdonaldtown is an urban place in Sydney, in the state of New South Wales, Australia.
It is 4 kilometres south-west of the Sydney central business district, adjacent to the suburbs of Newtown, Eveleigh and Erskineville.
The Colbys is an American prime time television soap opera that originally aired on ABC from November 20, 1985, to March 26, 1987.
Produced by Aaron Spelling, it was a spin-off of Dynasty, which had been the highest rated series for the 1984–1985 U.S. television season.
Jon Lynn Christensen (born February 20, 1963) is an American politician and corporate executive who is a former member of the United States House of Representatives.
Early lifeJon Lynn Christensen was born on February 20, 1963, in St. Paul, Nebraska, to Audrey and Harlan Christensen.
The Arbatel De Magia Veterum () is a Latin grimoire of Renaissance ceremonial magic published in 1575 in Switzerland.
Title A. E. Waite assumes that the title is from the  (or Arbotal) as the name of an angel the author would have claimed to have learned magic from.
Constanze Manziarly (14 April 1920 – disappeared 2 May 1945) was born in Innsbruck, Austria.
She served as a cook and dietitian to Adolf Hitler until his final days in Berlin in 1945.
Air Marshal Sir Hector Douglas McGregor,  (15 February 1910 – 11 April 1973) was a senior Royal Air Force commander.
RAF careerBorn in New Zealand and educated at Napier Boys' High School, McGregor joined the Royal Air Force in 1928.
The Twelve Grapes (Sp. , "the twelve grapes of luck") is a Spanish tradition that consists of eating a grape with each of the twelve clock bell strikes at midnight of December 31 to welcome the New Year.
Each grape and clock bell strike represents each of the coming twelve months.
Timothy Manning (Irish: Tadhg Ó Mongáin) (November 15, 1909 – June 23, 1989) was an Irish American prelate of the Roman Catholic Church.
He served as Archbishop of Los Angeles from 1970 to 1985, and was elevated to the cardinalate in 1973.
Everyday Food (from the test kitchens of Martha Stewart Living) was a digest size cooking magazine and PBS public television program published and produced by Martha Stewart Living Omnimedia (MSLO).
Both feature quick and easy recipes targeted at supermarket shoppers and the everyday cook.History and profileEveryday Food was established in 2003.
The Zipser Germans, Zipser Saxons, or, simply, just Zipsers (, , , ) are a German-speaking (more specifically Zipser German-speaking as native dialect) sub-ethnic group in Central-Eastern Europe and national minority in both Slovakia and Romania (there are also Zipser German settlements in the Zakarpattia Oblast, in the historical region of Carpathian Ruthenia, present-day western Ukraine).
Along with the Sudeten Germans (), the Zipser Germans were one of the two most important ethnic German groups in the former Czechoslovakia.
James W. Abbott (born June 12, 1948) is an American retired politician and academic, most recently serving as the president of the University of South Dakota from 1997 to 2018.
Abbott was the Democratic nominee in the 2002 South Dakotan gubernatorial election.
Catterlen is a small village and civil parish  north west of Penrith, Cumbria.
At the 2001 census the civil parish had a population of 471, increasing to 605 at the 2011 Census.
Namco was a video game developer and publisher, originally from Japan.
Bandai Namco Entertainment is the successor to Namco and continues manufacturing and distributing video games worldwide.
The Library of Adventures () is a popular series of adventure novels published by Detgiz in the Soviet Union in 1955 and reprinted in 1981.
The series, much sought after by Soviet book collectors, comprised twenty books, more or less accurately reflecting the tastes of an adolescent Russophone readership.
A muffin or cupcake tray  is a mold in which muffins or cupcakes are baked.
A single cup within a regular muffin tin is  and most often has room for 12 muffins, although tins holding 6, 8, 11, 24, and 35 muffins do exist.
Rocket to Ramonia is an album by the Huntingtons released in 1996 in cooperation with the Flying Tart Recording Company, a division of Burnt Toast Vinyl.
All tracks on the album are cover versions of Ramones songs.
Devil's Ground is the fifth album by German power metal band Primal Fear.
It was released on 23 February 2004.
Leonard Bernard Stern (December 23, 1922 – June 7, 2011) was an American screenwriter, film and television producer, director, and one of the creators, with Roger Price, of the word game Mad Libs.Life and careerStern was born in New York City and majored in journalism at New York University.
He was a Women’s Army Corps recruiter while serving in the Army during World War II.
The eastern falanouc (Eupleres goudotii) is a rare mongoose-like mammal in the carnivoran family Eupleridae endemic to Madagascar .
It is classified alongside the Western falanouc (Eupleres major), recognized only in 2010, in the genus Eupleres.
Richard Vaughan (born 16 April 1978) is a Welsh and British badminton player from Llanbradach, Caerphilly, Wales.
Vaughan was the Chief Executive of Badminton Ireland between 2011 - 2015.
An ice cream bar is a frozen dessert featuring ice cream on a stick.
The confection was patented in the US in the 1920s, with one invalidated in 1928.
Dynasty is an American prime time television soap opera that aired on ABC from January 12, 1981, to May 11, 1989.
The series, created by Richard and Esther Shapiro and produced by Aaron Spelling, revolves around the Carringtons, a wealthy family residing in Denver, Colorado.
The 1976–77 season was the 97th season of competitive football in England.
This year The Football League revamped the tie-breaking criteria for teams level on points, replacing the traditional goal average tiebreaker with one based on goal difference to try to encourage more scoring.
The Lethbridge Herald is the leading daily newspaper in greater Lethbridge, Alberta, Canada.
It is owned by Alta Newspaper Group and also publishes and distributes a weekly newspaper, the Lethbridge Sun Times.
Walther Hewel (25 March 1904 – 2 May 1945) was a German diplomat before and during World War II, an early and active member of the Nazi Party, and one of German dictator Adolf Hitler's personal friends.
Early lifeHewel was born in 1904 to Anton and Elsa Hewel in Cologne in the Rhineland, where his father ran a cocoa factory.
The Aden-Abyan Islamic Army (AAIA, ) is an Islamist militant group based in southern Yemen, led by Zein al-Abideen al-Mehdar (also known as Abu El-Hassan El-Mohader).
The group has been designated as a terrorist organization by Bahrain, Canada and the United Kingdom.
Delčevo ( ) is a small town in the eastern mountainous part of North Macedonia.
It is the municipal seat of the eponymous municipality.
Seycove Secondary School is a Canadian high school in the Deep Cove neighbourhood of the District of North Vancouver, British Columbia.
Located just east of Dollarton Highway, the school has a student population of approximately 500 students in grades 8 through 12.
The Workers' Unity League (WUL) was established in January 1930 as a militant industrial union labour central closely related to the Communist Party of Canada on the instructions of the Communist International.
This was reflective of the shift in the Communist International's political line that ushered in its "Third Period".
Arron Matthew Oberholser (born February 2, 1975) is an American professional golfer and an analyst and commentator for the Golf Channel.
Early life and amateur career Oberholser was born in San Luis Obispo, California.
Tihamah or Tihama ( ) refers to the Red Sea coastal plain of the Arabian Peninsula from the Gulf of Aqaba to the Bab el Mandeb.
EtymologyTihāmat is the Proto-Semitic language's term for 'sea'.
Yauatcha is a Chinese restaurant in Broadwick Street, Soho, London, England, specialising in dim sum.
The restaurant was created in 2004 by Alan Yau, who previously created the Japanese Wagamama and  Thai Busaba Eathai restaurant chains as well as the more expensive Hakkasan restaurant, also in London.
The Royal Air Force's Logistics Command was a command formed to provide logistics support for the RAF.
HistoryThe Command was formed on 1 April 1994 and its role was to provide logistics support to the RAF.
100 Demons is an American metalcore band from Waterbury, Connecticut.
Being fans of tattoos, the band derived their name from a book of traditional Japanese tattoo artwork by Horiyoshi III.
Theresa Magdalena "Tisa" Farrow (born July 22, 1951) is a retired American actress and model.
Early lifeFarrow was born in Los Angeles, California, the daughter of Irish-born actress Maureen O'Sullivan and Australian-born film director John Farrow.
Choum () is a town in northern Mauritania, lying in the Adrar Region close to the border with Western Sahara.
In the year 2000, Choum had a population of 2,735.
Maa-alused are, in Estonian folk religion, mysterious elf-like creatures which live beneath the ground.
They were believed to have a parallel existence to that of humans, the principal differences being that all orientations are reversed, such that up becomes down and left becomes right, and that all things possessed by them are diminished in size.
Horlick Field, located on the north side of Racine, Wisconsin, in the United States, is a 5,000-seat football stadium and a baseball park enclosed within stone walls and chain fences.
The land for the field was donated by William Horlick, the inventor of malted milk.
The Running Horse is a pub in the town of Leatherhead, Surrey, England.
It is Grade II* listed.
Jiko Fatafehi Luveni ( – 22 December 2018) was a Fijian politician and Speaker of the Parliament of Fiji.
She was a member of the FijiFirst party before resigning her party membership in order to take up the position of Speaker.
The London Symphony Chorus (abbreviated to LSC) is a large symphonic concert choir based in London, UK, consisting of over 150 amateur singers, and is one of the major symphony choruses of the United Kingdom.
It was formed in 1966 as the LSO Chorus to complement the work of the London Symphony Orchestra (LSO).
The Dhruva reactor is India's largest nuclear research reactor.
It was the first nuclear reactor in Asia proper.
Upper Yemen () and Lower Yemen are traditional regions of the north western highland mountains of Yemen.
Northern Highlands and Southern Highlands are terms more commonly used presently.
Lower Yemen () and Upper Yemen are traditional regions of the north western highland mountains of Yemen.
Northern Highlands and Southern Highlands are terms more commonly used presently.
William Moses Roberts Jr. (August 16, 1936 – October 7, 2017) was an American songwriter and musician credited with composing the 1960s rock music standard "Hey Joe.
"BiographyRoberts attended The Citadel, The Military College of South Carolina but left school for the life of an itinerant musician.
John Edward Walsh  (12 November 1816 – 20 October 1869) was an Irish lawyer and Conservative politician.
He served as Attorney-General for Ireland in 1866 and as Master of the Rolls in Ireland from 1866 to 1869.
Guinness Foreign Extra Stout (FES) is a stout produced by the Guinness Brewery, an Irish brewing company owned by Diageo, a drinks multinational.
First brewed by Guinness in 1801, FES was designed for export, and is more heavily hopped than Guinness Draught and Extra Stout, which gives it a more bitter taste, and typically has a higher alcohol content (at around 7.5% ABV).
Angelo Buccarello, OSST (born 12 May 1942) is an Italian Catholic priest and member of the Trinitarians known for his founding of the Catholic Chaplaincy for Prisons.
BiographyBuccarello was born in Castrignano del Capo, a small Town in Southern Italy, on 12 May 1942.
The number of national daily newspapers in Greece was 68 in 1950 and it increased to 156 in 1965.
Mid through the Greek financial crisis in 2016, on a national level there were 15 daily general interest, 11 daily sports, 4 daily business, 10 weekly and 16 Sunday newspapers in circulation.
Richard Vaughan (born 28 July 1971) is a robotics and artificial intelligence researcher at Simon Fraser University in Canada.
Since 2018, Vaughan is on leave from SFU and is working at Apple.
Knots Landing is an American prime time television soap opera that aired from December 27, 1979, to May 13, 1993.
The show centered on the personal and professional lives of the residents of Seaview Circle, a cul-de-sac in the suburb of Knots Landing, California.
The Super is a 1991 American comedy film directed by Rod Daniel and starring Joe Pesci as a New York City slum landlord sentenced to live in one of his own buildings until it is brought up to code.
Screenwriter Nora Ephron co-scripted the story with Sam Simon.
The Palace of the Governors () is an adobe structure built in the Territorial Style of Pueblo architecture on Palace Avenue in Santa Fe, New Mexico.
Located within the Santa Fe Historic District along the Santa Fe Plaza between Lincoln and Washington avenues, it has served as the seat of government for New Mexico for centuries, having been established as the capitol building of Nuevo México in 1610.
This is a list of newspapers in the Republic of Cyprus.
Daily newspapersGreek languageAlithia Haravgi MakhiPhileleftheros Politis SimeriniEnglish languageCyprus MailDiscontinuedThe Cyprus TimesWeeklyGreek languageKathimeriniEnglish languageCyprus ObserverCyprus TodayCyprus Weekly Financial MirrorSee alsoList of newspapersList of newspapers in Northern CyprusMedia of CyprusReferencesNewspapersCyprus
Barbara Crampton (born December 27, 1958) is an American actress and producer.
She began her career in the 1980s in television soap operas before starring in horror and thriller films—both paths would define her continued accolade-winning career.
Thomas Henry Carter (October 30, 1854September 17, 1911) was an American politician, who served as territorial delegate, a United States representative, and a U.S. Senator from Montana.
Carter was born in Junior Furnace, Ohio, on October 30, 1854.
Mameria is an area of high-elevation jungle to the northeast of the Paucartambo range in southeast Peru, drained by the Mameria river, an affluent of the Nistrón river.
Until the 1960s this remote and sparsely populated area would have been considered a part of the Callanga jungle area.
The Malcolm Willey House is located in Minneapolis, Minnesota, United States.
It was designed by the American architect Frank Lloyd Wright, and built in 1934.
Dallas is an American prime time television soap opera that revolves around the Ewings, a wealthy Texas family in the oil and cattle-ranching industries.
The show was famous for its cliffhangers, including the "Who shot J.R.?" mystery and the "Dream Season".
The Daily Gamecock (formerly The Gamecock) is the editorially independent student news organization of the University of South Carolina.
It primarily serves the main campus of the University of South Carolina System in the state of South Carolina.
Regulation of the telephone numbers in Serbia is under the responsibility of the Regulatory Agency of Electronic Communication and Mail Services (RATEL), independent from the government.
The country calling code of Serbia is +381.
A picocell is a small cellular base station typically covering a small area, such as in-building (offices, shopping malls, train stations, stock exchanges, etc.), or more recently in-aircraft.
In cellular networks, picocells are typically used to extend coverage to indoor areas where outdoor signals do not reach well, or to add network capacity in areas with very dense phone usage, such as train stations or stadiums.
Sumner P. Hunt (Brooklyn, New York state, May 8, 1865 – Los Angeles, California, November 19, 1938) was an architect in Los Angeles from 1888 to the 1930s.
On January 21, 1892, he married Mary Hancock Chapman, January 21, 1892.
Billy Barnes (January 27, 1927 – September 25, 2012) was a composer, lyricist and actor from Los Angeles, California.
Barnes may be best known for his theatrical revues and his recurring role as Mr. Edlin on the television series Mad About You.
Chaneque, Chanekeh, or Ohuican Chaneque, as they were called by the Aztecs, are legendary creatures in Mexican folklore, meaning "those who inhabit dangerous places" or "owners of the house" in Náhuatl.
These small, sprite-like beings hold a connection to elemental forces and are regarded as guardians of nature.
Luis Morones Negrete (1890 – 1964), also known as Luis Napoleón Morones, was a Mexican major union leader, politician, and government official.
He was a pragmatic politician who experienced a rapid rise to prominence from modest roots and made strategic alliances.
Time Walker is a 1982 science fiction horror film directed by Tom Kennedy.
The film received negative reviews from critics.
Christopher Anderson Whyte (born 2 September 1961) is an English former footballer who played as a central defender and made nearly 400 appearances in the Football League and Premier League.
He had lengthy spells with Arsenal, West Bromwich Albion, Leeds Unitedwhere he was a pivotal part of their 1991–92 title-winning teamand Birmingham City, and also played for numerous other clubs in England and abroad.
Gordon Bernie Kaufmann (19 March 1888 – 1 March 1949) was an English-born American architect mostly known for his work on the Hoover Dam.
Early life On 19 March 1888, Kaufmann was born in Forest Hill, London, England.
Yahtzee is an American game show that premiered on January 11, 1988.
Based on the dice game Yahtzee, the show was hosted by Peter Marshall, with Larry Hovis serving as both the show's announcer and a regular panelist.
Basket Case 2 is a 1990 American comedy slasher film written and directed by Frank Henenlotter, and the sequel to the 1982 film Basket Case.
It stars Kevin Van Hentenryck as Duane Bradley, who moves with his deformed, formerly conjoined twin brother Belial into a home for "unique individuals" run by their long-lost aunt, eccentric philanthropist Granny Ruth (played by Annie Ross).
Just Glü It is the debut album by the L.A. punk rock band Glue Gun.
It was released in April 1994 (see 1994 in music).
Settimia Caccini (6 October 1591 – , Italy) was a well-known Italian singer and composer during the 1600s, being one of the first women to have a successful career in music.
Caccini was highly regarded for her artistic and technical work with music.
Dubsound & Power is a 2000 album by Christafari.
It contains instrumental mixes of songs from his WordSound&Power album.
The Turin Metro () is the modern VAL rapid transit system serving Turin.
It is operated by Gruppo Torinese Trasporti (GTT), a public company controlled by the municipality of Turin.
Whortle's Hope is a dark fantasy novel for children by British author Robin Jarvis.
It is the second book in The Deptford Mouselets series, prequels to Jarvis's Deptford Mice trilogy aimed at a slightly younger audience.
A rotary vane pump is a type of positive-displacement pump that consists of vanes mounted to a rotor that rotates inside a cavity.
In some cases these vanes can have variable length and/or be tensioned to maintain contact with the walls as the pump rotates.
Pia Ann-Kristin Johansson (born 16 November 1960 in Umeå) is a Swedish actor, lecturer and examinator.
Johansson studied at the Skara scene school, which was followed by a degree from Swedish National Academy of Mime and Acting in 1989.
Proprietary hardware is computer hardware whose interface is controlled by the proprietor, often under patent or trade-secret protection.
Historically, most early computer hardware was designed as proprietary until the 1980s, when IBM PC changed this paradigm.
Voodoo Dawn is a 1991 American horror film directed by Steven Fierberg and starring Tony Todd, Raymond St. Jacques, Theresa Merritt and Gina Gershon.
It was written by Jeffrey Delman, Evan Dunsky, Thomas Rendon and John A. Russo, and produced by Steven D. Mackler.
A Tootsie Pop (known as Tutsi Chupa Pop in Latin America) is a hard candy lollipop filled with the chocolate-flavored chewy Tootsie Roll candy.
They were invented in 1931 by an employee of The Sweets Company of America.
USS Lee Fox (DE-65/ADP-45), a  of the United States Navy, was named in honor of Ensign Lee Fox (1920–1941), who was killed in action during the Japanese attack on Pearl Harbor, on 7 December 1941.
Lee Fox was laid down on 1 March 1943 at the Bethlehem-Hingham Shipyard, Inc., in Hingham, Massachusetts; launched on 29 May 1943, sponsored by Mrs. Lee Fox, mother of Ensign Fox; and commissioned on 30 August 1943.
The sorption pump is a vacuum pump that creates a vacuum by adsorbing molecules on a very porous material like molecular sieve which is cooled by a cryogen, typically liquid nitrogen.
The ultimate pressure is about 10−2 mbar.
Siblicide (attributed by behavioural ecologist Doug Mock to Barbara M. Braun) is the killing of an infant individual by its close relatives (full or half siblings).
It may occur directly between siblings or be mediated by the parents, and is driven by the direct fitness benefits to the perpetrator and sometimes its parents.
In music, standard tuning refers to the typical tuning of a string instrument.
This notion is contrary to that of scordatura, i.e. an alternate tuning designated to modify either the timbre or technical capabilities of the desired instrument.
This is a list of newspapers in Belize.
Major newspapers  Amandala, established in 1969, offers a mix of national news, sports, and editorial opinion The Belize Times, official newspaper of the People's United Party The Guardian, official newspaper of the United Democratic Party The Reporter, weekly independent newspaper established in 1967Minor newspapers  Ambergris Today: rival to The San Pedro Sun on Ambergris Caye Caye Caulker Chronicles: chief paper for village of Caye Caulker The Placencia Breeze: tourism paper for Placencia The San Pedro Daily: online newspaper The San Pedro Sun: respected source for San Pedro The Wabagari Post: local newspaper of Dangriga TownDefunct newspapers  The Alliance Weekly: weekly newspaper published in Belize City (1990s)
The Scene Is Not for Sale is the second and last album by the L.A. punk rock band Glue Gun.
It was released in November 1995.
This is a list of winners and nominees of the Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Supporting Actor in a Limited or Anthology Series or Movie.
Before 1975, supporting actors featured in a miniseries or movie were included in categories such as comedy or drama.
William Heaton Cooper RA (6 October 1903 – 1995) was an English impressionistic landscape artist who worked predominantly in watercolours, most famous for his paintings of the Lake District.
Since the 1950s, he has become known as one of the most celebrated British landscape artists of the 20th century.
Howard Frank Mosher (June 2, 1942 – January 29, 2017) was an American author of thirteen books: eleven fiction and two non-fiction.
Much of his fiction takes place in the mid-20th century and all of it is set in the Northeast Kingdom of Vermont, a region loosely defined by the three counties in the northeastern corner of the state (Essex, Orleans, and Caledonia).
Judith Nisse Shklar (September 24, 1928 – September 17, 1992) was a philosopher and political theorist who studied the history of political thought, notably that of the Enlightenment period.
She was appointed the John Cowles Professor of Government at Harvard University in 1980.
NGC 1309 is a spiral galaxy located approximately 120 million light-years away, appearing in the constellation Eridanus.
It is about 75,000 light-years across, and is about 3/4s the width of the Milky Way.
America by Havalina was released in 1999 on Wignalls' own label, Jackson Rubio.
It is a musical tour of America by region and draws on many regional musical influences.
This is a list of newspapers in the Bahamas.
Newspapers Abaconian, Marsh Harbour, AbacoThe Bahama Journal - Nassau, New ProvidenceBahamas NationalBahamas News Ma Bey, founded in 2009, headquarters located in Orlando, FloridaBahamas PressBahamas SpectatorBahamas UncensoredBahamas WeeklyEleutheran, EleutheraThe Freeport News - Freeport, Grand Bahama IslandThe Nassau Guardian - Nassau, New ProvidenceOfficial Gazette The Bahamas, founded in 1783, official newspaper of the Bahamas' governmentThe Punch - Nassau, New ProvidenceThe Tribune - Nassau, New ProvidenceSee alsoTelevision in the BahamasReferences BahamasNewspapers
, meaning Heavenly Dragonfly, was a manzai comedy duo consisting of  and .
Members of the Yoshimoto Kogyo entertainment conglomerate, they performed on the Fuji TV variety show Mecha-Mecha Iketeru!
Strangeland is a 1998 American horror film written by Dee Snider and directed by John Pieplow.
The film centers around a police detective trying to save his city, as well as his daughter, from an online predator who enjoys bringing "enlightenment" through ritual pain.
This is a list of newspapers in Costa Rica.
Newspapers The Costa Rica News, daily, in English Diario Extra, daily, in Spanish; tabloid press; the country's principal newspaper by circulation La Nación, daily, in Spanish La Prensa Libre, daily, in Spanish; first newspaper founded in the country La Teja, daily, in Spanish The Tico Times, weekly, in EnglishSee also  Media of Costa RicaReferencesFurther readingExternal linksqcostarica.com, daily news, in English  Costa RicaNewspapers published in Costa RicaMagazines published in Costa RicaNewspapers
A New Covenant was a political slogan used by U.S. President Bill Clinton to describe his political philosophy and agenda.
The term was used sporadically during the 1992 campaign and Clinton's terms in office to describe a "new social compact" between the United States Government and its citizens.
The IWK Health Centre is a major pediatric hospital and trauma centre in Halifax, Nova Scotia that provides care to maritime youth, children and women from Nova Scotia, New Brunswick, Prince Edward Island and beyond.
The IWK is the largest facility in Atlantic Canada caring for children, youth and adolescents, and is the only Level 1 pediatric trauma centre east of Quebec.
Fielfraz was a Danish band, which had its heyday between 1990 and 1996.
The band members were Claus Hempler on guitar and vocals, Nils Brakchi on bass, Kenneth Priisholm on guitar (lead) and Jens Langhorn on drums.
Tyson Mao (born May 8, 1984, in San Francisco, California) is an American Rubik's Cube speedsolver.
He is a co-founder and a former board member of the World Cube Association, an organization that holds competitive events for the Rubik's Cube.
IWK may refer to:IWK Health CentreIndah Water KonsortiumIndigenous Weather KnowledgeIndustrie-Werke KarlsruheInitiativen Wirtschaft für
KunstInstitut für Wiener Klangstil (Institute for Viennese Sound Style IWK) IATA code for Marine Corps Air Station Iwakuni
John David Wathan (; born October 4, 1949) is an American former professional baseball player, coach and manager.
He played his entire career in Major League Baseball as a catcher for the Kansas City Royals from 1976 to 1985.
"Back Door Santa" is a funk-style song recorded by Clarence Carter, which Atlantic Records released as a single in 1968.
In an artist biography, it is described as "a superbly funky Christmas single" and "raunchy".
The Buffalo nickel or Indian Head nickel is a copper-nickel five-cent piece that was struck by the United States Mint from 1913 to 1938.
It was designed by sculptor James Earle Fraser.
In field theory, a nonlocal Lagrangian is a Lagrangian, a type of functional  containing terms that are nonlocal in the fields , i.e. not polynomials or functions of the fields or their derivatives evaluated at a single point in the space of dynamical parameters (e.g. space-time).
Examples of such nonlocal Lagrangians might be:    The Wess–Zumino–Witten action.
Shklar (Shkliar, Shklyar, , , ) is Ukrainian and Belarusian surname meaning Glassmaker often given to Jews, may refer to:Judith N. Shklar (1928–1992), American political scientistLeon Shklar, software developer and an author on the subject of web developmentVasyl Shkliar Ukrainian writer and political activist.
See also Sklar
Tertiary hyperparathyroidism is a condition involving the overproduction of the hormone, parathyroid hormone, produced by the parathyroid glands.
The parathyroid glands are involved in monitoring and regulating blood calcium levels and respond by either producing or ceasing to produce parathyroid hormone.
Probuzhdane (written Пробуждане in Bulgarian) is the first self-released album by Balkandji.
The name means "Awakening" and the band translates it to "Awake".
High-energy X-rays or HEX-rays are very hard X-rays, with typical energies of 80–1000 keV (1 MeV), about one order of magnitude higher than conventional X-rays used for X-ray crystallography (and well into gamma-ray energies over 120 keV).
They are produced at modern synchrotron radiation sources such as the beamlines ID15 and BM18 at the European Synchrotron Radiation Facility (ESRF).
Glutamate transporters are a family of neurotransmitter transporter proteins that move glutamate – the principal excitatory neurotransmitter – across a membrane.
The family of glutamate transporters is composed of two primary subclasses: the excitatory amino acid transporter (EAAT) family and vesicular glutamate transporter (VGLUT) family.
This is a list of newspapers in Dominica.
The Chronicle Dominica News OnlineSee alsoList of newspapersReferencesExternal linksDominicaNewspapers
Michael D. Bissonnette is the former mayor of Chicopee, Massachusetts.
Bissonnette was first elected mayor in a landslide in the November 2005 election after he defeated embattled mayor Richard Goyette, who has been arrested weeks prior on federal extortion charges.
In universal algebra and in model theory, a structure consists of a set along with a collection of finitary operations and relations that are defined on it.
Universal algebra studies structures that generalize the algebraic structures such as groups, rings, fields and vector spaces.
This is a list of newspapers in the Dominican Republic. theAdscene.com (North Coast, Cabarete, Sosua, Puerto Plata) Camino – weekly religious newspaper El Caribe (Santo Domingo) Clave (Santo Domingo) -  free weekly newspaper El Día (Santo Domingo) – free newspaper Diario a Diario (Santo Domingo) – weekly newspaper Diario Libre (Santo Domingo) – free newspaper Dominican Today DominicanCentral.com (North Coast, Cabarete, Sosua, Puerto Plata)
DominicanoDigital.com (Santo Domingo) - multilingual newspaper DominicanosHoy.com (Santo Domingo) El Expresso (Santo Domingo) – free daily newspaper; defunct El Faro (Puerto Plata) Hoy (Santo Domingo) La Información (Santiago) El Jaya (San Francisco de Macoris) Listín Diario (Santo Domingo) – oldest newspaper in the Dominican Republic La Nación (Santo Domingo) – defunct El Nacional (Santo Domingo) – afternoon newspaper La Noticia (Santo Domingo) – defunct Nuevo Diario (Santo Domingo) Primicias (Santo Domingo) – weekly newspaper
The Spode Museum is based in Stoke-on-Trent, England, where Josiah Spode, known for his role in the Industrial Revolution, established his pottery business in 1774.
The Spode Museum collection includes a ceramics collection representing 200 years of Spode manufacture, ranging from spectacular pieces made for Royalty, the Great Exhibitions and the very rich to simple domestic wares.
The Cathedral Quartet, also known as the Cathedrals, was an American southern gospel quartet who performed from 1964 to December 1999.
The group's final lineup consisted of Glen Payne (lead), George Younce (bass), Ernie Haase (tenor), Scott Fowler (baritone and bass guitar), and Roger Bennett (piano and rhythm guitar).
The bare-throated tiger heron (Tigrisoma mexicanum) is a wading bird of the heron family, Ardeidae, found from Mexico to northwestern Colombia, with one recorded sighting from the United States in Hidalgo County, Texas.
It is  in length and weighs .
Miss A (stylized as "MISS A" or "miss A", Hangul: ) was a South Korean girl group formed by JYP Entertainment.
The group debuted in July 2010 with the single "Bad Girl Good Girl" as a quartet consisting of Fei, Jia, Min, and Suzy.
The Castle is a video game released by ASCII Corporation in 1986 for the FM-7 and X1 computers.
It was later ported to the MSX and NEC branded personal computers, and got a single console port for the SG-1000.
Sir Stuart Auchincloss Coats, 2nd Baronet (20 March 1868 – 15 July 1959) was a British politician and Member of Parliament for Wimbledon from 1916 to 1918 and then East Surrey from 1918 to 1922.
Early lifeStuart was born on 20 March 1868.
, whose real name is  (alternatively, Altria Pendragon), is a fictional character from the Japanese 2004 visual novel Fate/stay night by Type-Moon.
Saber is a heroic warrior who is summoned by a teenager named Shirou Emiya to participate in a war between masters and servants who are fighting to accomplish their dreams using the mythical Holy Grail.
Alfred Heaton Cooper (1863–1929)  was an English watercolour artist.
He is known for his landscapes of the English Lake District and Norway, and for illustrating several travel guidebooks.
The 6th Royal Tank Regiment (6 RTR) was a regiment of the Royal Tank Regiment, of the British Army, until 1959.
It originally saw action as 6th Battalion Tank Corps in 1917.
Several notable blizzards occurred in 2006.
The North American blizzard of 2006, which delivered record snowfall to New York CityThe Early Winter 2006 North American Storm Complex affected parts of southern Canada in DecemberThe December 20-21, 2006 Colorado Blizzard struck Colorado and some surrounding areas on December 20-21The October Surprise Storm in Western New York
This is a list of newspapers in El Salvador.
Diario El Salvador (San Salvador) Diario Co Latino (San Salvador) El Diario de Hoy (San Salvador)
Robot software is the set of coded commands or instructions that tell a mechanical device and electronic system, known together as a robot, what tasks to perform.
Robot software is used to perform autonomous tasks.
WIVM-LD, virtual channel 39 (UHF digital channel 34), is a low-power television station licensed to Canton, Ohio, United States.
WIVN-LD (virtual channel 29 and VHF digital channel 5) and WIVD-LD (virtual and UHF digital channel 26) in Newcomerstown, and WIVX-LD (virtual and VHF digital channel 13) in Cleveland are translators of WIVM-LD.
Frank J. Fabozzi is an American economist, educator, writer, and investor, currently Professor of Practice at The Johns Hopkins University Carey Business School and a Member of Edhec Risk Institute.
He was previously a Professor of Finance at EDHEC Business School, Professor in the Practice of Finance and Becton Fellow in the Yale School of Management, and a Visiting Professor of Finance at the Sloan School of Management at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.
The Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Supporting Actress in a Limited or Anthology Series or Movie is an award presented annually by the Academy of Television Arts & Sciences (ATAS).
It is given in honor of an actress who has delivered an outstanding performance in a supporting role on a television limited series or television movie for the primetime network season.
Spider-Plant Man is a British parody short film which parodies the 2002 film adaptation of the superhero character Spider-Man.
The film was made for the Comic Relief 2005 appeal and aired on BBC One on 11 March 2005.
Scattergories is an American game show on NBC daytime hosted by Dick Clark, with Charlie Tuna as announcer, that aired from January 18 to June 11, 1993.
The show, which was adapted from the Milton Bradley board game of the same name, was produced by Reg Grundy Productions and was the second to last American game show to be produced by the company.
This is a list of newspapers in Guatemala.
Newspapers Prensa Libre, the second-most widely circulated newspaper in GuatemalaAl DíaNoticias GuatemalaDiario de Centro América, the nation's newspaper of public recordLa HoraEl Metropolitano, based in Mixco; published twice each monthNuestro Diario, the most widely circulated newspaper in Central AmericaEl Periódico<ref>[http://www.elperiodico.com.gt El Periódico'''s website]</ref>Publinews, the first free daily in GuatemalaEl Quetzalteco, based in Quetzaltenango; digital only and part of Prensa LibreSiglo VeintiunoLa Voz del MigranteLa Epoca, no longer in circulationEl Gráfico, no longer in circulationEl Imparcial'', no longer in circulationSee also Media of GuatemalaReferencesFurther readingExternal links  Guatemala Newspapers
Funny Business (also known as Laughing Matters) is a BBC television documentary series about the craft of comedy.
Originally airing in the UK on 22 November 1992 the series consisted of six 50-minute episodes, with each one focusing on a different aspect of humour and show business entertainment.
This is a list of newspapers in HaitiCurrent Hebdo24 (Haitian online newspaper (media))
Balistrad, est. 2018 (Haitian online newspaper (media))
Brivudine (trade names Zostex, Mevir, Brivir, among others) is an antiviral drug used in the treatment of herpes zoster ("shingles").
Like other antivirals, it acts by inhibiting replication of the target virus.
This is a list of newspapers in Honduras.
Newspapers  Diez La Gazzeta (official government newspaper) El Caribe El Heraldo Honduras This Week (in English) Honduras Weekly (in English) El Periódico La Prensa El Tiempo La Tribuna (Honduras)See alsoMedia of HondurasReferencesFurther readingExternal linkslist of newspapers from Honduras at NewspaperIndex.com HondurasNewspapers
St. Mary's Hall may refer to:United Kingdom St. Mary's Hall, Coventry, EnglandStonyhurst Saint Mary's Hall, preparatory school to Stonyhurst College, Lancashire, EnglandSt Mary Hall, Oxford, EnglandSt Mary's Hall, Brighton, girls school founded in 1836 and closed in 2009United States St. Mary's Hall at Georgetown University, Washington, D.C. St. Mary's Hall, a private school located in San Antonio, Texas, USA Doane Academy (formerly St. Mary's Hall - Doane Academy), a private school located in Burlington, New Jersey, USA Shattuck-Saint Mary's, a private school located in Faribault, Minnesota, USAChina St. Mary's Hall, Shanghai, a girls' school in Shanghai related to St. John's University, Shanghai and St. John's University (Taiwan)
Educational institution disambiguation pages
Mary Margaret McKeown (born May 11, 1951) is a Senior United States circuit judge of the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit based in San Diego.
McKeown has served on the Ninth Circuit since her confirmation in 1998.
The Saint John Free Public Library incorporated in 1883, was the first tax-supported public library in Saint John, New Brunswick, Canada, hence the inclusion of "Free" in the title.
The Saint John Free Public Library consists of three branches, the central branch in the Market Square complex, East Branch in the Saint John Transit Building, and West Branch in Lancaster Mall.
This is a list of newspapers in Nicaragua.
NewspapersOther NewspapersEl 19 (Managua) (daily, digital)7 Días (Managua) (bi-weekly)Confidencial (Managua) (daily, digital)La Jornada (Managua) (daily, digital)
This is a list of newspapers in Panama.
Newspapers Crítica - websiteDía a Día - websiteEl PanameñoLa Estrella de PanamáMi DiarioPanamá América - websiteLa PrensaEl SigloSee alsoMedia of Panama
"Disneyland 10th Anniversary" is a 1965 episode of Walt Disney's Wonderful World of Color, broadcast on both January 3 and May 30.
The show begins with Walt Disney showing viewers and Disneyland ambassador Julie Reihm plans for upcoming attractions, including It's a Small World, Pirates of the Caribbean and the Haunted Mansion.
David Penzer (born May 22, 1966) is an American professional wrestling ring announcer currently signed to Impact Wrestling.
He is also known for his work with World Championship Wrestling (WCW) from 1993 to 2001.
Titans East is the name of several DC Comics superhero teams.
The teams appear in the Teen Titans comic books and animated series.
Hans Schemm (6 October 1891 – 5 March 1935) was an educator who became a prominent Nazi Party official.
He served as Gauleiter of Gau Bayreuth and Bavarian State Minister for Education and Culture until his death in an airplane accident.
Belmond Le Manoir aux Quat' Saisons ("Four Seasons Manor", a.k.a.
Le Manoir) is a luxury hotel-restaurant in the village of Great Milton near Oxford, in Oxfordshire, England.
The Cast of Beatlemania is a U.S. Beatles' tribute band formed in 1980.
The Cast is one of longest running Beatles' tribute band in the world.
The Five Dollar Smile and Other Stories is a short story collection by Indian politician Shashi Tharoor, published in 1990 by Viking Press.
The stories collected were written in the author's late teens and initially published in various magazines and newspapers including JS, The Illustrated Weekly of India, Eve's Weekly, Youth Times, Gentleman, The New Review and Cosmopolitan.
The KBS Cup is a South Korean Go competition.
OutlineThe KBS Cup is sponsored by KBS.
Susan Williams-Ellis (6 June 1918 – 26 November 2007) was a British pottery designer, who was best known for co-founding Portmeirion Pottery.
She was the eldest daughter of Sir Clough Williams-Ellis.
Caerlanrig - also spelled 'Carlenrig' - (Gaelic: Cathair Lannraig) is a hamlet in the parish of Cavers, Borders, Scotland, lying on the River Teviot, 6 miles (10 km) north east of that river's source, and 10 miles (16 km) south west of Hawick.
EtymologyThe first element of the name is probably the extinct Cumbric cair 'fortification', though Gaelic cathair has been suggested.
Hedges Eyre Chatterton (5 July 1819 – 30 August 1910) was an Irish Conservative Party Member of Parliament (MP) in the United Kingdom Parliament and subsequently Vice-Chancellor of Ireland.
BiographyHe was born in Cork, the eldest son of Abraham Chatterton, a solicitor, and
TNT Sunday Night Football also known as NFL on TNT was the name for the series of National Football League (NFL) broadcasts on Sundays produced by Turner Sports for Turner Network Television (TNT).
TNT aired NFL games on Sunday nights from 1990 to 1997 and served as one of the league's two cable television partners during that time with ESPN.
This is a list of newspapers in Saint Vincent and the Grenadines.
Weekly The NewsThe VincentianSearchlightDaily  The HeraldOther  SVG Express The VincyViewSee alsoLists of newspapersReferences Saint Vincent and the GrenadinesNewspapersNewspapers
Jennifer Elaine Kaiser (born January 6, 1980) is an American artist, model, trainer, and retired professional wrestler.
She is best known for her time with Ohio Valley Wrestling under the ring name Sosay (pronounced So-Say).
Since 1959, the Oscar Mathisen Award (also known as the Oscar Mathisen Memorial Award, the Oscar Mathisen Memorial Trophy, and sometimes the Skating Oscar) is awarded annually for outstanding speed skating performance of the season.
The award was introduced by Oslo Skøiteklub (Oslo Skating Club, OSK) to commemorate the legendary Norwegian speed skater Oscar Mathisen (1888–1954).
Portmeirion is a British pottery company based in Stoke-on-Trent, England.
They specialise in earthenware tableware.
The banded bullfrog (Kaloula pulchra) is a species of frog in the narrow-mouthed frog family Microhylidae.
Native to Southeast Asia, it is also known as the Asian painted frog, digging frog, Malaysian bullfrog, common Asian frog, and painted balloon frog.
FC Mülheim is a German association football club based in Mülheim an der Ruhr, North Rhine-Westphalia.
HistorySpielvereinigung Oberhausen und Styrum was established through the union of a number of local sports clubs including Styrumer Spielverein 08, Styrum 08 and Oberhausener Spielverein.
North Australia can refer to a short-lived former British colony, a former federal territory of the Commonwealth of Australia, or a proposed state which would replace the current Northern Territory.
Colony (1846–1847)A colony of North Australia existed briefly after it was authorised by letters patent of 17 February 1846.
Play It Like That is the second and final album by Australian female pop group Bardot, released in November 2001 (see 2001 in music).
The album debuted at number 16 in Australia and spawned the singles "ASAP", "I Need Somebody" and "Love Will Find a Way".
Below is a list of newspapers published in Vatican City.
L'Osservatore RomanoDonne, Chiesa, MondoVatican News (online only)See alsoList of newspapersIndex of Vatican City-related articlesVatican CityNewspapersNewspapers
Cogito (originally git-pasky) is a revision control system layered on top of Git.
It is historically the first Git frontend, which appeared in April 2005, just days after Git itself.
Center for Talent Development (CTD), established in 1982, is a direct service and research center in the field of gifted education and talent development based at Northwestern University.
CTD offers in-person and online educational programs for students age 3 through grade 12, and resources for their families, and educators, including: Online enrichment, honors, and AP courses Service-learning and leadership programs  Weekend and summer programs  Assessment and consulting services, including above-grade-level assessment, through Northwestern University's Midwest Academic Talent Search Parent seminars  Online communities for students and parents Program evaluation, professional development, and curriculum units for schools CTD also works with the Jack Kent Cooke Foundation to support their scholarship programs, which are designed to advance the education of exceptionally promising students who have financial need.
Richard A. Bierschbach is dean and professor of law at Wayne State University Law School.
He became Wayne Law's 12th dean on August 17, 2017.
Walid Mohi Edine al Muallem ( Walīd Muḥīyy ad-Dīn al-Muʿallam; 13 January 194116 November 2020) was a Syrian diplomat and Ba'ath Party member who served as foreign minister from 2006 to 2020 and as deputy prime minister from 2012 to 2020.
Early life and educationWalid Muallem was born into a Sunni family on 13 January 1941 in Damascus.
The Rega Institute for Medical Research is a Belgian scientific establishment that is part of the Catholic University of Leuven (Leuven) in central Belgium.
The Rega Institute is an interfacultary biomedical research institute of the Catholic University of Leuven and consists of departments of medicine and pharmacology.
Christopher Lloyd (born 1938) is an American actor.
Christopher Lloyd may also refer to:Christopher Lloyd (art historian) (born 1945), Surveyor of the Queen's Pictures, 1988–2005Christopher Lloyd (gardener) (1921–2006), author of gardening booksChristopher Lloyd (naval historian) (1906–1986), British naval historianChristopher Lloyd (TV producer) (born 1960), American TV screenwriter and producerChris Lloyd (born 1980), sprinter from DominicaChristopher Charles Lloyd (born 1982), rapper known as Lloyd Banks, member of G-UnitChristopher Lloyd (world history author) (born 1968), historian, educationalist and authorChristopher Lloyd (priest), Irish Anglican priest
Samuel "Sammy" Silke is a fictional character appearing in American comic books published by Marvel Comics.
The character debuted in the comic series Daredevil.
"Milkshake" is a song by American singer Kelis from her third studio album, Tasty (2003).
Written and produced by the Neptunes, the song was originally offered to Britney Spears for her fourth studio album, In the Zone, but was instead given to Kelis.
Below is a list of newspapers published in Andorra.
All newspapers in Andorra are written in the Catalan languageDaily Altaveu (Andorra la Vella) BondiaDiari d'Andorra (Andorra la Vella)El Periòdic d'Andorra / El Periòdic (Escaldes-Engordany)Weekly 7diesSee alsoList of Catalan-language newspapers (includes newspapers in other Catalan-speaking areas that are outside Andorra)
Viktor An (; born Ahn Hyun-soo () on November 23, 1985), is a South Korean-born Russian short-track speed skating coach and retired short-track speed skater.
With a total of eight Olympic medals, six gold and two bronze, he is the only short track speed skater in Olympic history to win gold in every distance, and the first to win a medal in every distance at a single Games.
The European beewolf (Philanthus triangulum), also known as the bee-killer wasp or the bee-eating philanthus (from the now obsolete synonym Philanthus apivorus), is a solitary wasp that lives in the Western Palearctic and Afrotropics.
Although the adults of the species are herbivores (feeding on nectar and pollen), the species derives its name from the behaviour of the inseminated females, who hunt Western honey bees.
David B. McLane is an American businessman, known primarily as a wrestling promoter and television producer.
He was the creator of the GLOW-Gorgeous Ladies of Wrestling and WOW-Women Of Wrestling (recognized as WOW! and WOW), both nationally syndicated series.
This is a list of newspapers in Georgia.
Caucasian Journal (Tbilisi), online, published in English with versions in Georgian and Armenian languages.
This is a list of newspapers in Georgia, US.
List of newspapers{| class="wikitable sortable"|-!
The Electron-Land Cup is a Go competition.
OutlineThe Electron-Land Cup is sponsored by Korean Economic News, Baduk TV, and Cyber Kiwon.
In political jargon, a self-licking ice cream cone is a self-perpetuating system that has no purpose other than to sustain itself.
The phrase appeared to have been first used in 1991–1992, in a book about Gulf War weapons systems by Norman Friedman, and On Self-Licking Ice Cream Cones, a paper by Pete Worden about NASA's bureaucracy, to describe the relationship between the Space Shuttle and Space Station.
List of newspapers in Georgia may refer to: List of newspapers in Georgia (country)
List of newspapers in Georgia (U.S. state)
is a Japanese stage actress and voice actress from Ōta, Tokyo.
She is a graduate of the College of Fine Arts at Nihon University.
This article lists the feast days of the General Roman Calendar as they were at the end of 1954.
It is essentially the same calendar established by Pope Pius X (1903–1914) following his liturgical reforms, but it also incorporates changes that were made by Pope Pius XI (1922–1939), such as the institution of the Feast of Christ the King (assigned to the last Sunday in October), and the changes made by Pope Pius XII (1939–1958) prior to 1955, chief among them the imposition of the Feast of the Immaculate Heart of Mary upon the universal Church (August 22, on the existing octave day of the Assumption) in 1944, the inscription of Pius X into the General Calendar (September 3) following his 1954 canonization, and the institution of the Feast of the Queenship of Mary (May 31) in October 1954.
Cartoon Orbit was a children's online gaming network created by Turner Online to promote its shows and partners.
Launched as an addition to the Cartoon Network website, Cartoon Orbit opened to the public in October 2000.
The SK Gas Cup is a Go competition.
OutlineThe SK Gas Cup is sponsored by SK Gas.
is a two-year private women's junior college in Aomori, Aomori Prefecture, Japan.
The university was established in 1963, and is descended from an art school established in 1937.
In fashion and clothing, a petite size is a standard clothing size designed specifically for women 164 cm (5 ft 4 in) and under.
This categorization is not solely based on a woman's height, but also takes into account the proportions of her body.
Briercrest Christian Academy, formerly Caronport High School, is a private Christian high school located in Caronport, Saskatchewan.
The school includes a student residence program and extracurricular activities such as sports, drama, art and music.
is a former Japanese actress, television presenter, radio presenter, and author best known for playing Fumiko Sakurai in the 1962 Godzilla film, King Kong vs. Godzilla, Kissy Suzuki in the 1967 James Bond film, You Only Live Twice, and Madame Piranha in the 1967 King Kong film, King Kong Escapes.
CareerHama was working as a bus conductor when she was spotted by producer Tomoyuki Tanaka.
Ernest W. Seaholm High School (simply referred to as Seaholm High School) is a Magnet high school in Birmingham, Michigan, United States.
It was established in 1951 and is part of the Birmingham Public Schools district.
Fort Totten is a neighborhood located in Ward 5 of Northeast Washington, D.C.Fort Totten is located between Riggs Road N.E. to the north, Bates Rd N.E., Allison Street N.E., and the southern end of Fort Totten Park to the south, the Washington Metro Red Line tracks to the east, and North Capitol Street NW to the west.
The Washington Metro's Green Line tracks also go through the Fort Totten neighborhood through a tunnel that goes through Fort Totten Park when traveling between the Fort Totten and Georgia Avenue-Petworth Metro Stations.
Coroplast is a brand name of corrugated plastic and a registered trademark of Coroplast, LLC, a member of the Inteplast Group of companies.
Because of the success of this brand, it has become a generically used tradename and many people in North America today refer to all corrugated plastic as "coroplast".
(born 9 May 1968) is a Japanese former ski jumper.
He is best remembered for a meltdown at the 1994 Winter Olympics in Lillehammer, which cost the Japanese national team a victory, and his subsequent redemption at the 1998 Winter Olympics in Nagano; the latter of which led to him being affectionately called "Happy Harada".
Mission 3:16 is an album by Carman.
Released in 1998 on Sparrow Records, the album peaked at number 94 on the Billboard 200 chart.
Cobalt 60 was an electro-industrial/EBM group featuring Jean-Luc de Meyer and Dominique Lallement.
Cobalt 60 has also done music for the PC game Wing Commander: Prophecy (Wing Commander V).
Drangiana or Zarangiana (, Drangianē;  also attested in Old Western Iranian as 𐏀𐎼𐎣, Zraka or Zranka, was a historical region and administrative division of the Achaemenid Empire.
This region comprises territory around Hamun Lake, wetlands in endorheic Sistan Basin on the Iran-Afghan border, and its primary watershed Helmand river in what is nowadays southwestern region of Afghanistan.
Charlotte Arnold (born July 27, 1989) is a Canadian actress.
She is best known for her roles as Sadie Hawthorne in Naturally, Sadie and Holly J. Sinclair in Degrassi: The Next Generation, for which she won a Gemini Award for Best Performance in a Children's or Youth Program or Series in 2010.
Waterdown was a hardcore punk and post-hardcore band from Osnabrück, Germany.
The band emerged onto the scene in 1999 under the formation of: Axel Pralat (guitar), Marcel Bischoff (vocals), Jörg Schwoeppe (drums), Christian Kruse (bass), Holger Behrens (guitar), and Ingo Rieser (vocals).
It Takes Two is a game show in which contestants gave numerical answers to questions (which usually entail stunts and/or demonstrations).
The original program was created and produced by Ralph Andrews and aired on NBC from March 31, 1969, to July 31, 1970, at 10:00 AM Eastern.
The Calopterygidae are a family of damselflies, in the suborder Zygoptera.
They are commonly known as the broad-winged damselflies, demoiselles, or jewelwings.
Platypus is a horizontal scrolling shooter game created and designed by Anthony Flack, produced by George Bray, and programmed by Michael W. Boeh.
The objective is to guide an antique spacecraft by utilizing the mouse in order to avoid and attempt to shoot enemies.
Jeffrey Lynn Bostic (born September 18, 1958) is an American former professional football player who was a center for the Washington Redskins of the National Football League (NFL).
He played college football for the Clemson Tigers.
Bazhong () is a prefecture-level city in north-eastern Sichuan province, China.
Its population was 2,712,894 at the 2020 census whom 1,064,766 lived in Bazhou and Enyang urban districts.
New Hope-Solebury High School is a public high school located at 182 West Bridge Street in New Hope, Pennsylvania.
The school's mascot is the Lion, and its colors are royal blue and gold.
The Aomori Curling Club is a curling club in Aomori, Japan.
It is best known as being the home of , a women's curling team that won six Japanese Curling Championships (2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009 & 2010) and represented Japan at four World Curling Championships (2005, 2007, 2008 & 2010) and at two Winter Olympics (2006 & 2010).
"Man and the Moon" is an episode of Disneyland, which originally aired on December 28, 1955.
It was directed by Disney animator Ward Kimball.
According to the Political Constitution of the Free and Sovereign State of Colima, the exercise of the Executive Power of this Mexican entity is placed in a single individual, called the Constitutional Governor of the Free and Sovereign State of Colima who is chosen for a period of 6 years and is not eligible for reelection.
The term of governor begins November 1 of the year of the election and finishes October 31 after six years have elapsed.
Oxon Hill High School (OHHS) is a public senior high school, located in Oxon Hill, an unincorporated area in Prince George's County, Maryland, and a suburb of Washington, D.C. in the United States.
The school, which serves grades 9 through 12, is a part of the Prince George's County Public Schools system.
A binary moment diagram (BMD) is a generalization of the binary decision diagram (BDD) to linear functions over domains such as booleans (like BDDs), but also to integers or to real numbers.
They can deal with Boolean functions with complexity comparable to BDDs, but also some functions that are dealt with very inefficiently in a BDD are handled easily by BMD, most notably multiplication.
"The Last Few Bricks" is an instrumental bridge/medley used by Pink Floyd and Roger Waters at The Wall live shows, between "Another Brick in the Wall (Part III)" and "Goodbye Cruel World".
CompositionIt was composed specifically for the purpose of allowing the bricklayer roadies more time to finish constructing the wall, to seal off the stage almost completely, before Waters appeared in the last one-brick-wide space in the wall to sing "Goodbye Cruel World", and end the first part of the show.
The Comeback EP is an EP by the Canadian indie rock band Stars, released in 2001 on Le Grand Magistery Records.
Track listingReferences2001 EPsStars (Canadian band) albums
Amit Chaudhuri (born 15 May 1962) is a novelist, poet, essayist, literary critic, editor, singer, and music composer from India.
He was Professor of Contemporary Literature at the University of East Anglia from 2006 to 2021, Since 2020, he has been at Ashoka University, India, as Professor of Creative Writing and, since 2021, is also Director of the Centre for the Creative and the Critical, Ashoka University.
Umbra is a sans-serif display typeface designed in 1935 by R. Hunter Middleton for the Ludlow Typograph company.
It is an adaptation of the uppercase light weight of his earlier typeface Tempo.
"The Plausible Impossible" is an episode of the Disneyland television program, originally broadcast on October 31, 1956.
Walt Disney explains how drawings and animation make things that are impossible seem plausible, as evidenced in ancient history (i.e., Egyptian gods, dragons, and various creatures from Greek mythology) and various cartoons with Mickey Mouse and Donald Duck.
Chung Mong-joon or Chung Mong Joon (, born November 15, 1951) is a South Korean businessman and politician.
He is the sixth son of Chung Ju-yung, founder of Hyundai, the second-largest South Korean chaebol before its breakup in 2003.
Tilbury Town railway station is on a loop line of the London, Tilbury and Southend line, serving the town of Tilbury, Essex.
It is  down the line from London Fenchurch Street via  and it is situated between  and .
Prince George's County Public Schools (PGCPS) is a public school district that serves Prince George's County, Maryland.
During the 2023-2024 academic year, the district enrolls 133,000 students and operates over 200 schools.
( , "the Lagoon") is an Egyptian tourist city created in 1990, and is owned and developed by Samih Sawiris' Orascom Development,.
It is located on the Red Sea in the Red Sea Governorate of Egypt,  north of Hurghada.
Cornus alternifolia is a species of flowering plant in the dogwood family Cornaceae, native to eastern North America, from Newfoundland west to southern Manitoba and Minnesota, and south to northern Florida and Mississippi.
It is rare in the southern United States.
Abby Kelley Foster (January 15, 1811 – January 14, 1887) was an American abolitionist and radical social reformer active from the 1830s to 1870s.
She became a fundraiser, lecturer and committee organizer for the influential American Anti-Slavery Society, where she worked closely with William Lloyd Garrison and other radicals.
The following is a list of governors of the Mexican state of Jalisco from 1821.
The current Constitution indicates a term of six years in length, which cannot be renewed under any circumstances.
Mirabello Sannitico is a  small town in  the province of Campobasso, Molise, southern Italy.
The population is about 2,100 inhabitants.
KHTS (1220 kHz) is a commercial AM radio station that is licensed to the Canyon Country neighborhood of Santa Clarita, California, about  north of Los Angeles.
The station is owned by Jeri Lyn Broadcasting (formerly Saddleback Broadcasting).
Albany State University is a public historically black university in Albany, Georgia.
In 2017, Darton State College and Albany State University consolidated to become one university under the University System of Georgia (USG).
Byron Joseph Anthony (born 20 September 1984) is a Welsh former professional footballer who is currentlyAcademy Manager at Bristol Rovers.
Born in Newport, he began his career with Cardiff City, progressing through the club's youth system after signing in 2000.
The Arthur Kill Vertical Lift Railroad Bridge is a rail vertical-lift bridge connecting Elizabethport, New Jersey and the Howland Hook Marine Terminal on Staten Island, New York, United States.
The bridge was built by the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad in 1959 to replace the Arthur Kill Bridge, a swing bridge opened in 1890.
"A Day in the Life of Donald Duck" is a 1956 episode of the Disneyland TV show.
As the name of the episode implies, viewers experience Donald Duck himself as he struggles through a typical day at the Walt Disney Studios.
Pharaoh's Island ( Jazīratu Firawn), whose current popular name is Coral Island, is a small island in the northern Gulf of Aqaba some  east off the shore of Egypt's eastern Sinai Peninsula.
Some scholars identify this island port with biblical Ezion-Geber.
Trust is a 1990 American romantic black comedy film written and directed by Hal Hartley and starring Adrienne Shelly and Martin Donovan.
Two young misfits, both in emotional shock, meet in a Long Island town and through trials develop a platonic relationship based on mutual admiration, respect and trust.
Neil James Cox (born 8 October 1971) is an English former professional footballer and manager who is currently the assistant manager of National League side York City.
A defender capable of playing at centre or right-back, he made over 500 appearances in the Football League during his career and was capped at Under-21 level by England.
CJYM (1330 AM) is a radio station broadcasting a classic hits format.
Licensed to Rosetown, Saskatchewan, Canada, it serves west central Saskatchewan.
Marc S. Seriff (born May 5, 1948 in Austin, Texas) is best known as the CTO and co-founder of America Online, along with Jim Kimsey (CEO), Steve Case, and William von Meister (as Control Video Corporation).
BiographySeriff received his B.S. in Mathematics and Computer Science from the University of Texas at Austin in 1971 and an M.S. in Electrical Engineering and Computer Science from Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT) in 1974.
The following includes a list of films that won awards at the American Sundance Film Festival.1980s1984Grand Jury Prize Dramatic – Old EnoughGrand Jury Prize Documentary – Style WarsHonorable Mention Documentary – Seeing RedHonorable Mention Documentary – The Good Fight (The Abraham Lincoln Brigade in the Spanish Civil War)Special Jury Prize
Dramatic –
Cedar Lake East Beach is an urban beach in Minneapolis, Minnesota, United States.
It is managed by the Minneapolis Park and Recreation Board and located on the east side of Cedar Lake.
The Battle Creek Sanitarium was a world-renowned health resort in Battle Creek, Michigan, United States.
It started in 1866 on health principles advocated by the Seventh-day Adventist Church and from 1876 to 1943 was managed by Dr. John Harvey Kellogg.
Lawrence Shulman (born May 17, 1937) is the former Dean of the University at Buffalo, The State University of New York.
His scholarship covers these subfields of social work: group work, supervision, child welfare, and teaching.
Dorothy Goodman ( Bruchholz; January 15, 1926 – July 23, 2023) was an American educator closely associated with the charter school movement.
She founded and served as Director of the Washington International School; launching the school with three 4-year-olds in the basement of her home in 1966 and served as headmistress until 1985, when the school enrolled 530 students, ranging in age from 3 to 18, representing 80 nations.
Charlotte and Her Boyfriend () is a 13-minute 1958 film by Franco-Swiss director Jean-Luc Godard.
It is shot entirely in or from a hotel room, in which Jules (Jean-Paul Belmondo) gives Charlotte (Anne Collette) a seemingly endless and self-indulgent tirade on her faults and his tribulations.
Super Bowl XLVIII was an American football game between the American Football Conference (AFC) champion Denver Broncos and National Football Conference (NFC)
champion Seattle Seahawks to decide the National Football League (NFL) champion for the 2013 season.
Flattbush is a heavy metal band from Bellflower, California, a small city within South Central Los Angeles county.
The group was established in early 1993 by Enrico Maniago (vocals), Brian Legaspi (lead guitar), Eric Long (rhythm guitar), Arman Maniago (bass guitar), and Anthony Gonzales (drums).
The Canadian ambassador to the United Arab Emirates is an official diplomatic post held by a senior Canadian civil servant.
List of Canadian ambassadors to the United Arab EmiratesSee also Canada–United Arab Emirates relationsEmbassy of Canada, Abu DhabiNotes United Arab Emirates Canada
Shakedown!
is the debut studio album by American rock band theSTART.
Rebecca "Becky" Kellar (born January 1, 1975) is a women's ice hockey player.
She played for Burlington Barracudas in the Canadian Women's Hockey League.
Gourav Dhiman (born 16 December 1986) is an Indian cricket player for the national team, bowling right-arm medium-pace and batting right-handed.
He played for India Under-15s and now plays for India Under-19s, Karnataka Under-19s.
Yong Peng is a town in Mukim Tanjung Semberong, Batu Pahat District, Johor, Malaysia.
It has an area of 1911.6 hectares with an estimated population of 29,046.History During the reign of Sultan Abu Bakar of Johor and under the influence of the British rule in the 1870s, a policy was initiated to modernise Johor and increase tax revenue by opening up more of the forest and swamp area for plantation purposes (initially for spices such as pepper and gambier; then followed by rubber).
Mondo Music Corporation is a record label in Lusaka that produces recordings by some of Zambia's the most popular musicians, including Amayenge, Danny, K'Millian, Exile, JK, Shatel, Nathan Nyirenda, Jojo Mwangaza, Lilly T.[Tribal Cousin Ackson Chulu, Sydney Kasonde]  The company was started in 1998 by Chisha Folotiya, its first release being a gospel album by the Omega Singers.
The company's motto is "The Nation's Music Leaders", which they try to live up to by offering releases for all age groups and demographics.
Carla Rae MacLeod (born June 16, 1982) is a Canadian ice hockey coach and retired member of the Canadian national women's hockey team.
She is the current head coach of the Czech national ice hockey team and the Ottawa PWHL team in the Professional Women's Hockey League (PWHL).
Paternoster Press is a British Christian publishing house which was founded by B. Howard Mudditt (1906–1992) in 1936.
Mudditt was a Bank of England clerk who decided to move into publishing after seeing the many publishers based on London's Paternoster Row during his lunch hours; the firm was named after the street, and also alluded to the Lord's Prayer.
Cheryl Pounder (born June 21, 1976, in Montreal, Quebec) is a women's ice hockey player.
She played defence for the Canadian Women's Hockey League's Mississauga Chiefs, and competed in the 2002 and 2006 Winter Olympics.
Tamar Janine Reilly (born September 19, 1963), known professionally as Alexandra Silk, is an American pornographic actress, pornographic director and adult model.
Biography A graduate of the State University of New York at Albany, Silk began her adult career as a stripper in Las Vegas.
Mark van Eeghen (born April 19, 1952)is an American former professional football player who was a running back for ten years in the National Football League (NFL), during which he made two Super Bowl appearances.
He played eight seasons for the Oakland Raiders (1974–1981) and then two seasons with the New England Patriots (1982–1983).
Transnet Freight Rail is a South African rail transport company, formerly known as Spoornet.
It was part of the South African Railways and Harbours Administration, a state-controlled organisation that employed hundreds of thousands of people for decades from the first half of the 20th century and was widely referred to by the initials SAR&H (SAS&H in Afrikaans).
Colleen Kay Sostorics (born December 17, 1979 in Kennedy, Saskatchewan) is a Canadian retired women's ice hockey defenseman.
She played extensively for Canada at the international level, including three Olympic gold medals (2002 in Turin, 2006 in Salt Lake City, and 2010 in Vancouver).
The Medellín River (), called Porce River () during most of its course, is a river that flows through the Colombian city of Medellín and its metropolitan area.
For many years an organization called Mi Río (My River) was involved in river cleanup projects.
Airforce Delta Strike, known as  in Japan and Deadly Skies III in Europe, is the third installment in the Konami Airforce Delta series.
It was released in 2004 exclusively on the PlayStation 2.
The James A. Rhodes State Office Tower is a 41-story,  state office building and skyscraper on Capitol Square in Downtown Columbus, Ohio.
The Rhodes Tower is the tallest building in Columbus and the fifth tallest in Ohio.
Nathan Blake (born 27 January 1972) is a Welsh former professional footballer, pundit and television presenter.
He notably played in the Premier League for Sheffield United, Bolton Wanderers, Blackburn Rovers and Wolverhampton Wanderers.
The 2006 European cold wave was an unusual and deadly cold wave which resulted in abnormal winter conditions over much of Europe.
Southern Europe saw cold and snow, while places in northern Norway saw abnormally mild conditions.
Rashid Abdullah Al Nuaimi راشد عبدالله النعيمي is the former foreign minister of the United Arab Emirates.
Early life and educationNuaimi is a member of the ruling family of Ajman, Al Nuaimi.
Meghan Christina Agosta (born February 12, 1987) is a Canadian women's ice hockey forward, who last played for the Montreal Stars of the Canadian Women's Hockey League.
Agosta plays for the Canada women's national ice hockey team and is a gold (3) and silver medallist at the Winter Olympics of 2006 Turin, 2010 Vancouver, 2014 Sochi, and 2018 Pyeongchang Winter Olympics.
Sheikh Abdullah bin Zayed bin Sultan Al Nahyan (; born 30 April 1972) is the Minister of Foreign Affairs of the United Arab Emirates.
He is a son of the founder of the United Arab Emirates, Zayed bin Sultan Al Nahyan.
The Dagliç is a breed of sheep found primarily in western Anatolia in Turkey.
They are a carpet wool breed used for both meat and dairy production.
Jennifer Botterill,  (born May 1, 1979) is a Canadian former women's hockey player and current hockey broadcast television analyst who played for Harvard University, the Canadian national team, the Mississauga Chiefs, and the Toronto Aeros.
She entered the ice hockey world after starting in the sport of ringette.
Motion, the process of movement, is described using specific anatomical terms.
Motion includes movement of organs, joints, limbs, and specific sections of the body.
Tricia Pursley is a retired American actress.
The Saint Petersburg, Florida-born actress is best known as Devon Shepherd McFadden, daughter of Ellen Shepherd (Kathleen Noone), on All My Children.
Jayna Hefford (born May 14, 1977) is a Canadian retired ice hockey player and current chairperson of the Professional Women's Hockey Players Association.
Hefford got her start in the sport of ringette but soon moved into ice hockey.
Gina Kingsbury (born November 26, 1981) is a Canadian former professional ice hockey player and current general manager of the Toronto PWHL team in the Professional Women's Hockey League (PWHL).
Playing careerBesides hockey, Kingsbury participated in field hockey and softball as a student at the Hotchkiss School in Lakeville, Connecticut.
Window Water Baby Moving is an experimental short film by Stan Brakhage, filmed in November 1958 and released in 1959.
The film documents the birth of the director's first child, Myrrena, by his then-wife Jane Brakhage, now Jane Wodening.
Microsoft Management Console (MMC) is a component of Microsoft Windows that provides system administrators and advanced users an interface for configuring and monitoring the system.
It was first introduced in 1998 with the Option Pack for Windows NT 4.0 and later came pre-bundled with Windows 2000 and its successors.
Katherine Marie "Katie" Weatherston (born April 6, 1983) is a Canadian retired ice hockey player and head coach of the Lebanese women’s national ice hockey team.
As a member of the Canadian women's national ice hockey team, she won Olympic gold in the women's ice hockey tournament at the 2006 Winter Olympics in Turin and medalled at two IIHF Women's World Championships.
The maximum-term method is a consequence of the large numbers encountered in statistical mechanics.
It states that under appropriate conditions the logarithm of a summation is essentially equal to the logarithm of the maximum term in the summation.
Unholy Grave is a Japanese grindcore band that formed in 1993 and are based in the city of Nagoya, Japan.
The band got its name from the song "Beyond the Unholy Grave" by the American death metal band Death.
Sami Jo Small (born March 25, 1976) is a Canadian former ice hockey goaltender.
As a member of the Canadian national team, she was an Olympic gold medallist and four-time World Championship medallist.
Joseph LaFlesche, also known as E-sta-mah-za or Iron Eye (1822–1888), was the last recognized head chief of the Omaha tribe of Native Americans who was selected according to the traditional tribal rituals.
The head chief Big Elk had adopted LaFlesche as an adult into the Omaha and designated him in 1843 as his successor.
The École nationale supérieure d'informatique et de mathématiques appliquées, or Ensimag, is a prestigious French Grande École located in Grenoble, France.
Ensimag is part of the Institut polytechnique de Grenoble (Grenoble INP).
Jedaiah ben Abraham Bedersi (c. 1270 – c. 1340) () was a Jewish poet, physician, and philosopher; born at Béziers (hence his surname Bedersi).
His Occitan name was En Bonet, which probably corresponds to the Hebrew name Tobiah; and, according to the practices of Hachmei Provence, he occasionally joined to his name that of his father, Abraham Bedersi.
Eric Alfred Havelock (; 3 June 1903 – 4 April 1988) was a British classicist who spent most of his life in Canada and the United States.
He was a professor at the University of Toronto and was active in the Canadian socialist movement during the 1930s.
Delaney Collins (born May 2, 1977) is a Canadian retired ice hockey player and coach.
She announced her retirement from international play on August 23, 2011.
Trevor Ruffin (born September 26, 1970) is an American former professional basketball player who played briefly in the National Basketball Association (NBA).
The 6'1" point guard played at the University of Hawaii from 1992 to 1994.
Norma Chávez (born 29 June 1960) served seven terms as a member of the Democratic Party in the Texas House of Representatives representing District 76 (which includes part of El Paso County).
She was defeated for re-election by Naomi Gonzalez in the Democratic primary runoff held on April 13, 2010, and left office in January 2011.
Carr Vattal Van Anda (December 2, 1864 – January 29, 1945) was the managing editor of The New York Times under Adolph Ochs, from 1904 to 1932.
BiographyVan Anda was born in Georgetown, Ohio to Frederick Van Anda and Mariah Davis.
In population genetics, a selection coefficient, usually denoted by the letter s, is a measure of differences in relative fitness.
Selection coefficients are central to the quantitative description of evolution, since fitness differences determine the change in genotype frequencies attributable to selection.
Linux Fund is an organization that has been raising money and making donations to Free and Open Source Software (FOSS) projects since 1999.
IRS 501(c)(3)
The Statutes of Canada (SC) compiles, by year, all the laws passed by the Parliament of Canada since Confederation in 1867.
The Revised Statutes of Canada (RSC) consolidates current federal laws in force, incorporating amendments into acts, adding new substantive acts enacted since the last revision and deleting rescinded acts.
Paul Shaffer and the World's Most Dangerous Band is an American musical ensemble led by Paul Shaffer.
It was David Letterman's house band for 33 years.
The Revised Statutes of Canada (R.S.C. or RSC) consolidates current federal laws in force, incorporating amendments into acts, adding new substantive acts enacted since the last revision and deleting rescinded acts.
Supplements to the RSC contain new or amended statutes, while consolidations republish laws for convenience without changing their legal effect.
Mid-Orange Correctional Facility was an all-male, medium security prison located in the town of Warwick, New York.
It closed in 2011.
Telese Terme, called simply Telese until 1991, is a city, comune (municipality) and former episcopal seat in the Province of Benevento, in the Campania region of southern Italy.
It is located in the valley of the Calore, well known for its sulfuric hot springs.
The 33rd Virginia Infantry Regiment was an infantry regiment raised in the Commonwealth of Virginia for service in the Confederate States Army during the American Civil War.
It was a part of the famed "Stonewall Brigade," named for General Stonewall Jackson.
Cole Harbour is the name for a natural harbour located in the Canadian province of Nova Scotia.
It is located in central Halifax County, with the mouth of the harbour located 6 kilometres northeast of Halifax Harbour.
Muhammetnazar Gapurowiç Gapurow (; 15 February 192213 July 1999) was a Turkmen politician who was the first secretary of the Communist Party of the Turkmen SSR from 1969 until 1985.
He spent his entire career in the Komsomol and Communist Party apparatus, becoming the republic's most influential politician for almost two decades in the Brezhnev era.
Columbus College of Art & Design (CCAD) is a private art school in Columbus, Ohio.
It was founded in 1879 as the Columbus Art School and is one of the oldest private art and design colleges in the United States.
Charles Hamelin  (born April 14, 1984) is a Canadian retired short track speed skater.
In a competitive career that spanned nearly twenty years on the international circuit, Hamelin participated in five Winter Olympic Games (2006, 2010, 2014, 2018 and 2022) and won six Olympic medals, including a national-best four gold medals.
Life for Rent is the second studio album by English singer Dido, released by Arista Records on 29 September 2003.
The album was produced by her brother Rollo Armstrong and American songwriter Rick Nowels.
Cole Harbour  is a provincial electoral district in  Nova Scotia, Canada, that elects one member of the Nova Scotia House of Assembly.
In 1978, Halifax Cobequid was divided into four separate ridings, one of which was named Cole Harbour.
Anastasia "Nastia" Valeryevna Liukin (;  ; born October 30, 1989) is a Russian-born American former artistic gymnast.
She is the 2008 Olympic all-around champion, a five-time Olympic medalist, the 2005 and 2007 World champion on the balance beam, and the 2005 World champion on the uneven bars.
USS Amesbury (DE-66/APD-46), a  of the United States Navy, was named in honor of Lieutenant (jg) Stanton Morgan Amesbury (1916–1942), who was killed in action while flying from the aircraft carrier  during Operation Torch in 1942.
Amesbury was laid down on 8 March 1943 at Hingham, Massachusetts, by the Bethlehem-Hingham Shipyard; launched on 6 June 1943, sponsored by Mrs. Janet Kenney Amesbury, the widow of Lieutenant (jg.)
Jerry Lee Tagge (born April 12, 1950) is a former American football player.
He played college football as quarterback at the University of Nebraska–Lincoln, where he led the Nebraska Cornhuskers to consecutive national championships in 1970 and 1971.
Tineo (Asturian Tinéu) is a concejo (municipality) in the Principality of Asturias, Spain.
It is situated on a small tributary of the Narcea River.
Zizula hylax, 'the Tiny grass blue is a species of blue butterfly.
DescriptionMale upperside: dull violet blue, which changes to a brighter tint of violet in certain lights.
A lint roller or lint remover is a roll of one-sided adhesive paper on a cardboard or plastic barrel that is mounted on a central spindle, with an attached handle.
The device facilitates the removal of lint or other small fibers from most materials such as clothing, upholstery and linen.
To Be or Not to Be is a 1983 American war comedy film directed by Alan Johnson, produced by Mel Brooks, and starring Brooks, Anne Bancroft, Tim Matheson, Charles Durning, Christopher Lloyd, and José Ferrer.
The screenplay was written by Ronny Graham and Thomas Meehan, based on the original story by Melchior Lengyel, Ernst Lubitsch and Edwin Justus Mayer.
Equatorial College School, also known as ECS, is a private secondary school in the Ibanda District of Uganda.
It was founded by a group of professionally skilled teachers in 2002 under the board of Directors headed by Robert Kamasaka, and the current Headmaster is Bigirwa Moses.
Sara María Aldrete Villareal (born September 6, 1964) is a Mexican alleged serial killer who was convicted for supposedly heading a drug-smuggling and human sacrifice cult with Adolfo Constanzo.
The members of the cult, dubbed by the media as The Narcosatanists (Spanish: "Los Narcosatánicos"), called her The Godmother ("La Madrina"), with Constanzo as "The Godfather"  ("El Padrino").
The Ghost Tower of Inverness is an adventure module for the Dungeons & Dragons fantasy roleplaying game, set in the game's World of Greyhawk campaign setting.
The module's title refers to an ancient magical tower located in the southern Abbor-Alz Hills.
Yeah, right may refer to:
Yeah Right!, a skateboarding video
Tortolì (;  or ; ) is a town and comune in Sardinia, in the Province of Nuoro.
GeographyTortolì is situated on the eastern coast of Sardinia.
A zero-suppressed decision diagram (ZSDD or ZDD) is a particular kind of binary decision diagram (BDD) with fixed variable ordering.
This data structure provides a canonically compact representation of sets, particularly suitable for certain combinatorial problems.
Boyd Huppert (born January 22, 1962) is an American journalist and television personality.
He is a news reporter for KARE 11 in Minneapolis–Saint Paul, Minnesota.
Les Sept péchés capitaux is a 1962 French film composed of seven different segments, one for each of the seven deadly sins, each being by different directors and featuring different casts.
At the time it served as a showcase for rising directors and stars, many of whom achieved later fame.
Jill Neimark is an American writer.
Her April 2007 cover story in Discover Magazine, "Understanding Autism" won the 2007 award from the Autism Society of America.
White Plume Mountain is an adventure module for the Advanced Dungeons & Dragons fantasy role-playing game, written by Lawrence Schick and published by TSR in 1979.
The 16-page adventure bears the code "S2" ("S" for "special").
St. Johnsbury Academy (SJA) is an independent, private, coeducational, non-profit boarding and day school located in St. Johnsbury, Vermont, in the United States.
The academy enrolls students in grades 9-12.
Totana is a municipality in the Region of Murcia in Spain.
It has a population of 32008.
Wat Florida Dhammaram () is a Buddhist monastery in Kissimmee, Florida, established by Lung-po Chaokhun Phra Tepvaraporn (Im Arindhamo) in the mid-1990s.
HistoryLung-po visited lay-devotees in Florida and perceived the lack of a Buddhist monastery in the Central Florida area.
The Massacre of the Innocents is the subject of two paintings by Peter Paul Rubens depicting the episode of the biblical Massacre of the Innocents of Bethlehem, as related in the Gospel of Matthew (2:13–18).
The first, measuring 142 x 182 cm, was painted after his return to his native Antwerp in 1608, following eight years spent in Italy.
There are 3500 newspapers being published in Azerbaijan.
The vast majority of them are published in Azerbaijani.
Daisy Louisa C. de Melker (née Hancorn-Smith; 1 June 1886 – 30 December 1932) simply known as Daisy de Melker, was a South African nurse who poisoned two husbands with strychnine for their life insurance money; she also poisoned her only son with arsenic for reasons which are still unclear.
De Melker is the second woman to have been hanged in South African criminal history.
Tshi, Tchwi, or Oji are a group of people living in Ghana.
The chief of these are the Ashanti, Fanti, Akim  and Aquapem.
Josef, Baron von Mering (28 February 1849, in Cologne – 5 January 1908, at Halle an der Saale, Germany) was a German physician.
Working at the University of Strasbourg, Mering was the first person to discover (in conjunction with Oskar Minkowski) that one of the pancreatic functions is the production of insulin, a hormone which controls blood sugar levels.
Andrew College is a private liberal arts college in Cuthbert, Georgia.
It is associated with The United Methodist Church and is the ninth-oldest college in Georgia.
In Belarus, there are both privately held and state-owned newspapers.
Below is a list of newspapers published in Belarus.
Heidelberg University is a private university in Tiffin, Ohio.
Founded in 1850, it was known as Heidelberg College until 1889 and from 1926 to 2009.
Below is a list of newspapers published in Croatia.
List of publicationsNational dailies24sata (est. 2005, based in Zagreb; number one tabloid in the country in terms of circulation) 24sata.hrJutarnji list (est. 1998, based in Zagreb) jutarnji.hrNovi list (est. 1900, based in Rijeka; the oldest Croatian newspaper still in existence) novilist.hrSlobodna Dalmacija (est. 1943, based in Split) slobodnadalmacija.hrVečernji list (est. 1959, based in Zagreb) vecernji.hrSpecialized dailiesPoslovni dnevnik (est. 2004, business and financial daily) poslovni.hrSportske novosti (est. 1945, based in Zagreb; sports daily)
Limnophila aromatica, the rice paddy herb, is a tropical flowering plant in the family Plantaginaceae.
It is native to Southeast Asia, where it flourishes in hot temperatures and grows most often in watery environments, particularly in flooded rice fields.
Babinda is a rural town and locality in the Cairns Region, Queensland, Australia.
In the , the locality of Babinda had a population of 1,253 people.
State Route 15 (SR 15) is a  state highway that travels south-to-north across the entire length of the U.S. state of Georgia, east of its centerline.
This route is part of a multi two-state route 15 that begins at Florida and ends at Georgia at the North Carolina state line.
Britney:
The Videos is the third video album by American recording artist Britney Spears.
Fannie May Confection Brands, Inc. is an American chocolate manufacturer headquartered in Chicago and currently owned by multinational company Ferrero SpA.
Fannie May manufactures a broad variety of products including enrobed, barks, caramels, squares, berries, twist wrapped, molded, flow wrapped, and boxed chocolates.
Osteospermum moniliferum (synonym Chrysanthemoides monilifera) is an evergreen flowering shrub or small tree in the daisy family, Asteraceae.
It is native to southern Africa, ranging through South Africa and Lesotho to Mozambique and Zimbabwe.
Living Stage Theatre Company was a theatre for social change founded in 1966 by Robert A. Alexander (1929–2008).
He served as the artistic director until 1995.
Louisville Museum Plaza was a 62-story skyscraper that was planned for Louisville, Kentucky, United States.
By August 1, 2011, despite the expenditure of public funds on its behalf, its developers had officially announced that they were abandoning plans to build it.
Ignat Aleksandrovich Solzhenitsyn (; born 23 September 1972) is a Russian American conductor and pianist.
He is the conductor laureate of the Chamber Orchestra of Philadelphia and the principal guest conductor of the Moscow Symphony Orchestra.
The Logar River (also Lowgar) is a river of Afghanistan.
It gives the name to the Logar Valley and Logar Province.
The women's tournament in ice hockey at the 2006 Winter Olympics was held in Turin, Italy from 11 to 20 February 2006.
Eight countries qualified for the tournament.
Theodore "Ted" Corday (May 8, 1908 – July 23, 1966) was a Canadian-American producer, director and co-creator of soap opera for NBC, most notably the hit series Days of Our Lives.
BiographyBorn in Winnipeg, Manitoba, Corday graduated from the University of Alberta in 1930 and studied law before moving to the United States in 1934.
The Rosy Crucifixion, a trilogy consisting of Sexus, Plexus, and Nexus, is a fictionalized account documenting the six-year period of Henry Miller's life in Brooklyn as he falls for his second wife June and struggles to become a writer, leading up to his initial departure for Paris in 1928.
The title comes from a sentence near the end of Miller's Tropic of Capricorn: "All my Calvaries were rosy crucifixions, pseudo-tragedies to keep the fires of hell burning brightly for the real sinners who are in danger of being forgotten.
The Antipornography Civil Rights Ordinance (also known as the Dworkin–MacKinnon Antipornography Civil Rights Ordinance or Dworkin–MacKinnon Ordinance) is a name for several proposed local ordinances in the United States and that was closely associated with the anti-pornography radical feminists Andrea Dworkin and Catharine A. MacKinnon.
It proposed to treat pornography as a violation of women's civil rights and to allow women harmed by pornography to seek damages through lawsuits in civil courts.
Ryan Steven Lochte ( ; born August 3, 1984) is an American professional swimmer and 12-time Olympic medalist.
Along with Natalie Coughlin, Dara Torres, and Jenny Thompson, he is the second-most decorated swimmer in Olympic history measured by total number of medals, behind only Michael Phelps.
Demon is a multi-looping roller coaster at Six Flags Great America in Gurnee, Illinois and California's Great America in Santa Clara, California.
Both coasters opened in 1976 as Turn of the Century, when each Great America park was owned by Marriott Corporation.
This is a list of female athletes by sport.
Each section is ordered alphabetical by the last name (originally or most commonly known).
Alveolar lung diseases, are a group of diseases that mainly affect the alveoli of the lungs.
CausesAlveoli are the functional units of the lungs.
Pi-Ramesses (; Ancient Egyptian: , meaning "House of Ramesses") was the new capital built by the Nineteenth Dynasty Pharaoh Ramesses II (1279–1213 BCE) at Qantir, near the old site of Avaris.
The city had served as a summer palace under Seti I (c. 1290–1279 BCE), and may have been founded by Ramesses I (c. 1292–1290 BCE) while he served under Horemheb.
Vanity sizing, or size inflation, is the phenomenon of ready-to-wear clothing of the same nominal size becoming bigger in physical size over time.
This has been documented primarily in the United States and the United Kingdom.
Sir Tomu Malaefone Sione,  (17 November 1941 – April 2016), was a political figure from the Pacific nation of Tuvalu.
He worked as a journalist from 1962 to 1968, and held the post of radio announcer in the Broadcasting and Information Department of the administration of the Gilbert and Ellice Islands Colony (GEIC).
In geometry, the grand antiprism or pentagonal double antiprismoid is a uniform 4-polytope (4-dimensional uniform polytope) bounded by 320 cells: 20 pentagonal antiprisms, and 300 tetrahedra.
It is an anomalous, non-Wythoffian uniform 4-polytope, discovered in 1965 by Conway and Guy.
The Goplans or Goplanes (, ) was an early West Slavic tribe that inhabited the central parts of the Kujawy region, with their probable seat at Kruszwica.
They might have been named after the Lake Gopło; Kmietowicz believes the Bavarian Geographer (845) overheard it and recorded it (as Glopeani).
In computing, the Two Generals' Problem is a thought experiment meant to illustrate the pitfalls and design challenges of attempting to coordinate an action by communicating over an unreliable link.
In the experiment, two generals are only able to communicate with one another by sending a messenger through enemy territory.
Roxalana "Roxana" Druse ( – February 28, 1887), was the last woman hanged in the state of New York, and the first woman hanged in 40 years in Central New York.
Her botched execution didn't kill her instantly, further motivating New York officials to replace the gallows with the electric chair in New York in 1890.
Roughing filters provide pretreatment for turbid water or simple, low maintenance treatment  when high water quality is not needed.
External links SANDEC pageBlue filter Inc. (commercial site)Rejuvenation of SSF using HRF techniqueAppropriate technologyWater filters
The Juno Award for "Dance Recording of the Year" has been awarded since 1990, as recognition each year for the best dance music recording by an artist from Canada.
Due to the relatively single-oriented nature of the dance genre, the award is most commonly presented for an individual single or a remix, although it may also be presented for a full album.
The Juno Award for Indigenous Music Album of the Year is an annual award presented by the Canadian Academy of Recording Arts and Sciences for the best album by an Indigenous Canadian artist or band.
It was formerly known as Best Music of Aboriginal Canada Recording (1994–2002), Aboriginal Recording of the Year (2003–2009), and Aboriginal Album of the Year (2010–2016).
The  is a Go competition.
The Women's Meijin is the female version of the Meijin title.
The Forgotten Temple of Tharizdun is an adventure module for the Dungeons & Dragons (D&D) role-playing game, for use in the World of Greyhawk campaign setting.
The module was published by TSR, Inc. in 1982 for the first edition Advanced Dungeons & Dragons rules.
Andrew Startin is an Australian performer, impersonator and television personality.
Startin came to prominence in 1997 as a result of a video tape of him impersonating Sam Newman being sent into The AFL Footy Show in an attempt to win a trip to London.
Isle of the Ape is an adventure module for the Dungeons & Dragons role-playing game World of Greyhawk campaign setting, in which the events occur in a magical demiplane of the same name created by the mad archmage Zagyg Yragerne.
Plot overviewIsle of the Ape is a scenario in which the player characters encounter a gargantuan ape on an isolated island.
Mordenkainen's Fantastic Adventure by  Robert J. Kuntz and Gary Gygax is an adventure module for the Dungeons & Dragons role-playing game, published by TSR, Inc. in 1984.
It originally bore the code "WG5" and was intended for use with the Advanced Dungeons & Dragons first edition rules.
Music for Films is the seventh solo studio album by Brian Eno, released in September 1978 on EG Records.
His third release of experimental electronic material (the others being that year's Ambient 1: Music for Airports and 1975's Discreet Music), it is a conceptual work intended as a soundtrack for imaginary films, although many of the pieces had already appeared in actual films.
Dihydrobenzophenanthridine oxidase (DHBP oxidase) is an enzyme.
In the IUBMB Enzyme Nomenclature, dihydrobenzophenanthridine oxidase is .
Varshakonda is a village in the Jagityal district of Telangana, India.
It follows a panchayat form of government, where Sarpanch is the head of the village.
The U.S. state of Alabama is currently divided into seven congressional districts, each represented by a member of the United States House of Representatives.
Since the 1973 redistricting following the 1970 U.S. census, Alabama has had seven congressional districts.
Corners is a Children's BBC children's television series of the 1980s.
Produced by Alison Stewart, the format of the programme was that viewers would submit questions and queries (usually general knowledge, but sometimes metaphysical or scientific), and the two hosts, Tracy Brabin (later Sophie Aldred and then Diane-Louise Jordan) and Simon Davies, would try to answer the questions, aided by an anthropomorphised animal puppet, Jo Corner, who was performed and puppeteered by Robin Stevens (who later performed as Tom on Ragdoll's Tots TV).
The Angel Makers of Nagyrév (, "Tiszazug poison-mixers") were a group of women living in the village of Nagyrév, Hungary, who, between 1914 and 1929, poisoned to death an estimated 40–100 people.
They were supplied arsenic and encouraged to use it by a local midwife named Zsuzsanna Fazekas, wife of Gyula Fazekas, née Zsuzsanna Oláh (Fazekas Gyuláné Oláh Zsuzsanna).
Nagyrév is a village in Jasz-Nagykun-Szolnok, central Hungary.
It was the location of the Nagyrév culture.
Eelco Martinus ten Harmsen van der Beek (more commonly Harmsen van der Beek or just Beek; October 8, 1897 – July 24, 1953) was a Dutch illustrator and commercial artist.
Abroad, he is best remembered for his illustration of Enid Blyton's Noddy books.
The World's Most Beautiful Swindlers () is a 1964 crime comedy anthology film composed of five segments, each of which was created with a different set of writers, directors, and actors.
Cast Mie Hama as a bar hostess (segment "Les Cinq Bienfaiteurs de Fumiko") Ken Mitsuda as a rich client (segment "Les Cinq Bienfaiteurs de Fumiko") Nicole Karen as a French tourist (segment "La rivière de diamants")
T. O. Morrow is a supervillain appearing in American comic books published by DC Comics.
He is responsible for the creation of the Red Tornado, Red Inferno, Red Torpedo, Red Volcano, and Tomorrow Woman androids, the last of these with the help of Professor Ivo.
Jeanne Weber (7 October 1874 – 5 July 1918) was a French serial killer.
She strangled at least 10 children, including her own.
Slotback, sometimes referred to as an S-back or A-back, is a position in gridiron football.
The "slot" is the area between the offensive tackle and the wide receiver.
The  is a Japanese Go competition.
Outline The Women's Kisei is sponsored by NTT DoCoMo, and uses a hayago format, of 30 seconds per move and a 10x1 minute byo-yomi, unlike the Kisei, which uses an eight-hour thinking time format.
Waverley-Fall River-Beaver Bank  is a provincial electoral district in  Nova Scotia, Canada, that elects one member of the Nova Scotia House of Assembly.
It was created in 2003 from Bedford-Fall River and Sackville-Beaver Bank.
Victoria—The Lakes is a provincial electoral district in  Nova Scotia, Canada, that elects one member of the Nova Scotia House of Assembly.
Its Member of the Legislative Assembly (MLA) since the 2017 election has been Keith Bain of the Progressive Conservative Party of Nova Scotia.
The Women's Saikyo (Strongest) is a Go competition.
The tournament was discontinued in 2008.
Matthew John Serra (born June 2, 1974) is an American former professional mixed martial artist and Brazilian Jiu-Jitsu practitioner who competed for the Ultimate Fighting Championship.
He is the co-star of Dana White: Lookin' for a Fight and co-host of the official podcast of the UFC, UFC Unfiltered, alongside Jim Norton.
The Smithville Seminary was a Freewill Baptist institution established in 1839 on what is now Institute Lane in Smithville-North Scituate, Rhode Island.
Renamed the Lapham Institute in 1863, it closed in 1876.
Sackville—Cobequid is a provincial electoral district in  Nova Scotia, Canada, that elects one member of the Nova Scotia House of Assembly.
The riding was created in 1978 when the former district of Halifax Cobequid was redistributed.
St Ignatius' Church, Richmond is a Roman Catholic church located in the Melbourne suburb of Richmond, Victoria, Australia.
It is one of the largest churches in Melbourne outside of the central business district.
Hammonds Plains—Upper Sackville is a former provincial electoral district in Nova Scotia, Canada, which existed from 2003 to 2013.
It elected one member of the Nova Scotia House of Assembly.
The Women's Kakusei was a Go competition.
OutlineThe Women's Kakusei used a knockout format.
The Women's JAL Super Hayago was a Go competition.
OutlineThe Women's JAL Super Hayago was sponsored by Japan Airlines.
Area codes 631 and 934 are the telephone area codes in the North American Numbering Plan (NANP) for Suffolk County, New York, on Long Island.
Area code 631 was created in 1999 in a split from 516; and 934 was added as an overlay in 2016.
The International Society of Bassists (ISB) is a 501(C)(3) not-for-profit organization for anybody who enjoys the double bass.
The society was founded in 1967 by Gary Karr as the International Institute for String Bass (IISB).
Feleti Vakaʻuta Sevele, Lord Sevele of Vailahi (born 7 July 1944) is a Tongan politician who served as the Prime Minister of the Kingdom of Tonga from 30 March 2006 to 22 December 2010.
BiographyEarly lifeLord Sevele was born in Ma’ufanga, Nuku’alofa.
The Asahi Pro Best Ten was a Go competition.
Outline
The Watchman Industrial School and Camp, also known as the Watchman Institute, was founded in 1908 for black youths by Reverend William S. Holland in Providence, Rhode Island.
He based it on the educational theories of Booker T. Washington.
The Asahi Top Eight Players was a Go competition.
OutlineThe final was a best-of-three match.
Gower Street is a two-way street in Bloomsbury, central London, running from Euston Road at the north to Montague Place in the south.
The street is continued from North Gower Street north of Euston Road.
Scholes International Airport at Galveston  is three miles southwest of Galveston, in Galveston County, Texas, United States.
The National Plan of Integrated Airport Systems for 2011–2015 categorized it as a reliever airport.
The Haunted Bookshop is a 1919 novel by Christopher Morley, now in the public domain in the United States.
It has remained a popular representative of the "bibliomystery," a mystery story set in the world of books.
Gunskirchen is a town in the Austrian state of Upper Austria.
GeographyGunskirchen lies in the Hausruckviertel.
The New Haven County Cutters were an independent baseball team based in New Haven, Connecticut.
From 2004 through 2007, the Cutters played in the Canadian-American Association of Professional Baseball (the "Can-Am League", formerly known as the Northeast League in 2004), an independent league that is not affiliated with Major League Baseball nor with the Minor League Baseball organization.
Basrur / Basroor is a village in Kundapura taluk in Udupi district of Karnataka.
Historically Basrur was also called Barcelor, Barcelore, Barcalor, Basnur, Bares, Abu-Sarur and Barsellor.
The Papua New Guinean honours system is the main system of honouring citizens of Papua New Guinea for their services to the country; it consists of three Orders and several medals.
After independence, Papua New Guinea used the Imperial honours system, however, in recognition of the nation's 30th anniversary, a new awards system was adopted.
Leon's Frozen Custard is a family-owned drive-in restaurant specializing in frozen custard, located in Milwaukee, Wisconsin.
Opened in 1942, its current appearance as a "drive-in restaurant" comes from an early 1950s remodel.
In probability theory and statistics, a mixture is a probabilistic combination of two or more probability distributions.
The concept arises mostly in two contexts: A mixture defining a new probability distribution from some existing ones, as in a mixture distribution or a compound distribution.
Pam Ward is an on-air personality for the cable sports television network ESPN, serving as one of the play-by-play announcers for ESPN's coverage of the 2012 and 2013 Women's College World Series of Softball.
She is a graduate of the University of Maryland, College Park with a degree in communications.
Francis Lewis High School (FLHS) is a selective public high school located in Fresh Meadows, in the New York City borough of Queens.
It is one of the most-applied-to public high schools in New York City with 9,468 applicants in 2016.
Copley station is an underground light rail station on the MBTA Green Line, located in the Back Bay section of Boston, Massachusetts.
Located in and named after Copley Square, the station has entrances and exits along Boylston Street and Dartmouth Street.
McKinney National Airport , formerly  Collin County Regional Airport at McKinney, is a general aviation airport located in McKinney, Texas, United States, about 30 miles north of downtown Dallas.
The airport is a reliever airport for Dallas Love Field and Dallas/Fort Worth International Airport.
"Everybody (Backstreet's Back)" is a song by American boy band Backstreet Boys, written and produced by Denniz Pop and Max Martin.
It was released as the first single from the band's second international studio album Backstreet's Back in June 1997, and the third single from their self-titled debut US studio album on March 9, 1998, although the song was already being played by many American radio stations unofficially by importing the Canadian single.
Sin Gwang-su (Korean: 신광수, Hanja: 辛光洙, Japanese: 立山富蔵 (Tateyama Tomizō), born June 27, 1929) is a North Korean national suspected of espionage for North Korea.
He is wanted by Japanese authorities for his alleged participation in abductions of Japanese citizens during the 1970s and 1980s.
Tana Qirqos (variantly spelled Tana Kirkos; also called Tana Chirqos or Tana Chirkos, etc.; Ge'ez: ጣና ቂርቆስ ṭānā qirqos, ጣና ጪርቆስ ṭānā č̣irqos) is an island in the eastern part of Lake Tana in Ethiopia, near the mouth of the Gumara River, having a latitude and longitude of .
It is considered a holy island, and only monks of the Ethiopian Church live there.
Greenfield High School is a public high school in Greenfield,  Wisconsin, United States.
It serves grades 9-12 for the Greenfield School District.
Steve Hartsell (born January 6, 1978, Ann Arbor, Michigan) is an American former competitive pair skater.
With sister Danielle Hartsell, he is the 1999  U.S. National Champion and the 1997 World Junior Champion.
Human reproduction is sexual reproduction that results in human fertilization to produce a human offspring.
It typically involves sexual intercourse between a sexually mature human male and female.
The NFL on Westwood One Sports is the branding for Cumulus Broadcasting subsidiary Westwood One's radio coverage of the National Football League.
These games are distributed throughout the United States and Canada (the latter through TSN Radio).
The Chevron Cars are anthropomorphic vehicles who were part of an advertising campaign of the Chevron Corporation consisting of television spots, print ads, billboards, and toy cars available at Chevron retail locations.
HistoryTheir debut in television commercials on May 1, 1995, featured talking cars done in clay animation, with a variety of car colors each with different personalities.
Danielle Hartsell (born November 21, 1980, in Ann Arbor, Michigan) is an American former competitive pair skater.
With brother Steve Hartsell, she is the 1999  U.S. National Champion and 1997 World Junior Champion.
Joel Meyers is an American sportscaster who is the play-by-play announcer of the New Orleans Pelicans of the National Basketball Association (NBA).
He also is the lead host of "Above the Rim", which airs weekdays from 10am-1pm ET on SiriusXM NBA Radio.
Jeffrey McFadden is a Canadian classical guitarist, and a recording artist for Naxos Records.
He is known for his recordings of works by composers of the romantic era such as Fernando Sor and Napoleon Coste.
Zee Cine Award for Best Track of the Year is chosen from public-opinion poll, and the song is declared a winner at the actual ceremony.
This category was first founded in 2004 and it is considered a prestigious award for a particular song of the film to win.
Zachary Thompson Space (born January 27, 1961) is an American lawyer and politician and the former U.S. Representative for , serving from 2007 until 2011.
He is a member of the Democratic Party.
Like many institutions that draw public interest, the Supreme Court of the United States has frequently been depicted in fiction, often in the form of legal drama.
While early depictions of the Supreme Court in fiction tended to be reverential, over time depictions became more critical and melodramatic.
In geometry, the Fermat cubic, named after Pierre de Fermat, is a surface defined byMethods of algebraic geometry provide the following parameterization of Fermat's cubic:
In projective space the Fermat cubic is given byThe 27 lines lying on the Fermat cubic are easy to describe explicitly: they are the 9 lines of the form (w :
There Are Doors is a speculative fiction novel  by American writer Gene Wolfe, published in 1988.
The narrative follows a department store salesman as he tries to track down his short-lived girlfriend.
Boot Polish is a 1954 Hindi comedy drama directed by Prakash Arora and produced by Raj Kapoor.
It won Best Film at the Filmfare Awards.
Osmium is the debut album of American funk band Parliament, led by George Clinton.
The album has a psychedelic soul sound with a spirit of experimentation that is more similar to early Funkadelic than the later R&B-inspired Parliament albums.
Note: The Little River of northeastern Indiana is also sometimes known as the Little Wabash River.
The Little Wabash River is a  tributary of the Wabash River in east-central and southeastern Illinois in the United States.
Fools Garden (until 2003 known as Fool's Garden) is a German band formed in 1991 in the city of Pforzheim.
The founders of the group and the only permanent members are vocalist Peter Freudenthaler and guitarist Volker Hinkel.
Dallas Executive Airport , formerly Redbird Airport, is six miles (10 km) southwest of Downtown Dallas, in Dallas County, Texas, United States.
The airport is used for general aviation and is a reliever airport for Dallas Love Field.
Suzanne Bennett (1893–1974) (also known as Lady Hubert Wilkins) was an Australian-born actress who achieved success on Broadway in the United States in the 1920s.
She was born Susannah Catherine Evans in the goldfields town of Walhalla, Victoria to John Evans (a miner) and Alice Louisa Whitlow.
The Volunteer Defence Corps (VDC) was an Australian part-time volunteer military force of World War II modelled on the British Home Guard.
The VDC was established in July 1940 by the Returned and Services League of Australia (RSL) and was initially composed of ex-servicemen who had served in World War I.
The Zee Cine Award Best Director is chosen via the public of India.
The winners are announced in March.
Call of the Mastodon is a compilation album of early recordings from the American metal band Mastodon.
It was released on February 7, 2006, by Relapse Records.
KMYU (channel 12) is a television station licensed to St. George, Utah, United States, serving as the MyNetworkTV affiliate for the state of Utah.
It is owned by Sinclair Broadcast Group alongside Salt Lake City–based CBS affiliate KUTV (channel 2) and independent station KJZZ-TV (channel 14).
Clásicos de la Provincia is the sixth album by Colombian singer/composer Carlos Vives.
Released in Colombia in late 1993, and internationally on February 22, 1994, the album is a collection of Colombian vallenato standards.
Demon's World is a 1989 run and gun arcade video game originally developed by Toaplan and published in Japan by Taito and in North America by Catalina Games.
In the game, players assume the role of two ghost hunters to fight against several ghosts and monsters that were unleashed upon Earth by the titular demon king.
Gordon Scott Durie (born 6 December 1965 in Paisley) is the Scottish former professional footballer, a utility player who usually played as a striker.
He played for East Fife, Hibernian, Chelsea, Tottenham Hotspur, Rangers and Hearts.
Jun of Gojoseon was the last king of Gija Joseon.
He was succeeded by Wiman (Wei Man), whose usurpation of the throne began the dynasty of Wiman Joseon of Gojoseon.
The World Can't Wait (WCW) is a coalition group in the United States dedicated to mobilizing mass resistance to what it describes as crimes committed by the US government.
Initially formed as an ad-hoc coalition to organize mass protests to force the George W. Bush Administration from office, WCW has also protested against the Iraq and Afghanistan wars, the continued operation of the Guantanamo Bay prison, the use of torture by the U.S. government under both the Bush and Obama administrations, and against anti-abortion groups and legislation.
Pedro A. Galván (1833? - December 12, 1892) was a Mexican general, 25th governor of the Mexican state of Colima (interim), and governor of the state of Jalisco.
A main avenue in the residential area of the City of Colima bears his name.
A search engine is a software system that finds web pages that match a web search.
They search the World Wide Web in a systematic way for particular information specified in a textual web search query.
Tous contre un was a daily quiz show, broadcast live on Télé-Québec in Canada from September 2001 to March 2003.
It was hosted by Marc-André Coallier.
Warcon Enterprises was a New York City based independent record label focusing on mostly post-hardcore, started by Bob Chiappardi of Concrete Marketing and Kevin Lyman, the founder of Warped Tour, in 2004.
Warcon was a sponsor of the Rockstar Taste of Chaos tour.
Atmoda ('Awakening' in Latvian) was a weekly newspaper in Latvian SSR and Latvia issued from December 1988 to April 1992.
It was published by the Popular Front of Latvia (PFL) and was the first independent, opposition paper in the Latvian SSR.
Oziel Hlalele Motaung was a member of the Pan-African Parliament and minister of sports and agriculture from Lesotho.
ReferencesMembers of the Pan-African Parliament from LesothoLiving peopleYear of birth missing (living people)
Malebaka Flory Bulane is a member of the Pan-African Parliament from Lesotho.
ReferencesMembers of the Pan-African Parliament from LesothoYear of birth missing (living people)
Letuka Nkole is a member of the Pan-African Parliament from Lesotho.
ReferencesMembers of the Pan-African Parliament from LesothoLiving peopleYear of birth missing (living people)
Nedim C. Buyukmihci is an American doctor of veterinary medicine, specializing in veterinary ophthalmology, and founder of the Association of Veterinarians for Animal Rights.
A leading figure within the animal rights movement, he is an outspoken critic of scientific testing on animals.
Heroic virtue is the translation of a phrase coined by Augustine of Hippo to describe the virtue of early Christian martyrs.
The phrase is used by the Roman Catholic Church.
Wellington Football Club are a football club based in the village of Wellington, Herefordshire, England.
The club is affiliated to the Herefordshire County FA.
Thabang Nyeoe is a member of the Pan-African Parliament from Lesotho.
In 2006 Nyeoe founded the Basotho Democratic National Party (BDNP), promising to improve the quality of life for residents.
The Kadowaki–Woods ratio is the ratio of A, the quadratic term of the resistivity and γ2, the linear term of the specific heat.
This ratio is found to be a constant for transition metals, and for heavy-fermion compounds, although at different values.
William A. Bottrell (born October 27, 1952) is an American record producer and songwriter.
He has collaborated with Michael Jackson, Madonna, Electric Light Orchestra and Sheryl Crow.
This is a list of ministers of ecclesiastical affairs of Denmark since the establishment of the Ministry for Ecclesiastical Affairs in 1916.
List of ministers since 1916|-!
Khauhelo Deborah Raditapole was a member of the Pan-African Parliament from Lesotho.
Raditapole was born in Maseru on 7 August 1938.
Neil Michael Knight Smith (born 27 July 1967) is a former English cricketer who played in seven One Day Internationals from 1986 to 1996.
He then went on to work at Warwick School for boys, Myton Road, Warwick as the Groundsman but has recently semi retired.
The Mary Ellis grave is a grave located behind an AMC Theatre on U.S. Route 1 in New Brunswick, Middlesex County, New Jersey, United States.
The granite gravestone is located on a  high stonework pyramid in the back parking lot.
Smethwick Rangers Football Club is a football club based in Smethwick, West Midlands, England.
They are currently members of the  and play at the Trevor Brown Memorial Ground in Boldmere, groundsharing with Boldmere St Michaels.
Tenants Purchase Scheme (TPS) is a scheme which allows tenants in public housing estates under the Hong Kong Housing Authority to purchase their flats.
The price is set to be much lower than the market prices of private flats and Home Ownership Scheme (HOS) owing to the age of flats and restriction on selling.
Seedskadee National Wildlife Refuge is a National Wildlife Refuge of the United States located in western Sweetwater County in the state of Wyoming.
It covers 26,400 acres (106 km2) managed by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, an agency within the U.S. Department of the Interior.
Bara Kaman is the unfinished mausoleum of Ali Adil Shah II in Bijapur, Karnataka in India.
Ali Adil Shah of the Adil Shahi dynasty wanted to build a mausoleum of unmatched architectural quality.
The bacon and egg pie is a savoury pie consisting of a crust containing bacon, egg and sometimes onion, mushrooms, bell peppers, peas, tomato, fresh herbs and cheese.
It is popular in New Zealand.
Garnet Fredrick Coleman (born September 8, 1961) is an American politician.
From 1991 to 2022, he was a member of the Texas House of Representatives for the 147th district, located entirely within Houston and Harris County.
The Southern San Luis Valley Railroad is a fallen flag shortline railroad that was located in Southern Colorado.
Best known in its final years of operation, it served a connection with the Denver and Rio Grande Western Railroad at Blanca, Colorado.
Jessica's Law is the informal name given to a 2005 Florida law, as well as laws in several other states, designed to protect potential victims and reduce a sexual offender's ability to re-offend which includes a mandatory minimum sentence of 25 years in prison and lifetime electronic monitoring when the victim is less than 12 years old.
A version of Jessica's Law, known as the Jessica Lunsford Act, was introduced at the federal level in 2005 but was never enacted into law by Congress.
Bewdley Town Football Club is a football club based in Bewdley, Worcestershire, England.
They are currently members of the  and play at Ribbesford Meadows.
The First Reformed Church, historically known as the Dutch Reformed Church, is located in New Brunswick, New Jersey on 160 Neilson Street.
It is adjacent to the First Reformed Church Cemetery in the churchyard.
The Korg MS2000 is a virtual analog synthesizer produced by the Japanese electronic musical instrument manufacturer Korg.History and featuresThe synthesizer was offered as either a 44-key board or as a rack module, the latter being controlled by an external keyboard controller, hardware sequencer or a computer, making use of the system's very complete MIDI implementation.
It was intended to bring the sound and basic functionality of the MS-10 and MS-20 back into the keyboard market, but with the updated technology of Virtual Analog Synthesis.
San Lorenzo High School, also known as "SLz", is a public high school located in Ashland, California, and is part of the San Lorenzo Unified School District.
The school's student body reflects the diversity of its surrounding and nearby communities, namely San Lorenzo, San Leandro, Hayward, and Oakland.
88 Minutes is a 2007 American thriller film directed by Jon Avnet and starring Al Pacino, Alicia Witt, Leelee Sobieski, William Forsythe, Deborah Kara Unger, Amy Brenneman, Neal McDonough and Benjamin McKenzie.
In the film, famed forensic psychiatrist Dr. Jack Gramm (Pacino) is one of the most sought-after profilers in the world.
The Queen of Spades () is a 1982 film adaptation of the 1834 Alexander Pushkin short story of the same name.
Film is verbatim (including epigraphs) screening of Pushkin's story.
Austin Chisangu Liato (born 23 August 1965) is a Zambian politician.
He served as a member of the National Assembly for Kaoma Central between 2002 and 2011 and as Minister of Labour and Social Security from 2008 until 2011.
An institute of consecrated life is an association of faithful in the Catholic Church canonically erected by competent church authorities to enable men or women who publicly profess the evangelical counsels by religious vows or other sacred bonds "through the charity to which these counsels lead to be joined to the Church and its mystery in a special way".
They are defined in the 1983 Code of Canon Law under canons 573–730.
Dorothea Nancy Waddingham (21 June 1899 – 16 April 1936) was an English nursing home matron who was convicted of murder.
LifeDorothea Waddingham was born Dorothy Nancie Merelina Allan Chandler, with her parents marrying a year after her birth – Waddingham being her father's surname.
Nepenthes hamata  is a tropical pitcher plant endemic to Sulawesi, where it grows at elevations of 1400–2500 m above sea level.
The specific epithet hamata is derived from the Latin word hamatus, meaning "hooked".
The Graveyard Shift is a 1965 novel by Harry Patterson, also known as Jack Higgins (Patterson being Higgins's real name).
The novel tells the story of Nick Miller, a newly recruited police officer who lives with his rich brother but who will not take part in his brother's business.
Phillip Ferdinand Mahre (born May 10, 1957) is a former World Cup alpine ski racer, widely regarded as one of the greatest American skiers of all time.
Mahre competed on the World Cup circuit from 1976 to 1984.
The Ais Gill rail accident occurred on the Settle–Carlisle line in Northwest England on 2 September 1913.
Two long trains were both ascending a steep gradient with some difficulty, because their engines generated barely enough power to carry the load.
Joram Macdonald Gumbo is a Zimbabwean politician, member of parliament, former member of the Pan-African Parliament from Zimbabwe, and former cabinet minister.
He is a member of the Zanu-PF party.
Saviour Kasukuwere (born 23 September 1970) is a Zimbabwean politician who served in the government of Zimbabwe as Minister of Local Government, Rural Development and National Housing between October and November 2017.
He was also the ZANU–PF party's national political commissar until December 2017.
Charles Shanyurai Majange is a member of the Pan-African Parliament from Zimbabwe.
See also List of members of the Pan-African ParliamentReferencesYear of birth missing (living people)
is a very popular masculine Japanese given name.
Possible writingsHaruto can be written using different kanji characters and can mean:春人, "spring, person"春大, "spring, big"春斗, "spring, dipper"晴人, "sunny/clear up, person"晴斗, "sunny/clear up, dipper"治人, "govern, person"陽斗, "sun/yang, dipper"遥都, "distant, city"The name can also be written in hiragana or katakana.
Paurina Gwanyanya Mpariwa (born 1964), sometimes written as Paurine Mpariwa, is a member of the Pan-African Parliament from Zimbabwe.
Mpariwa is the chair of the Public Accounts Committee.
University of Nashville was a private university in Nashville, Tennessee.
It was established in 1806 as Cumberland College.
John James Anderson (born April 18, 1956) is an American actor and producer best known to television audiences for playing the character of Jeff Colby in both the prime-time soap opera Dynasty and its spin-off series The Colbys throughout the 1980s.
CareerJames is a veteran of daytime soaps, first appearing in Search for Tomorrow in the late 1970s.
Paul Themba Nyathi is a Zimbabwean opposition politician, the director of elections for the Arthur Mutambara-led faction of the Movement for Democratic Change and a member of the Pan-African Parliament from Zimbabwe.
Nyathi was a teacher who joined the Zimbabwe African People's Union of Joshua Nkomo, fighting against the white-minority government of Ian Smith.
Childish describes something suitable for a child, or something (particularly behavior) that is immature.
It may also refer to: Billy Childish (born 1959), English artist, writer, and musician Childish Gambino (born 1983), American actor, writer, comedian, director, and musician Childish Major (born 1991), American rapper and record producerSee also Minor (law)
Brierley Hill & Withymoor F.C. was a football club based in Halesowen, West Midlands, England.
They were established in 1955, originally as Oldswinford F.C., and went through several subsequent name changes, but folded in 2008.
Marais des Cygnes (Swans marsh in English) may refer to: Marais des Cygnes massacre prior to the American Civil War Marais des Cygnes Massacre Memorial Park a Kansas state historic site near that commemorates the 1858 massacre of the same name Battle of Marais des Cygnes during the American Civil War Marais des Cygnes National Wildlife Refuge in Kansas in the United States Marais des Cygnes River in Kansas and Missouri in the United StatesSee also Marais (disambiguation)
Cygnes (disambiguation)
Elizabeth Van Valkenburgh (née Woodley; July 1799 – January 24, 1846) was an early American murderer who was hanged for poisoning her husband.
BackgroundElizabeth Woodley was born in Bennington, Vermont.
Gordon Thomson (born March 2, 1945) is a Canadian actor widely known for his role as Adam Carrington on the 1980s American prime time soap opera Dynasty.
Early lifeThomson began acting while studying English at McGill University in Montreal.
Saint Sabinian of Troyes (died 275) was a pagan who converted to Christianity (tradition states that he was converted by Patroclus of Troyes), and became a martyr under Aurelian.
He was beheaded at Rilly-Sainte-Syre near Troyes.
Bromyard Town Football Club is a football club based in Bromyard, Herefordshire, England.
They are currently members of the  and play at Delahay Meadow.
Bustleholme Football Club is a football club based in West Bromwich, West Midlands, England.
They are currently members of the  and play at York Road in Rowley Regis.
John MacDonald Coleman (born February 21, 1958) is an American actor who has played the role of Steven Carrington in the 1980s prime time soap opera Dynasty (1982–1988), Noah Bennet in the science-fiction drama series Heroes (2006–2010), State Senator Robert Lipton on The Office (2010–2013), and United States Senator William Bracken on Castle (2012–2015).
Early life and educationColeman was born February 21, 1958, in Easton, Pennsylvania, in the Lehigh Valley region of eastern Pennsylvania.
Jane Toppan (born Honora Kelley; March 31, 1854 – August 17, 1938), nicknamed Jolly Jane, was an American serial killer who is known to have committed twelve murders in Massachusetts between 1895 and 1901; she confessed to a total of thirty-one murders.
The killings were carried out in Toppan's capacity as a nurse, targeting patients and their family members.
Cokeville Meadows National Wildlife Refuge is a National Wildlife Refuge of the United States located in Wyoming.
It is managed by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, an agency within the U.S. Department of the Interior.
Dudley Town Football Club is a football club based in Dudley, West Midlands, England.
The club is one of the oldest non-league teams in the Midlands region, having been established in 1888.
Goodrich F.C. was a football club based in Wolverhampton, West Midlands, England.
The team joined the West Midlands (Regional) League Division
Alvey Augustus Adee (November 27, 1842 – July 4, 1924) was a long-time official with the United States Department of State who served as the acting Secretary of State in 1898 during the Spanish–American War.
He was the second of three senior State Department officials—the first being William Hunter and the third Wilbur J. Carr—whose overlapping careers provided continuity and good management in American foreign policy for over a century, from the administration of President Andrew Jackson until that of Franklin D. Roosevelt.
Amelia Sach (1873 – 3 February 1903) and Annie Walters (1869 – 3 February 1903) were two British murderers better known as the Finchley baby farmers.
BackgroundLittle is known about Annie Walters, but Amelia Sach's background is well-documented: Sach was baptised Frances Amelia Thorne in Hampreston, Dorset on 5 May 1867.
Gornal Athletic Football Club is a football club based in Lower Gornal, Dudley, in the West Midlands county in England.
They are currently members of the  and play at the Garden Walk Stadium.
Claire Yarlett (born February 15, 1965) is an English-born American actress, best known for her role as Bliss Colby in The Colbys, the spin-off series to the 1980s prime-time soap opera Dynasty.
She also starred on the short-lived TV series Robin's Hoods.
Great Wyrley F.C. was a football club based in Great Wyrley, Staffordshire, England.
They joined the West Midlands (Regional) League Division Two in 1980.
WS-MetaDataExchange is a web services protocol specification, published by BEA Systems, IBM, Microsoft, and SAP.
WS-MetaDataExchange is part of theWS-Federation roadmap; and is designed to work in conjunction with WS-Addressing, WSDL and WS-Policy to allow retrieval of metadataabout a Web Services endpoint.
Heath Hayes Football Club was a football club based in Heath Hayes near Cannock, Staffordshire, England.
They played at the Coppice Colliery Ground.
Def Wish Cast (sometimes known as Def Wish Posse or abbreviated to DWC) are an Australian hip hop group from Western Sydney.
BiographyDef Wish Cast are an Australian hip hop group who are among the few founders of Australian hip hop, "having created something localised that was revered and is now mythologized."
The Employment Standards Act of British Columbia (Canada), is legislation enacted by the provincial government of British Columbia to protect the rights of working people.
Sections within the act outline the employers responsibility to their employees, notably things such as minimum wage, meal breaks, and parental leave.
Belle Gunness, born Brynhild Paulsdatter Størseth (November 11, 1859 – possibly April 28, 1908), nicknamed Hell's Belle, was a Norwegian-American serial killer who was active in Illinois and Indiana between 1884 and 1908.
Gunness is thought to have killed at least fourteen people, most of whom were men she enticed to visit her rural Indiana property through personal advertisements, while some sources speculate her involvement in as many as forty murders making her one of the most prolific female serial killers in history.
Ledbury Town Football Club is a football club based in Ledbury, Herefordshire, England.
They are currently members of the  and play at New Street.
Lye Town Football Club is a football club based in the Black Country town of Lye, Stourbridge, West Midlands, England.
They are currently members of the  and play at the Sports Ground.
Transformus is a regional Burning Man art festival hosted on Marvin's Mountaintop in Masontown, West Virginia.
The community forms a temporary city called Mysteria during the third weekend in July which includes art installations, neighborhoods, lively nightlife and camps which offer services to the community.
Anna Marie Hahn (born Filser; July 7, 1906 – December 7, 1938) was a German-born American serial killer.
BiographyEarly lifeAnna Hahn was the youngest of twelve children though five of her siblings had died by the time Anna was born.
Market Drayton Town Football Club is a football club based in Market Drayton, Shropshire, England.
They are currently members of the  and play at the Greenfields Sports Ground.
Ko Jum (เกาะจำ, also Koh Jum) or Ko Pu (เกาะปู) is a part of Nuea Khlong district in Krabi province, Thailand.
Ko Jum consists of three villages: Ban Ko Pu, Ban Ting Rai, and Ban Ko Jum.
The adjective hygrophanous refers to the color change of mushroom tissue (especially the pileus surface) as it loses or absorbs water, which causes the pileipellis to become more transparent when wet and opaque when dry.
When identifying hygrophanous species, one needs to be careful when matching colors to photographs or descriptions, as color can change dramatically soon after picking.
Pathfinder National Wildlife Refuge is located in the U.S. state of Wyoming and includes 16,807 acres (68 km2).
The refuge is managed by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service and the U.S. Bureau of Reclamation, both agencies within the U.S. Department of the Interior.
Pelsall Villa F.C. was a football club based in the village of Pelsall, near Walsall, West Midlands, England.
The team kit consisted of black and red striped shirts, black shorts and black socks.
Sentul City (previously Bukit Sentul) is a modern housing area situated at Sentul, Babakan Madang, Bogor Regency, in West Java, Indonesia.
Its geographical coordinates are 6 52' 0" South, 112 26' 0" East and its original name (with diacritics) is Sentul.
Léonie Fuller Adams (December 9, 1899 – June 27, 1988) was an American poet.
She was appointed the seventh Poet Laureate Consultant in Poetry to the Library of Congress in 1948.
Shawbury United Football Club are a football club originally from Shawbury, Shropshire, but currently based in Shrewsbury, Shropshire, England.
They were established in 1992.
Empress Wang Shen'ai (; 384 – 3 October 412), formally Empress Anxi (安僖皇后, literally "the peaceful and careful empress") was an empress of Jin Dynasty (266–420).
Her husband was the developmentally disabled Emperor An.
Tividale Football Club is a football club based in Tividale, near Dudley, West Midlands, England.
They were established in 1954.
Ottilie "Tillie" Klimek (born Otylia Gburek; 1876 – November 20, 1936) was a Polish American serial killer, active in Chicago.
According to accounts, she pretended to have precognitive dreams, accurately predicting the dates of death of her victims, when in reality she was merely scheduling their deaths.
Wednesfield Football Club are a football club based in Wednesfield, West Midlands, England.
They were established in 1961.
Wolverhampton Casuals Football Club are a football club based in Featherstone, near Wolverhampton, England.
Established in 1899, they are currently members of the .
tsclient (Terminal Server Client) is a discontinued  frontend for rdesktop and other remote desktop tools, which allow remotely controlling one computer from another.
It is a GNOME application.
Gunn Margit Aas Andreassen (born 23 July 1973 in Kristiansand) is a former Norwegian biathlete.
Biathlon career
Ravikant Shukla (born 9 July 1987) is an Indian first class cricketer.
Career
Wyrley Rangers F.C. was a football club based in Essington, Wolverhampton, England.
The club was established in 1988.
Kevin Lyman is the founder and operator of the Kevin Lyman Group, formerly known as 4Fini, Inc., a live event production company and brand strategy firm.
His most notable live production is the live music festival series Vans Warped Tour, which attracted about 750,000 people annually and was the longest-running North American festival concert tour.
Saladin the Victorious, also known as Saladin and the Great Crusades (, ), is a 1963 Egyptian epic film directed by Youssef Chahine.
It is written by Yusuf Sibai and others, based on the novel by Naguib Mahfouz.
Rohit Gurunath Sharma (born 30 April 1987) is an Indian international cricketer and the current captain of India national cricket team in all formats.
Considered one of the best batsmen of his generation.
A cystidium (: cystidia) is a relatively large cell found on the sporocarp of a basidiomycete (for example, on the surface of a mushroom gill), often between clusters of basidia.
Since cystidia have highly varied and distinct shapes that are often unique to a particular species or genus, they are a useful micromorphological characteristic in the identification of basidiomycetes.
Bamforth National Wildlife Refuge is located in southern Albany County in the U.S. state of Wyoming and includes 1,116 acres (4.5 km2).
The refuge is managed by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service an agency within the U.S. Department of the Interior.
Hotman Paris Hutapea (born 20 October 1959) is an Indonesian lawyer, presenter and businessman.
He is known for his flamboyant style, high-profile clients,  luxurious lifestyle, and mistresses.
HNoMS Æger was a Rendel gunboat built for the Royal Norwegian Navy at Karljohansvern Naval Yard in 1894, as the last of the 2. class gunboats.
Larger than the other, older 2. class gunboats, Æger had a 38 mm (1.5 inch) armoured deck.
Sammy Leung Chi Kin is an actor under TVB, DJ, singer, and host for Commercial Radio Hong Kong.
Life and careerLeung was raised in Kwai Shing Estate, and received his secondary education at St. Stephen's College and La Salle College, graduating with a score of 25 (1A5B) in the HKCEE.
Operation Savannah was the South African code name for their military incursion into Angola in 1975–1976.
It was part of the South African Border War and arose due to the Angolan War of Independence.
An ashik (, ; ; —all from ) or ashugh (; ) is traditionally a singer-poet and bard who accompanies his song—be it a dastan (traditional epic story, also known as hikaye) or a shorter original composition—with a long-necked lute (usually a bağlama or saz) in Turkic (primarily Turkish and Azerbaijani cultures, including Iranian Azerbaijanis) and non-Turkic cultures of South Caucasus (primarily Armenian and Georgian).
In Azerbaijan, the modern ashik is a professional musician who usually serves an apprenticeship, masters playing the bağlama, and builds up a varied but individual repertoire of Turkic folk songs.
Leon Petrażycki (; ; born 13 April 1867, in Kołłątajewo, Mogilev Governorate, now in Belarus – 15 May 1931, in Warsaw) was a Polish philosopher, legal scholar, and sociologist.
He is considered an important forerunner of the sociology of law.
Hutton Lake National Wildlife Refuge is located in southern Albany County in the U.S. state of Wyoming and includes 1,968 acres (8 km2).
The refuge is managed by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service an agency within the U.S. Department of the Interior.
Daddy-Long-Legs is a 1912 epistolary novel by the American writer Jean Webster.
It follows the protagonist, Jerusha "Judy" Abbott, as she leaves an orphanage and is sent to college by a benefactor whom she has never seen.
Louise Peete (September 20, 1880 – April 11, 1947) was a convicted American serial killer.
Peete was first convicted of the 1920 murder of wealthy mining engineer Jacob C. Denton, and was sentenced to life in prison in 1921.
Darkness, also known as World at War, is a series of six fantasy novels by Harry Turtledove.
Though a fantasy, its general history, geography, and combatants are analogs of World War II, called the "Derlavai War" in this universe.
Preethi Nair (born 1971) is a British author of Indian heritage.
Born in Kerala, India, she came to the United Kingdom as a child.
{{Infobox military unit|unit_name= 3rd Battalion 6th Marines|image=3rdBN6thMAR.jpg|caption= 3/6 Insignia|dates= August 14, 1917 – August 20, 1919June 14, 1922 – August 10, 1922June 12, 1924 – November 10, 1928November 1, 1940 – March 27, 1946October 17, 1949 – present|country= |allegiance= |branch= |type= Light Infantry|role=
The mission of the Marine Corps rifle squad is to locate, close with and destroy the enemy by fire and maneuver and/ or repel enemy assault by fire and close combat.
Here Come the Mummies (HCTM) is an American funk rock band best known for its live performances and anonymous band members.
The band consists of various professional musicians based in Nashville, Tennessee.
Sympetally (fused petals) is a flower characteristic that historically was used to classify a grouping of plants termed Sympetalae, but this term has been abandoned in newer molecular based classifications, although the grouping has similarity to the modern term asterids.
History Sympetalae Rchb.
The Artsakh Defence Army () was the defence force of the breakaway Republic of Artsakh.
Established in 1992, it united previously disorganized self-defence units which were formed in the early 1990s with the goal of protecting the ethnic Armenian population of Nagorno-Karabakh from attacks by Soviet and Azerbaijani armed forces.
The Hive is a recording studio in North Hollywood, Los Angeles at 5500 Cahuenga Blvd, owned and run by the members of the alternative rock band 311.
Origin In 2000, after finishing touring for Soundsystem, the five members of 311 grew distraught with having to pay upwards of $2,000 a day in professional recording studios.
Ernest Vincze (born 1942 in Budapest, Hungary) is a film and television cinematographer.
Among his credits are the 1986 film Biggles, the television movie Escape from Sobibor and the Sean Penn and Madonna vehicle Shanghai Surprise.
Hong Kong Mathematical High Achievers Selection Contest (HKMHASC, Traditional Chinese: 香港青少年數學精英選拔賽) is a yearly mathematics competition for students of or below Secondary 3 in Hong Kong.
It is jointly organized by Po Leung Kuk and Hong Kong Association of Science and Mathematics Education since the academic year 1998-1999.
Wing Commander: Prophecy is the fifth installment in the Wing Commander science fiction space combat simulator franchise of computer games.
The game was originally released in 1997 for Windows, produced by Origin Systems and distributed by Electronic Arts, and in 2003, a GBA conversion was produced by Italy-based Raylight Studios and distributed by Destination Software.
Barry Long (1 August 1926 – 6 December 2003) was an Australian spiritual teacher and writer.
Early lifeBarry Long was born and raised in Australia and had little formal education.
Tubiflorae is a botanical name, meaning “with tubular flowers”.
It was used in the Engler system (and derived systems such as the Wettstein system) for: an order in the Sympetalae.
This List of operations of the South African Border War details the military operations conducted by the South African Defence Force during the South African Border War: Operation Savannah (1975) Operation Bruilof (1978) Operation Seiljag (1978) Operation Reindeer (1978) Operation Rekstok (1979) Operation Safraan (1979) Operation Sceptic (Smokeshell) (1980)  Operation Vastrap (July 1980) Operation Klipklop (1980)Operation Winter (1980) Operation Wishbone SAAF Operation (December 1980) Operation Vasbyt (1981) Operation Konyn (1981) Operation Carnation (1981) Operation Protea (1981) Operation Daisy (1981) Operation Kerslig (1981) Operation Rekstok III SAAF Operation (March 1982) Operation Super (1982) Operation Meebos (1982) Operation Bravo (Angola) SAAF Operation (October 1982)
Operation Maanskyn SAAF Operation (1983) Operation Drama (1983) Operation Phoenix (South Africa) (1983) Operation Skerwe SAAF Operation (1983) Operation Dolfyn (1983) Operation Karton
Conrad I (also Konrad) (born 915/920 - died 20 August 997) was Duke of Swabia from 983 until 997.
His appointment as duke marked the return of Conradine rule over Swabia for the first time since 948.
The green-billed malkoha (Phaenicophaeus tristis) is a species of non-parasitic cuckoo found throughout Indian Subcontinent and Southeast Asia.
The birds are waxy bluish black with a long graduated tail with white tips to the tail feathers.
Operation Protea was a military operation during the South African Border War and Angolan Civil War in which South African Defence Forces (SADF) destroyed a number of South West Africa People's Organisation (SWAPO) bases in Angola.
During the operation, which took place from 23 August to 4 September 1981, up to 5,000 SADF soldiers occupied Cunene province, Angola.
MS NKS 1867 4° is a 1760 paper manuscript now in the Danish Royal Library, Copenhagen (section Den nye kongelige samling).
It contains skaldic poetry, assorted runological information, the Prose Edda and the Poetic Edda, plus Sólarljóð, and 16 illustrations based on the Eddas.
Vince Flaherty is an American producer, recording artist, writer, and political activist.
In 2014, he was a Democratic candidate for the U.S. House to represent the 33rd Congressional District of California on a platform of fulfilling 434 promises.
Frederick III of Holstein-Gottorp (22 December 1597 – 10 August 1659) was a Duke of Holstein-Gottorp.
He was the elder son of Duke Johann Adolf of Holstein-Gottorp and Princess Augusta of Denmark.
Mortenson Lake National Wildlife Refuge is located in southern Albany County in the U.S. state of Wyoming and includes 1,776 acres (7.2 km2).
The refuge is managed by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service an agency within the U.S. Department of the Interior.
Frating is a village and small civil parish of the Tendring district of Essex, England.
It is about  east of Colchester and  northwest of Clacton-on-Sea.
The banded bay cuckoo or bay-banded cuckoo (Cacomantis sonneratii) is a species of small cuckoo found in the Indian subcontinent and Southeast Asia.
Like others in the genus they have a round nostril.
One of the modern systems of plant taxonomy, the Dahlgren system was published by monocot specialist Rolf Dahlgren in 1975 and revised in 1977, and  1980.
However, he is best known for his two treatises on monocotyledons in 1982  and revised in 1985.
The American Heavyweight Wrestling Championship was the first heavyweight professional wrestling championship in the United States.
The title existed from 1881 through approximately 1922.
Operation Askari was a military operation during 1983 in Angola by the South African Defence Force (SADF) during the South African Border War.
BackgroundOperation Askari, launched on 6 December 1983, was the SADF's sixth large-scale cross-border operation into Angola and was intended to disrupt the logistical support and command & control capabilities of People's Liberation Army of Namibia (PLAN) the military wing of the South West Africa People's Organisation SWAPO, in order to suppress a large-scale incursion into South West Africa that was planned for the beginning of 1984.
SÁM 66 (Stofnun Árna Magnússonar á Íslandi) is an 18th-century manuscript now at the Árni Magnússon Institute for Icelandic Studies, Iceland.
Reference information and a copy of this manuscript can be found online.
Cuculus saturatus, better well known as the Himalayan cuckoo, is a brooding parasitic bird that is part of the Cuculidae family.
The species breeds from the Himalayas eastward to southern China and Taiwan.
Naas General Hospital () is a general hospital located on the Craddockstown Road at Naas in County Kildare in Ireland.
It was founded in 1841 and is managed by Dublin Midlands Hospital Group.
Hückelhoven (;  ) is a town in the district of Heinsberg, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is situated on the river Rur, approx.
The common hawk-cuckoo (Hierococcyx varius), popularly known as the brainfever bird, is a medium-sized cuckoo resident in the Indian subcontinent.
It bears a close resemblance to the Shikra, even in its style of flying and landing on a perch.
John Edward "Jack" Clarke (14 July 1933 – 3 December 2001) was an Australian rules footballer and coach in the VFL.
An Essendon and Victorian champion, Clarke was one of the premier midfielders of the VFL for well over a decade, Clarke led Essendon to the flag in 1962 as captain, and also played in the victorious 1965 side.
Christine Harris (born 1958) is an Australian actress and producer, born and raised in South Australia.
She is currently director of HIT Productions theatre touring company.
Number 19 Squadron (sometimes written as No. XIX Squadron) is a squadron of the Royal Air Force.
It was the first squadron to operate the Supermarine Spitfire.
Wassenberg (;  ) is a town in the district Heinsberg, in North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany.
It is situated near the border with the Netherlands, on the river Rur, approx.
The following is a list of coaches who have coached the Essendon Football Club at a game of Australian rules football in the Australian Football League (AFL), formerly the VFL.
Key:  C = Coached W = Won L = Lost D = Drew * = Caretaker coachReferencesEssendon Football Club coachesEssendon Football ClubEssendon Football Club coaches
The Wyoming toad (Anaxyrus baxteri), also known commonly as Baxter's toad, is a species of toad in the family Bufonidae.
The Wyoming toad is an extremely rare amphibian that exists only in captivity and within Mortenson Lake National Wildlife Refuge in Wyoming in the United States.
Tiny Sepuku is a syndicated weekly comic strip created by Ken Cursoe based around a character named Tiny Sepuku (usually addressed simply as "Tiny" by readers - every question starts with the salutation "Dear Tiny") who answers questions from his readers and generally dispenses love advice.
Publication history Tiny Sepuku began in 1997 as a parody of Hello Kitty, and achieved success in alternative weeklies by the year 2000.
This is a list of plants found in the wild in Caatinga vegetation of Brazil.
Acanthaceae Anisacanthus brasiliensis Lindau Anisacanthus trilobus Lindau Lophostachys floribunda Ness Ruellia asperula Benth. & Hook.f.
The World/American Greco-Roman Heavyweight Championship and the World/European Greco-Roman Heavyweight Championship was a Greco-Roman professional wrestling championship contested for throughout the continent of Australia, Europe and North America.
The title existed from 1875 through approximately 1937.
AM 738 4to, Edda oblongata or Langa Edda, is a late 17th-century Icelandic paper manuscript currently housed in the Árni Magnússon Institute for Icelandic Studies, Reykjavík.
The manuscript is most notable for its distinct oblong format and the numerous colorful illustrations it contains.
Philippe Nicolet (born 4 January 1953 in Lausanne), is a Swiss film director of both documentaries and fiction.
Journalist and scriptwriter, he was the first editor-in-chief of the Lausanne television station before embarking on a project tracing the history of relations between Switzerland and the European Union for the Jean Monnet Foundation, of which Professor Henri Rieben was the president.
The Shebang was a radio show broadcast weekday mornings from 6 am to 9 am AEST in Sydney, Australia, on Triple M.
It was hosted by Marty Sheargold, Fifi Box and Paul Murray with Anthony Maroon as the show anchor.
Ramesh Chandappa Jigajinagi (born 28 June 1952) is an Indian politician from Karnataka and currently a member of Lok Sabha.
He was Union Minister of State for Drinking Water and Sanitation in 2016.
WWF WrestleMania Challenge is a professional wrestling video game based on the World Wrestling Federation (WWF), released in 1990 for the Nintendo Entertainment System by Acclaim Entertainment under the LJN label, and in 1992 for the Family Computer by Hot-B.
The game features nine wrestlers: Hulk Hogan, André the Giant, "Macho King" Randy Savage, The Ultimate Warrior, Big Boss Man, Brutus "The Barber" Beefcake, Ravishing Rick Rude, Hacksaw Jim Duggan, and "Yourself" (a generic character).
Henry Glass (January 7, 1844 – September 1, 1908) was a rear admiral in the United States Navy, best remembered for his role in the bloodless capture of Guam in the Spanish–American War.
He was also a Union veteran of the American Civil War.
Doug Richardson is an American screenwriter and novelist who writes action movies and thrillers.
He is best known for writing movies like Die Hard 2, Bad Boys, and Hostage and was the first Hollywood writer to sell a spec script for a million dollars.
Thibault is a French personal name and surname, a form of Theobald, a Germanic name composed from the elements  theod- "people" and bald "bold".
Surname Arthur Thibault (191483), Canadian farmer and political figure in Saskatchewan Bernard Thibault (born 1959), French trade unionist, Secretary of the Confédération Générale du Travail (CGT) Conrad Thibault (190387), American baritone vocalist David Thibault (born before 2013), French-Canadian singer and Elvis impersonator Dominique Thibault (born 1988), Canadian ice hockey player Emmanuel Thibault (born 1974), French dancer François-Anatole Thibault (18441924), French writer and Nobel Laureate François Thibault (born before 1992), French Maître de chai (Cellar Master) Geneviève Thibault de Chambure (190275), French musicologist Gérard Thibault d'Anvers (15741629),
Congressional stagnation is an American political theory that attempts to explain the high rate of incumbency re-election to the United States House of Representatives.
In recent years this rate has been well over 90 per cent, with rarely more than 5-10 incumbents losing their House seats every election cycle.
St. Peter's is an independent brewery founded in 1996 by John Murphy in former agricultural buildings adjacent to St. Peter’s Hall in St Peter, South Elmham, near Bungay in the English county of Suffolk.
The brewery produces cask ales, but is best known for its cold-filtered bottled beers.
David R. Mayhew (born May 18, 1937) is a political scientist and Sterling Professor of Political Science Emeritus at Yale University.
He is widely considered one of the leading scholars on the United States Congress, and the author of nine influential books on American politics, including Congress: The Electoral Connection.
Ursula Bruhin (born 19 March 1970) is a Swiss snowboarder, World Champion in Parallel Giant Slalom in 2001 and 2003.
External links  UrsulaBruhin.ch Interview with Ursula Bruhin Swiss female snowboardersSnowboarders at the 2006 Winter Olympics1970 birthsLiving peopleOlympic snowboarders for Switzerland21st-century Swiss women
The Main Missile and Artillery Directorate of the Ministry of Defense of the Russian Federation (), commonly referred to by its transliterated Russian acronym GRAU (), is a department of the Russian Ministry of Defense.
It is subordinate to the Chief of Armament and Munition of the Russian Armed Forces, a vice-minister of defense.
D.C. is an American drama television series that ran from April 2 to 23, 2000 on The WB.
The series followed five young interns in Washington, D.C. as they navigate their careers and lives in the nation's capital.Initially titled D.C. Interns, the series was given a 13-episode order in May 1999 to debut as a midseason replacement.
The First Malayan Five-Year Plan (1956 – 1960) was the first economic development plan launched by the Malayan government just before independence in 1957.
The colonial British government had concentrated available resources on fighting the Malayan communist insurgency instead of developing the rural areas of Malaya.
Susan J. Isaacs (born December 18, 1946 in Nashville, Tennessee) is an American professional poker player, who has been based in Las Vegas, Nevada, since 1986.
Isaacs has finished in the money of six World Series of Poker (WSOP) ladies' events, and won the ladies' championship back-to-back in 1996 and 1997.
Sir Leo George Chiozza Money (; 13 June 1870 – 25 September 1944), born Leone Giorgio Chiozza, was an Italian-born economic theorist who moved to Britain in the 1890s, where he made his name as a politician, journalist and author.
In the early years of the 20th century his views attracted the interest of two future Prime Ministers, David Lloyd George and Winston Churchill.
Jan Vang Sørensen (born Jan Vang Hansen;  1960) is a retired Danish football player, turned professional poker player from Odense.
He has won two bracelets at the World Series of Poker.
Grateful Dawg is a documentary film released in 2000 which chronicles the friendship and musical relationship of musicians Jerry Garcia and David Grisman.
Director and producer Gillian Grisman uses multiple videos, as well as live recordings, to help show this bond between two friends and musicians.
The Lake Ontario Shore Railroad (LOSRR) was a short-lived common carrier railroad in New York that was absorbed by the Rome, Watertown and Ogdensburg Railroad.
Construction The LOSRR was chartered to be built from Suspension Bridge, New York to Oswego, New York in 1858.
For interest rate swaps, the Swap rate is the fixed rate that the swap "receiver" demands in exchange for the uncertainty of having to pay a short-term (floating) rate, e.g. 3 months LIBOR over time.
(At any given time, the market's forecast of what LIBOR will be in the future is reflected in the forward LIBOR curve.)
Carole Kay Hillard (née Rypkema; August 14, 1936 – October 25, 2007) was the first woman to serve as Lieutenant Governor of South Dakota.
PersonalHillard was born in Deadwood, South Dakota, August 14, 1936, to Edward Rypkema and Vernell Peterson; she was one of three daughters born to them.
A Pareto chart is a type of chart that contains both bars and a line graph, where individual values are represented in descending order by bars, and the cumulative total is represented by the line.
The chart is named for the Pareto principle, which, in turn, derives its name from Vilfredo Pareto, a noted Italian economist.
Roberto Vecchioni (born 25 June 1943) is an Italian singer-songwriter, lyricist, teacher, and writer.
BiographyVecchioni was born in Carate Brianza, Province of Monza and Brianza, to a Neapolitan family.
Madison Alexander Cooper, Jr., (June 3, 1894 – September 28, 1956) was an American businessman and philanthropist from Waco, Texas, and is best remembered for his long novel  Sironia, Texas (1952), which made publishing history at that time as the longest novel in English originally published in book form, in two volumes totaling 1,731 pages, containing an estimated 840,000 words.
Life and careerCooper was born in Waco, and was the son of Madison Alexander and Martha Dillon (Roane) Cooper.
The Outlets were an American rock band, formed in Boston, consisting of David Alex Barton on vocals, his brother Rick Barton on lead guitar, Mike White on bass and Walter Gustafson on drums.
HistoryAn acclaimed live band, The Outlets attained success in the greater Boston music scene but failed to gain national attention when they signed with Restless/Enigma in 1985, despite modest critical acclaim including a recommendation from Billboard.
Snowboarding is a sport at the Winter Olympic Games.
It was first included in the 1998 Winter Olympics in Nagano, Japan.
Gustav Tschermak von Seysenegg (19 April 1836 – 24 May 1927) was an Austrian mineralogist.
BiographyHe was born in Litovel, Moravia, and studied at the University of Vienna, where he obtained a teaching degree.
{{Infobox officeholder| name = Tejaswini Gowda| image = | caption = | birth_date =| birth_place
= Doddarayappanahalli-Kanivenarayanapura, Bangalore, Karnataka| residence =Bangalore Rural| death_date =| death_place =| office = Member of Legislative CouncilKarnataka| constituency = Karnataka| termstart = 18 July 2018| office1  = Member of Parliament, Lok Sabha| constituency1 = Kanakapura| term1 = 2004-2009| predecessor1 = H. D. Deve Gowda| successor1 = D. K. Suresh (as MP for Bangalore Rural)| party = Bharatiya Janata Party (since 2014)| otherparty          = Indian National Congress (2004-2014)| spouse = Sreeramesh| children = 2| website = http://tejasvinigowda.com/| footnotes = | date = 6 April || year = 2009 || source = https://web.archive.org/web/20060622225933/http://164.100.24.208/ls/lsmember/biodata.asp?mpsno=4050 }}Dr. Tejaswini Gowda (born 11 November 1966) was a member of the 14th Lok Sabha (2004–2009) from Kanakapura in Karnataka (India), representi
"Ukridge's Dog College" is a short story by P. G. Wodehouse, which first appeared in the United States in the April 1923 issue of Cosmopolitan, and in the United Kingdom in the May 1923 Strand.
It features the irrepressible Stanley Featherstonehaugh Ukridge and was included in the collection Ukridge, published in 1924.
Jan Hansen (born 14 February 1955) is a retired Norwegian footballer who played for Ranheim, Rosenborg BK and Norway.
He played 252 league matches for Rosenborg, ranking fifth overall in the club history.
Lowe is a Swedish synthpop band formed in 2002 by Leo Josefsson (vocals/guitar), Rickard Gunnarsson (bass) and Mehdi Bagherzadeh (keyboards).
The music can be described as emotional pop, contrived with electronic elements.
There are four overriding requirements for a patent to be granted under United Kingdom patent law.
Firstly, there must have been an invention.
Rudok, also spelt Rutok and Rutog, more properly Rudok Dzong (), is a town that served as the historical capital of the Rudok area in Western Tibet on the frontier with Ladakh.
In the 1911 Encyclopædia Britannica, it is described as being "picturesquely situated" on the side of a hill standing isolated in the plain near the east end of Lake Pangong.
Puntamba is a market town situated on the banks of the Godavari River in Rahata taluka, Ahmednagar District in the state of Maharashtra in India.
The village contains the 14th and the final resting place of the sage Changdev.
Cheryl Maas (born 28 September 1984) is a Dutch snowboarder, who competed at the 2006 Winter Olympics in Torino, finishing 11th at the halfpipe.
She also competed at the 2014 Winter Olympics in Sochi, finishing 20th in slopestyle and in the 2018 Winter Olympics in PyeongChang where she finished 23rd in slopestyle and 20th in big air.
Digital economy rankings was published as a one-off exercise by the Economist Intelligence Unit as the follow-up to their previous e-readiness rankings.
This was done to reflect the increasing influence of ICT in economic (and social) progress.
Hugh Francis Durrant-Whyte  (born 6 February 1961) is a British-Australian engineer and academic.
He is known for his pioneering work on probabilistic methods for robotics.
Kevin John Bowyer (; born 9 January 1961) is an English organist, known for his prolific recording and recital career and his performances of modern and extremely difficult compositions.
BiographyBowyer was born on 9 January 1961 in Southend-on-Sea, England.
The Manor Ground was a football stadium in Oxford, England, the home of Oxford United (previously known as Headington United) between 1925 and 2001.
It hosted United's record crowd of 22,750 against Preston North End in an FA Cup 6th Round match on 29 February 1964.
The Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974 (JJDPA) is a United States federal law providing formula grants to states that follow a series of federal protections on the care and treatment of youth in the juvenile justice and criminal justice systems.
Summary of provisionsThe JJDPA, as amended, contains four "core protections" or "core mandates" for youth:  "Deinstitutionalization/Deincarceration of Status Offenders" (DSO) — Generally prohibits the detention of status offenders and non-offenders (i.e., youth who are runaways, truants or curfew violators) in juvenile detention or adult jails.
Geoffrey Barraclough (10 May 1908 – 26 December 1984) was an English historian, known as a medievalist and historian of Germany.
Biography
The European Social Fund Plus (ESF+) is one of the European Structural and Investment Funds (ESIFs), which are dedicated to improving social cohesion and economic well-being across the regions of the Union.
The funds are redistributive financial instruments that support cohesion within Europe by concentrating spending on the less-developed regions.
William Fraser McDowell (February 4, 1858 – April 26, 1937) was an American bishop of the Methodist Episcopal Church, elected in 1904.
He was born in Millersburg, Ohio, U.S.EducationWilliam earned the A.B. degree in 1879 from Ohio Wesleyan University, Delaware, Ohio.
Intracrine refers to a hormone that acts inside a cell, regulating intracellular events.
In simple terms it means that the cell stimulates itself by cellular production of a factor that acts within the cell.
is a 1961–63 novel by Nobel Prize-winning Japanese author Yasunari Kawabata.
The novel is narrated from the present and past perspective of the characters and how they differed from each other's point of view.
"Ukridge's Accident Syndicate" is a short story by P. G. Wodehouse, which first appeared in the United States in the May 1923 issue of Cosmopolitan, and in the United Kingdom in The Strand Magazine in June 1923, under the title "Ukridge, Teddy Weeks and the Tomato".
It features the irrepressible Stanley Featherstonehaugh Ukridge, and was included in the collection Ukridge, published in 1924.
The First Malaysia Plan (1966–1970) was an economic development plan implemented by the government of Malaysia.
It was the first economic plan for the whole of Malaysia—Sabah and Sarawak included—as opposed to just Malaya, which previous economic plans (such as the Second Malayan Five Year Plan) had confined themselves to.
The lieutenant governor of South Dakota is the second-ranking member of the executive branch of South Dakota state government and also serves as presiding officer of the South Dakota Senate.
The lieutenant governor succeeds to the officer of governor if the office becomes vacant, and may also serve as acting governor if the governor is incapacitated or absent from the state.
Con Solo Pensarlo is a 1998 album by the Belgian singer Axelle Red.
The albums contains Spanish versions of French songs that appeared on Axelle Red's two previous albums, Sans Plus Attendre and À Tâtons.
Sir William FitzWilliam (1526–1599) was an English Lord Justice of Ireland and afterwards Lord Deputy of Ireland.
In 1587, as Governor of Fotheringhay Castle, he supervised the execution of the death sentence on Mary, Queen of Scots.
Amanda Marshall is the 1995 debut album by Canadian singer Amanda Marshall.
The album peaked at number four on the RPM Albums Chart and has also been certified Diamond by the CRIA with over 1,000,000 copies sold in Canada, making it Marshall's best-selling album of her career.
In mathematics, the tensor bundle of a manifold is the direct sum of all tensor products of the tangent bundle and the cotangent bundle of that manifold.
To do calculus on the tensor bundle a connection is needed, except for the special case of the exterior derivative of antisymmetric tensors.
